Sent2
restate (words) from one language into another language.
a group of nations having common interests.
soften or disintegrate by means of chemical action, heat, or moisture.
devote oneself to a special area of work.
a porch that resembles the deck on a ship.
either of the two halves of a bow from handle to tip.
a supplementary part or accessory.
place limits on (extent or access).
be opposite.
cause to become alive again.
something with no concrete substance.
a name given to a product or service.
a set sequence of steps, part of larger computer program.
cover the front or surface of.
estimate the value of.
a mental representation of the meaning or significance of something.
an occasion on which people can assemble for social interaction and entertainment.
make fine adjustments or divide into marked intervals for optimal measuring.
a narrative song with a recurrent refrain.
handle effectively.
appoint someone to (a position or a job).
organization of performers and associated personnel (especially theatrical).
office furniture consisting of a container for keeping papers in order.
signal by winking.
any of the equal portions into which the capital stock of a corporation is divided and ownership of which is evidenced by a stock certificate.
establish or strengthen as with new evidence or facts.
a communication (usually brief) that is written or spoken or signaled.
a denture anchored to teeth on either side of missing teeth.
terminate an association with.
reduce or cause to be reduced from a solid to a liquid state, usually by heating.
treat the body or any part of it by wrapping it, as with blankets or sheets, and applying compresses to it, or stuffing it to provide cover, containment, or therapy, or to absorb blood.
make underscoring marks.
surround completely.
the end of a word (a suffix or inflectional ending or final morpheme).
an assertion that someone is guilty of a fault or offence.
create an image or likeness of.
bend into the shape of a crank.
mock or make fun of playfully.
be extremely bad in quality or in one's performance.
the relative position or standing of things or especially persons in a society.
consider in detail and subject to an analysis in order to discover essential features or meaning.
persuade somebody to accept something.
matter that remains after something has been removed.
anything that approximates the shape of a column or tower.
become inflated.
a heavy toxic silvery-white radioactive metallic element; occurs in many isotopes; used for nuclear fuels and nuclear weapons.
say mean things.
be offended or bothered by; take offense with, be bothered by.
a number that expresses the accomplishment of a team or an individual in a game or contest.
subject to political, religious, or moral censorship.
a casual or unexpected convergence.
a connection between an electrical device and a large conducting body, such as the earth (which is taken to be at zero voltage).
the act of ending something.
a well-known or notable person.
an agent that operates some apparatus or machine.
determine or indicate the place, site, or limits of, as if by an instrument or by a survey.
act in unison or agreement and in secret towards a deceitful or illegal purpose.
be tantamount or equivalent to.
cause to move by pulling.
a voluntary gift (as of money or service or ideas) made to some worthwhile cause.
a loud utterance of emotion (especially when inarticulate).
go back to a previous state.
a body of people who settle far from home but maintain ties with their homeland; inhabitants remain nationals of their home state but are not literally under the home state's system of government.
a formal series of statements showing that if one thing is true something else necessarily follows from it.
cause to move; cause to be in a certain position or condition.
earnest and conscientious activity intended to do or accomplish something.
a system of units used to express the weight of something.
some situation or event that is thought about.
feel or have a desire for; want strongly.
a blank character used to separate successive words in writing or printing.
a facility where things can be deposited for storage or safekeeping.
make a certain noise or sound.
cause to be in brief contact with.
get to know or become aware of, usually accidentally.
the chief executive of a republic.
touch with the lips or press the lips (against someone's mouth or other body part) as an expression of love, greeting, etc..
the force used in pulling.
a gradual decrease; as of stored charge or current.
a number or letter indicating quality (especially of a student's performance).
an impetuous rush toward someone or something.
suffer failure, as in some enterprise.
the property of copious abundance.
a short note recognizing a source of information or of a quoted passage.
(often followed by `of') a large number or amount or extent.
sway to and fro.
a change for the better.
a sacrament admitting a baptized person to full participation in the church.
a courteous expression (by word or deed) of esteem or regard.
cause (a computer) to execute a single command.
give to, and receive from, one another.
a punctuation mark (.) placed at the end of a declarative sentence to indicate a full stop or after abbreviations.
something craved, especially an intravenous injection of a narcotic drug.
increase rapidly and in an uncontrolled manner.
make high-pitched sounds.
a special variety of domesticated animals within a species.
the discipline that records and interprets past events involving human beings.
a person who is the aim of an attack (especially a victim of ridicule or exploitation) by some hostile person or influence.
military personnel lost by death or capture.
use cunning or deceit to escape or avoid.
a loss entailed by giving up or selling something at less than its value.
a sudden sharp decrease in some quantity.
change the key of, in music.
a message refusing to accept something that is offered.
move so that an opening or passage is obstructed; make shut.
cut the surface of; wear away the surface of.
a fruiting structure resembling an umbrella or a cone that forms the top of a stalked fleshy fungus such as a mushroom.
a list of particulars (as a playbill or bill of fare).
a diacritical mark used to indicate stress or placed above a vowel to indicate a special pronunciation.
the trait of believing in the honesty and reliability of others.
an attempt to get something.
go up or advance.
clean with hard rubbing.
become injured, broken, or distorted by pressure.
point or cause to go (blows, weapons, or objects such as photographic equipment) towards.
give or convey physically.
do lacework.
an open jar of glass or porcelain used as an ornament or to hold flowers.
preserve with sugar.
a motorboat with an open deck or a half deck.
a process of becoming larger or longer or more numerous or more important.
be careful or certain to do something; make certain of something.
give something useful or necessary to.
edge tool used in shaving.
learn by reading books.
lengthen or extend in duration or space.
refrain from doing something.
something that provides direction or advice as to a decision or course of action.
a representation of a person that is exaggerated for comic effect.
a separate and self-contained entity.
make less severe or harsh.
a judgment of the qualities of something or somebody.
beat severely with a whip or rod.
shape or influence; give direction to.
produce buds, branches, or germinate.
a particular environment or walk of life.
a vertical array of numbers or other information.
be cognizant or aware of a fact or a specific piece of information; possess knowledge or information about.
any likeness of a person, in any medium.
any of various controls or devices for regulating or controlling fluid flow, pressure, temperature, etc..
cause to form a united, orderly, and aesthetically consistent whole.
informal terms for the leg.
the goal intended to be attained (and which is believed to be attainable).
place or set apart.
assets belonging to or due to or contributed by an individual person or group.
an event that accomplishes its intended purpose.
place in a line or arrange so as to be parallel or straight.
bedclothes consisting of a lightweight cloth covering (an afghan or bedspread) that is casually thrown over something.
a protective covering consisting of netting; can be mounted in a frame.
a measure of how likely it is that some event will occur; a number expressing the ratio of favorable cases to the whole number of cases possible.
someone who frequently finds fault or makes harsh and unfair judgments.
recovery or preservation from loss or danger.
observe with care or pay close attention to.
to compel or deter by or as if by threats.
extend out or project in space.
be the host of or for.
make invalid for use.
feel about or towards; consider, evaluate, or regard.
a proportion in relation to a whole (which is usually the amount per hundred).
an approximate definition or example.
the state or fact of being an owner.
a natural elevation (especially a rocky one that juts out into the sea).
evaluate or estimate the nature, quality, ability, extent, or significance of.
the part played by a person in bringing about a result.
a nonmetallic univalent element that is normally a colorless and odorless highly flammable diatomic gas; the simplest and lightest and most abundant element in the universe.
a single chance or instance.
move or sway in a rising and falling or wavelike pattern.
a period of time containing 365 (or 366) days.
face and withstand with courage.
(medicine) the condition in which an organism can resist disease.
a brief statement.
do duty or hold offices; serve in a specific function.
a member of a military unit trained as shock troops for hit-and-run raids.
get on top of; deal with successfully.
a casualty to military personnel resulting from combat.
change directions as if revolving on a pivot.
a quantity that is twice as great as another.
provoke or stir up.
the trade of a funeral director.
catch fire.
a concentrated example of something.
a substance that is used as a medicine or narcotic.
the successful action of solving a problem.
develop in a positive way.
go away or leave.
(nautical) brace consisting of a heavy rope or wire cable used as a support for a mast or spar.
a passageway through or under something, usually underground (especially one for trains or cars).
be fully aware or cognizant of.
move very slightly.
incorporate a food ingredient into a mixture by repeatedly turning it over without stirring or beating.
pass over, across, or through.
refrain from harming.
strike as if by whipping.
manual turning of a fetus in the uterus (usually to aid delivery).
enclose in or as if in a frame.
take up or begin anew.
discover or come upon accidentally, suddenly, or unexpectedly; catch somebody doing something or in a certain state.
the act of starting something for the first time; introducing something new.
an angular or rounded shape made by folding.
teach or refine to be discriminative in taste or judgment.
an interpretation of a text or action.
draw a line or lines underneath to call attention to.
a prediction of the course of a disease.
have need of.
an indication of damage.
a momentary brightness.
cause to regain consciousness.
a mental state characterized by a pessimistic sense of inadequacy and a despondent lack of activity.
the act of changing the location of something.
move in circles.
bring (several things) into consonance or relate harmoniously.
cause to move; cause to be in a certain position or condition.
the state of being joined or united or linked.
become distinct and acquire a different character.
the goal intended to be attained (and which is believed to be attainable).
take possession of by force, as after an invasion.
give entirely to a specific person, activity, or cause.
make a schedule; plan the time and place for events.
like better; value more highly.
give to a charity or good cause.
furnish with rubrics or regulate by rubrics.
a petition or appeal made to a person of superior status or rank.
break down, literally or metaphorically.
react verbally.
a slight surface cut (especially a notch that is made to keep a tally).
cause to move; cause to be in a certain position or condition.
the act of forcing yourself (or being forced) into or through a restricted space.
give a definition for the meaning of a word.
pursue for food or sport (as of wild animals).
act against or in opposition to.
money deposited in a bank or some similar institution.
bring into being.
a short theatrical performance that is part of a longer program.
a party of people assembled for dancing.
(computer science) a computer that provides client stations with access to files and printers as shared resources to a computer network.
forbid the public distribution of ( a movie or a newspaper).
(computer science) a computer file that contains text (and possibly formatting instructions) using seven-bit ASCII characters.
an acknowledgment of appreciation.
an outward semblance that misrepresents the true nature of something.
cause to become widely known.
perceive with the senses quickly, suddenly, or momentarily.
government income due to taxation.
shape or influence; give direction to.
put an end to.
the particular portion of space occupied by something.
have trust in; trust in the truth or veracity of.
logical or comprehensible arrangement of separate elements.
an arrangement scheme.
to close within bounds, limit or hold back from movement.
get or gather together.
censure severely or angrily.
a pair of people who live together.
become unfit for consumption or use.
become engaged or intermeshed with one another.
take vows, as in religious order.
the general activity of selling.
allow to have.
a public secondary school usually including grades 9 through 12.
physician and American Revolutionary leader; signer of the Declaration of Independence (1745-1813).
British term for the luggage compartment in a car.
have or exploit a monopoly of.
reduce (petroleum) to a simpler compound by cracking.
attract; cause to be enamored.
to remain emotionally or intellectually attached.
transporting goods commercially at rates cheaper than express rates.
the preservation and careful management of the environment and of natural resources.
fall out of the pod or husk.
abstain from eating.
feel hot or painful.
come back after being refused.
loss of ability to function normally.
someone who controls resources and expenditures.
a kitchen appliance used for cooking food.
rinse one's mouth and throat with mouthwash.
an approximate calculation of quantity or degree or worth.
turn on or around an axis or a center.
an offer of marriage.
show submission or fear.
the entering of a legal document into the public record.
shrivel or wither or mature imperfectly.
have faith or confidence in.
start to burn or burst into flames.
the cognitive processes whereby past experience is remembered.
enclosure consisting of a section of canal that can be closed to control the water level; used to raise or lower vessels that pass through it.
an onerous or difficult concern.
someone (or something) on which expectations are centered.
a sharp side formed by the intersection of two surfaces of an object.
hitting a golf ball off of a tee with a driver.
the remains of something that has been destroyed or broken up.
utter with force; utter vehemently.
treat with an agent; add (an agent) to.
pass through the esophagus as part of eating or drinking.
cause to move or operate freely within a bounded space.
secrete or form water, as tears or saliva.
the state of being connected.
the statement of a theme in notes of lesser duration (usually half the length of the original).
the time yet to come.
the state of owing something (especially money).
a specific size and style of type within a type family.
demand as being one's due or property; assert one's right or title to.
damage the reputation of.
give equal rights to; of women and minorities.
lengthen in time; cause to be or last longer.
a bundle (especially one carried on the back).
a person who conveys (carries or transmits).
an intuitive understanding of something.
adhering to moral principles.
have sexual intercourse with.
partake in a feast or banquet.
show devotion to (a deity).
make a clicking or ticking sound.
run or flow slowly, as in drops or in an unsteady stream.
write a computer program.
a state of order in which events conform to the law.
an electronic memory device.
a light line that is used in lettering to help align the letters.
the trait of sincere and steadfast fixity of purpose.
look furtively.
get rid of.
get or find back; recover the use of.
(statistics) a coefficient assigned to elements of a frequency distribution in order to represent their relative importance.
cause to move round and round.
become due for repayment.
provide veterinary care for.
make new.
put a coat on; cover the surface of; furnish with a surface.
strike out (a batter), (of a pitcher).
regain or make up for.
duplicate or match.
indistinct articulation.
the act of applying force in order to move something away.
drive forcibly as if by a punch.
an unpleasant or disappointing surprise.
make less hostile; win over.
informal terms referring to a domestic cat.
sorting one thing from others.
the act of fastening things together.
a group of people living together in a camp.
an unforeseen development.
cater to popular taste to make popular and present to the general public; bring into general or common use.
make impure.
an implement consisting of a length of wood.
formally reject or disavow a formerly held belief, usually under pressure.
turn or go to the port or left side, of a ship.
impose, involve, or imply as a necessary accompaniment or result.
fix to; attach.
assign to a specific task.
be the culminating event.
the act of constructing something.
(computer science) the part of a computer (a microprocessor chip) that does most of the data processing.
consider again (a bill) that had been voted upon before, with a view to altering it.
cancel, annul, or reverse an action or its effect.
determine the essential quality of.
the pursuit and killing or capture of wild animals regarded as a sport.
manipulate the registers of an organ.
move to and fro or from place to place usually in an irregular course.
the act of granting rights.
a reflex response to the passage of electric current through the body.
become pregnant; undergo conception.
the act of certifying or bestowing a franchise on.
the act of apportioning or distributing something.
the state of being more than full.
the conscious subjective aspect of feeling or emotion.
the condition of having been proposed as a suitable candidate for appointment or election.
hunt or shoot snipe.
hunt with hawks.
(construction) a layer of masonry.
a usually brief attempt.
the phenomenon of a propagating wave (light or sound) being thrown back from a surface.
examine minutely.
be fond of.
a person who is under the protection or in the custody of another.
strike sharply, as in some sports.
fly in or as if in a glider plane.
a fourth part of a year; three months.
make tight or tighter.
provide with power and authority.
run at a moderately swift pace.
form an impenetrable cover over.
a mold for setting concrete.
wear away or erode.
something that is desired intensely.
store (liquids or gases) in bottles.
be a sign or indication of.
the act of choosing or selecting.
the act of becoming more distant.
take in marriage.
skip, leap, or move up and down or sideways.
a stronghold.
the fashionable elite.
the characteristic utterance of an animal.
make more intense, stronger, or more marked.
a journey for some purpose (usually including the return).
manipulate in a fraudulent manner.
fruit preserved by cooking with sugar.
the activity of leading.
a finishing coat applied to exclude moisture.
someone who cleans soot from chimneys.
emit a steady even light without flames.
behave in a certain way.
express or utter with a hiss.
stingless male bee in a colony of social bees (especially honeybees) whose sole function is to mate with the queen.
a boxing or wrestling match.
cause to procreate (animals).
a feeling of annoyance at being hindered or criticized.
move along on or as if on wheels or a wheeled vehicle.
provide with a new seat.
the act of extracting ores or coal etc from the earth.
enter uninvited.
a person or thing equal to another in value or measure or force or effect or significance etc.
a cause of pain or injury or loss.
make clear and (more) comprehensible.
the act of retaining something.
a problem.
stretch out completely.
continue to live through hardship or adversity.
the act of caressing with the lips (or an instance thereof).
lay with rails.
the motion of one object relative to another.
make a hole, especially with a pointed power or hand tool.
piece (something old) with a new part.
the act of breaking something.
the floor of a building that is at or nearest to the level of the ground around the building.
a quantity of money.
the large room of a manor or castle.
prevent from entering; keep out.
sniff or smell inquiringly.
provide housing for.
change the inherent purpose or function of something.
provide with (something) usually for a specific purpose.
gain points in a game.
travel in front of; go in advance of others.
remove by or as if by rubbing or erasing.
the hard ridge that forms the upper part of the nose.
make (a surface) shine.
return to a former condition.
remove the husks from.
speed up the progress of; facilitate.
strike out by swinging and missing the pitch charged as the third.
raise in rank, character, or status.
make visible by means of chemical solutions.
an acute febrile highly contagious viral disease.
make to a size; bring to a suitable size.
remove tree stumps from.
pass the tongue over.
an image that is generated by a computer.
come out better in a competition, race, or conflict.
the component of the aerodynamic forces acting on an airfoil that opposes gravity.
start abruptly.
(broadcasting) a local announcement inserted into a network program.
something that is made real or concrete.
sound sharply or shrilly.
the act of admitting someone to enter.
spend time in prison or in a labor camp.
contain or hold; have within.
the act of informing by verbal report.
request urgently and forcefully.
the quality of being unlike or dissimilar.
throw quickly.
move to and fro.
put up with something or somebody unpleasant.
the termination or disintegration of a relationship (between persons or nations).
destroy a ship.
the act of starting something for the first time; introducing something new.
ride a motorcycle.
the principal activity in your life that you do to earn money.
continue a certain state, condition, or activity.
a statement (either spoken or written) that is made to reply to a question or request or criticism or accusation.
a committee having supervisory powers.
a short section of a musical composition.
the gears by which the motion of a machine can be reversed.
take a walk for one's health or to aid digestion, as after a meal.
a part of a forked or branching shape.
fill or close tightly with or as if with a plug.
incite, move, or persuade to some act of lawlessness or insubordination.
announce the termination of, as of treaties.
cause to throb or beat rapidly.
make a mark or lines on a surface.
recite with musical intonation; recite as a chant or a psalm.
(computer science) the ability to exchange and use information (usually in a large heterogeneous network made up of several local area networks).
the act of applying force suddenly.
a process of becoming smaller or shorter.
exercise authoritative control or power over.
be or play a part of or in.
an extended area of land.
move an implement through.
deprive of courage or hope; take away hope from; cause to feel discouraged.
a force that is a branch of the armed forces.
furnish with spars.
remove water from.
provide with rails.
be a summary of.
affect with smut or mildew, as of a crop such as corn.
talk or behave amorously, without serious intentions.
accept an excuse for.
be a signal for or a symptom of.
a verbal or written request for assistance or employment or admission to a school.
have as a logical consequence.
cross on foot.
the act of sucking.
a band of leather or rope that is placed around an animal's neck as a harness or to identify it.
put a harness.
provide or equip with furniture.
to move (the head or body) quickly downwards or away.
reason by deduction; establish by deduction.
fertilize and cause to grow.
find the solution to (a problem or question) or understand the meaning of.
move about in a confused manner.
put up with something or somebody unpleasant.
a means or agency by which something is expressed or communicated.
take apart into its constituent pieces.
a short theatrical performance that is part of a longer program.
issue an order.
the termination of a meeting.
an indicator that orients you generally.
increase the volume of.
open (a place) to members of all races and ethnic groups.
reduce to small pieces or particles by pounding or abrading.
hit a fly.
exhaust by allowing to pull on the line.
be incompatible; be or come into conflict.
produce a click.
angle with a hook and line drawn through the water.
the face or front of a building.
make something more diverse and varied.
issue bonds on.
a woman's sleeveless undergarment.
move very fast.
oppose, as in hostility or a competition.
make more complex, intricate, or richer.
show to be invalid.
create by putting components or members together.
the activity of supplying or providing something.
make lighter or brighter.
the actors in a play.
take up someone's soul into heaven.
discipline in personal and social activities.
a person eating a meal (especially in a restaurant).
a sudden outburst.
make hard or harder.
the introductory section of a story.
work with a tool.
make less severe or strict.
support by placing against something solid or rigid.
part; cease or break association with.
have the financial means to do something or buy something.
a list of candidates nominated by a political party to run for election to public offices.
to say, state, or perform again.
allow the passage of air through.
unite or merge with something already in existence.
use up (resources or materials).
become hard or harder.
cause to be firmly attached.
become broader or wider or more extensive.
unrestricted freedom to use.
the act of taking possession of or power over something.
give a structure to.
mark with a scar.
tag the base runner to get him out.
be reflected as heat, sound, or light or shock waves.
a competitor thought likely to win.
become long or longer.
to be on base at the end of an inning, of a player.
either of the two categories (male or female) into which most organisms are divided.
the atomic weight of an element that has the same combining capacity as a given weight of another element; the standard is 8 for oxygen.
provide with a toggle or toggles.
cause to move back and forth.
measure the depth of (a body of water) with a sounding line.
make a loud noise, as of animal.
the act of coming to land after a voyage.
bring two objects, ideas, or people together.
make reference to.
behave violently, as if in state of a great anger.
move in a spiral or zigzag course.
a feeling of aversion or antipathy.
release (gas or energy) as a result of a chemical reaction or physical decomposition.
overcome with amazement.
behave in a patronizing and condescending manner.
take into one's family.
(contract bridge) the highest bid becomes the contract setting the number of tricks that the bidder must make.
go on a campaign; go off to war.
react to a stimulus or command.
sound with resonance.
an injury caused by exposure to heat or chemicals or radiation.
make a logical or causal connection.
apply conditioner to in order to make smooth and shiny.
exercise, or have the power of, memory.
a state of extreme anger.
become wrinkled or crumpled or creased.
admit to testing or proof.
any accounting period of 12 months.
make a plug for; praise the qualities or in order to sell or promote.
relative darkness or lightness of a color.
strike heavily, especially with the fist or a bat.
make receptive or willing towards an action or attitude or belief.
open again or anew.
a way of conceiving something.
heat a metal prior to working it.
feel the need to eat.
be in direct physical contact with; make contact.
give suck to.
decorative cover for a bed.
to grip, cut off, or tear with or as if with the teeth or jaws.
play on a string instrument with a bow.
an impression that something might be the case.
a successful free throw or try for point after a touchdown.
express audibly; utter sounds (not necessarily words).
pause or hold back in uncertainty or unwillingness.
a single serving of a beverage.
give an incentive for action.
the day immediately before today.
take or capture by force.
apply a plaster cast to.
interfere in someone else's activity.
assign a new time and place for an event.
value measured by what must be given or done or undergone to obtain something.
touch, lift, or hold with the hands.
scrape or rub as if to relieve itching.
narrate or give a detailed account of.
any activity that occupies a person's attention.
cause to become awake or conscious.
provide a feast or banquet for.
an act of hindering someone's plans or efforts.
fool or hoax.
raising the stakes in a card game by a factor of 2.
the control of a country by military forces of a foreign power.
(computer science) the occurrence of an incorrect result produced by a computer.
give pleasure to or be pleasing to.
a soft pad placed under a saddle.
elevate or idealize, in allusion to Christ's transfiguration.
inability of the heart to pump enough blood to sustain normal bodily functions.
cause to vibrate in a definite pattern.
warn or arouse to a sense of danger or call to a state of preparedness.
adapt or conform oneself to new or different conditions.
cause to move faster.
supply food ready to eat; for parties and banquets.
express or raise an objection or protest or criticism or express dissent.
clear mucus or food from one's throat.
pass into a specified state or condition.
add embellishments and paintings to (medieval manuscripts).
make thick or thicker.
run or move very quickly or hastily.
feel physical pain.
tell or spread rumors.
throw with force or recklessness.
return in thought or speech to something.
try to cure by special care of treatment, of an illness or injury.
a strong sweeping cut made with a sharp instrument.
any address at which you dwell more than temporarily.
(botany) the usually underground organ that lacks buds or leaves or nodes; absorbs water and mineral salts; usually it anchors the plant to the ground.
reproduce or make an exact copy of.
thread on or as if on a string.
engrave by means of dots and flicks.
have a strong desire or urge to do something.
be pertinent or relevant or applicable.
indicate contempt by breathing noisily and forcefully through the nose.
to become aware of through the senses.
cause to be alert and energetic.
remove by erasing or crossing out or as if by drawing a line.
cook slowly and for a long time in liquid.
the temperature at which a liquid boils at sea level.
make a map of; show or establish the features of details of.
the social force that binds you to the courses of action demanded by that force.
avoid or try to avoid fulfilling, answering, or performing (duties, questions, or issues).
lead someone in the wrong direction or give someone wrong directions.
maintain or assert.
restore to a previous or better condition.
expose or make accessible to some action or influence.
approach a limit as the number of terms increases without limit.
the stitching that forms the rim of a shoe or boot.
put under the control and authority of a federal government.
manual stimulation of the genital area for sexual pleasure.
equip with a fuse; provide with a fuse.
the successful ending of the American Revolution.
the smallest whole number or a numeral representing this number.
a demanding or stimulating situation.
all or part of a natural object that is collected and preserved as an example of its class.
amplify (an electron current) by causing part of the power in the output circuit to act upon the input circuit.
utter words loudly and forcefully.
contrast with equal weight or force.
strike the air in flight.
preserve in a can or tin.
(chemistry) a chain of atoms in a molecule that forms a closed loop.
make the surface of level or smooth.
impress or affect deeply.
supply with a constant flow or sprinkling of some liquid, for the purpose of cooling, cleansing, or disinfecting.
apply a thin coating of paint, metal, etc., to.
fail to attend to.
make a sharp sound.
connect or arrange into a chain by linking.
beat thoroughly and conclusively in a competition or fight.
look through a book or other written material.
the state of being active.
(theology) the act of delivering from sin or saving from evil.
make unfit or unsuitable.
cook on a hot surface using fat.
improve or perfect by pruning or polishing.
an area that is approximately central within some larger region.
start suddenly, as from fright.
be larger in number, quantity, power, status or importance.
give entirely to a specific person, activity, or cause.
the finger next to the thumb.
put up with something or somebody unpleasant.
the role of the head of a government department.
consider again; give new consideration to; usually with a view to changing.
travel at an excessive or illegal velocity.
an air force unit smaller than a squadron.
the act of giving someone a job.
the act of troubling or annoying someone.
droop, sink, or settle from or as if from pressure or loss of tautness.
cite as an authority; resort to.
set aside or apart for a specific purpose or use.
make out of components (often in an improvising manner).
learn by repetition.
intend (something) to move towards a certain goal.
register formally as a participant or member.
write as if with print; not cursive.
shoot down, of birds.
appoint to a clerical posts.
undergo sequestration by forming a stable compound with an ion.
furnish with an opening to allow air to circulate or gas to escape.
stand with arms or forelegs raised, as if menacing.
any accounting period of 12 months.
convert the genetic information in (a strand of DNA) into a strand of RNA, especially messenger RNA.
give a thrashing to; beat hard.
immerse or be immersed in a boiling liquid, often for cooking purposes.
supply with water, as with channels or ditches or streams.
the period of time during which a contract conveying property to a person is in effect.
protect or strengthen with sandbags; stop up.
make a tour of a certain place.
the head of a city government.
take up with the tongue.
a city on the River Thames in Berkshire in southern England.
a chart or map showing the movements or progress of an object.
take away a vital or essential part of.
the quality of being inadequate or falling short of perfection.
pat or squeeze fondly or playfully, especially under the chin.
make up something artificial or untrue.
the act of swallowing.
have unlawful sex with a whore.
reverse the winding or twisting of.
reimburse or compensate (someone), as for a loss.
sharpen with a strap.
the longer of the two telegraphic signals used in Morse code.
the part of the body between the neck and the upper arm.
rain, hail, or snow hard and be very windy, often with thunder or lightning.
fill with high spirits; fill with optimism.
the terminal forced release of pressure built up during the occlusive phase of a stop consonant.
let or cause to fall in drops.
the status of being a champion.
draw advantages from.
He said the problem needs to be corrected before the space shuttle fleet is cleared to fly again.
The broad Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX inched up 3 points, or 0.32 percent, to 970.
"It's a huge black eye," Arthur Sulzberger, the newspaper's publisher, said of the scandal.
"I think there's a building confidence that the cop is on the beat."
In New York, Vivendi shares were 1.4 percent down at $18.29.
Myanmar's pro-democracy leader Aung San Suu Kyi will be kept under house arrest following her release from a hospital where she underwent surgery, her personal physician said Friday.
John Heine, a spokesman for the commission in Washington, declined to comment on Mr. Spitzer's criticism.
Bremer said he would launch a $70-million program in the next two weeks to clean up neighborhoods across Iraq and build community projects, but gave no details.
In Europe, France's CAC-40 rose 1.3 percent, Britain's FTSE 100 declined 0.2 percent and Germany's DAX index gained 0.6 percent.
He later found out the alarming incident had been caused by Concorde's powerful sonic boom.
The no-shows were Sens. John Kerry of Massachusetts and Bob Graham of Florida.
He added that genes on the Y might play a role in influencing gender-specific differences in disease susceptibility.
One of the defining and well-studied characteristics of temperament is how people react to novelty.
But butterflies housed under an earlier light cycle, 1 a.m. to 1 p.m., flew toward the southeast.
He has a very good reputation," RT Jones analyst Juli Niemann said of Grant.
France, which infuriated Washington by leading the charge against U.N. approval for the war, also sought changes.
Mel Gibson is negotiating with Newmarket Films to distribute his embattled Biblical epic "The Passion of Christ" in the United States.
She won the talent portion singing "If I Could" and also won in evening wear.
State officials estimated the cost at nearly $2 billion.
The city had requested federal funds, but withdrew that request when American Express pledged at least $3 million.
Of the 1.1 million infected in south Asia, 62% are female.
An hour later Israeli attack helicopters rained missiles on a car in Gaza City, killing seven people, Palestinian sources said.
Executive recruiters say that finding a seasoned chief merchandising officer perhaps will be the trickiest of all hires.
AAA spokesman Jerry Cheske said prices might have affected some plans, but cheap hotel deals made up for it.
More than 10,000 people, most of them civilians, have been killed in three decades of insurgency.
Claudette, the first hurricane of the Atlantic storm season, hit the mid-Texas coast July 15, classified as a Category 1 hurricane with maximum sustained winds of 85 mph.
She countersued for $125 million, saying G+J broke its contract with her by cutting her out of key editorial decisions and manipulated the magazine's financial figures.
The Standard Edition One is a single processor version of the Oracle Standard Edition Database.
Wall Street was also waiting for aluminum maker Alcoa Inc. (nyse: PEP - news - people) to report earnings after the close.
Microsoft acquired Virtual PC from its developer, Connectix, earlier this year.
His aides warn an abrupt departure could trigger more bloodshed, a view shared by many in Liberia.
It is the first named storm to develop in the Caribbean in December.
The dead man, Leon Williams, was found in his third-floor apartment.
It is the nation's first large-scale counterterrorism exercise since the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks.
The AFL-CIO announced Wednesday that it will decide in October whether to endorse a candidate before the primaries.
Ursel Reisen confirmed it had been operating the coach, but declined to give details of the passengers other than to say they were of mixed ages.
A total of 17 confirmed cases of cholera were reported yesterday by the World Health Organisation in the southern Iraqi city of Basra.
Khatami, who arrived in Beirut Monday, was also to visit Syria, Yemen and Bahrain.
"At first blush, it doesn't look like any rules were broken," said Gen. Richard Myers, chairman of the Joint Chiefs of Staff.
In Millville yesterday, Mayor James Quinn ordered all city flags flown at half-staff for the next 30 days.
The 14-year-old national spelling finalist who attends school in Belmont, N.C., got a word that sounded like "zistee" during competition Wednesday.
Tom Kraynak, manager of operations and resources for the Canton, Ohio-based East Central Area Reliability Council, said investigators are considering the scenario.
And all of the samples contained molecules that can only be produced when cholesterol interacts with ozone.
The plan, called The NIH Roadmap, was developed over 14 months with help from more than 300 consultants in industry and academia.
And it can store more than a gigabyte of information - equivalent to 1,000 high quality images or around 12 hours of music - in just one cubic centimetre.
Excluding legal fees and other charges it expected a loss of between 1 and 4 cents a share.
Budget negotiations between the mayor and the City Council are entering high gear.
Also at increased risk are those with suppressed immune systems due to illness or medicines.
Acting New Haven Police Chief Francisco Ortiz said police were treating the explosion as a criminal matter.
"For me, the Lewinsky imbroglio seemed like just another vicious scandal manufactured by political opponents," Mrs Clinton writes.
Wire transfers from four of the 40 accounts open at Beacon Hill totaled more than $3.2 billion from 2001 to 2002, Morgenthau said.
The State University at Stony Brook launched the study in 1996, after earlier studies indicated a possible connection.
Earlier, Bashir's supporters had defied a police order and cried "Allahu Akbar (God is Greatest)" as he walked to his seat.
Spokesman James Howe said five children aged between 4 and 17 were taken to hospital with neck and chest injuries, while three others were treated at the scene.
Chiron has acceptances from holders of nearly 20 percent of PowderJect shares.
This report was cleared by the Joint Intelligence Committee.
About 31 percent of Americans are now obese — roughly 30 or more pounds over a healthy weight.
Coupling, an American version of a hit British comedy, will couple with Friends on Thursdays.
In morning trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Coca-Cola shares were down 34 cents at $43.67.
Aug. 15, 1982: Remains of Chapman, Hinds and Mills are found in the Green River.
The people who are sending these messages are infringing on my rights and everyone else's rights to use your computer," McKechnie said.
"They ransacked and burned the two villages completely," rebel commander Ousmane Coulibaly told Reuters by satellite phone from the bush.
It is the highest reading since the index was created in August 1997.
Generally unwanted—and often pornographic or with fraudulent intent —spam is a nuisance and a distraction," Gates writes.
U.S. Special Forces troops are training Colombian soldiers at military bases in the region to protect the pipeline.
The decision came after "listening to our customers and associates," Melissa Berryhill, a spokeswoman for Wal-Mart, said.
"It's a new beginning as far as the courts, Crown Prosecution Service and police are concerned, making the criminal justice system work better."
Texas lawmakers must close a $185.9 million budget gap by the middle of July or the schools wont open in September, Comptroller Carole Keeton Strayhorn said Thursday.
Shares of Hartford were up $2.28, or 5.2 percent, to $45.90 in midday trading.
The DVD CCA appealed that decision to the U.S. Supreme Court.
"We believe we are fully prepared to roll out the revised Diebold machines," said Gilles W. Burger, chairman of the Maryland State Board of Elections.
A radio station has suspended two disc jockeys for locking themselves in the studio and continuously playing Dixie Chicks songs, violating the station's two-month-old ban on the group's music.
The broad Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX was up 8.79 points, or 0.96 percent, at 929.06.
BusinessWeek Online has learned that the settlement could come as early as Monday, May 19.
Sovereign shares closed on the New York Stock Exchange at $15.68, down 74 cents, or 4.5 percent.
In afternoon trading, Aspen's shares were off 89 cents or more than 27 percent at $2.33 per share.
The 6-3 ruling reinstates a law that told libraries to install filters or surrender federal money.
When the prime minister's position was established in the spring, it offered the United States and Israel a way to work around Arafat.
Note the subheading of this terrible parable in the "American Masters" series, "Arthur Miller, Elia Kazan and the Blacklist: None Without Sin."
Saturday, officials in California described Gehring as cooperative — but said he has revealed nothing about what has happened to the children.
A kayaker found Dr. Scribner's body floating near the doctor's houseboat in Portage Bay, where he was eating lunch when his wife, Ethel, left for an appointment.
After protesters rushed the stage and twice cut power to the microphone, Hedges cut his speech short.
A passer-by found the boy hiding along a dirt road in Spanish Fork Canyon about 7 p.m. Thursday, with his feet free but his hands still taped.
Hewlett-Packard is putting in for a second-quarter profit of $659 million, or 29 cents a share, on revenue of $18 billion.
Doctors said that one or both of the boys may die and that if they survive, some brain damage is possible.
At Northwest Medical Center of Washington County in Springdale, one child is in serious condition.
Gulping for air, I started crying and yelling at him, 'What do you mean?
Sean Harrigan, president of the California Public Employees' Retirement System, also suggested paring the NYSE's 27-member board and allotting more seats to investors outside the securities industry.
The other victim recovered Tuesday morning was Al Larsen, 31, of Fort Worth, Texas.
GlaxoSmithKline, the UK drugmaker, has said it would cut off supplies to Canadian stores shipping drugs to the US.
The Competition Commission delivered its verdict yesterday on the proposed merger of the two big ITV players, Carlton and Granada.
The Swedish central bank, also meeting on Wednesday, is widely expected to announce a cut on Thursday of as much as half a percentage point.
For the third time in four years wildfires closed Mesa Verde National Park, the country’s only park dedicated to ancient ruins.
They cover more than 300,000 UAW workers and 500,000 retirees and spouses.
His sport utility vehicle was found June 25, abandoned without its license plates in Virginia Beach, Va.
She said she eventually allowed him to fix her bike while she sat in his car, and they chatted.
Heatley led Atlanta in scoring last season with a team-record 41 goals and 48 assists.
Daniels said he doesn't know what Bush will say at tonight's $2,000-per-person reception to raise funds for his presidential re-election bid.
A three-judge panel of the 8th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals in St. Louis overturned a ruling issued last year that supported the ordinance.
We're thrilled to be up 3-2,'' Coach Gregg Popovich said Wednesday.
In a regulatory filing, EDS said the SEC had asked for information related to its troubled IT outsourcing contract with the US Navy.
The company claimed it is the largest sale of Xserves by an Apple retailer.
Only 29 families of frogs are known, most of which were named by the mid-1800s.
"This is an extremely heartrending time for the entire Brandeis University community.
North American markets grabbed early gains Monday morning, as earnings season begins to slow and economic indicators take the spotlight.
Internal chaos has allowed foreign companies to set up damaging commercial logging and fishing operations without proper monitoring or export controls.
Including convertible securities, the total estimated value of the deal is $124 million, according to Corel.
The Standard and Poor's 500-stock index, a broad collection of equities representing leading companies, finished its best quarter yesterday since the last three months of 1998.
The court's three-judge tribunal was expected to give its verdict next February.
He played four seasons in Miami, including the Dolphins' 27-17 loss to Washington in the Super Bowl.
Analysts surveyed by First Call were expecting sales of $723 million and a loss of 28 cents a share.
"I know of nobody who pressured anybody," Douglas Feith, undersecretary of defense for policy, said at a Pentagon briefing.
Beta versions of Nterprise Linux Services are expected to be available on certain HP ProLiant servers in July.
Excluding one-time items, it expects profit of 11 cents to 15 cents a share.
Byrd, speaking from the Senate floor, said he questioned "the motives of a deskbound president who assumes the garb of a warrior for purposes of a speech."
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> added 1.92 points, or 0.12 percent, at 1,647.94.
Tickets, available through Ticketmaster, went on sale yesterday.
Grant Thornton claims that it too was the “victim” of a fraud.
That task appealed to two masters of the megabyte, Peter Lyman and Hal Varian, professors at the University of California-Berkeley's School of Information Management and Systems.
My judgment is 95 percent of that information could be declassified, become uncensored so the American people would know," Mr. Shelby said on NBC's "Meet the Press."
No tumors were detected; rather, empty cavities and scar tissue were found in their place.
But the US insisted it wanted more done to prevent complaints being filed in the first place, preferably by repealing the entire law.
Two-year-old Egyptian twin boys, born with their heads conjoined, have been separated after 26 hours of surgery at the Children's Medical Centre in Dallas.
Mitzna and party secretary Ophir Pines agreed to convene party organizations within 10 days to discuss whether new primaries would be held or a temporary leader appointed.
"She was crying and she was really scared," said Yasin.
The euro soared to $1.1914 in Asian trading, before slipping back to $1.1884 in late European trading, up from $1.1857 late Monday.
At Wednesday's summit, Abbas pledged to end the "armed intefadeh," renounced "terrorism against the Israelis wherever they might be" and alluded to the disarming of militants.
The civilian unemployment rate improved marginally last month _ sliding down to 6.1 percent _ as companies slashed payrolls by 93,000 amid continuing mixed signals about the nation's economic health.
Professor Moffitt said the results needed to be replicated before pursuing testing of individuals for the presence of the long or short versions of the gene.
Quattrone lawyer John W. Keker said his client is innocent.
Naval Academy spokesman Cmdr. Rod Gibbons said: ``Today's announcement came as a surprise.
The exchange also said its five-person compensation committee will consist only of directors from outside the securities industry.
LendingTree shares rose 43 percent, or $6.31, to $21, more than doubling in the last two months.
Last week, his lawyers asked Gov. Mark R. Warner to grant clemency, but the governor declined to intervene.
Congress has added a new benefit - an option to buy insurance coverage for prescription drugs.
Brian Rohrbough, whose son, Daniel, was killed at Columbine, said the tape raises disturbing issues.
"[They] were defined by dedication and courage," said the CIA's director George Tenet.
Shares of Mandalay closed down 8 cents at $29.42 Thursday.
License sales, a key measure of demand, fell 21 percent to $107.6 million.
Dotson was arrested July 21 after telling FBI agents he shot Dennehy when Dennehy tried to shoot him, according to the arrest warrant affidavit.
Prosecutors maintained that Durst murdered Black to try to assume Black's identity.
PeopleSoft's board has recommended stockholders reject the offer.
Black Democratic leaders were trying to arrange a meeting with Democratic National Committee Chairman Terry McAuliffe to discuss the layoffs of 10 minority staffers at party headquarters.
"These are dark days for our industry," the Geneva-based International Air Transport Association's Director-General Giovanni Bisignani said.
Other nations involved in the PSI include Germany, Italy, the Netherlands, Poland, Portugal, Spain and Britain.
The dollar was at 116.78 yen JPY= , virtually flat on the session, and at 1.2871 against the Swiss franc CHF= , down 0.1 percent.
Germans represent more than a quarter of all foreign visitors to Italy and 40 percent of hotel bookings.
Near a mosque in the northern town of Mosul, rebel gunmen also assassinated a Sunni Muslim tribal leader who backed the coalition.
Nearly half - 45 percent - are for shopping or running errands.
In Texas, public watchdog groups opposed Mr. Bush's efforts to house his papers at his father's presidential library, where they would have remained secret for a half-century.
The NIST discovered that in 1999 the Port Authority issued guidelines to upgrade the fireproofing to a thickness of 1 1/2 inches.
It's also a strategic win for Overture, given that Knight Ridder had been using Google's advertising services.
Several Florida officials connected to the case have received threatening letters, accompanied by rifle bullets.
IBM said the Rational products were also integrated with Rational PurifyPlus, which allows developers to work in Java, Visual C# and VisualBasic .Net.
Freeman said not having a driver license has been a burden.
The protesters denounced the country's supreme leader, hard-liner Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
Hoy confirmed the woman's age Tuesday and said she was on vacation with her family, but is expected to return this week.
The American Roman Catholic archdiocese of Boston has offered $55 million to settle more than 500 sex abuse lawsuits involving priests.
Among them are conversations between police, firefighters and other emergency workers, as well as media inquiries.
The 30-year bond US30YT=RR dipped 14/32 for a yield of 4.26 percent from 4.23 percent.
But he is the only candidate who has won national labor endorsements so far, picking up his 11th on Tuesday.
Oracle shares also rose on the news, up 15 cents to $13.51 on the Nasdaq.
North American stock markets got off to a slow start Tuesday, with investors ready to get their first taste of quarterly earnings.
A Spanish tanker, Sandra Tapias, was to be loaded with another million barrels, bought by Spanish refiner Cepsa SA, in the afternoon.
Although a small city-state, Singapore is the 12th-largest trading partner of the United States, with trade volume of $33.4 billion last year.
The dollar pushed as high as $1.1115 to the euro in early trade, extending Tuesday's one percent rally to hit its strongest level since April 30.
The broader market also retreated, having climbed higher for four consecutive weeks.
His first Father's Day as a dad, his first major as a champion.
It said the patents were "allegedly" assigned to Syndia in 2001 through the Lemelson Medical, Educational and Research Foundation Limited Partnership.
The Americas market will decline 2.1 percent to $30.6 billion in 2003, and then grow 15.7 percent to $35.4 billion in 2004.
At the service Morrill's widow, Ellie, sobbed and hugged Bondeson's sister-in-law as people consoled her.
Connolly said FBI agents in San Diego and abroad spent thousands of hours investigating al-Bayoumi.
The lawyer for Hollins Jr., Thomas Royce, has said his client had no link to the company that owned and operated E2.
The single currency rose as far as 135.26 yen , its highest level since the introduction of the single currency in January 1999.
A 62-year-old West Babylon man has contracted the West Nile virus, the first human case in Suffolk County this year, according to the county health department.
Grassley and Baucus said they had rejected that approach in their plan.
But the North Korean nuclear crisis has dominated his time in office.
In the second quarter last year, AK Steel reported a profit of $16.2 million, or 15 cents a share.
PG&E's shares gained 24 cents to $15.44 during Tuesday's trading on the New York Stock Exchange.
The tech-laced Nasdaq Composite .IXIC rallied 30.46 points, or 2.04 percent, to 1,520.15.
The decision is "clearly incorrect," FTC Chairman Tim Muris said.
A captured rebel said 2,100 combatants had been involved in the offensive.
"It was a brazen attempt at intimidation," said a Republican legislator who attended the meeting.
An FBI statement said legal proceedings were expected Monday in federal court in Baltimore.
"It's a blond-haired woman wearing a Cartier watch on her wrist," the source said.
The Nasdaq Composite index, full of technology stocks, was lately up around 18 points.
MDC spokesperson Paul Themba Nyathi said the Avenues Clinic was targeted because it was handling opposition supporters.
JAPAN added to growing international pressure on Burma yesterday, threatening to halt its hefty economic aid unless the military government released pro-democracy leader Aung San Suu Kyi.
"This proposal is modest compared with the space programme, and may seem unrealistic only because little effort has been devoted to it.
But the bureau never kept tabs on al-Bayoumi—despite receiving prior information he was a secret Saudi agent, the report says.
"That really affects the companies, big time," said Jim Santangelo, president of the Teamsters Joint Council 42 in El Monte.
Wal- Mart, Kohl's Corp., Family Dollar Stores Inc., and Big Lots Inc. posted May sales that fell below Wall Street's modest expectations.
After posting $3 million bail, Jackson flew to Las Vegas, where he had been working on a video.
What's more, companies are not feeling confident enough to replace older PCs, the analyst firm said.
"The future of BA is in the hands of the negotiators," Eddington told British Broadcasting Corp. television on Sunday.
In addition, 6,800 people were in quarantine and thousands of health-care workers in working quarantine.
"Both of these kids are in wonderful physical condition right now," said Goodrich, also director of pediatric neurosurgery at the Children's Hospital at Montefiore.
Her son would get upset, his mom said, but then turn around and befriend his taunters.
The Nasdaq Composite index, full of technology stocks, was lately up around 18 points.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> added 1.92 points, or 0.12 percent, at 1,647.94.
The suit was filed in the Supreme Court of New York County.
District Attorney Dave Lupas reminded jurors that Stubbs is, "a cold, calculating killer".
The 30-year bond US30YT=RR jumped 20/32, taking its yield to 4.14 percent from 4.18 percent.
A seventh person, a 21-year-old woman, was in critical condition in the burn unit at Akron Children's Hospital.
The men were flown to nearby Botswana on an Air Malawi flight, the officials said.
Dynes will be paid $395,000 a year; Atkinson's salary is $361,400.
The foreign bits are recognized by other cells that realize it is infected and kill it.
"In return we expect North Korea to give up nuclear weapons."
"We condemn the Governing Council headed by the United States," Sadr said in a fiery sermon at Koufa mosque near Najaf.
The product can be instructed to permit business-only use, according to Sendmail.
Axelrod died in his sleep of heart failure, said his daughter, Nina Axelrod.
Both Counterpane and iDefense contend that the exploit works effectively against Windows 2000 systems running Service Pack 3 and 4.
Early Wednesday, the benchmark 10-year US10YT=RR had lost 16/32 in price, driving its yield up to 3.33 percent from 3.26 percent late Tuesday.
A sour forecast from Sun Microsystems Inc. SUNW.O put more pressure on Wall Street before the quarterly earnings season.
The New York Stock Exchange suspended trading yesterday in Loral, which closed at $3.01 Friday.
Shares of Coke were down 26 cents to close at $44.10 on the New York Stock Exchange.
Ernst & Young has denied the SEC's claims, and called its recommendations "irresponsible".
Indeed, Wolfowitz admitted Saturday that neither military action nor "large scale bribery" would solve the issue.
At the accident scene, the driver was "covered in blood" but helped to remove children, Wood said.
The tech-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> gained 18.35 points, or 1.13 percent, to 1,646.02.
The health department spokesperson added the department is following Centers for Disease Control protocol.
Shares of Guidant were down 5.3 percent at $40.92 in afternoon trading on the New York Stock Exchange.
Moose's book goes on sale Monday, nearly a year after the sniper shootings started in the Washington area.
Fatalities in rollover crashes accounted for 82 percent of the increase in 2002, NHTSA said.
Labor Department analysts discounted a slight improvement in the national unemployment rate, which fell in August to 6.1 percent from 6.2 percent.
The British pound flexed its muscle against the dollar, last up 1 percent at $1.6672.
Schools Chancellor Joel Klein said he was pleased by the results.
The study also found that skin cancer nearly tripled in Norway and Sweden since the 1950s.
One witness told the Anatolian news agency he saw the plane on fire in mid-air.
Obus also denied a defense motion to postpone the Sept. 29 trial date.
Health Minister Manto-Tshabalala Msimang is not fit to preside over an anti-retroviral treatment rollout plan, according to some opposition parties.
That is, if the Recording Industry Association of America has anything to say about it.
He or she decides the merchandising direction of the company, or basically what it should stand for.
The Rev. Christopher Coyne, spokesman for the archdiocese, did not immediately return several calls seeking comment.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index was down 25.36 points, or 1.53 percent, at 1,628.26.
Several relatives of Australian victims of the attack sat in the front row of the court, but few Balinese attended the trial.
In July 32 Singaporean police officers were sent to Baghdad to help train Iraqi police forces and returned home last month.
In early U.S. trading, the euro <EUR=> was down 0.6 percent to $1.1741, after rising to a four-month high of $1.1860.
Previously, it had reported a small profit of $12 million, or break-even on a per-share basis, for the period.
Thursday morning, PeopleSoft's board rejected the Oracle takeover offer.
A coalition of campaign groups, including the militant national students body, is backing the action and is mobilising for protests.
The company is also adding .Net and J2EE support to its Enterprise Application Environment development toolset, Sapp said.
Frist proposed a process in which it would take gradually fewer votes to overcome filibusters preventing final votes on judicial confirmations.
It has a chequered safety record, including 47 accidents that resulted in 668 deaths.
Ryan Harvey, a high school outfielder from Florida, was chosen sixth by the Cubs.
About 20 family members of the victims were invited to the news conference.
Four of the defendants have pleaded guilty to weapons charges and other counts.
The study appears today in the New England Journal of Medicine.
In the aftermath of Hurricane Isabel, federal and local governments remained shut down, as did schools and many businesses.
A major British study has added to the evidence that hormone replacement therapy increases the risk of breast cancer, especially when women receive a combination of estrogen and progestin.
On Tuesday, he picked up the endorsement of the United Steelworkers of America.
The FTC signed up 50 million phone numbers for the list, which was due to go into effect October 1.
"I was in the water for about eight seconds.
Adora Obi Nweze, the NAACP state president, said the state has refused to consider the possibility of murder.
Hebei has reported 191 cases and eight deaths, though the WHO experts did not say how many were in rural areas.
Instead, they fear the conference is an attempt by corporate farming and biotech interests to push into new markets.
"It has outraged the membership," said Rian Wathen, organizing director of United Food and Commercial Workers Local 700.
The blue-chip Dow Jones industrial average .DJI jumped 194.14 points, or 2.09 percent, to 9,469.20 after sinking more than 1 percent a day earlier.
About 38,000 OGE Energy Corp. customers are without power, the company said on its Web site.
Now, Blanca's husband, 63-year-old Roger Lawrence Strunk of Tracy, faces a murder indictment issued by the Philippine government in February.
U.S. Agriculture Secretary Ann Veneman kicks off the three-day Ministerial Conference and Expo on Agricultural Science and Technology on Monday.
Amazon's shares yesterday closed at $54.32 on the Nasdaq Stock Market, up 29 cents.
Prince, who heads Citigroup's global corporate and investment bank, is replacing Sanford Weill as CEO.
Operating revenues rose to $1.45 billion from $1.38 billion last year.
Spot gold was quoted at $358.65/359.15 an ounce at 0500 GMT, having darted as high as $359.25 -- a level not seen since February 25.
In Canada, the surging dollar was in focus again as it struggled and just failed to stay above the 75 cent (U.S.) mark.
But the justices ruled that the police supervisor who repeatedly questioned Mr Martinez as he screamed in pain did not violate his Fifth Amendment rights.
But Lawtey is the first entire prison to take that path.
"Yes, I do not wish to be present during this witness," Peterson, 31, calmly told the judge as he was returned to his cell.
The Dow Jones industrial average .DJI rose 18.25 points, or 0.19 percent, to 9,586.71.
National Constitution Center President Joseph Torsella was hit in the head and knocked to his knees.
Of those three, only Dillard's responded to the survey that ranked 45 large companies on employment, marketing, procurement, community reinvestment and charitable donations.
"I don't know whether the person I'm talking to now may end up being someone else," Parrish said.
Ruffner, 45, does not have a lawyer on the murder charge, authorities said.
Both men are being held for investigation of administrative immigration violations.
Passed in 1999 but never put into effect, the smoking law would have prevented bar and restaurant patrons from lighting up, but exempted private clubs from the regulation.
Under the proposed terms of the transaction, and following the spinoff of PalmSource, Palm will exchange 0.09 shares for each share of Handspring.
The report shows that drugs sold in Canadian pharmacies are manufactured in facilities approved by Health Canada, which serves a similar role as the FDA for the Canadian government.
One of the key suspects in the October nightclub bombings that killed more than 200 people in Bali went on trial Monday amid tight security.
By 2040, retirees will account for a third of the population, up from a fifth today.
Iraqi police opened fire in downtown Baghdad Wednesday after demonstrators demanding jobs stormed a police station and threw stones at officers, police said.
The Dow Jones industrial average <.DJI> rose 49 points, or 0.47 percent, to 10,578.
EDS reported a first-quarter loss of $126 million, or 26 cents per share.
Shares in Microsoft slipped 4.7 percent in after-hours trade to $27.54 from a Nasdaq close of $28.91.
They are actually going to record sales for Velcade this year," said Matt Geller, an analyst at CIBC World Markets.
The rock was first observed by the Lincoln Near Earth Asteroid Research Program, also known as LINEAR.
Both rebels and government forces, including those loyald to Taylor, have been accused of pillaging villages in Liberia's countryside despite a peace deal.
Microsoft has been awarded a patent on a popular instant-messaging feature that shows users when the person on the other end of the conversation is typing a message.
There is no clear successor for Mr. O'Neill at Hyundai.
He urged employees to "avoid complacency" and to "change old habits and seriously rethink business-as-usual."
Kerkowski and Fassett's bodies were unearthed at Selenski's Mount Olivet Road home on June 5.
We think this was bad law, and we still expect to be vindicated ultimately.
These despicable acts were committed by killers whose only faith is hate and the United States will find the killers and they will learn the meaning of American justice.
In the opinion, Kline noted that it is illegal for children that young to have sexual relations.
The transaction will expand Callebaut's sales revenues from its consumer products business by around 45 percent to some one-third of total sales.
Indonesia's army has been accused of human rights abuses during its earlier battles with GAM, charges it has generally denied.
Iraq's economy was shattered under former president Saddam Hussein and by the U.S.-led war to oust him which ended in April.
One man had brandished an English-Turkish dictionary and pointed to the word "refugee".
The bulk of the bill - $64.7 billion - goes for military operations primarily in Iraq and Afghanistan.
The U.S. House of Representatives, the other chamber of Congress, does not vote on treaties.
Dolores E. Mahoy, 68, of Colorado Springs is just the type of person who might be helped by the legislation pending in Congress.
That federal investigation is separate from an informal inquiry by the Securities and Exchange Commission.
Declining issues outnumbered advancers slightly more than 3 to 1 on the New York Stock Exchange.
There were 659 women enrolled at the academy at the time of the survey.
The impact of natural-gas shortages "will touch virtually every American," Energy Secretary Spencer Abraham warned yesterday.
A new beauty contest kicking off in Italy next week will give pixel-perfect pin-ups the chance to steal sultry Sophia's sex-symbol status.
Nevada is where the most women smoke, 28 percent.
The estimate of analysts surveyed by Thomson First Call was for a loss of $2.75 a share.
Lee Janzen, tied atop the leaderboard with five holes left, finished with a 68 to tie for sixth with Bob Crane (67) at 269.
In November, Jeffrey Brabakow, the chief executive at the time, said the company used aggressive pricing to get higher payments for the sickest Medicare patients.
It is widely expected to give Bair formal approval to offer the plane for sale to airlines.
There are some who feel like the conditions are such that they can attack us there.
That poll had 712 likely voters and sampling error of plus or minus 3.7 percentage points.
Defense lawyers had requested a change of venue for two reasons: They argued that massive pretrial publicity had tainted the jury pool against their client.
LendingTree matches borrowers via the Internet with more than 200 mortgage brokers, banks and other lenders.
Australia's 9 million income taxpayers received surprise tax cuts of between $3 and $11 a week from Treasurer Peter Costello last night.
MONY shares rose 8.76 per cent to $31.90 in after-hours trading in New York.
The head of the local disaster unit, Gyorgy Heizler, said the coach driver had failed to heed red stop lights.
For the current academic year, tuition at public colleges averaged $4,694, up almost $600 from the year before.
The unemployment rate in San Joaquin County dipped last month to 8.5 percent, down nearly a full percentage point from August.
Burrell said Diana wrote a letter in October 1996 claiming there was a plot to kill her in a smash and gave it to him to keep as insurance.
Security lights have also been installed on a barn near the front gate.
But American troops will not shrink from mounting raids in the locations of their foes that can be pinpointed.
Moore did not have an immediate response Tuesday.
On Aug. 8, Juvenile Court Judge Robert Yeates ordered that Parker be placed in protective custody.
Republican National Committee Chairman Ed Gillespie issued a letter Friday to CBS Television President Leslie Moonves.
"The steps that the Iranians claim to have taken in terms of capturing al-Qaida are insufficient.
Dotson, 21, was subsequently charged with Dennehy's murder.
The offer is also subject to Goldman signing an agreement with Drax's senior banks, senior bond holders and hedging banks by Sept. 30, it said.
The study results were released at a meeting in Seattle of the American Thoracic Society and also will be published in tomorrow's issue of The New England Journal of Medicine.
Chief Justice William H. Rehnquist and Justices Antonin Scalia and Clarence Thomas dissented.
United has paid $34 million in penalties for failing to meet employment targets.
Shelley's office released signature counts late Friday and said counties had reported counting 575,926 signatures so far.
On Tuesday, before Byrd's speech, Fleischer said Bush wanted ''to see an aircraft landing the same way that the pilots saw an aircraft landing.
"The whole thing is a travesty," fumed Brent Newbury, president of the Rockland County Patrolmen's Benevolent Association.
"It's a wonder that Porchia was the only deceased in this case," Sax added.
Unifi official Rob O'Neill said: "The gloves are off.
Pratt & Whitney had said that if it won the contract 75 per cent of the engine equipment would be outsourced to European suppliers, with final assembly in Germany.
Staff writers Brandon Formby and Colleen McCain Nelson contributed to this report.
The New Zealand Commerce Commission had given Westpac no indication whether it would have approved its deal.
He added that prosecutors will seek the death penalty.
The quarterlies usually stay in stores for between six to eight weeks," Carney added.
"The movement to defend pensions is gaining momentum, and we won't give up," said Marc Blondel, leader of the Force Ouvriere union.
Ellison said that contrary to the contentions of PeopleSoft management, Oracle intends to "fully support PeopleSoft customers and products" for many years to come.
Note the subheading of this terrible parable in the "American Masters" series, "Arthur Miller, Elia Kazan and the Blacklist: None Without Sin."
He also objects to the sales and personal income tax increases in the package.
The world's largest software company said it recognized the difficulty the multiple patches posed for companies trying to apply them.
McArthur told internetnews.com price declines have moderated and remained below 30 percent from the previous year for the last two quarters.
Before the meeting, Putin said Russia regards Saudi Arabia as a key Muslim state.
The company will offer songs for 99 cents and albums for $9.95.
"We don't know everything [but] what we know suggests that we should take what they're saying seriously," he said.
Bounty hunting is illegal in Mexico, and the bounty hunter was charged with kidnapping.
Shares of Gillette closed down 45 cents at $33.70 in trading Wednesday on the New York Stock Exchange.
Shares of Tampa-based Outback Steakhouse Inc. closed at $44.50, up $1.78, or 4.2 percent, on the New York Stock Exchange.
The Dow Jones industrials briefly surpassed the 9,000 mark for the first time since December."
The submission was on Monday, but the announcement was made Friday at the International Broadcasting Convention in Amsterdam.
Lower courts have splintered on the issue, allowing depictions of the Ten Commandments in some instances and not in others.
The Department of Homeland Security announced Tuesday that it has selected three companies to continue research into ways to thwart shoulder-fired missile attacks on U.S. commercial aircraft.
The government wanted to revive talks with the Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam (LTTE) to discuss the interim structure.
Sandy Mitchell, 44, from Kirkintilloch, Glasgow, and William Sampson, a British citizen born in Glasgow, face beheading in public.
The free service was originally intended to block about 80 percent of telemarketer calls.
He was arrested in Atlanta, Georgia, on Monday night by police acting on a tip-off.
O'Brien's attorney, Jordan Green, declined to comment.
In a statement issued by his solicitors, Mr Hadley said: "I am absolutely delighted with the outcome of proceedings.
The losses occurred overnight in Willow Canyon, one of three areas in the Santa Catalina Mountains threatened by the resurgent Aspen fire.
"We don't want to stand by and see a credit card lynching take place," he said.
July 10 - The Bush administration's latest effort to expand the role of religious organizations in government services enlists church-based youth groups in anti-drug programs.
Commercial releases of the 2.6 kernel by major Linux distributors still remain months away.
The Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC was off 6.52 points, or 0.39 percent, at 1,645.66.
But the officials later revised the numbers and said about 250 had been arrested at some 60 stores.
Brian Halla, CEO of NatSemi, claimed the deal made sense for both companies.
Of those who signed the letter, 57 are senators, including 24 Republicans.
The sale represents about 52 per cent of the 115.9 million shares Mr Turner held at the end of April.
As of this week, 103 human West Nile cases in 45 counties had been reported to the health department.
Manuel and his group entered the US the same way thousands of people do every day, by walking across the bridge between Matamoros and Brownsville.
The analyst, already let go by Merrill, can request a hearing before a NASD panel.
Chinese language Web portals also support 3721 keywords, the Web site said.
Bush, however, also lashed out at the terrorist bombings in Saudi Arabia that killed at least 29 people -- including a number of Americans.
Sirius recently began carrying National Public Radio, a deal pooh-poohed by XM because it doesn't include popular shows like All Things Considered and Morning Edition.
"I'm very proud of the citizens of this state," said Gov. John Baldacci, a casino foe.
Schwarzenegger picks up more independents and crossover voters than Bustamante.
Dittemore announced his plans to resign on April 23.
Selenski had served about seven years in prison for bank robbery.
Maddox, who had battled cancer since 1983, cracked two ribs earlier this month when he fell at an assisted living home where he was recovering from surgery.
Graham, who co-chaired the inquiry, is a presidential candidate.
Rolfe said Linksys overtook Cisco Systems last year as the leading supplier of WLAN equipment.
Schools that don't meet the testing goals for two years in a row must offer transfers.
Tampering with medicine apparently was so lucrative, investigators said, that many of the suspects lived in million-dollar homes.
Analysts polled by Reuters Research, a unit of Reuters Group Plc, on average forecast profit of $1.69 per share.
Two more died later, and initial autopsy reports show they succumbed to dehydration, hypothermia and suffocation.
Mr Howard also said yesterday that Hicks would be fairly treated, saying he had faith in the US justice system.
Mahmud controlled access to Saddam and was frequently at his side.
People in a van opened fire on a pickup and SUV believed to be transporting illegal immigrants, said Pinal County Sheriff Roger Vanderpool.
The trial, which could last until early 2004, is expected to hear the first of 125 witnesses Friday.
The PCs are scattered across the United States, Canada and South Korea.
Microsoft issued a patch for the vulnerability, which affects Windows NT 4.0, Windows NT 4.0 Terminal Services Edition, Windows 2000, Windows XP and Windows Server 2003.
The donation of 60,000 tons brings the total of U.S. contributions for the year to 100,000.
The union banned the import of genetically modified food in 1998 after many consumers feared health risks.
Products featuring Vanderpool will be released within five years, he said.
The appetizer devoured, Annika Sorenstam moves on to the entree this week at the McDonald's LPGA Championship.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> rose 6 points, or 0.41 percent, to 1,498.
According to the Census Bureau, the Hispanic population increased by 9.8 percent from the April 2000 census figures.
Authorities looked to the public yesterday for help in solving the deadly sniper-style shootings of three people outside Charleston-area convenience stores.
Noah Wyle, who has played Dr. John Carter since the series launched in 1994, has inked a one-year extension to his deal with producer Warner Bros. TV.
Cisco has similar relationships with BellSouth competitors SBC Communications, AT&T and Sprint Communications.
The WHO has said the Singapore case did not fit its profile of SARS and was "not an international public health concern."
Harris and Klebold killed 12 students, a teacher and themselves at the school.
"We condemn and denounce the Governing Council, which is headed by the United States," Moqtada al-Sadr said.
HP fell to second place with server sales growing 0.4 percent to $2.9 billion.
In a statement distributed today, 28 Chechen non-governmental organisations said they would boycott the vote and warned voters to expect fraud.
Between 1960 and 2000, however, the state's population grew by 30.4 percent to 6,080,485.
Bryant, 24, has been charged with felony sexual assault.
Jay Fishman, 51, chairman and chief executive of St Paul, will be chief executive of the combined company.
The Third Armored Cavalry Regiment recently apprehended about 40 suspected fighters near the Syrian border, officials said.
Douglas Meester, 20, is charged with rape, sodomy, indecent assault, and providing alcohol to minors.
Total revenue for the second quarter was $1.48 billion, up 7% from $1.39 billion in the same period last year.
The airline said a similar discovery was made on the plane in Houston.
The show's creator and executive producer, Phil Rosenthal, quipped in a statement: "We had a big contract negotiation.
Pataki said if power was restored, state workers would be back on the job Friday morning.
Bolivia's army fought to stop a column of dynamite-wielding miners from streaming into the besieged capital on Wednesday, leaving two dead as a popular uprising against the President spread.
The Nasdaq is down roughly 0.4 percent for the month, on track to snap a 7-month streak of gains.
The report was found last week tucked inside a training manual that belonged to Hicks.
U.S. soldiers killed about two dozen suspected Taliban militants in southern Afghanistan after their convoy came under attack, the military said Sunday.
Dell's Personal All-in-One A920 is an entry-level device that combines printer, scanner and copier functions for $89.
The International Committee of the Red Cross, fearful for the safety of its staff operating in Iraq, announced it was temporarily shutting its offices in Baghdad and Basra.
The Ireland Palestine Solidarity Campaign, of which he was a member, said he was researching a schools exchange project.
Glover said the killer used a ``peculiar slipknot,'' including a coaxial cable and an extension cord, to strangle some of the victims.
Jane Doe, deciding to fight the subpoena, asked Verizon to withhold her name.
"It got up on his personal radar screen in the past week, and I had to get my pitch.
In a case in August, a 27-year-old laboratory worker in Singapore developed SARS.
A reading above 50 suggests growth in the sector, while a number below that level indicates contraction.
Supporters asked a federal court Monday to block the removal of a Ten Commandments monument from the Alabama Judicial Building.
Johnston made $5.8 million in salary and bonus in 2001 as president, and as a part-time adviser earned $1 million in 2002.
A black pickup truck was also seen in the Campbells Creek area, Morris said.
But in the first 30 seconds of the bout, family members knew it was an uneven match, Jodie Meyers, Stacy Young's sister, said.
FCC chief Michael Powell presides over hearing Monday.
On Wall Street, the Dow Jones Industrial Average rose 0.5 per cent at 9,905.8 and the Nasdaq Composite added 0.7 per cent at 1,995.1.
Tehran has made it clear it will only sign the protocol if a ban on imports of peaceful Western nuclear technology is lifted.
Congress twice passed similar bills, but then-President Clinton vetoed them both times.
"I would rather be talking about positive numbers rather than negative.
Under the program, US officials work with foreign port authorities to seek out high-risk cargo before it can reach the United States.
In 1999, two years before his death, Mr. Nielsen told an interviewer that he thought the rock face would outlive him by many years.
Her 20-year-old sister, Allyson, was severely burned and remained hospitalized in critical condition.
As of yesterday, the total number of National Guard and Reserve troops called to duty worldwide stood at 154,603.
Telemarketing Associates, hired by VietNow, raised $7.1 million from 1987 to 1995.
Warren David Campbell, 32, and climbing companion Jonathan Smith, 47, did not return as expected on Tuesday from climbing on Mt D'Archiac in the McKenzie District.
He had been in protective custody since being transferred to Souza-Baranowski in April, officials said.
The Democrat's 2000 platform didn't explicitly support gay marriages but backed "the full inclusion of gay and lesbian families into the life of the nation."
The stock had risen 63 cents, or 3 percent, to close at $20.26 in regular-session Nasdaq trading.
Still, Singapore quarantined 70 people who had been in close contact with the scientist.
Mr. McCall, who ran unsuccessfully for governor of New York in 2002, styled himself an advocate of better corporate governance.
Hundreds of reporters and photographers swamped the town and the short hearing involving the five-time All-Star was carried live on national cable networks.
Second-quarter sales grew 7 percent, to $645 million from $600 million in 2002.
The Skagit was expected to crest during the night at 38 feet at Mount Vernon, 10 feet above flood stage, the National Weather Service said.
A former partner of accountancy firm Ernst & Young was yesterday arrested by FBI agents in the US on charges of obstructing federal investigations.
Congregants of Turner Monumental AME Church said Shelia Chaney Wilson, 43, was agitated when she came to the church, in the Kirkwood neighborhood on the city's east side.
He was the ace of diamonds in a U.S. deck of cards showing pictures of most-wanted Iraqi leaders.
A pro-independence radical, Miodrag Zivkovic, of the Liberal Alliance, came in second with 31 percent of the vote.
Georgia has received all but $70,000 of its money back with the help of the FBI.
Yeager said the incident appeared to be isolated, but the suspect showed tendencies of being a prior offender.
Taiwan reported 65 new cases on May 22, a one-day record, and 55 new cases on May 23, making its epidemic the world's fastest-growing.
Sammy Sosa was suspended for eight games by major league baseball Friday for using a corked bat, and he immediately appealed the decision.
Half the women received a daily tablet of the combination oestrogen plus progestin while the rest were given a placebo.
In early trading, the Dow Jones industrial average was down 39.94, or 0.4 percent, at 8,945.50, having slipped 3.61 points Monday.
The 30-year bond US30YT=RR lost 16/32, taking its yield to 4.20 percent from 4.18 percent.
The injured were taken to hospitals in Jefferson City and Columbia, about 48km north; their conditions were not immediately available.
Each boy weighed less than 50 pounds when they were removed from the home Oct. 10.
Against the Swiss franc the dollar was at 1.3289 francs, up 0.5 percent on the day.
Instead of one long operation to separate the twins, Goodrich and Dr. David Staffenberg plan about three, with several weeks between each.
The company has expanded those basic services, offering payment and even financing.
The Atlanta Olympic Games attack killed one woman and injured more than 100 other people.
In 2001, President Bush named her to the Student Loan Marketing Association, the largest U.S. lender for students.
The waves of scandal angered not only victims' advocates but parishioners and some priests, to the point that Law could no longer run the archdiocese.
Zuccarini was ordered held without bail Wednesday by a federal judge in Fort Lauderdale, Fla.
The department's stance disappointed some abortion opponents, and it threatens to alienate social conservatives who have provided strong political support for Ashcroft and President Bush.
With 4.7 million people infected with HIV or AIDS, South Africa has the world's highest AIDS caseload.
As executive vice president of new ventures, Elias will report to Joe Tucci, EMC's president and chief executive.
PRESIDENT Yoweri Museveni has promoted Brigadier Aronda Nyakairima to Major General and named him Army Commander.
And if that ain't a Democrat, then I must be in the wrong meeting," he said to thunderous applause from his supporters.
WebTV was sold to Microsoft in 1997 for $425 million and today is called MSN TV.
The Maine program could be a model for other states.
Joining him in the majority opinion were Justices Sandra Day O'Connor, David H. Souter, Ruth Bader Ginsburg and Stephen G. Breyer.
The Metropolitan Transportation Authority, which plans to appeal, was given until May 28 to restore the old subway and bus fare and the old commuter railroad rates.
The Bombardier and Embraer aircraft will be delivered to U.S. Airways by September 2006.
"Today, we are trying to convey this problem to Russian President Vladimir Putin (news - web sites) and President Bush (news - web sites)."
The state wants to kill the wolves in approximately a 1,700-square-mile area near McGrath to establish a moose nursery of sorts.
Peterson told police he left his wife at about 9:30 a.m. on Dec. 24 to fish alone in San Francisco Bay.
Prices had pulled back from offshore highs when the Empire State survey far exceeded expectations by jumping to 26.8 in June, a record high, from 10.6 in May.
"I am being forced into exile by the world's superpower," Taylor said in an address videotaped at his home.
Detective Chief Inspector Norman McKinlay, leading the investigation, said: "There is evidence a body or bodies have been in this area.
Investigators continue to probe virtually every aspect of Campbell's personal and financial affairs, the former mayor has said.
Mr. Mills declined to comment yesterday, saying that he never discussed personnel matters.
Maj-Gen Jeffery said he would give his military pension to charity while he served at Yarralumla.
Tampa Bay manager Lou Piniella, bench coach John McLaren and Huff all were ejected in the middle of the ninth.
TNK-BP has six oil producing units, five refineries and 2,100 filling stations.
Many of the changes are improvements to the original plan, Libeskind said.
Revenue was up a tad, from $610.6 million to $616.5 million.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> jumped 26 points, or 1.78 percent, to 1,516.
Peter Deutsch, D-Fla., said he wanted to congratulate the FDA.
Iowa State athletic director Bruce Van de Velde would not confirm an offer was made to Lebo.
And, globally, the number of active probable cases has declined to 573.
The 21-year-old eagle, found by a zookeeper early Thursday, had severe puncture wounds to his abdomen and back, spokeswoman Julie Mason said.
Still, Pinellas rabies cases fell sharply to 17 in 1996 and 3 in 1997, Agnew said.
Whitley's attorney, Marc Garber, called the ruling "a huge victory."
Shares of BioReliance sold at $47.98 at the close of market yesterday, down 2 cents.
Just five months ago, Dean committed to accepting taxpayer money and the spending limits that come with it and vowed to attack any Democrat who didnt.
Throughout China's mainland, the disease has killed 300 people and infected more than 5,270.
It also supports coloured labels to better organise documents, and dynamic browsing of the network for Mac, Windows and Unix file servers.
Officials with Torch and JetBlue did not respond to repeated phone calls from the Mercury News seeking comment.
DeVries, who was voluntarily castrated in August 2001, has said the surgery took away his ability to become sexually aroused.
On the week, the Dow Jones industrial average rose 11.56 points, while the Nasdaq Stock Market gained 39.42 points.
Nuremberg, Germany-based SuSE will license Sun's Java 2 Standard Edition (J2SE) and ship Sun's Java Virtual Machine across its Linux software line.
The artists say the plan will harm French culture and punish those who need help most - performers who have a hard time lining up work.
Long lines formed Sunday outside gas stations and people rushed to get money from cash machines as Israelis braced for the strike's effects.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC eased 8.52 points, or 0.51 percent, to 1,670.21.
Martin served two thirds of a five-year sentence for the manslaughter of Barras and for wounding Fearon.
"We're being hyper-vigilant," said Dr. James Young, Ontario's commissioner of public safety.
Sales rose 37 per cent year-on-year to 1.76bn, beating expectations.
The company said it would renew its guidance for 2003 when it announces its second quarter results in mid-July.
The companies said Idec holders would own about 50.5 percent of the stock of the combined company.
"This attack was wrong, and it was dangerous to our goals," Raymond said.
"We haven't decided whether to use an unbroken or dotted white line," said Dave Richardson, the ICC's cricket manager.
Shinseki's career included combat in Vietnam and head of U.S. peacekeeping efforts in Bosnia.
Water samples are being sent to the state health department for analysis.
"But that does not clear them of the responsibility to do everything possible to minimize civilian harm."
Ross Garber, Rowland's legal counsel, said the governor would have no comment on the condo deal.
District Superintendent J. Chester Floyd told reporters Monday that McCrackin will be reassigned within the district.
NEW YORK -(Dow Jones)- Former star investment banker Frank Quattrone pleaded not guilty Tuesday to criminal charges of obstruction of justice and witness tampering.
A federal appeals court ruled Tuesday that the U.S. government can withhold the names of people detained as part of the September 11 investigation, reversing a lower court decision.
Mr Hughes had seen Amrozi's face on television, the infamous images of the grinning mechanic from east Java.
Under the agreement, Medicare coverage for drug benefits would begin in 2006.
Researchers found that sea ice in the Arctic is disappearing at a rate of 9 percent each decade.
The Dow Jones industrial average .DJI fell 79.43 points, or 0.86 percent, to 9,117.12 on Friday.
"Biotech products, if anything, may be safer than conventional products because of all the testing," said Robert Fraley, Monsanto's executive vice president.
The Dow Jones industrial average fell 10.89 points, or 0.11 percent, to 9,837.94.
The seizure occurred at 4am on March 18, just hours before the first American air assault.
A nationally board certified teacher with a master's degree, Kelley, in his 30th year teaching, makes $65,000.
In Vienna, the International Atomic Energy Agency said on Monday ElBaradei had accepted Iran's invitation, but said no date had yet been set.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX was 0.46 points lower, or 0.05 percent, at 997.02.
The PRC epidemic began in Guandong province in November, but the Communist Party government refused to report truthfully about its spread for four months.
Conte said Druce will be charged with murder.
Earnings were affected by a non-recurring $8 million tax benefit in the year-ago period.
Gerry Kiely, a EU agriculture representative in Washington, said EU ministers were invited but canceled because the union is closing talks on agricultural reform.
Next, Baltimore took Nick Markakis, a left-handed pitcher and outfielder from Young Harris Junior College in Georgia.
Alhart said the governor "remains hopeful that the city will continue to work with us and engage in good-faith discussions."
Some women also express concern about a society in which more people than ever are turning to cosmetic surgery in a quest for bodily perfection.
MSNBC.com first reported the CIA request on Friday.
"The other guy, he's ashamed of his party, and I don't blame him.
Since then, Texas Gov. Rick Perry has called two special sessions trying to push the measure through.
There is, however, no photograph of Dr Hollingworth in the June issue of the magazine examined by The Age yesterday.
Dynes will be paid $395,000 a year; Atkinson's salary is $361,400.
"But they did not, as of the time of this particular tragic event, provide the security we had requested," Mr Jordan said.
The agency said it would consider as timely any tax returns or payments due from Friday through Aug. 22 if they are completed by Aug. 22.
It was announced that Green will replace Park in the Dale Earnhardt Inc. No. 1 Chevrolet, beginning with the Winston Open at Lowe's Motor Speedway next week.
Costa will play Juan Carlos Ferrero next in a rematch of last year's final.
Their belief was based on speculation that estrogen prevents cell damage and improves blood flow.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX crept up 4.3 points, or 0.44 percent, to 980.52.
The Texas congressional delegation now is 17-15 Democratic.
None of the casualties was Americans, said Capt. Michael Calvert, regiment spokesman.
"We think PeopleSoft customers deserve the right to choose," Ellison said.
"We have found the smoking gun," said Hubbard, director of NASA's Ames Research Center in California.
The Fijian military installed an all-indigenous government led by Mr Qarase, who won democratic elections in September 2001.
But Vincent Weafer, security director with Symantec Security Response, said all the virus did was visit a pornography site.
Armstrong County District Attorney Scott Andreassi said the many family photos in the home did not include Kristen.
Microsoft will stop developing versions of its Internet Explorer browser software for Macintosh computers, saying that Apple's Safari is now all that Apple needs.
Mr. Chapman, who hasn't been arrested, is expected to appear for arraignment next Thursday, prosecutors said.
President Bush has raised $83.9 million since beginning his re-election campaign in May, and has $70 million of that left to spend, his campaign said Tuesday.
So far, authorities also have searched areas in Pennsylvania, Ohio, Indiana, and Michigan.
"They have blocked all new bio-crops because of unfounded, unscientific fears," Bush said.
France, which infuriated Washington by leading the charge against U.N. approval for the war, also sought changes.
No charges have been filed in those deaths, but Luzerne County District Attorney David Lupas said authorities were "continuing to make significant progress" in the case.
The Conference Board said its measure of business confidence, which had fallen to 53 in the first quarter of 2003, improved to 60 in the most recent second quarter.
In a 6-3 ruling, the justices said such anti-psychotic drugs can be used only in "limited circumstances."
Attorneys for both the archdiocese and the plaintiffs began meeting last week to reach the out-of-court settlement.
Above that, Medicare would pay 90 percent of all drug costs.
Razali Ismail met for 90 minutes with Suu Kyi, a 1991 winner of the Nobel Peace Prize, at her lakeside home, where she is under house arrest.
Sir Richard was speaking after a meeting in London with Australian Tourism Minister Joe Hockey.
Greenspan told Congress on Tuesday the U.S. economy "could very well be embarking on a period of sustained growth".
BuyMusic is the first subscription-free paid download music service for PC users.
Kathy Nicolo (Jennifer Connelly) is desperate that her family not find out that her life has fallen apart.
The 30-year bond US30YT=RR grew 1-3/32 for a yield of 4.30 percent, down from 4.35 percent late Wednesday.
The Institute for Supply Management said its index of non-manufacturing activity rose to 50.7 from 47.9 in March.
Last week, his lawyers asked Warner to grant clemency under certain conditions that would have lead to a new sentencing hearing.
"It looks very much like an isolated event," World Health Organization spokeswoman Maria Cheng said.
Police said her two small children were alone there for up to two days as she lay dead.
The Rev. John Johnston, 64, was charged with aggravated harassment in the phone call case and with criminal possession of a weapon, according to a police statement.
Gov. Linda Lingle and other dignitaries are scheduled to be at the base to watch the launch.
Plaintiffs' attorneys would get $4.1 million of the settlement.
It would take three votes to kill the ACC's expansion.
Some 660 prisoners from 42 countries are being held at the Naval base at Guantanamo Bay, many captured during the war against Al Qaeda in Afghanistan.
To reach Brad Cooper, Johnson County municipal reporter, call (816) 234-7724 or send e-mail to bcooper@kcstar.com.
Members of Kathleen Peterson's family were not present.
At first blush, then, the creators of the registry would seem to have drawn the line between exempted and banned calls in the right place.
And now it's anything he wants to say," confirmed Stone County Nursing and Rehabilitation Center social director Alesha Badgley.
The Episcopal Church, with 2.3 million members, is the American branch of the worldwide Anglican Communion, which has 77 million adherents.
"We still have a lot to do, but I feel confident that HP is no longer an integration story."
Police have arrested 21 people in connection with the murder of a young Nigerian child whose headless and limbless torso was found floating in the river Thames.
Ebbers' lawyer, Reid Weingarten, said despite the thorough investigation, "the best the investigators can do is nitpick about the process and substance of isolated business decisions."
In morning trading, the Dow Jones industrial average was down 8.76, or 0.1 percent, at 9,310.20, having gained 201 points Monday.
The dispute has led Ukrainian president Leonid Kuchma to cut short a state visit to Latin America.
The Justice Department filed a civil rights lawsuit Thursday against the state of Mississippi, alleging abuse of juvenile offenders at two state-run facilities.
Marcel Desailly, the France captain and Chelsea defender, believes the latter is true.
Officials in Chechnya's Moscow-backed government are a frequent target for rebels, and tension is running high ahead of Sunday's presidential election in the war-ravaged region.
Gagne struck out two in a perfect ninth inning for his 23rd save.
Trading of EchoStar's stock closed Tuesday at a 52-week high of $32.17, up $1.54.
She was the only woman employed as a warehouse worker and heavy equipment operator and the only woman in her Teamsters local.
She told the inquiry that her husband had received assurances from his line manager and senior ministry officials that when he came forward his name would not be made public.
If convicted, each faces up to five years in prison and a fine of $250,000 or more based on the amount of gains involved.
Police detained Khodorkovsky early on Saturday when his jet made a refueling stop in the Siberian city of Novosibirsk.
Sony Ericsson also said it plans to close its R&D site in Munich, Germany, for GSM and UMTS handsets.
China is scrambling to stop the disease from spreading to the countryside, where most of its 1.3 billion people live.
Statistics from the Kansas Department of Health and Environment show that 11,844 abortions were performed in the state last year.
U.S. stocks rose slightly on feather-light volume on Friday, as Wall Street regrouped after the biggest-ever power outage in North America.
Passengers were evacuated smoothly, although they were not told what was going on, he said.
The researchers say that the fact the MAP bug is present in the vast majority of Crohns sufferers means it is almost certainly causing the intestinal inflammation.
From 1993 to 2002, there were 142 reported sexual assaults at the academy.
In the seconds after the crash, she added, Captain Smith said simply, "Oh my God."
According to the report, average life expectancy has increased by nearly two years since 1990.
Lee Boyd Malvo will be called as a witness Wednesday in a pretrial hearing for fellow sniper suspect John Allen Muhammad.
"He really left us with a smile on his face and no last words ... He gave us each a kiss and that was it," she said.
For the full year period ending June 30, 2003, high-speed lines increased by 45 percent.
Young faces a fine, suspension or being permanently barred from the securities industry.
He said: “They were an inspirational couple, selfless and courageous.
Comstock said several federal courts have ruled that the detentions are fully within the law.
The other victim, Michael Walker, of 550 Barbey Street, was struck in the neck.
According to the State Department list, about 25 nations have signed bilateral agreements in the past four months, about half in the past three weeks.
In an interview, Ms. Healey, who is a criminologist, said many lawmakers here and across the country shared a wariness toward capital punishment.
A county firefighter, was struck by lightning and was in stable condition at Frankfort Regional Medical Center.
Brigadier General Edward Aritonang, a police spokesman, confirmed yesterday that another two had been arrested, one in Jakarta and another in Magelang, Central Java.
U.S. District Judge William Barbour said he imposed the maximum because Avants showed no remorse.
Still, Mr. Weill will remain very much a power at the company.
The jurors were taken into the courtroom in groups of 40 and asked to fill out a questionnaire.
Five alternate jurors also were selected, with a sixth alternate to be picked on Friday.
Greg Parseghian was appointed the new chief executive.
The California Farm Bureau did not immediately have an official response to Tuesday's ruling.
The report cites the marriage of the alleged operational commander of the Bali bombings, Mukhlas, as an example of how JI uses marriage to grow.
Philadelphia's council is not the first to defy the national policy.
He said he wasn't bothered by polls and that he would continue to do what he believed to be right, in both foreign and domestic policy.
General Sattler heads a Combined Joint Task Force aboard the command ship Mount Whitney.
Meanwhile, Funny Cide's trainer, Barclay Tagg, called the allegations "ridiculous."
It called on the Commerce Department to respond within 60 days.
The results were 3 cents a share lower than the forecast of analysts surveyed by Thomson First Call.
The legal ruling follows three days of wild volatility in RIM's stock over speculation that PC giant Hewlett-Packard Co. may be bidding for the company.
Cuban officials said that last year none of about two dozen nominated Cuban musicians received U.S. visas in time to attend the Latin Grammys.
The findings are being published today in the Annals of Internal Medicine.
Ratliff said he hopes to bring the two measures to the full Senate by Friday.
"We think it's great news," said Enron spokesman Eric Thode.
The analysts said they believe the payroll statistics provide a more accurate picture of the economy because they are based on a larger sample.
Michael Schiavo has argued that his wife never wanted to be kept alive artificially.
"I think we can now qualify what is happening as a genuine epidemic," Health Minister Jean-Francois Mattei said on France Inter radio.
Terri Schiavo, 39, underwent the procedure at the Tampa Bay area hospice where she has been living for several years, said her father, Bob Schindler.
The service will launch later this summer with 800 locations, and Sprint plans 2,100 locations by the end of the year.
Prior to joining Eastman Kodak, Mr. Palumbo held senior marketing positions for Procter & Gamble.
Mr McDevitt has been granted control of three aspects of policing by Commissioner William Morrell.
Gold's bounce pulled other precious metals higher, sending silver to $4.83/85 an ounce from $4.80/82 last quoted in New York.
NASCAR officials could not be reached for comment Tuesday.
The boy was taken to Nassau University Medical Center, where staff said he was "doing okay."
A Global Crossing representative had no immediate comment.
Shares of LendingTree rose $6.21, or 42 percent, to $20.90 after hitting $21.36 earlier.
The unions also staged a five-day strike in March; strikes have preceded eight of the last 10 contracts.
Gov. Rick Perry opposes expansion of gambling but has said he would be "hard-pressed" to veto the lottery sunset bill.
The Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC dipped 8.59 points, or 0.48 percent, to 1,773.54.
Kentucky: Republican Ernie Fletcher, a three-term House member, is battling Democratic state Attorney General Ben Chandler.
The Dow Jones industrial average finished the day down 98.32 points at 9,011.53.
Enron's stock comprised as much as 61% of the workers' 401(k) portfolios.
The Senate judiciary committee on Tuesday overcame a significant hurdle in the battle to create a trust fund to pay victims of asbestos exposure but the most difficult obstacles remain.
She said she didn't know yet whether she would certify the budget.
The flaw involves the Remote Procedure Call (RPC) protocol, which deals with inter-computer communications.
Although obesity can increase the risk of a host of health problems, skeptics argue, so do smoking and high cholesterol, which are not considered diseases.
Now she has her first trophy after victory in the US Women's Amateur Public Links here on Sunday.
It also features a 4.5 in back-lit LCD screen and memory expansion facilities.
The readings came back at 160 on June 16 and 120 at June 23 at one of three sampling sites at Huntington Beach.
The letter indicates the Vatican's interest in bolstering conservatives within the Episcopal Church.
"Whereas long lines used to catch 10 fish per 100 hooks, now they are lucky to catch one," Myers said.
Hillary Clinton, the New York senator and former first lady, has a book out Monday titled Living History.
Carnival Corp. stock was down 2.5 percent, or 81 cents, at $31.20 on the New York Stock Exchange.
And several Senate Republicans are cranky about the House map.
Murphy said Strier's sister, Ethel Celnik, was in the courtroom at the time, but Strier was not.
It will cost about $20,000 per average course of treatment -16 to 17 weeks.
It upheld fallback rules that bar the same groups from airing ads that promote, support, attack or oppose a candidate at any time.
In response to sluggish sales, Cisco pared spending.
The Royals chose Chris Lubanski, a high school outfielder from Pennsylvania who hit .528, with the fifth pick.
The dollar rose 0.15 percent against the Japanese currency to 115.97 yen.
The Dow Jones rose 41.61 points Friday, a gain of 0.4% for the day and 0.7% for the week.
But Mr. Crosby told The Associated Press: "Right from the beginning, we didn't want to see anyone take a cut in pay.
In turning down the NIMA offer, Gehman said, ''there were a number of bureaucratic and administrative missed signals here.
Convicted child molester Brian DeVries spoke out in response to community outrage Wednesday afternoon after registering as a sex offender at the Soledad Police Department.
At 11 a.m. EDT, Fabian's center was near latitude 18.1 north and longitude 53.2 west, or about 550 miles east of the Leewards.
On Saturday, Roddick equalled the world record with a 149 m.p.h. serve in beating Andre Agassi.
Teams of inspectors walked into a restricted area at one park without being stopped by employees; others took pictures of security-sensitive areas without anyone challenging them.
The Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC jumped 43.64 points, or 2.89 percent, to 1,553.73.
October heating oil ended down 0.41 cent to 70.74 cents a gallon.
Ms Cohen Alon's lawyer, Donald Levine, confirmed she tried to sell the story in February.
GBI spokesman John Bankhead said the murder scenes showed that the killer was very methodical.
"I think this moves us a lot closer toward saying that foam can do this kind of damage," Hubbard said.
"Microsoft had absolutely nothing to do with AtStake's internal personnel decision," Sundwall said.
Egyptologists think they may have identified the long-sought mummy of Queen Nefertiti, one of the ancient world's legendary beauties.
The rovers act as robotic geologists, moving on six wheels.
The Treasury said wants to give retail buyers of all Treasury securities the ability eventually to manage holdings online in a single account.
A passionate nationalist, Mr. D'Alessandro said: "Canada is a small country, and we need more companies like this."
That victim, a New Jersey resident, was in critical but stable condition at the hospital.
At 11 a.m. (1500 GMT), the 10-year note US10YT=RR was up 11/32 for a yield of 3.36 percent from 3.40 percent Wednesday.
Puretunes representatives could not be located Thursday to comment on the suit.
InterActiveCorp's shares closed at $34.19, down $2.81, or 7.6 percent on the Nasdaq Stock Market.
"But I do question the motives of a desk-bound president who assumes the garb of a warrior for the purposes of a speech."
Hundreds of Kenyan women claiming they were attacked and raped by British soldiers were granted government legal aid Wednesday to pursue their case against the Ministry of Defense.
State interior ministry spokesman Vasant Pitke told Reuters that at least 42 people had been killed and 112 injured.
Shares of LendingTree rose $6.03, or 41 percent, to close at $20.72 on the Nasdaq stock market yesterday.
Two years ago, the House passed a similar version that floundered in the Senate.
The company said this impacted earnings by a penny a share.
"I'm still not red-hot favourite," Hewitt said after battling to down Davydenko 6-3 4-6 6-3 7-6 (7-5) on centre court.
He also said Shockey is "living the dream life of a New York athlete.
Missouri health officials said he had not been hospitalized and is recovering.
U.S. stocks fell in early morning trade on Wednesday as a wave of profit warnings drained some of the optimism that has driven a rally over the past three months.
The technology-focused Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> advanced 6 points, or 0.30 percent, to 2,053, erasing earlier losses.
Sumitomo Mitsui Financial (JP:8316: news, chart, profile) was down 2.5 percent at 198,000 yen.
They include two Kuwaitis and six Palestinians with Jordanian passports, and the remainder are Iraqis and Saudis, the official said.
When his grandmother, then-Princess Elizabeth, turned 21 in 1947, the day was declared a public holiday, and she attended a reception and a ball.
Sorkin was to have been tried separately on charges of conspiracy and lying to a grand jury.
The man had entered the post office on Woodside Avenue at Maine Avenue shortly before 3 p.m.
In addition, the Justice Department said that the FBI has conducted ''fewer than 10'' investigations involving visits to mosques.
Outside the court, Sriyanto denied to The Age that he had done anything wrong.
"Our fundamental values haven't changed," Mary Sue Coleman, president of the university, said in a statement in Ann Arbor.
Astronomers have clocked eight more moons orbiting Jupiter, bringing its known total to 60.
The stock rose 48 cents to $30 yesterday in Nasdaq Stock Market trading.
He was joined by Chief Justice William H. Rehnquist and Justices Sandra Day O'Connor and Antonin Scalia.
The church's lawyer, Shirley Phelps-Roper, was clear: "What they have done is a thinly veiled attempt to do an end run around the constitution," she said.
When you crossed the line, you violated the constitutional right," said Charles Weisselberg, who teaches law at the University of California, Berkeley.
The men had Pakistani passports and reportedly were seen together at the airport earlier in the evening, law enforcement sources said.
As of Wednesday, there were 65 probable SARS cases in the Toronto region.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC gained 13.73 points, or 0.81 percent, to finish at 1,700.34.
Toll last week offered to buy the company for NZ75c a share, or $NZ158 million.
The remaining 1,557 genes are believed to be all functional.
Messagelabs, which runs outsourced e-mail servers for 700,000 customers around the world, has labeled the worm "high risk" and reports more than 31,000 infections in 120 countries.
Production for the second quarter was cut to 46 million barrels from 48 million barrels.
Tikrit is Saddam Hussein's hometown and the region around it is known as a hotbed of Baath Party supporters and former high-ranking Iraqi military officials.
The woman reported that she felt threatened and obtained a warrant for Stackhouse's arrest from the local magistrate's office.
Miodrag Zivkovic, the leader of the pro-independence opposition Liberal Alliance, came in second with 31 percent of the vote.
Service officials said Carlson refused to recuse himself from the case.
Shares of Redwood Shores-based Oracle rose 14 cents to $13.62.
A year ago the firm posted a profit of 26 million pounds.
With all precincts reporting, Fletcher had 88,747 votes, or 57 percent of the total.
Some 34.7 million shares have been tendered, Oracle said in a statement.
This after seven health care workers at a public hospital fell ill with flu-like symptoms.
Coca-Cola Co. (KO) reported higher profit for the quarter, helped by European demand, early on Thursday.
Yucaipa bought Dominick's in 1995 for $693 million and sold it to Safeway for $1.8 billion in 1998.
The unemployment rate is predicted to have ticked up a percentage point to 6.1%.
Dave Delainey agreed to cooperate with federal prosecutors in exchange for the plea.
Pete Slover reported from Laredo and Gromer Jeffers from Albuquerque.
The 25 percent hike takes annual UC undergraduate tuition to $4,794 and graduate fees to $5,019.
Last year it was sought to murder.
Economists' not against the companies openly using the attractiveness of luxury to promote their products.
And, perhaps the most important, Ahmadinejad destabilising influence, not bernanke.
All Europe
The gay and other practical "Modern" are rejected, laws.
Only a month before, muybarak refused the demands of constitutional reform by taxing them with "futile.
Only one month before, Muybarak disrupted the demands of constitutional reform by taxing futile '.
The future of Iraq is linked to oil production of the country.
Large Pax Europa of today, just like current prosperity paneuropéenne, depends on it.
This trend goes well beyond simple headscarves.
Beyond the geographical division, divisions recur locally.
But can this image survive a continuation of the decline?
But this image can survive a further decline?
Putin against people
The old version of the European response (what psychologists call "the envy of the dollar 'only become more pervasive.
But the returns which return the US markets of the transferable securities if attracting reflect a fragile political balance.
Every leader had markedly different explanations and theories on the situation.
The answer is in the support that the democratic activists indonésiens will be able to generate nationally and internationally.
They are for the moment.
The jobs, in particular, help the young to invent new forms of employment.
The future of Iraq is related to the oil production of the country.
In other areas, the sharia is imposed.
Each time, radical technological progress made it off these threats.
A Chinese influential businessman who share his time between Hong Kong and London, was even more precise.
The answer lies in the support that democratic activists Indonesians may generate drive and internationally.
But the returns which make the markets do not so attractive to reflect a fragile political equilibrium.
There are many questions.
However, the Americans have only a fall of 5.2% between 9 and on 24 may.
Each time, radical technological progress made slip these threats.
Jobs, in particular, would help young people to forge new lives through serious jobs.
This does not however emerging rich countries from their obligation to help.
And, perhaps most important, Ahmadinejad exerts a destabilizing influence, not Bernanke.
This leaves the opposition Conservative without any effective response.
After all, they have recommended the policies that politicians will take into account.
And this mistake mistake is in the process of its political.
What he has done without the initiative goes very far.
The old version of the European reaction (what the psychologists call “the desire of the dollar”) will become only more penetrating.
Last year it was required for murder.
The politicization of securities markets
Every originator had theories and explanations appreciably different on the situation.
The jobs, help young people to forge new lives through serious jobs.
Tocqueville believed that in the long term, nothing can oppose really this trend.
We are witnessing today to change a Muslim identity for an Islamic identity.
On the question of losing Alstom would have serious repercussions in Europe and not just for the policies on competition.
The large Europa Pax today, just as the current pan-European prosperity, depends on it.
Last year it was sought for murder.
In the absence of a change of associations.
But this image can survive a further decline?
The great Pax Europa today, as the current pan-European prosperity, depends on it.
That leaves the conservative opposition without effective response.
Losing on the question of Alstom would have serious repercussions in Europe and not just for policies on competition.
But returns which make American securities markets if attractive reflect a fragile political balance.
Only a month before, muybarak applications of constitutional reform disrupted were "futile."
It is undeniable that intolerance reached until the meetings the Turkish Government.
This does not however absolve the rich countries of their obligation to help.
We can also note that the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet has called one of these recent books democracy against itself.
After all, they have recommended the policies that the politicians or not consideration.
This is the spirit in which must be drawn up the European Constitution.
Each player had markedly different theories and explanations on the situation.
The success of the book is in itself a sign of Israel ".
And, also, of his regime.
But can this image survive a pursuit of decline?
The politicization of securities market
The western Europeans, who have forgotten this history, should heed our warnings.
That does not release however the rich countries of their obligation to help.
They are culture, poor and sick.
Those who do not know the intensive farming methods will be astonished perhaps the need for such legislation.
Today there are two ways plausible proceeding against a tyrant deposed.
However, a process of de-institutionalisation of the religious experience is also happening within Islam.
Ahmadinejad are embarking on an adventure, not Bernanke.
It is necessary to find other means.
At the forefront of these lessons we find that economic development is left largely in the hands of poor nations themselves.
Europe for all
This leaves the conservative opposition without any effective response.
Today there are two plausible ways to proceed with regard to a relieved tyrant.
Economists pro-marché not contradictory businesses that use openly the attraction of luxury to promote their products.
But the interest of America for Iraqi oil is not dictated by the economy or the energy policy.
A businessman Chinese influential, which shares his time between Hong Kong and London, was even more specific.
Some are noteworthy results.
But that does not detract rich countries from their obligation to help.
What he has done without the initiative goes very far.
However, a process of de-institutionalisation religious experience is also happening within Islam.
But the American point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
To be Muslim and be Islamiste are two different things.
Putin's Russia has already lost 12 prominent journalists, murdered in the last six years.
However, the American courses did not show that a fall of 5,2% between the 9 and on May 24.
We can also note the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet entitled, one of these recent books against democracy itself.
This is an implicit but clear repudiation of Mubarak, only Head of State for 24 years.
At the forefront of these lessons, we learn that economic development is largely left in the hands of poor nations themselves.
Some are noteworthy results.
They would give the right to divorce the husbands who would have abandoned them?
Yet, the Americans have accused a lowering of 5.2% between 9 and 24 May.
A Europe for all
The Russia of Putin has already lost 12 prominent journalists, murdered during the last six years.
The answer lies in the support that the Indonesian democrats will generate activists domestically and internationally.
But the US prices did not show that a decline in 5.2% between 9 and 24 May.
That is the spirit in which the European Constitution should be developed.
Yet the US courts have indicted that a reduction of 5.2% between 9 and 24 May.
Their donnerait-elle the right to divorce spouses who would have abandoned?
Other means should be found.
However, a process of the United States and also within Islam.
But the interests of America for Iraqi oil is dictated by the economy or the energy policy.
We must find other ways.
The politicization of securities markets
But the interests of the Iraqi people is not dictated by the economy or by energy policy.
And this gross mistake is conducting Russia policy to his downfall.
And, perhaps most important, Ahmadinejad has destabilizing influence, not Bernanke
Each time, radical technological progress off these threats.
We are witnessing today to change a Muslim identity for an Islamic identity.
The most important thing is that when interest rates go up, the values of the active fall.
Each time, technological progress radicals have made these threats slip.
It is in that spirit must be developed the European Constitution.
But the US point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
This trend goes well beyond simple scarves.
We must find other ways.
Russia of Putin already lost 12 eminent journalists, assassinated during the six last years.
The success of books is itself a sign of ‘ malaise ’.
They are uncultivated, poor and sick.
The president has less of capacities than it does not appear to with it, and it particuli�rement is particuli�rement eclipsed by the guide supr�me the Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
It is indisputable that reaches to the Turkish government.
A business Chinese influence, which shares his time between Hong Kong and London, was more precise.
The success of the book is in itself a sign of "malaise.
Politicization of the securities markets
Tocqueville thought in the long run, nothing can be really opposed this trend.
Tocqueville believed that in the long term, nothing can actually oppose this trend.
Who more is, the large oil exporters are not been willing to subject their policies of investment to the market rates.
They are poor, sick and uncultivated.
The economists, does not include the companies which use the attraction of luxury to promote their products.
The politicisation of the securities markets
An influential Chinese business man, who shares his time between HongKong and London, was even more precise.
Moreover, the major exporters of oil are not prepared to submit their investment policies to market conditions.
The Western Europeans, who have forgotten this story, should take account of our warnings.
Today we are to change a Muslim identity for Islamic identity.
Only one month before, Muybarak refused the demands of constitutional reform by taxing them with “futile”.
He has appointed a working party to make the necessary changes to the policies of public spending and fiscal policies.
Those who do not know the intensive methods surprised the necessity of such legislation.
It is necessary to are two different things.
It has appointed a working Group responsible for drawing the necessary changes to bring to public expenditure and fiscal policies.
Certain results are remarkable.
But as the European Union itself, and it will build it.
They give it the right to divorce the husband who have abandoned?
After all, they recommended the policies which the politicians take or not into account.
Today there are two ways of proceeding to the origins.
In other areas, the Sharia is imposed.
But this picture can survive in a European?
This trend goes well beyond simple headscarves.
But as the European Union itself, build and happen.
The President has fewer powers than it seems, and it is particuli failure to overshadowed by the Supreme Leader Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
The jobs, in particular, would help young people to forge new lives in jobs serious.
Western Europeans, who have forgotten this story, should heed our warnings.
And this big mistake is leading Russia to its political ruin.
The great Pax Europa today, as the current pan-European prosperity, depends.
But as the European Union itself, this will be built and this will happen.
The Western Europeans, who have forgotten this history, should take account of our warnings.
Western Europeans, who have forgotten this history, should take account of our warnings.
That is the spirit in which must be worked out the European Constitution.
Putin's Russia already lost 12 prominent journalists, murdered during the past six years.
The President has less powers than it seems, and it is particuli to rement overshadowed by the ayatollahs supr to guide me Ali Khamenei.
After all, they recommended policies that politicians or not take into account.
The people against Putin
Tocqueville believed that in the long term, nothing can oppose really to this trend.
Many questions are.
But they are necessary.
Moreover, the major oil exporters are not willing to submit their investment policies to market conditions.
But from the American point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
In the foreground of these lessons, one discovers that economic development is left mainly in the hands of the poor nations themselves.
And, perhaps the most important, Ahmadinejad affects destabilizing, Bernanke.
The key is that when interest rates are falling, the values of the active.
After all, they have policies that take or no consideration.
The gay and other ‘ modern ’ practices are rejected because nombrilistes.
Europeans of the West, who forgot this history, should take account of our warning statements.
It is undeniable that intolerance reached at summits of the Turkish Government.
That leaves the conservative opposition without any effective answer.
The answer lies in the support that the Indonesian democrats activists will generate national and internationally.
Putin, too, seems suspect the powerlessness of his regime.
Economists pro-marché companies which do not stand openly using the attractiveness of luxury to promote their products.
Every time, technological progress to fly these threats.
Western Europeans, who have forgotten this history, should heed our warnings.
He then appointed a working group to formulate the necessary changes to the policy of public spending and the fiscal policies.
Last year it was required for murder.
Every originator had theories and explanations significantly different on the situation.
Today there are two plausible ways to proceed as regards a burden tyrant.
The large Europa of today, just as the prosperity, depends on it.
However, a process of de-institutionalisation of religious experience is also happening within Islam.
Each time, of radical technological progress leave these threats.
Russia has already lost 12 distinguished journalists, murdered in the course of the past six years.
The former version of the European reaction (what psychologists call "the envy dollar) only become more pénétrante.
People against Putin
But the returns which make the American securities markets if attractive reflect a fragile political balance.
Today there are two ways plausible to undertake a tyrant deposed.
Only a month before,, the demands of constitutional reform in the five ".
The President has fewer powers that it seems, and it is particuli rement overshadowed by the supr guides me Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
The answer lies in the support that democratic activists Indonesia can generate nationalement and internationally.
Putin, too, seems suspect the powerlessness of his regime.
Each player had the theories and explanations markedly different situation.
And this gross error is conducting Russia to his downfall policy.
Then appointed a working party to make the necessary changes to give the policies public spending and to fiscal policies.
The people against Putin
Economists pro-marché are not opposed to companies which openly using the attractiveness of luxury to promote their products.
The gay and other practices modern 'are rejected, because navel-gazing.
But they were necessary.
The politicization of securities markets
The old version of the European reaction (what psychologists call "the envy of the dollar ') will only more pervasive.
The President has powers than it appears, and it is particularly eclipsed by the Supreme Ali Khamenei.
And, perhaps most importantly, Ahmadinejad has an influence, not destabilizing Bernanke.
Essence, it is that when interest rates go up, the values of the credit fall.
After all, they recommend the policies that politicians will take into account.
The questions are many.
But the returns that make American securities markets so attractive reflect a fragile political balance.
Those who do not know the methods of intensive farming, will perhaps the need for such legislation.
To be Muslim and islamiste are two different things.
Those who do not know the intensive farming methods astonished perhaps the need for such legislation.
There are many questions.
This is an implicit répudiation but clear of Mubarak, only Head of State for 24 years.
Losing on the question of Alstom would have serious repercussions in Europe and not just for policies on competition.
The questions are numerous.
Gays and other practices "modern ’ are rejected because among selfcentred.
Beyond the geographical division, the divisions occur locally.
Putin's Russia has already lost 12 distinguished journalists murdered during the past six years.
The catch and other practices, because.
The jobs, in particular, would help young people to create new lives in serious jobs.
Last year it was sought for murder.
Thought that in the long term, nothing can actually to this trend.
In the forefront of these lessons, we discover that economic development is left largely in the hands of poor nations themselves.
But just as the European Union itself, and that it will be done.
And this serious error is taking to Russia to its ruin policy.
But America's interest for Iraqi oil is not dictated by the economy or by energy policy.
Some results are remarkable.
A Europe for all
Perhaps those who do not know the methods of intensive farming will our by the need for such legislation.
This is an implicit but clear repudiation of Mubarak, only Head of State for 24 years.
After all, they have recommended policies that politicians or taking into consideration.
He has done, that the initiative not go very far.
Some results.
But from the American view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
But from the point of view of the international role was a trap.
To be Muslim and Islamiste are two different things.
Only a month ago, disrupted Muybarak applications of constitutional reform were a ‘ futile ’.
Moreover, the major oil exporters are not prepared to subject their policies of investment to market rates.
The success of the book is in itself a sign of 'malaise.
The answer lies in the support that the Indonesian democrats activists will generate domestically and internationally.
But just like the European Union itself, that will be built and that will be done.
Putin's Russia has already lost 12 prominent journalists, murdered during the past six years.
A Europe for all
Their donnerait-elle divorce law spouses who have abandoned them?
However, a process of désinstitutionalisation experience of religious also happens within Islam.
Today there are two plausible ways to a tyrant deposed.
What he has done without the initiative goes too far.
This does not release but rich countries of their obligation to help.
This does not, however, rich countries emerging from their obligation to help.
Today there are two ways to proceed plausible towards a tyrant deposed.
But they were necessary.
Ahmadinejad has embarque in an adventure, not Bernanke.
But just as the European Union itself, and this will happen.
Putin, also, seems to him to suspect the impotence of its mode.
It is undeniable that intolerance reached to the heights of Turkish Government.
Perhaps those which do not know the methods of intensive breeding will astonish by the need for such a legislation.
An influential Chinese businessman, who shares his time between Hong Kong and London, was even more specific.
In other areas, Sharia law is imposed.
What it has done without initiative go very far.
That leaves the opposition and without any effective response.
But this image further decline can survive?
But the interests of America for Iraqi oil is not dictated by the economy or by energy policy.
Some results.
The gays and others practical “modern” are rejected, because nombrilists.
The old version of the European reaction (what psychologists call "'s desire dollar") will become more pervasive.
Ahmadinejad is embarking upon an adventure, Bernanke.
At the forefront of these lessons, one discovers that economic development is largely in the hands of poor Nations themselves.
A Europe for all
The gay and other practices "Modern" are rejected, because nombrilistes.
The future of Iraq is linked to the country.
The people against Putin
We attend today the change of a Moslem identity for an islamist identity.
Employment, in particular, would help young people to forge new lives through serious employment.
That is the spirit in which must be drawn up the Constitution.
Moreover, the major oil exporters are not prepared to submit their investment policies under market conditions.
Ahmadinejad board in an adventure, not Bernanke
The first of these lessons, we discovered that economic development is largely left in the hands of poor nations themselves.
In other areas, the charia is imposed.
Etre Muslim and be Islamic are two different things.
What happened the initiative does not go very far.
They are poor, sick and uncultivated.
It then named an work group charged to formulate the changes necessary to bring to the policies public expenditure and to the fiscal policies.
The bottom line is that when interest rates go up, the values of credit fall.
But like the EU itself, this will be built and this will happen.
The former version of the European reaction (what psychologists call ‘ envy the dollar ’) will only most perceptively.
There are many questions.
Putin, too, seems accuse the powerlessness of his regime.
This trend goes well beyond simple scarves.
Their would give the right to divorce the husbands who would have given up them?
It was then appointed a working party to make the necessary changes to policies of public spending and tax policies.
They are uncultivated, poor and sick.
Then he appointed a working party to make the necessary changes to the policies of public spending and fiscal policies.
But the returns which make markets American Securities so attractive reflect a fragile political balance.
The people against Putin
They may also note that the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet called one of these recent its democracy against itself.
This tendency goes well beyond the simple scarves.
But America's interest for Iraqi oil is not dictated by the economy or by energy policy.
Ahmadinejad boards in an adventure, then.
But America's interest to Iraqi oil is not dictated by the economy or by energy policy.
The answer lies in the support that all will be able to generate nationally and internationally.
Beyond the geographical division, the divisions occur at local level.
The important thing is that when interest rates amount, the values of the active fall.
Big Pax Europe of today, like current prosperity pan-European, depends on it.
But this picture can survive a continuing decline?
In other regions, the sharia is imposed.
President has fewer powers than it appears to be, and it is this particuli rement overshadowed by the guide supr to me Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
We must find other ways.
A man of influential, which shares his time between Hong Kong and London, has even been more precise.
They are poor, sick and uncultivated.
Waste on the question of the Alstom Group would have serious repercussions in Europe and not only for the policies on competition.
We can also see that the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet entitled one recent books democracy against itself.
Each protagonist had appreciably different theories and explanations on the situation.
The success of the book is in itself a sign of ‘ malaise. "
Beyond geographical division, divisions reproduce at the local level.
And, perhaps most importantly, Ahmadinejad influence destabilizing, not Bernanke.
Other means should be found.
This leaves opposition Conservative without effective response.
What is more, the large oil exporters are not prepared to submit their investment policies to market conditions.
Only a month ago, muybarak écartait for constitutional reform in the taxing of "futile.
The success of the book constitutes in itself a sign of “faintness”.
We must find other ways.
Employment, in particular, would help the young people to forge new lives thanks to serious employment.
Putin, too, seems suspicion powerlessness of his regime.
And this great mistake is Russia to ruin its policy.
Each time, of radicals technological advancements made fly away these threats.
But they were necessary.
A Europe for all
But they were needed.
It has been an implicit but clear repudiation of Mubarak, only Head of State for 24 years.
Every leader had theories and markedly different explanations regarding the situation.
We are now witnessing the change of Muslim identity for an Islamic identity.
Beyond the geographical division, the divisions recur at local level.
Losing of Alstom would have serious repercussions in Europe and not just for policies on competition.
This is an implicit but clear répudiation of Mubarak, only Head of State for 24 years.
The success of the paper is itself a sign of malaise ".
To lose on the question of Alstom would have serious effects in Europe and not only for the policies on competition.
However, a process of desinstitutionalisation of the religious experiment also occurs within Islam.
Ahmadinejad embarks in an adventure, not Bernanke.
Such is the spirit in which must be elaborate the European Constitution.
But the view us the international role of the dollar was a trap.
Last year it was sought for murder.
Last year it was sought for murder.
And, perhaps the most important, the destabilising influence, not then.
To be Moslem and be Islamiste are two different things.
The most important thing, however, is that when the rate of interest, the values.
Beyond geographical division, divisions reproduce at the local level.
Their donnerait-elle divorce law spouses who would have abandoned?
Tocqueville believed that in the long term, nothing can really object to this trend.
But they were necessary.
The future of Iraq is linked to the oil production in the country.
This leaves the conservative opposition without any effective response.
Iraq's future is linked to oil production of the country.
But the returns that make us markets of securities if attractive reflect a fragile political balance.
However, a process of deinstitutionalisation of religious experience also happens within Islam.
Putin, too, seems to suspect the powerlessness of his regime.
That does not, however, the rich countries of their obligation to help.
The great Pax Europe of today, as prosperity pan-European today, depends on it.
It is undeniable that intolerance reached until the tops of the Turkish government.
What is more, the situation of oil are not prepared to submit their policies of investment to market conditions.
And this important mistaken is leading Russia to its political ruin.
Economists pro market does not oppose companies which use openly the attractiveness of luxury to promote their products.
The President has fewer powers than it they may seem, special to reviving is special to reviving overshadowed by guide supreme to me the Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
There are many questions.
A businessman Chinese influential, who share his time between Hong Kong and London, was even more precise.
On top of these lessons, we discover that economic development is left largely in the hands of poor nations themselves.
The people against Putin
That is the spirit in which must be developed the European Constitution.
Some results are remarkable.
It has been an implicit but clear repudiation of Mubarak, only Head of State for 24 years.
But the US point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
The former version of the European reaction (the desire called "the desire of the") ”.
The economists pro-market do not oppose the companies which openly use the attraction of the luxury to promote their products.
Ahmadinejad are embarking on an adventure, not bernanke.
Beyond the geographical division, at local level.
It is undeniable that intolerance reached summits of the Turkish Government.
The politization of the markets of the transferable securities
The future of Iraq is linked to oil production.
This trend goes well beyond simple scarves.
It is undeniable that intolerance reached until the heights of the Turkish Government.
We can also note that the French philosopher, Marcel Gauchet has called one of these recent books Democracy against itself.
To be Muslim and Islamic are two different things.
In other regions, the sharia is imposed.
One can also note that the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet entitled one of these recent books the democracy against itself.
The future of Iraq is linked to the oil production.
In other regions, the Sharia is imposed.
We are witnessing today to change a Muslim identity for an Islamic identity.
Those who do not know the intensive farming methods will be astonished perhaps the need for such legislation.
We can also note that the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet entitled the recent books against democracy itself.
This tendency goes well beyond simple.
It is an implicit but but clearly, the head of State for 24 years.
But they were necessary.
However, the American courts accused a reduction of 5.2% between 9 and on 24 May.
The key is that when interest rates go up, the values of active fall.
Losing on the issue of Alstom would have serious repercussions in Europe and not only for the policies on competition.
Tocqueville thought that on the long run, nothing can be really opposed to this tendency.
A couple who have left?
However, the Americans have accused that lower 5.2% between 9 and on 24 May.
What it did without the initiative not going very far.
A man wearing a hard hat is dancing.
An air plane is taking off.
A child is riding a horse.
The man is feeding a mouse to the snake.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is spreading shredded cheese on an uncooked pizza.
Two men are playing chess.
A man is playing guitar.
A man is playing a flute.
A man seated is playing the cello.
A man is cutting onions.
Two men are fighting.
A man is skating.
The man is playing the guitar.
A woman is playing an acoustic guitar and singing.
The man is erasing the chalk board.
A person throws a cat on the ceiling.
The man spanked the other man with a stick.
A woman picks up and holds a baby kangaroo in her arms.
A man is playing a bamboo flute.
Someone is folding a piece of paper.
A panda dog is running on the road.
A dog is trying to eat the bacon on its back.
A woman is carrying her baby.
A girl is brushing her hair.
A polar bear is sliding across the snow.
A woman is swimming.
Three men are on stage playing guitars.
A cat is rubbing against a baby.
A man is riding on a horse.
A man pours wine in a pot.
A girl is playing a guitar.
A panda slides down a slide.
A group of boys are playing soccer on the beach.
A woman is eating meat.
A woman is peeling a potato.
A woman is peeling a potato.
Men are playing cricket.
A boy falls off his bike.
A man is playing a flute.
A woman is playing a flute.
A cougar is chasing a bear.
A hare is running from a eagle.
A man chops down a tree with an axe.
A woman is cooking a breaded pork chop.
A woman measures another woman's ankle.
A girl running is flying a kite.
A man rode a mechanical bull.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a guitar.
A woman is dancing and singing in the rain.
A woman is slicing something.
A man is slicing an onion.
A man is pouring oil into a skillet.
A lion is playing with two men.
A dog is riding a skateboard.
A man is carving a statue.
A man is cutting an onion.
A woman is peeling shrimp.
A woman is cooking fish.
The lady sang into the microphone.
A woman is playing a guitar.
A baby is playing with a doll.
A man is slicing a cucumber.
A person is slicing some meat.
A person is cutting an onion.
A man is playing a keyboard.
A man climbs a rope.
A woman is playing the violin.
A man is playing the guitar.
A man is cutting up carrots.
A boy is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a guitar.
A boy is playing a guitar.
A woman is cutting tofu.
A boy is playing key board.
A man is riding a bicycle.
A man is playing an electric guitar.
A dog is licking a baby.
Kittens are eating from dishes.
A man is cutting and onion.
A man is playing the drums.
A man is playing the guitar.
A woman is cutting a red pepper.
A man plays the drum.
A woman is riding a horse.
A man is eating a banana.
A man is playing two keyboards.
A man is spitting.
A man cut a tree with an axe.
A little boy plays with a toy phone.
A woman is cooking something.
A lady is playing the guitar.
A man is riding a horse.
A man is riding a horse.
A man is playing a trumpet.
A man is playing a trumpet.
A man is playing a trumpet.
An animal is chewing on a key chain.
A squirrel runs around in circles.
A man cuts an onion.
A man and woman kiss.
A man is getting into a car in a garage.
A man is talking.
A man is talking.
A man is playing the guitar.
A person is cutting mushrooms with a knife.
A man is cutting up a fish.
A tiger is walking around.
A person is peeling an onion.
A man is playing the trumpet.
A woman is peeling an apple.
A panda bear is eating some bamboo.
A person is peeling an eggplant.
The monkey pushed the other monkey.
A squirrel is moving in circles.
A man ties his shoe.
A boy is playing the piano.
A dog is eating a piece of watermelon.
A woman is chopping broccoli with a knife.
A man peeled a potatoe.
A man plays a guitar.
A man is playing guitar.
A man is slicing onion.
A man is slicing a bun.
A woman is swimming underwater.
A man and woman is eating.
A man is playing a keyboard.
A panda slides down a slide.
A dog is chasing a ball.
The men are playing basketball.
A man is riding on a motorcycle.
A man is singing and playing a guitar.
The man is talking on the phone.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is exercising.
A man is talking.
A man slaps a woman.
Two bays are dancing.
A man is riding a horse.
A man is playing flute.
A girl is riding a horse.
A monkey is riding a bike.
A woman is peeling potato.
A man is slicing potato.
Someoen is playing guitar.
A woman is cutting an onion.
A girl is riding a bicycle.
A woman is slicing ginger.
A man is cutting a paper plate.
The woman is slicing herbs.
A man is playing the flute.
The man is playing the violin.
A man is lifting weights.
A woman is breading some meat.
A man is playing a keyboard piano.
Two zebras are playing in a field.
The lady cut up a green onion.
A woman is boiling noodles in water.
A slow loris is biting a persons finger.
Lionel Ritchie dances while standing on the ceiling.
A person is playing the piano.
A man is slicing some potato.
A woman plays on a flute.
A boy is looking at a calendar.
A woman is chopping onions.
A man plays a guitar.
A woman is sewing on a machine.
A cartoon chef is flipping pancakes.
A woman is slicing a pumpkin.
A man and woman is dancing.
A woman is riding a horse.
A car is driving down the road.
A woman is kneading dough.
A woman is slicing an onion.
A man is talking on a phone.
A man is riding on a horse.
A woman is dancing.
A man is eating.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is playing a piano.
A man is cooking.
A man is dancing.
A man is singing and playing the guitar.
A monkey is swinging from tree to tree.
The people got off the train at the station.
The man is cracking eggs into a bowl.
A dog bounces on a trampoline.
A man is playing a trumpet.
A band is playing onstage.
A man sings and plays the guitar.
A woman is slicing a tomato.
A man climbs up a rope.
A man is climbing a wall.
A herd of elephants are walking along a trail.
A man and woman are driving down the road in an open air vehicle.
A shirtless man is sitting on a chair.
A turtle is walking underwater.
Two women are wrestling on the floor.
A puppy is playing with a tennis ball.
A kangaroo is eating.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is cutting carpet with a knife.
A man is riding a motor scooter.
Someone is slicing a tomato.
A man is talking.
A man plays the guitar.
A dog licks a baby.
A man is slicing a tomato.
A woman is applying stickers to her face.
A man slices potatoes.
A man sitting on the floor in a room is strumming a guitar.
The woman is dicing garlic.
The dog is playing with a plastic container.
A squirrel runs in circles.
A boy is walking across a bridge.
A man seated in a room is playing the guitar.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is playing violin.
A man is playing a piano.
A man is eating something.
A woman is cracking an egg into a bowl.
A man is playing a piano.
A man guts a fish.
The men are putting suitcases into the car's trunk.
A little girl is walking down a hallway.
The man poured oil on the cut tomatoes.
A man is slicing a bun.
A animated airplane is landing.
A woman is balling dough.
A man is playing a harp.
A man and woman are walking arm in arm through a wooded area.
A cat is eating corn on the cob.
A woman picks up a baby kangaroo.
A fish is swimming.
Two women make something in a blender.
A man is climbing a rope.
A person is surfing.
A man is stabbing a target.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is spreading butter onto bread.
A woman is boiling noodles in water.
A man is eating a piece of bread.
A group of people are dancing.
A man is eating pasta.
A man is playing flute.
A woman is mixing meat.
A woman is cutting an onion.
A man is picking flowers.
A woman is riding a donkey.
A doctor rushes a patient on a stretcher.
A man is cutting carpet with a knife.
The woman is playing the flute.
A woman dances in the rain out side.
Two pandas are laying together.
Some people are dancing on stage.
A baby is laughing and giggling.
A boy is playing a piano.
A woman is riding a horse.
A woman is slicing a pepper.
The man is dancing.
A man plays the piano.
Two cats are fighting each other.
A person is writing with a pencil.
A woman is singing on stage.
A man is playing a guitar.
A person is stirring vegetables in a pot.
A man is running down a road.
A woman is flouring and rolling dough.
Woman is adding sugar to meat.
A woman is pouring water on fish.
A little boy is playing a guitar.
A cheetah is running across a field.
A man is eating a slice of pizza.
A monkey is riding on a bus.
A man and a woman are riding on a bicycle.
A man and woman are talking on the phone.
A man is cleaning a glass door.
A young man is singing while playing the guitar.
A man is singing while playing the guitar.
A woman is using a hoe.
A man is driving a car.
A young girl is using sign language.
A woman is doing her hair.
An elderly man is getting into a red car.
A large green ball hits a potato.
Someone is drilling a hole in a piece of wood.
A cat is playing a piano.
Dogs are swimming in a pool.
A man is adding a silencer to a gun.
The man used a machine to chop up a potatoe.
A woman is cutting tofu.
A herd of caribou are crossing a road.
A man is riding a horse.
Someone is playing a piano.
Someone is riding a horse.
Someone is sewing things.
A chicken is pecking at a dead mouse.
A woman is picking up a kangaroo.
A cat is playing with a camera.
Two men are playing guitar.
A little girl is walking down the street.
A man is cutting carpet with a knife.
A man is smearing butter on a slice of garlic bread.
A man is running on rope.
Someone is stirring a pot of chili with a spoon.
The lady broke raw eggs into a bowl.
A woman is cutting a lemon.
A man is cutting an onion.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is riding a horse.
A man is cutting a potato.
A woman is chopping octopus.
A woman is cutting a tomato.
A dog is running through water.
A woman is putting flour onto some meat.
A man is eating bread.
A man is playing a guitar.
Foxes are eating from a plate.
A boy is playing the piano.
Someone is playing a keyboard.
A boy is looking at a calendar.
A man is spitting.
Someoen is peeling a potato.
A man is singing to a woman.
A woman is slicing meat.
A man is dancing.
A man plays an acoustic guitar.
A woman is riding an elephant.
A woman is kneading dough.
A woman is playing violin.
A woman is placing skewers onto a rack.
A car is driving down the road.
A woman is chopping a potato.
Smeone is laying down.
A man is draining pasta.
A woman is exercising.
A woman is slicing fish.
A man is playing a flute.
A woman is cutting up some meat.
A man is eating a banana.
A man is riding a scooter.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man played the guitar.
A man is cleaning the house.
A man is cutting paper.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man jumps onto a short wall.
Runners compete in a race.
A man is mixing a bowl.
A woman is riding a horse.
A woman is slicing cucumber.
A woman is taking a bath.
A man is putting meat in a pan.
A guy is playing an instrument.
A man is slicing a potato.
A woman is cleaning a garden.
A man is melting butter in a pan.
Men are sawing logs.
Kids are dancing.
A man is playing piano.
A man is giving an interview.
A woman is peeling a prawn.
A girl is walking down a road.
A woman is mixing food in a bowl.
A man is driving a car.
A car is backing out of a blocked lane.
Someone is chopping some cabbage leaves.
The man sprinkled cheese on the pizza.
A boy plays a piano.
A man is hugging and kissing a woman.
A man is playing a guitar.
A animal is walking around.
A man is playing a keyboard.
A man is riding a mo-pad.
A boy is vacuuming.
A band is playing on a stage.
A group of people get off a train.
A woman is breading some meat.
A dog is walking around a pool.
A man is applying butter to bread.
A woman is applying cosmetics to her eyelid.
A woman is cutting some vegetables.
A man is doing yoga.
Some teenage girls are dancing for the camera.
A lion is pacing in a pen.
A man is cutting a potato.
A woman is playing a guitar.
The horse is running.
A woman is cutting onion.
A man is dancing in rain.
A woman is washing a freezer.
A person is playing the keyboard.
A man walks across a tight rope.
A woman is cutting a jalepeno.
A dog swims after a tennis ball.
A woman is preparing shrimp to cook.
A little kid is running around a fishing pole.
A man is walking down a road.
A man is making a speech at the podium.
A kid is playing keyboard.
A man is riding on a horse.
The person is slicing cheese.
A man is shooting a gun.
A bunny is playing with a stuffed bunny.
An airplane moves along a runway.
A woman is slicing meat with a knife.
A woman is feeding her baby with a bottle.
A woman is cutting a potato.
A man is riding a white horse.
A man is riding a horse.
A monkey is fighting a man.
A man is squeezing water.
A man is shooting off a gun.
A man is swinging on a rope.
A man is carrying another man on his back.
A man shows off a small monkey.
A man is folding paper.
A person is holding a skunk.
A man with a pistol shoots another man.
The man sang and played his guitar.
A man is smoking a cigarette.
A man is driving a car.
The man is holding a lemur.
A man is playing a key-board.
A woman is riding a horse.
A man breaks cinder blocks on another man.
Zebras are socializing.
A woman slices tofu.
Three men are playing guitars and singing together.
Elephants spray themselves with water.
A man is walking down the street.
The dog is standing at the counter.
A man drills a hole in a piece of wood.
A woman is dancing in railway station.
A man is staring out the window.
A skunk looks at the camera.
The woman is dicing garlic.
A badger is digging the earth.
A man is playing a flute.
A baby is laughing and giggling.
A helicopter lands.
A woman is slicing meat.
A man is playing a guitar.
A woman rides an elephant.
A puppy is pushing itself backwards.
A chef prepared a meal.
A woman is breaking a head of garlic into cloves.
A dog is walking along the edge of a pool.
A woman is mixing a cream in a glass with a spoon.
A person is drawing.
A teenager talks to a girl over a webcam.
A man sings with a guitar.
A large turtle crawls in the grass.
The lady sliced up the meat.
A woman is pouring batter into a bowl.
A man is using a laptop.
A woman is riding a water scooter.
Two people flipped tractor tires in a race.
A man is crawling.
A person riding a mechanical bull
A woman is using a sewing machine.
Kittens are eating food on trays.
A group of people are dancing.
A woman is cutting raw fish.
Someone is banging a camera lense against a nail.
A baby is crawling across the floor.
A person is playing a piano.
A woman is painting her lips.
A woman is feeding a man.
A man is peeling a carrot.
A monkey is teasing a dog at the zoo.
A dog is laying on the floor.
A dog is barking at a fly.
A man is playing his guitar.
A boy is playing a wooden flute.
The man added seasoning to water in a bowl.
A tied man is putting into water.
A baby rhino is following an adult rhino.
A woman is slicing partially into half of an onion.
A woman is carrying a kangaroo.
A dog opens a can of food.
A man catches a fish.
A man is busting concrete.
A man is slicing a leave.
A child is stuck in a dog house.
Men are falling into a pool.
A man is slicing some carrots.
A man sliced a plastic bottle with a sword.
A woman is swimming.
A woman is dancing.
The machine shaved the end of the pencil.
A South African Airways plane is flying in a blue sky.
A bear is fighting wolves.
A woman relaxes in an inner tube.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is kissing a woman in stage.
A woman is watching television.
A woman is slicing potatoes.
A man is playing the guitar.
A woman is peeling garlic.
A woman is cutting vegetable.
A man is slicing a cucumber.
A baby plays with a dog and ball.
A woman is slicing up some green leaves.
Four people are floating on a raft.
A man turns on the microwave.
The girl trotted the horse.
A man is cutting a potato.
A gorilla plays the drums.
A rocket exploded.
A dog is pawing at a fly in the carpet before it.
A woman is shredding chicken.
A person is slicing a tomato.
A helicopter flies over water.
A boy is pouring something from a pitcher.
A woman is riding on an elephant.
A man is playing the guitar.
An older woman is pouring oil into a skillet on the stove.
A dog is walking along a pool.
A man cutting butter into a mixing bowl.
A woman is peeling a potato.
A man is eating.
A man gets knocked off of a horse.
A woman is chopping cilantro.
A man pops wheelies on a motorcycle.
A man is rinsing a steak.
Two men are playing ping pong.
A man is kicking a soccer ball.
A person is slicing carrots in half.
A person is blow torching cameras.
A man is cutting open a box.
The lady fried the breaded meat in hot oil.
A woman plays the clarinet.
A man is singing while walking down the sidewalk.
A woman is dancing in the street.
A woman is cutting some octopus.
A woman is slicing up some pork.
A man is shooting off guns.
A band is playing on stage.
A man is drawing on a digital dry erase board.
A woman is kneading tortilla dough.
A baby is playing a guitar.
The woman is tapping her fingers on the table.
The rhino grazed on the grass.
A man is talking to a woman.
A lion is walking around.
A man is performing stunts.
The woman is slicing herbs.
Polar bears are fighting each other.
A dog is riding a skateboard.
The woman is poking holes in the potato.
A man pours water over a pilots head.
A man and a woman shake hands.
A man is performing a card trick.
A woman is wake boarding on a lake.
Trees are hit by very hard winds.
A cat plays with a small bottle.
A woman is frying shrimp.
The woman is playing the violin.
A man is slicing a tomato.
A woman is playing the violin.
A person is dicing an onion.
A person cuts ginger.
A woman is dancing.
A couple are eating a meal and talking.
A woman walks her dog down the street.
A man is turning over tables in anger.
A man is giving a woman a massage.
A girl plays a wind instrument.
Some people are singing.
A cat is licking from a saucer of milk.
A man is cutting tomatoes with a cleaver.
A boy sits on a bed, sings and plays a guitar.
A woman is applying eyeshadow.
A man is doing a card trick.
Two men are fighting using a form of martial arts.
The man and woman are walking.
A boy is playing a game on a laptop.
The women are singing and dancing.
Men jump in a river.
An officer is talking to recruits.
A man is putting foods in a box.
the man used a stenograph.
A woman is making noodles.
A woman seated is singing a song and playing the guitar too.
Some men are playing soccer.
A man climbs up a rope.
A man is taking a picture.
A man puts vegetables into a pot.
A woman is slicing garlic.
Some men are sawing.
Two men are pushing carts.
The man played his guitar.
A woman puts rice into a pan.
A large amount of penguins are heading to the ocean.
Someone is handling a bun.
A boy is playing a guitar.
A man is emptying a plastic container.
A man is maneuvering a soccer ball with his feet.
A man is leading a horse around by it's halter.
A piece of paper is being cut.
A woman is peeling a potato.
The lady peeled the shrimp.
A man tries to read the paper.
A man is holding a animal.
A woman is cutting a block of tofu into small cubes.
A woman is pouring a yellow mixture on a frying pan.
A monkey pulled a dogs tail.
A person is mixing ingredients in a bowl.
The cricket player hit the ball.
A woman is placing eggs into a pan.
A woman is slicing a cucumber.
A hamster is singing.
A man in a hat sings a song.
Someone is typing.
A soccer player scores a goal.
A woman is pouring ingredients into a frying pan.
A woman splashes around in the ocean's waves.
A man sprays another man with water from a hose.
A woman is pulling some kind of sticky goo out of a bowl.
A man is showing a t shirt.
Three men are jumping off a wall.
The man poured oil on the tomato slices.
The man played his guitar with a friend.
Someone pours olive oil into a bowl of tomato wedges.
A cat is licking a small bottle.
A young man is talking to a leaf.
A girl is putting on eye makeup.
A woman is pouring ingredients in a bowl.
A cat is crawling under a piece of furniture on it's back.
A woman is dancing on a stage.
A man is wiping the edge of a bowl off.
A nuclear weapon explodes in a desert.
A man is talking into a microphone.
A young man is dancing.
A woman is peeling potato.
The woman is cracking eggs into a bowl.
A woman is dancing in the rain.
The ladies are performing a dance.
A man breaks a stick.
A sea turtle is hunting for fish.
The girl is using an eye pencil on her eyelid.
A dog is riding on a bicyclists shoulders.
The beaver is being petted.
A man is spreading out dough.
A girl is tapping her finger nails.
A woman walks her dog onto astro turf.
Someone in a gorilla costume is playing a set of drums.
A man is showing his dog to the camera.
A man is walking with several dogs.
A person is cleaning a disk.
A man is playing a guitar.
Two women are singing.
Different sets of teams are playing football on a field.
An animal is walking on the ground.
Someone is riding a horse.
A man rides a water toy in the water.
A woman is slicing a carrot.
A man is spreading butter on a tortilla.
A man is dancing.
A man and and woman are running together, holding hands.
Women are dancing outside.
A boy is talking to a giant dog.
A woman is adding ingredients to a skillet.
A woman is preparing an egg in a skillet.
A person is cutting boiled egg into pieces.
A male and female robot are kissing.
The cat teased the dog by touching his head.
The woman is pencilling on eye shadow.
A rhino is grazing in a field.
The dog ran in the water at the beach.
A man is doing tricks with a soccer ball.
A woman driving a car is talking to the man seated beside her.
Pieces of butter is added in the stand mixer.
A cat and a boy play together.
The dog is playing with the floor cleaner.
A man is sprinkling seasoning on several split and buttered loaves of bread.
A couple slow dances.
A panda is lying down.
A person is dumping chopped vegetables into a pot on the stove.
A horse is running.
A onion is being chopped.
A group of swimmers fall into a pool.
A young girl is singing on a stage.
A man pours cleaner in his sink.
A man is eating bread.
A person cuts a big green pepper apart.
A woman spices some seafood.
A cat is playing on the floor.
A girl loses her kite.
A woman is frying meat.
A monkey is wading across a marsh.
A panda bear is eating.
The man is writing a letter.
A boy is screaming.
A boy is doing push ups.
A woman is pouring eyes into a bowl.
A cheetah chases prey on across a field.
Someone is cutting a tomato.
A onion is being sliced.
A woman is grilling pineapples.
A man is slicing garlic.
A person is mixing a pot.
A dog is pulling a girl down a hill.
A truck is going down a hill.
A youngster is sitting on a piano.
The little girl is putting her hair into a pony tail.
A woman cuts tofu into tiny pieces.
The man is stirring oil.
A baby sneezed and scared another baby.
A man is cutting a vegetable.
A woman is swimming in the water.
A man is playing an acoustic guitar and singing into a microphone.
The little dog barked at the electronic toy.
A man is preparing some dish.
A man is talking.
A woman cuts off a small piece of lemon rind.
A woman jumps hurdles on a horse.
A boy is sitting in a room playing a piano by lamp light.
A boy is riding a bicycle.
The man is exercising.
A man is playing a flute.
A woman stirs eggs in a bowl.
A man is holding a slow loris.
A woman plays an electric guitar.
A person is holding two baby lorises.
A rabbit is kissing another rabbit.
A hedgehog is biting at a blanket.
A slow loris hanging on a cord.
A man is jumping into water from a cliff.
A man is slicing a white onion with a mandolin slicer.
A woman is placing skewered food onto a cooker.
The man is dropping sliced cucumbers into water.
A kitten is playing with a woman's finger.
A Guinea pig eats a carrot.
Four young men stand still as a car explodes behind them.
A woman is cleaning a shrimp.
The man sat in his suit and smoked.
Someone is cutting paper.
A person is cutting leaves.
A woman is putting a baby into a trash can.
A little girl peddling a scooter.
A woman and dog are walking together.
The deer jumped over the fence.
A baby is falling asleep.
A man plays the guitar.
A cat is pooping into a toilet.
A man is moving large rocks.
A dog is moving its mouth.
The leaders benefit aujourd' hui of a new luck and let's let them therefore seize it.
Amendment No 7 is proposing certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
I would like to remind you that among our allies, there are strong of this tax.
The vote will take place at 5.30pm
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
There was not a majority voting in Parliament to go back to Article 272.
It has the effect of augmenting the potency of the big countries to the detriment of babies.
The fishers are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Leaders now have another chance to let them and therefore take.
The vote will take place at 17h30.
The body must be in balance.
We are proud often here to represent the citizens of Europe.
(The Parliament adopts legislative resolution)
The leaders benefit aujourd ' hui d ' a new chance and therefore let us let them it grab.
I belong to the Members who are present rather honourably.
Tunisia
It did not not more of the qualified majority in this Parliament to return to the Article 272.
As I have already explained, at second reading, a crisis is at the root of this modification of Directive.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summed up in a few words: the power of citizens on bureaucracy.
Amendment No 7 proposes changes to certain paragraphs references.
We take pride often here to represent the European citizens.
Thank you, Commissioner.
Often we are proud of representing Europe's citizens.
Thank you, Commissioner.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
I want to say to you that among our allies, there are fervent of this tax.
I insist on reminding you that among our allies, there are devotees of this tax.
Perhaps we should have been able to prevent a disaster.
Specific aid as the support of the market or the premium on grass are essential.
It has increased the power of the large countries to the detriment of small.
This point of the rules of procedure opens the door to the arbitrary.
Relation Maij-Weggen (A5-0323/2000)
Thank-You, Mister the Commissioner.
We we take pride often here of representing the european citizens.
It has in fact increased the power of large countries to the detriment of small.
Perhaps then we would have avoided a catastrophe.
Group must be in equilibrium.
There was not either qualified majority within this Parliament to come back to the article 272.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323 / 2000)
Mr President, I wish to take the protection of workers of this sector.
Thank you, Commissioner.
Amendment 7 proposes certain modifications in the references to the paragraphs.
The leaders benefit today of a new chance and thus let the matter.
I am one of the Members who are rather honourably here.
The vote will take place with 17h30.
This has the effect of increasing the power of the large countries at the expense of small.
The leaders profit aujourd' hui of a new luck and let us leave them therefore to seize it.
Thank you, Commissioner.
(The Parliament adopts the legislative resolution)
Tunisia
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarized in a few words: the power of citizens on bureaucracy.
There was no more qualified majority voting in this Parliament to come back to Article 272.
It does not was not no longer a majority voting in this Parliament to return to the article 272.
Given the leaders today a new chance and thus let the approach.
As I l ' have already explained in second reading, a crisis is at the root of this modification of directive.
Van Orden report (A5-0241 / 2000)
We would perhaps then able prevent a disaster.
It is our duty to continue to support Latvia on the issue of the integration of the Russian population.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Mr President, I want to take the protection of workers.
It is our duty to continue supporting Latvia on the question of the Russian population.
I am part of Members who are not properly present.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323 / 2000)
I would like to remind you that our allies, there are ardent supporters of this tax.
We preserve unanimity in the Council and thus a latent incapacity to act.
This has the effect of increasing the power of the large countries at the expense of small.
This has the effect of increasing the power of the large countries at the expense of small.
Van Orden report In particular A5-0241 -- 2000)
It is of our duty to continue supporting the Latvia on the question of the incorporation of the Russian population.
Mr Van Orden report (A5-0241 / 2000)
Mr. President, the Cashman report/ratio can summarize himself in a few words: capacity of the citizens on the bureaucracy.
Amendment 7 proposes certain modifications in the references to the paragraphs.
The users are the losers, employees, and European competitiveness and growth régresseront.
It is our duty to continue to support the Latvia on the question of the integration of the Russian population.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
This regulation point opens the door to the arbitrary one.
Tunisia
Fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointment.
It is that the European Union is involved and that it do so quickly.
I am part of Members who are not properly present.
Has the effect of increasing the power of the large at the expense of smaller countries.
The standards are hardly comparable and even less transferable.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
The standards are hardly comparable and still less transferable.
Tunisia
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323 / 2000)
There was no qualified majority in this Parliament to go back to Article 272.
The amendment 7 proposes some changes in the references to the paragraphs.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Report Van Orden (A5-0241 / 2000)
Mr President, I would like to make the defence of workers in this sector.
This point of the payment opens the door with the arbitrary one.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summed up in a few words: the power of citizens on the bureaucracy.
The users will be the losers, with the employees, and European competitiveness and growth will regress.
This has the effect of increasing the power of large countries at the expense of smaller.
There was no qualified majority in this Parliament to go back to Article 272.
I am one of those Members who are rather honourably here.
It is our duty to continue to support Latvia on the issue of the integration of the Russian population.
The leaders have today of a new opportunity and let them therefore seized.
Specific assistances like the support of the market or the premium with grass are essential.
I am one of the Members of Parliament who are rather present.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
The whole must be in balance.
Mr President, I would like to take the defence of workers in this sector.
Perhaps we would then have to avoid a disaster.
It suits that the European Union implies itself and that she do it quickly.
Tunisia
The whole must be in balance.
The occasional aid as the support of the market or the premium to grass is essential.
Mr President, I would like to defend workers in the sector.
The vote will take place at 5.30 p.m.
Tunisia
This point of the regulation opens the door to arbitrariness.
As I already explained in second reading, a crisis is at the base of this modification of directive.
Thank you, Commissioner.
It is right that the European Union is involved, and for this to be done quickly.
The vote will take place at 5.30 p.m.
We maintain the unanimity in the Council and therefore a latent capacity to act.
As I have already explained in second reading, is at the root of this directive.
Mr President, I hold to the defence of workers in this sector.
It is our duty to continue to support the Latvia on the issue of the integration of the Russian population.
Maij-Weggen report (5 / 2000)
Thank you, Mister the Commissioner.
Van Orden report (A5-0241 / 2000)
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summed up in a few words: the power of the citizens on bureaucracy.
On others who are unfortunately in the reason of a vengeance gained.
As I have already explained at second reading, a crisis is on the basis of this amended directive.
The standards are hardly comparable and even less transferable.
There was no qualified majority in this Parliament to go back to Article 272.
It is of our duty to continue to support Latvia on the question of the integration of the Russian population.
Other separate unfortunately because of a grudge accumulated.
Amendment 7 proposes certain modifications in the references to paragraphs.
This point of the regulation opens the door to the arbitrary.
The specific aid as the support of the market or the premium to the grass is necessary.
The vote will take place at 5.30 p.m.
The standards are hardly comparable and even less transferable.
The leaders have now of a new chance and let -- therefore the take.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summed up in a few words: the power of citizens on bureaucracy.
We maybe then could have avoided a catastrophe.
Tunisia
Mr President, the report Mr Cashman's can be summarised in a few words: the power of people on the tape.
We have the unanimity in the Council and therefore a covert inability to act.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Mister the President, I am anxious to take the defense of the workers of this sector.
(The Parliament adopts the legislative resolution)
Users will be the losers, with employees, and European competitiveness and growth Régresseront.
I am part of the parliamentary ones that are rather present honorably.
The specific aid as the support of the market or the premium on grass are essential.
We preserve the unanimity to the Counsel and therefore a latent inability to act.
This point of the regulation opens the door to the arbitrary.
Van Orden report (5 / 2000)
The fishermen are unemployed, tired and disappointed.
Van Orden report (5 / 2000)
As I have already explained at second reading, a crisis is on the basis of this amendment of directive.
Report Maij-Weggen (A5-0323 / 2000)
The consumers are the losers, with the employees, and the competitiveness and the growth European régresseront.
Report Horsebox Orden (A5-0241 / 2000)
Some separate themselves unfortunately in view of a grudge gained.
Tunisia
We ourselves often represent European citizens.
Users will be the losers, with employees, and régresseront European competitiveness and growth.
We maintain unanimity in Council and therefore a latent inability to act.
Mr President, I would like to take the defence of workers in this sector.
We keep unanimity in the Council and therefore a latent inability to act.
Mr President, the report Cashman can come down in some words: the power of the citizens on officialism.
Mr President, I would like to take the protection of workers in this sector.
The vote will place to 17h30.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
The vote will be to 17h30.
The European Union itself and do so quickly.
The whole must be in balance.
Report Maij-Weggen In particular A5-0323 -- 2000)
It is appropriate that the European Union is involved and that it makes it quickly.
It did not exist not more qualified majority within this Parliament to come back to the item 272.
All must be balanced.
We would perhaps then could prevent a disaster.
I would remind you that one of our allies, it is very much of this tax.
D 'other separate themselves unfortunately because of an accumulated grudge.
This point in the regulation opens the door to the arbitrary.
Thank you, Commissioner.
The whole must be in balance.
The specific aid as the support of the market or the premium to the grass are essential.
Mister Preside over it, I insist on taking the defense of the workers of this sector.
That has for effect to increase the power of the big countries to the detriment of the small ones.
I would like to remind you that one of our allies, there are ardent supporters of this tax.
The vote will take place at 5.30 p.m.
The occasional aid as the market or the grass is essential.
Specific aid as the market or the premium on grass are essential.
Thank you, Mister Commissioner.
We often take pride here to represent the citizens of Europe.
Tunisia
Tunisia
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323 / 2000)
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarized in two words: the power of the people on the tape.
We might then have to avoid a disaster.
The leaders have today a new chance and let them therefore seize it.
The fishermen inactive, are tired and disappointed.
Amendment No 7 is proposing certain amendments in the references to the paragraphs.
Tunisia
It is our duty to continue to support Latvia on the issue of the integration of the Russian population.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
I would like to remind you that among our allies, there are ardent supporters of this tax.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323 / 2000)
We keep unanimity in the Council and therefore a latent inability to act.
It is that the European Union is means and that it be done very soon.
I am one of the Members who are quite honourably here.
Punctual helps as the support of the market or bonus in the grass are necessary.
The whole must be balanced.
Van Orden report (A5-0241 / 2000)
This point of the regulation opens the door to arbitrariness.
I am part of parliamentarians who are rather present honourably.
Mister the President, the report Cashman can summarize itself in some words: the strength of the citizens on the bureaucracy.
It is that the European Union is involved and that it will soon.
I am one of the Members who are quite honourably here.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
It is right that the European Union is it entails, and do so quickly.
Mr President, I want to stand up for workers of this area.
The unit must be in balance.
We keep l ' unanimity in Council and therefore a latent inability to act.
Norms are barely comparable and even less alienable.
The leaders are here today to a new chance and let them therefore the take.
Mr. President, I make a point of taking the defense of the workers of this sector.
Tunisia
There was no qualified majority in this Parliament to go back to Article 272.
We keep unanimity in the Council and thus a latent failure to act.
The report Maij-Weggen, A5-0323/2000 --
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summed up in a few words: the power of citizens on bureaucracy.
We we pride often here of representing the European citizens.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323/2000)
This point of Procedure opens the door to the arbitrary.
Other separate unfortunately because of an accumulated resentment.
I want to remind you that of our allies, it is of major of tax.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323 / 2000)
The leaders now have another chance to let them and therefore seize it.
I form part of the members of Parliament who are rather honourably present.
We often enorgueillissons ourselves here to represent the European citizens.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised as follows: the citizens on bureaucracy.
Amendment 7 changes in references to paragraphs.
It is appropriate that the European Union means and that it should do so quickly.
I am anxious to recall you that among our allies, there is fervent of this tax.
Punctual help as the support of the market or the bonus at the grass is essential.
It is our duty to continue to support Latvia on the issue of the integration of the Russian population.
I would remind you that our allies, devotees of this tax.
Amendment No 7 is proposing certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
The leaders are today a new chance and thus let.
There did not exist either of majority qualified within this Parliament to return in article 272.
The vote will take place at 17h30.
We are proud often of representing the European citizens here.
We maintain unanimity in the Council and therefore a latent inability to act.
Report maij-weggen (A5-0323/2000)
Others separate unfortunately because of an accumulated resentment.
, The Parliament adopted the legislative resolution --
Specific aid, support or market at grass is essential.
Support specific as the support of the market or the premium to the grass is necessary.
Punctual assistance as the support of the market or the premium to grass is essential.
We often take pride here to represent the citizens of Europe.
Other divide unfortunately because of a grudge accumulated.
I would like to remind you that among our allies, there are enthusiasts of this tax.
Report Van Orden (A5-0241/2000)
I am one of the Members who are quite honourably here.
The standards are hardly comparable and even less transferable.
Other divide unfortunately because of a grudge accumulated.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summed up in a few words: the power of citizens on bureaucracy.
That has as effect to increase the power of the great countries to the detriment of the small ones.
Others are parting unfortunately because of a rancune gained.
Other divide unfortunately due to a accumulated ill-will.
Other diverge unfortunately owing to an accumulated vengeance.
I would like to remind you that among our allies, there are ardent supporters of this tax.
Specific aid as the support of the market or the premium on grass are essential.
The leaders now have a new chance and let them therefore seize it.
This point of the regulation opens the door to the arbitrary.
Other separate unfortunately because of resentment accumulated.
There was not majority qualified within this Parliament to bring back to the article 272 either.
Others unfortunately diverge in response to rancune gained.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Mr President, I wish to take the protection of workers of the sector.
The vote will take place on 17: 30.
The standards are hardly comparable and still less transferable.
It has to effect of increasing the power of the large countries to the detriment of small.
We could perhaps have been able to prevent a disaster.
The whole must be in balance.
As I have already explained to us at second reading, a crisis is at the root of this amendment to Directive.
There was no qualified majority in this Parliament to go back to Article 272.
This is to increase the power of the large countries at the expense of small.
Mr President, I would like to take the defence of workers in this sector.
All must be balanced.
The users will be the losers, with the employees, and European competitiveness and the growth will regress.
The standards are hardly comparable and even less transferable.
Others separate themselves unfortunately because of an amassed grudge.
Fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
The European Union must be involved and do so quickly.
We might then have to avoid a disaster.
Users will be the losers, with the employees, and the competitiveness and European growth régresseront.
This paves the way for the of the Rules of Procedure here.
As I have already said in the second reading, a crisis is at the basis of this amendment of directive.
In particular Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
I would like to remind you that among our allies, there are ardent supporters of this tax.
As I have already explained in second reading, a crisis is at the basis of this modification of directive.
It is our duty to continue to support Latvia on the issue of the integration of the Russian population.
It is important that the European Union itself and to do it quickly.
This has the effect of increasing the power of the large countries to the detriment of small.
I am one of the Members who are quite honourably here.
As I have already explained in second reading, a crisis is to the basis of this amendment of the directive.
Then we might have been able to avoid a disaster.
The standards are hardly comparable and still less transferable.
Tunisia was
Amendment No 7 is proposing certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
The amendment 7 proposes some modifications in the references to the paragraphs.
Thank you, Mr Commissioner.
It is important that the European Union to be involved and to do it quickly.
The whole must be in balance.
Other separate unfortunately because of a grudge accumulated.
Relation Horse-Trailer Orden (A5-0241/2000)
The leaders are today of a new chance and therefore let us take it.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarized briefly: the power of the people on bureaucracy.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
It is appropriate that the European Union is and what it implies does it quickly.
It is our duty to continue to press for Latvia on the issue of the integration of the Russian people.
We maintain unanimity in the Council and therefore a latent inability to act.
As I have already explained at second reading, a crisis is at the root of this amendment to Directive.
The standards are to death similar and even less transferable.
It is necessary that the European Union gets involved and that it makes it fast.
Has the effect of increasing the power of the large countries at the expense of the smaller countries.
The together must be in balance.
The vote will take place at 5.30 p.m.
It is our duty to continue to support Latvia on the issue of the integration of the Russian population.
We often take pride here to represent the citizens of Europe.
Thank you, Commissioner.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
We preserve the unanimity at the Council and thus a latent incapacity to act.
The unity must be in balance.
The vote will take place at 5.30 p.m.
Mrs Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323 / 2000)
Users are the losers, with workers and European competitiveness and innovation régresseront.
We would perhaps have been able to prevent a disaster.
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summarised in a few words: the power of citizens on bureaucracy.
As I have already explained it in second reading, a crisis is at the base of this modification of directive.
As I have explained, a crisis at second reading is the basis of amendment of the directive.
We enorgueillissons ourselves often here to represent the European citizens.
The whole must be in balance.
Maij-Weggen report (A5-0323 / 2000)
That causes to increase the power of the large countries to the detriment of small.
It is our duty to continue to support Latvia on the question of the integration of the Russian population.
This point of procedure opens the door to the arbitrary.
There was no qualified majority in this Parliament to go back to Article 272.
Specific aid as the market or the premium on grass are essential.
It is our duty of continue to support the Latvia on the issue of the integration of the russian people.
The vote will take place at 17h30.
We could perhaps then have avoided a catastrophe.
Tunisia
The standards are hardly comparable and still less transferable.
We might then have to avoid a disaster.
We keep unanimity in Council and therefore a latent incapacity to act.
It did not exist either qualified majority in this Parliament to return to article 272.
We would maybe then have been able to avoid a disaster.
Consumers will be the losers, with workers and competitiveness and growth regress.
Thank you, Commissioner.
Then we might have been able to avoid a disaster.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Van Orden report (A5-0241 / 2000)
Tunisia
We are often here to represent the citizens of Europe.
Thank you, Commissioner.
It has the effect of increasing the power of the large countries, to the detriment of the small ones.
I am one of the Members who are quite honourably here.
The users will be the losers, with the employees, and the competitiveness and growth regress.
There was no qualified majority in this Parliament to go back to Article 272.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
The standards are hardly comparable and even less transferable.
I am one of the Members who are rather present.
We preserve the unanimity to the Advice and therefore a latent inability to act.
Van Orden report (A5-0241 / 2000)
It suits that the European Union is implied and that it makesit rapidly.
We are often here to represent the European citizens.
The fishermen are idle, tired and disappointed.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Thank you, Mr Commissioner.
Users will be the losers, with employees, and European competitiveness and growth Régresseront.
The norms are hardly comparable and still less transferable.
I want to remind you that of our allies, it is of much of this tax.
This point of the regulations opens the door to the arbitrary one.
Mrs Maij-Weggen's report (5 / 2000)
Mr President, the Cashman report can be summed up in a few words: the power of the citizens on the bureaucracy.
This point of the regulations opens the door to arbitrary power.
We maintain unanimity in the Council and therefore a latent inability to act.
A specific aid as the support of the market or the premium on grass are essential.
This Regulation opens the door to the arbitrary.
The users will be the losers, with the employees, and the European competitiveness and growth will recede.
We often take pride here in representing the European citizens.
It is of our duty to continue to support the Latvia on the question of the integration of the Russian population.
Thank you, Mister the Police chief.
Van Orden report (A5-0241/2000)
The amendment 7 proposes some changes in the references to the paragraphs.
Tunisia
The leaders have today a new chance and let them therefore seize it.
Mister Preside over it, the relation Cashman can amount in some words: the power of the citizens on the bureaucracy.
D ' others part unfortunately in reason d ' a collected resentment.
It is of our duty of continuing press Latvia on the question of the integration of the Russian population.
All must be in balance.
Tunisia
The standards are hardly comparable and even less transferable.
Report Van Orden (A5-0241 / 2000)
I am part of the members of parliament who are rather honorably present.
We maintain unanimity in the Council and therefore a latent inability to act.
The leaders profit today from a new chance and thus let them seize it.
Thank you, Commissioner.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
(the Parliament adopts the legislative resolution)
That was to increase the power of the large countries to the detriment of small.
I am one of those Members who are quite properly here.
This regulation opens the door to the arbitrary.
As I already explained it in second reading, a crisis is located to the basis of this modification of directive.
Report/ratio Maij-Weggen (A5-0323/2000)
I make a point of recalling you that among our allies, there are enthusiasts of this tax.
The users will be the losers, with employees, and European competitiveness and growth will diminish.
As I have already explained in second reading, a crisis is on the basis of this amendment of directive.
The users will be the losers, with employees, and European competitiveness and growth will diminish.
Mr President, I would like to take the defence of workers in this sector.
Report/ratio Van Orden (A5-0241/2000)
Mr President, I should like to take the defence of workers in this sector.
The users will be the losers, with the employees, and the competitiveness and the European growths will decline.
The whole must be in balance.
We keep unanimity in the Council, and therefore a latent inability to act.
The users are the losers, with the employees, and the competitiveness and growth european régresseront.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
Thank you, Commissioner.
Mr President, I would like to take the defence of workers in this sector.
The norms are scarcely comparable and again less transférables.
Specific aid as the support of the market or the premium to grass is essential.
Amendment No 7 proposes certain changes in the references to the paragraphs.
Consumers will be the losers, with employees, and competitiveness and growth régresseront European.
(Parliament adopted the legislative resolution)
The leaders now have a new chance and let them therefore take.
The rules are comparable only good, let alone.
Amendment 7 offers certain modifications in references to paragraphs.
Report Van Orden, A5-0241/2000 --
This regulation opens the door to arbitrariness.
It is appropriate that the European Union is implied and that it does it quickly.
Amendment No 7 is proposing certain changes in the references to paragraphs.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
The vote will take place at 5.30 p.m.
We would perhaps have been able to then avoid a disaster.
The vote will take place at 5.30 p.m.
Often we pride ourselves here to represent the people of Europe.
The standards are hardly comparable and still less transferable.
The fishermen are inactive, tired and disappointed.
As I have already explained at second reading, a crisis is at the root of this amendment of directive.
As I have already explained at second reading, a crisis is on the basis of this amendment of directive.
It is appropriate that the European Union means and that it should do so quickly.
Other separate unfortunately a accumulated resentment.
We might have been able to prevent a disaster.
I would like to remind you that one of our allies, there are strong this tax.
It is of our duty of continue to support the country on the issue of the integration of the Russian people.
Vote will take place at 17 h 30.
There was no qualified majority in this Parliament to go back to Article 272.
I hold you recall that our allies, there are enthusiastic about this tax.
We often take pride here to represent the citizens of Europe.
But other sources close to the sale said Vivendi was keeping the door open for further bids in the next day or two.
Micron's numbers also marked the first quarterly profit in three years for the DRAM manufacturer.
Perry said he backs the Senate's efforts, including the fines, to force the Democrats to return.
The American Anglican Council, which represents Episcopalian conservatives, said it will seek authorization to create a separate province in North America because of last week's actions.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> climbed 19.11 points, or 1.2 percent, to 1,615.02.
Shares of Allergan were up 14 cents at $78.40 in late trading on the New York Stock Exchange.
More than 130 people have been arrested and $17 million worth of property seized in an Internet fraud sweep announced Friday by three U.S. government agencies.
Albuquerque Mayor Martin Chavez said investigators felt confident that with the arrests they had "at least one of the fires resolved."
The scientist also quarantined himself at home as soon as he developed SARS symptoms, officials said.
The upgrade will be available as a free download for current customers with SmarNet support in January 2004.
A Cuban architect was sentenced to 20 years in prison Friday for using two fake grenades to hijack a passenger plane from Cuba to Florida in April.
Jim Williams, director of the US-VISIT project, said that by the middle of November, inspectors will be fingerprinting and photographing many foreign passengers arriving in Atlanta.
The hearing came one day after the Pentagon for the first time singled out an officer - Dallager - for failing to address the scandal.
In Nairobi, the provost of All Saints Cathedral, the Very Reverend Peter Karanja, said the US Episcopal Church was alienating itself from the Anglican Communion.
Vermillion, Posey and Madison County populations will decline.
Swartz had sought to have the charges dismissed, saying New Hampshire was the wrong place to charge him.
In 1995, the last survey, those numbers were equal.
The federal courts have ruled that the monument violates the constitutional ban against state-established religion.
They underwent more tests over the weekend, and are now warded at Raffles Hospital.
At the Casa de Espaa, customers were eating dinner and playing bingo when a bomb went off.
The panel will not begin a formal investigation because the statute of limitations has expired, Plofsky said.
Frankel said Peace Rules will run in the Preakness Stakes on May 17.
The charges of espionage and aiding the enemy can carry the death penalty.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index <.SPX> shed 2.38 points, or 0.24 percent, at 995.10.
Klarman was charged with 16 counts of wire fraud.
It may be dying because entrenched interests are positioning themselves to control the Internet's choke-points and they are lobbying the FCC to aid and abet them."
But church members and observers say they anticipate that the decision here could pose doctrinal problems for some Episcopalians who believe the Bible prohibits homosexuality.
Steve Squyres, a Cornell University scientist, is principal investigator for the missions' science instruments.
The military said it had killed 16 rebels and captured nine in the campaign so far, with one soldier killed and six wounded.
The team has named the sensor Canary, for cellular analysis and notification of antigen risks and yields.
Shares of Express Scripts ESRX.O fell about 4 percent to $66.73 on the Nasdaq in late morning trade.
Sgt. Ernest Bucklew, 33, was coming home from Iraq to bury his mother in Pennsylvania.
Shevaun Pennington disappeared on Saturday morning after arranging to meet 31-year-old Toby Studabaker.
While federal prosecutors refuse to discuss the investigation, lawyers and others familiar with it say it remains focused on Campbell.
The blue-chip Dow Jones industrial average .DJI fell 86.56 points, or 0.94 percent, to 9,109.99, after giving up more than 1 percent earlier.
But neither he nor Peace Rules could keep Funny Cide from drawing away.
Waksal pleaded guilty to insider trading charges last year, and he is scheduled to be sentenced June 10.
Zambrano pitched seven innings and allowed two runs on five hits and four walks.
"I'm absolutely confident we're going to have a bill," Frist, R-Tenn., said Thursday.
The Korean Air deal is expected to be finalized "in the next several weeks," Boeing spokesman Bob Saling said.
Shares of EDS closed Thursday at $18.51, up 6 cents on the New York Stock Exchange.
There were 293 human cases of West Nile in Indiana in 2002, including 11 deaths statewide.
The Supreme Court said Monday the government can require public libraries to equip computers with anti-pornography filters, rejecting librarians' complaints that the law amounts to censorship.
The vulnerability exists in the way Microsoft's Visual Basic for Applications checks document properties passed to it when a document is opened.
Of the 24 million phone votes cast, Studdard was only 130,000 votes ahead of Aiken.
To watch pay television, consumers would insert into the set a security card provided by their cable service.
However, we have decided to opt for the European consortium's engine as the best overall solution."
The U.S. Food and Drug Administration rejected ImClone's original application in December 2001, saying the trial had been sloppily conducted.
House Judiciary Committee Chairman James Sensenbrenner, R-Wis., says he is sensitive to civil liberties complaints.
The Dodgers won their sixth consecutive game and seventh in their last nine as they beat Colorado 3-2 on Wednesday in front of a crowd of 25,332 at Dodger Stadium.
So far, authorities also have searched areas in Pennsylvania, Ohio, Indiana, and Michigan.
The 30-year bond <US30YT=RR> firmed 24/32, taking its yield to 4.18 percent, after hitting another record low of 4.16 percent.
On Thursday, a Post article argued that a 50 basis point cut from the Fed was more likely.
Heatley underwent surgery Saturday for a broken jaw and an MRI found two torn ligaments in his right knee.
Lay had refused to turn over the papers, asserting his Fifth Amendment right against self-incrimination.
In a news release Thursday, Strayhorn said this was the first time a comptroller rejected a budget.
Analysts polled by Thomson Financial First Call had been expected to see a loss of about 11 cents a share from continuing operations.
A new worm has been spreading rapidly across the Internet, sometimes pretending to be an e-mail from Microsoft Chairman Bill Gates, antivirus vendors said Monday.
He said police had identified the bodies of seven of the 14 bombers who launched five almost simultaneous raids Friday night.
In addition, the NTSB also recommended to NHTSA that state legislation be enacted to prohibit holders of learners permits and intermediate licenses from using mobile phones while driving.
The University of Michigan plans to release a new undergraduate admissions policy Thursday after its acceptance requirements were rejected by the U.S. Supreme Court in June.
An audiotape aired last week by the Arab al-Jazeera television network may be the strongest evidence yet that Saddam survived the war.
Last week, former chief financial officer Franklyn Bergonzi pleaded guilty to one count of conspiracy and agreed to cooperate with the government's investigation.
But company officials expect the costs of the replacement work to run into the millions of dollars.
Today, Dean ends his four-day, 10-city "Sleepless Summer" tour in Chicago and New York.
Cavender did say: "I felt that if I disagreed with Rosie too much I would lose my job."
The product also streams Internet radio and comes with a 30-day free trial for RealNetworks' Rhapsody digital music subscription service.
The dollar dropped to $1.1564 per euro at 7:30 a.m. in London from $1.1486 on Friday.
The European Commission, the EU's powerful executive body, described the move as "legally unwarranted, economically unfounded and politically unhelpful."
The director of the Office of Medical Access, Cindy Cripps-Prawak, left her job after the department introduced a plan to distribute marijuana through doctors' offices.
Wire transfers from four of the 40 accounts open at Beacon Hill totaled more than $3.2 billion from 2001 to 2002, Morgenthau said.
He ran last year for the Democratic nomination for Texas governor, but lost the primary to multimillionaire Tony Sanchez.
Wal-Mart has told its top 100 suppliers that they'll need to have radio-frequency ID systems in place for tracking pallets of goods through the supply chain by Jan. 25, 2005.
Harvey was taken to St. Luke's Hospital for precautionary neck X-rays, which came back negative.
Morales, who pleaded guilty in July, expressed "sincere regret and remorse" for his crimes.
A woman who underwent such an abortion could not be prosecuted under the bill.
FirstEnergy Corp. should have determined that modernizing one of its plants would increase overall pollution emissions, U.S. District Judge Edmund Sargus ruled Thursday.
Through Sunday, Sept. 21, Site Finder has been visited over 65 million times by Internet users.
Democrats dominate the Assembly while Republicans control the Senate.
Nick Pollard, the head of Sky News said: "This is a shocking blow for James's family.
"I came to Washington basically to establish relationships and make sure we are getting more federal money," Schwarzenegger said after one meeting.
Despite problems in the job market, the latest snapshot of the labor markets was slightly better than economists were expecting.
"The concrete barriers (between lanes) were being tossed around like feathers."
Chante Jawaon Mallard, 27, is charged with murder and tampering with evidence.
"IT is the only vehicle on which established economies will be able to compete" with fast-growing economies such as China and India, Barrett said.
Former Phipps aides Linda Saunders and Bobby McLamb have both pleaded guilty to federal charges including extortion.
Vivendi shares were 0.3 percent up at 15.62 euros in Paris at 0841 GMT.
The company has publicly identified Linux as one of its biggest competitive threats.
BAT also said Antonio Monteiro de Castro, director for Latin America and the Caribbean, would become chief operating officer on January 1, 2004.
The report added that "spin" and manipulative public relations "are not the answer," but that neither is avoiding the debate.
The latest shooting linked to the spree was a Nov. 11 shooting at Hamilton Township Elementary School in Obetz, about two miles from the freeway.
The central bank's policy board left rates steady for now, as widely expected, but surprised the market by declaring that overall risks were weighted toward weakness.
The system is priced from US$1.1 million to $22.4 million, depending on configuration.
Trouble flared when at least four North Korean reporters rushed from the Taegu media centre to confront a dozen activists protesting against human rights abuses in the North.
Dusty had surgery for cancer in 2001 and had a kidney removed.
"MediaMax performs EXACTLY as "advertised" to the companies who purchased it," Jacobs said in the statement.
But Itar-Tass news agency said four of his bodyguards were among those killed by the bomb.
Netgear prices the WGT634U Super Wireless Media Router, which will be available in the first quarter of 2004, at under $200.
The commission estimated California lost $937 million to corporate tax shelters in 2001.
U.S. officials did not say whether American forces, who were acting on intelligence, crossed into Syrian territory and were vague about how the Syrian guards were involved.
The battle around VeriSign"s three-week-old Site Finder service rages on.
Last Thursday, the RIAA sent a stiff copyright warning to Penn State's department of astronomy and astrophysics.
Druce last night was held in isolation at the same prison.
Emile Laroza, 51, contracted SARS while working as a nurse at North York General Hospital, the epicentre of the second SARS outbreak.
Their leader, Abu Bakr al-Azdi, surrendered in June; his deputy was killed in a shoot-out with Saudi forces recently.
King County Superior Court Judge Charles Mertel will then recess the trial until Monday.
Google's early stage backers in include California-based Stanford University and VC firms Kleiner Perkins and Sequoia Capital.
The rally overshadowed ceremonies marking the sixth anniversary of Hong Kong's return to China on 1 July 1997.
Palm said on Wednesday it plans to buy Handspring, a company created by renegade Palm co-founder Jeff Hawkins.
"I'm not going to be sponsoring it because it's not our proposal, but I'm not responding to it in a negative way," he said.
The government recently shelved peace talks being brokered by neighbouring Malaysia after a spate of attacks on Mindanao, including three deadly bombings, that it blamed on the MILF.
That was up from the year-ago quarter, when the company earned $54.3 million, or 22 cents a share.
Along with Boston, Watertown, Saugus and Framingham also are going smoke-free Monday.
He was arrested in Atlanta, Georgia, on Monday night by police acting on a tip-off.
Israeli soldiers began tearing down settlement outposts in the West Bank yesterday - an Israeli obligation under a new Mideast peace plan.
The union said it would reveal later which chain would be targeted.
Innocent or not, "she's damaged goods," said Howard Davidowitz, chairman of Davidowitz & Associates, a national retail consulting firm in New York.
The new products on the desktop side include the latest versions of Pylon Conduit and Pylon Pro.
Scott Dixon eventually made winning the Honda Indy 225 look easy Sunday at Pikes Peak International Raceway.
Ankara says all four suicide bombers were Turkish.
Kodak expects earnings of 5 cents to 25 cents a share in the quarter.
Thousands of revellers, celebrating the decision, vowed to push for more legal rights, including same-sex marriages.
Major fires had burned 264,000 acres by early last night.
Nations like Israel and Australia already have such status.
The results are to be published in Wednesday's issue of The Journal of the American Medical Association.
The cradle for the h2200 has space for recharging a second battery.
U.S. forces struck dozens of targets on Monday, killing six guerrillas and arresting 99 others during 1,729 patrols and 25 raids conducted over 24 hours.
One man had brandished an English-Turkish dictionary and pointed to the word "refugee".
Close cooperation between regional law enforcement agencies and intelligence services was at the heart of the fight against terrorism, he said.
In 2006, Asia Pacific will report growth of 7.9 percent to $81.8 billion.
Captain Robert Ramsey of US 1St Armored Division said a truck had exploded outside the building at around 11 am.
BA said the second quarter, which included unofficial industrial action at Heathrow, had been difficult.
Later this year, the command will send trainers with soldiers from four North African nations on patrolling and intelligence gathering missions.
The Bush administration blames the wave of bombings and guerrilla attacks on Saddam loyalists and foreign Muslim militants who have entered Iraq to fight U.S. troops.
Tour doctors later confirmed that he had broken his right leg near the hip and also sustained wrist and elbow fractures.
Spitz is expected to testify later for the defense.
This is unacceptable," said Patrick Pelloux, the president of France's Association of Emergency Doctors.
"What has happened to you, sir, by way of punishment, is certainly more than enough," Covello said.
The mother also contended that she was sexually assaulted by one of the guards during the 1998 confrontation.
The benchmark 10-year note US10YT=RR lost 11/32 in price, taking its yield to 3.21 percent from 3.17 percent late on Monday.
Peregrine sold its Remedy business unit to BMC Software in November for $355 million.
Spansion Flash memory solutions are available worldwide from AMD and Fujitsu.
Domestic sales at both GM and No. 2 Ford Motor Co. declined more than predicted as a late summer sales frenzy prompted a larger-than-expected industry backlash.
A tropical storm rapidly developed in the Gulf of Mexico on Sunday and could have hurricane-force winds when it hits land somewhere along the Louisiana coast Monday night.
The pressure will intensify today, with national coverage of the final round planned by ESPN and words that are even more difficult.
LIPA Chairman Richard Kessel said that meant the cable could be used "as we see fit.
A key portion of the accord was the implementation of a special council to monitor health spending, set goals for the system and measure progress in reforming health care.
Dynes has been at UC San Diego since 1991 after spending 22 years with AT&T Bell Labs, where he worked on superconductors and other materials.
Shares in BA were down three percent at 165-1/4 pence by 0933 GMT, off a low of 164 pence, in a stronger market.
Both the House and Senate bills would end the ban on research and development of low-yield nuclear weapons.
Meningitis is an infection of the fluid in a person's spinal cord and around the brain.
Chiron and Aventis Pasteur together made about 80 million doses, ordinarily enough for U.S. demand, The Associated Press reported.
The missing workers, two men and a woman, were inside the building when the first blast occurred, Mayor Joe T. Parker said.
"We condemn this raid which is in our view illegal and morally and politically unjustifiable," London-based NCRI official Ali Safavi told Reuters by telephone.
Investigators uncovered a 4-inch bone fragment Thursday night, but authorities said it was from an animal.
The International Union of Painters and Allied Trades endorsed Mr Dean several weeks ago.
The letter bomb sent to Prodi exploded in his hands but he was unhurt.
About half of all U.S. households have money in mutual funds.
The attorney representing al-Halabi, Air Force Maj. James Key III, denied the charges, according to The Associated Press.
In seeking leniency, Waksal apologized to the court, his employees and his family.
Since early May, the city has received 1,400 reports, he said.
Forest, the Freedom Organisation for the Right to Enjoy Smoking Tobacco, said it had greeted The Lancet's call with "amusement and disbelief'".
The House has passed bills the past two Congresses, but the Senate has not.
The investment gives Larkspur, Calif.-based BayStar more than 2.9 million shares of SCO common stock, or 17.5 percent of the company's outstanding shares.
But for the elderly and those with weakened immune systems, it can be fatal.
OPEC this week is set to pressure independent exporters to back the cartel's next supply cut to prevent the resumption of Iraqi exports undercutting oil prices.
Six new Krispy Kreme stores were opened in the first quarter, bringing the total number of stores to 282.
"My understanding of this is that there is a lower percentage of successful impregnations with frozen," Ezzell said.
The Federal Trade Commission asked Congress yesterday for broader powers to attack the rapidly growing problem of spam, which new studies show accounts for half of all e-mail traffic.
Federal officials said the document remained sealed until Thursday morning to allow authorities to make arrests in five Western states.
"What is happening here is that people who have opposed this action throughout are trying to find fresh reasons why it was not the right thing to do."
Klarman was arrested by FBI agents Monday morning at his home in New York.
Bishop O'Brien, aged 67, had told police he thought he had hit a dog or cat.
There will be 9.3 million visitors to hot spots in 2003, up from 2.5 million in 2002, Gartner said.
Richard Miller, 57, survived a lifesaving liver transplant but remains hospitalized.
A spokesman for SCO could not be reached for comment this afternoon.
The proportion of Americans with insurance from employers declined to 61.3 percent, from 62.6 percent in 2001 and 63.6 percent in 2000.
World No.2 Lleyton Hewitt has accused his professional peers of long-standing malice, including an attempt last year to dupe him into refusing a drug test.
The MSN Messenger 6 software will be available from 11 a.m. PST on Wednesday, according to Microsoft.
Families stuck on the highway were being urged to remain in their cars, and to use their cell phones only in case of emergency.
"I have acknowledged that I behaved inappropriately," he said.
The crates are full of hardback copies of "Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix."
It added it had "co-operated fully" with police since November.
Australian researchers believe they have found a trigger of type 1 diabetes in children - their mothers eating potatoes and other tuberous vegetables during pregnancy.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC lost 2 points, or 0.18 percent, to 1,649.
People who once thought their blood pressure was fine actually need to start exercising and eating better, according to new U.S. guidelines published on Wednesday.
"But at this stage, given the early detection, the outlook in such instances would be positive," he said.
Amazon and the New York attorney general's office have already settled with one of the alleged e-mail forgers.
Marissa Jaret Winokur, as Tracy, won for best actress in a musical.
In New York, the Dow Jones industrial average a gauge of 30 blue chip stocks was up 3.29 points or 0.04 per cent to 8,585.97.
"The average track error for the five-day (forecast) is 323 nautical miles.
Rich Media interactive ad formats doubled their share from 3% in second quarter of 2002, to 6% in the second quarter of 2003.
Said Mr. Burke: "It was a textbook landing considering the circumstances."
Allegiant's stock closed Wednesday at $23.40, up 64 cents, in trading on the Nasdaq market.
By law, 911 calls are not public information in Rhode Island.
Shares of Fox Entertainment Group Inc., News Corp.'s U.S. media and entertainment arm, fell 45 cents to $26.85 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.
Defense Secretary Donald H. Rumsfeld said Tuesday it will take time to locate die-hard remnants of Saddam Hussein's deposed regime in Iraq.
France Telecom shares dropped 3.6 percent while Orange surged 13 percent.
Bremer said he would launch a $70-million program in the next two weeks to clean up neighborhoods across Iraq and build community projects, but gave no details.
Authorities performed an autopsy Thursday on one of three bodies recovered from beneath a layer of freshly poured concrete in the basement of a northwest Indiana home.
As Sayliyah was the command base for the Iraq war, but hundreds who ran the war have returned to the United States.
Two federal agencies are investigating telecommunications gear maker Lucent Technologies for possible violations of U.S. bribery laws in its operations in Saudi Arabia.
Details on pricing will be announced within a few weeks, McBride said.
The Nasdaq had a weekly gain of 17.27, or 1.2 percent, closing at 1,520.15 after gaining 30.46 yesterday.
The British Foreign Office said it had mediated the two men's release.
Each week 138 million shoppers visit Wal-Mart's 4,750 stores.
Sources in the racing industry said Fontana will get a second NASCAR race on Labor Day weekend starting next season.
"Maybe, but the old age helps us to understand our strength and our weakness and the reality of the world.
"I marched in the streets against Richard Nixon and the Vietnam War," she said.
In his letter, McBride charges the Free Software Foundation and Red Hat with trying to undermine U.S. copyright laws.
In late-morning trading on the Nasdaq Stock Market, Corixa was up 74 cents, or 10%, at $7.94.
While waiting for a bomb squad to arrive, the bomb exploded, killing Wells.
The FBI, CIA, Canadian Security Intelligence Service and Royal Canadian Mounted Police declined to comment on the Washington Times report.
"This was a persistent problem which has not been solved, mechanically and physically," said board member Steven Wallace.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average ($DJ: news, chart, profile) rose 56 points, or 0.7 percent, to 8,588.
She also pledged to bring peace to Iraq: "Americans don't cut and run, we have to see this misadventure through."
At 12 months, there was still a difference between the groups, but it was not considered significant.
He added: "There is no doubt about the chemical programme, the biological programme and indeed the nuclear weapons programme.
"It just seems like all the issues that we support he doesn't," said Gabriela Lemus, the league's director of policy and legislation.
"I know this sounds counterintuitive, but it's true: City-grown pollution -- and ozone in particular -- is tougher on country trees," U.S. ecologist Jillian Gregg said.
Ridge said that no actual explosives or other harmful substances will be used.
Dennehy, who transferred to Baylor last year after getting kicked off the University of New Mexico Lobos for temper tantrums, became a born-again Christian in June 2002.
"This is America, my friends, and it should not happen here."
Bashir also felt he was being tried by opinion rather than facts of law, he added.
But under cross-examination by O'Donnell's attorney, Lorna Schofield, Toepfer conceded she had ignored many of O'Donnell's suggestions and projects.
The broad Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX shed 0.17 of a point, or just 0.02 percent, to 934.
He crawled through a narrow, winding canyon, rappelled down a 60-foot cliff, and walked some six miles down the canyon near Canyonlands National Park in southeastern Utah.
Amnesty International said that over the past 20 years it had collected information about 17,000 disappearances in Iraq.
The Dow Jones industrial average <.DJI> fell 44 points, or 0.46 percent, to 9,568.
Texas Instruments climbed $US1.37 to $US19.25 and Novellus Systems advanced $US1.76 to $US36.31, each having been raised to "overweight" by Lehman.
She took the highly unusual step of skipping cabinet to attend a meeting with the presidents of Rwanda and Uganda.
China's foreign ministry said: "We hope all parties will continue to make efforts and continue the process of dialogue."
Van-Vliet, who was also injured, called in the accident on the school bus radio.
In a mixture of ancient Melanesian pagan and modern Christian ceremonies the people tried again to erase the misfortunes they believe have kept them poor since that long-ago meal.
The Dow Jones industrial average <.DJI> was off 7.75 points, or 0.08 percent, at 9,175.47.
Prairie dogs, usually found in southwestern and western states, aren’t indigenous to Wisconsin.
Mr. Mills declined to comment yesterday, saying that he never discussed personnel matters.
In that case, the court held that the city of Cincinnati had violated the First Amendment in banning, in the interest of aesthetics, only the advertising pamphlets.
"Reloaded" is the second installment of a trilogy; "The Matrix Revolutions" is slated for debut in November.
In addition, "fewer than 10" FBI offices have conducted investigations involving visits to Islamic mosques, the Justice Department said.
The news also comes in conjunction with Suns annual JavaOne developers conference in San Francisco.
The royal household was bracing itself for any more revelations in A Royal Duty, based on the former servant’s time with Diana, Princess of Wales.
The arrests came just days after Israeli troops shot and killed Abdullah Kawasme, the militant group's leader in Hebron.
Chief Executive Mickey Robinson was fired for cause in September, the company said last month.
The virus killed 44 people in the Toronto area, including one doctor and two nurses.
Apple Computer Inc. said Monday it exceeded record industry expectations by selling more than 1 million songs since the launch of its online music store a week ago.
He had been arrested twice before for trespassing and was barred from the complex.
Oracle chairman Larry Ellison has hinted that the company could yet again increase its offer for rival PeopleSoft.
Box cutters were the weapons used by the 19 hijackers in the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks.
The heatwave was due to a mass of hot, dry air from the southeast, said Mario Almeida of Portugal's weather service.
"Spending taxpayer dollars to create terrorism betting parlors is as wasteful as it is repugnant," Wyden and Dorgan said Monday in a letter to the Pentagon.
But Merrill Lynch analyst Steven Milunovich said the "somewhat ambiguous ruling" by regulators might be a setback for Static Control depending on how it developed its competing product.
Police believe Wilson then shot Jennie Mae Robinson once in the head before turning the gun on herself.
Moore of Alabama says he will appeal his case to the nation's highest court.
The arm was kept in a separate room, but the monkeys could track their progress by watching a representation of the arm and its motions on a video screen.
His protest led to a 47-hour standoff with police that caused huge traffic jams in downtown Washington and northern Virginia.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX rose 6.48 points, or 0.66 percent, to 990.51.
U.S. Agriculture Secretary Ann Veneman kicks off the three-day Ministerial Conference and Expo on Agricultural Science and Technology on Monday.
The Telegraph can reveal that Sir John Stevens, the Metropolitan Police Commissioner, placed his force on its highest alert last week.
Fighting has continued sporadically in the west, where it is complicated by the presence of battle-hardened Liberians on both sides.
It's the National Audubon Society's annual Christmas Bird Count, now in its 104th season.
Organizers established a Web site, http://defacerschallenge.com, listing in broken English the rules for hackers who might participate.
Southwest said its traffic was up 4.6 percent in the quarter on a capacity increase of 4.2 percent.
Their belief was based on speculation that estrogen prevents cell damage and improves blood flow.
Shortness was found twice as often in those with hearing loss.
Cisco executives were encouraged by $1.3 billion in cash flow and the increase in net income, but said they remained ``cautiously optimistic'' about a rebound.
I am not giving any consideration to resignation," Shumaker said in a statement.
A poll released this week showed that the FBI bugging of the mayor has given a boost to his re-election effort.
Bulger's brother, a former FBI informant, is now on the law enforcement agency's "10 Most Wanted" list.
The injured passenger at John Peter Smith died later in the morning; his name has not been released, Jones said.
A Caesarean had originally been planned in mid- November, two weeks early.
The virus spreads when unsuspecting computer users open file attachments in emails that contain familiar headings like "Thank You!" and "Re: Details".
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index <.SPX> gained 5.51 points, or 0.56 percent, to 981.73.
CELF's founding members are Hitachi, Matsushita, NEC, Philips, Samsung, Sharp, Sony, and Toshiba.
"It's not zero," said David Ropeik, director of risk communication at the Harvard Center for Risk Analysis.
She, in turn, occasionally told John that she was still sleeping with an ex-boyfriend, "Baywatch" hunk Michael Bergin.
If draining the ponds in Maryland will further help establish Steve's innocence, we welcome it."
On Tuesday, a Florida appeals court again refused to block removal of the tube.
He said he also expects to have the support of lawmakers from other agricultural states.
The new worm affects these Windows systems: 2000, XP, NT 4.0 and Server 2003.
Seven 20- and 21-year-old male cadets were caught in an off-campus hotel room early Saturday with two female teens, 16 and 18 years.
Shares of McDonald's and Wendy's continued their recent recovery Monday, rising more than 1 percent on the New York Stock Exchange in afternoon trade.
The matter could then be sent to the U.N. Security Council.
He and the other lawyers planned to stay until the river starts receding.
The Saint Sophia Camp hosts religious retreats for children during the summer months as well as other events year round, according to its Web site.
Dealers said the euro's downward momentum may pick up speed should it break below $1.15.
Gemstar shares moved higher on the news, closing up 2.6 percent at $5.49 on Nasdaq.
Tito Barbini, a regional minister for agriculture in Tuscany, Italy, criticized the absence Tuesday in Sacramento.
Along with chip maker Intel, the companies include Sony, Microsoft, Hewlett-Packard, International Business Machines, Gateway, Nokia and others.
In a show of corporate solidarity, Kroger Co., which owns Ralphs, and Albertson Inc. locked out their workers the next morning.
The Hispanic population increased by 9.8per cent from the April 2000 census figures, despite less favourable social and economic conditions than in the 1990s.
Shares jumped almost 7 percent in pre-open trading, rising to $18.26 from $17.05 at Tuesday's close.
We don't need a little bitty tax relief plan.
Harry Potter's latest wizard trick?
Nvidia will take advantage of MediaQ customers, which include such players as Siemens AG, Sharp, Philips, Dell, Mitsubishi and Sony Corp.
Aventis, based in Strasbourg, France, is one of the leading producers of the vaccine and one of a handful of companies that still make it.
The Dow Jones industrial average .DJI fell 79.43 points, or 0.86 percent, to 9,117.12 on Friday.
"We're in the Stanley Cup finals, and it was a little bit embarrassing the way we played in the first two games.
Playwright George Axelrod, who anticipated the sexual revolution with The Seven Year Itch and Will Success Spoil Rock Hunter?
"Mr. Bryant is innocent and expects to be completely exonerated," Mackey said in a statement.
Standard & Poor's 500 index rose 15.66 to 1,046.79, its best advance since Oct. 1, when it gained 22.25.
Charles Cullen, 43, was transferred from the Somerset County Jail in Somerville to the Anne Klein Forensic Center, a 150-bed psychiatric treatment facility in Trenton.
Stardust was designed to gather thousands of dust particles streaming from Wild 2.
Nine seconds later, SpaceShipOne broke the sound barrier, the company said.
A long awaited report on the Hong Kong government's handling of the SARS outbreak has been released.
US Airways Flight 5481, which crashed Jan. 8, was judged to be within 100 pounds of its maximum takeoff weight.
BlueCore3 also implements v1.2's eSCO facility to provide the basis for advanced cordless telephony applications for Bluetooth transmission.
"I'm going to try to march with a number of different groups," Bloomberg said.
The attack seemed similar to attacks staged near foreign compounds in Riyadh on May 12, for which officials have also blamed al-Qaida.
That was the biggest drop since August 1993 and stemmed from falling prices for cars, trucks, men's and boys' clothes and cigarettes.
The security personnel performed ``well within standards'' and the two staff aides were ``very sorry all this happened,'' Gainer said.
"We've put a lot of effort and energy into improving our patching progress, probably later than we should have.
International rescue workers hacked desperately through flattened debris for survivors and cemeteries overflowed in Iran's ancient Silk Road city of Bam yesterday.
Griffith, 77, grew up in Mount Airy and now lives in Manteo.
The academy will get its own internal report next week and it will be made public, Rosa said.
The boy fired once into a wall and sprayed the room with fire extinguishers, making it hard to see, the chief said.
The consumer-confidence index came in at 83.5 in June, down slightly from a revised 83.6 in May, the Conference Board said.
"I notice a mood change in their priorities," said one Iraqi politician after meeting with Mr. Bremer.
"The clear message is it should not be used to prevent cardiovascular disease," Manson said.
Former model Lady McCartney lost a leg in a road accident in 1993 and is understood to have steel plates fitted in her hips which would make natural childbirth difficult.
The network will drop one edition of "Dateline," its newsmagazine franchise.
The meat, poultry, butter, cheese and nuts were being stored by more than 100 wholesalers in Chicago.
BlueCore3-Multimedia contains an open platform DSP co-processor and also includes a 16-bit stereo audio codec with dual ADC and DAC for stereo audio.
Vice President Dick Cheney says Mississippi Republican Haley Barbour would be a good governor because of his government and business savvy.
Emile Laroza, 51, contracted SARS while working as a nurse at North York General Hospital, the epicentre of the second SARS outbreak.
Redman has allowed two earned runs or less in six of his nine starts.
The sales leave Mr. Turner with about 45 million shares in AOL.
He also recruited other people to take delivery of fraudulently obtained merchandise he had ordered.
Total shipments reached 19.5 million units last year, compared with 8.9 million units in 2001.
The Mets took Lastings Milledge, an outfielder from Florida, with the 12th pick.
With the remaining three shuttles grounded in the wake of the Columbia accident, the rookies will have to wait even longer.
Bremer, 61, is a former assistant to former Secretaries of State William P. Rogers and Henry Kissinger.
Moore, the suspended chief justice of the Alabama Supreme Court, stands trial before the Alabama Court of the Judiciary.
The blue-chip Dow Jones industrial average .DJI tacked on 97 points, or 1.14 percent, to 8,699.
According to an arrest warrant, Bryant, 24, attacked a woman on June 30.
Kerry was viewed favorably by 66 percent of those polled; Dean at 57 percent.
The tech-laden Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC shed 8 points, or 0.45 percent, to 1,645.
Twenty-four players broke par in the first round, the third highest figure in U.S. Open history.
Those talks have not taken place, according to an Oracle spokeswoman.
Hollywood actor Robert De Niro has been diagnosed with prostate cancer, his spokesman said today.
Kroger's Ralphs chain and Albertsons immediately locked out their grocery workers in a show of solidarity.
It has sought observer status for seven years, but was again rebuffed May 19 at the annual WHO conference in Geneva.
The Nasdaq composite index fell 2.95, or 0.2 percent, for the week to 1,912.36 after stumbling 37.78 yesterday.
IBM shares closed up $1.75, or 2.11 percent, at $84.50 on the New York Stock Exchange.
The countys first and only human case of West Nile this year was confirmed by health officials on Sept. 8.
National Breast Cancer Centre head Professor Christine Ewan said there was no need for panic.
The company's chief executive retired and chief financial officer resigned.
The New Democrats also renewed their commitment to no health-care privatization and no premiums.
"However, we are not certain about the outcome of the discussion at this moment."
The bill is among the first of 13 that Congress must pass each year to fund the federal government.
ESPN reported that Knight's two-year deal is worth $2.38 million, including a $300,000 signing bonus.
The dollar was at 117.85 yen against the Japanese currency, up 0.1 percent.
The technique is used during the second and, occasionally, third trimester of pregnancy.
Also as part of the deal, PalmSource stock will begin trading on the NASDAQ stock market Wednesday under the ticker symbol: PSRC.
The crates are full of hardback copies of "Harry Potter and the Order of the Phoenix."
The grant also funds beach testing in King George County, Norfolk and Virginia Beach.
Halliburton shares fell 54 cents, or 2.4 percent, to $21.76 a share in midday New York Stock Exchange trade.
He said the attackers left behind leaflets urging workers at the Ishtar Sheraton to stop working at the hotel.
With diplomacy heating up in the nearly 10-month-old crisis, Chinese Foreign Minister Li Zhaoxing flies to Japan on Sunday en route to South Korea on August 13.
On Monday, Abbey trotted on stage, tail wagging, with Conway before a crowd of 10,000 attendees at PeopleSoft's annual customer conference.
The Fed also said the risks to the economy were biased toward weakness.
The damaged area of the garage was not stable, with ``the real potential for a secondary collapse,'' McGreevey said.
With 97 percent of precincts counted tonight, 68 percent of voters opposed the tax.
The government did not identify the taikonauts -- a term coined from taikong, the Chinese word for space.
HP fell to second place with server sales growing 0.4 percent to $2.9 billion.
Later Tuesday, Graham was expected to be re-elected for a second one-year term.
Still, changes to IE "may affect a large number of existing Web pages," according to the W3C's notice.
"We're being hyper-vigilant," said Dr. James Young, Ontario's commissioner of public safety.
The researchers gave copies of "Dr. Atkins' New Diet Revolution" to the carb-cutters.
Barbini said the EU may reach a compromise but it wants a system for labeling such foods, something the industry has resisted.
The fire spread to several surrounding structures on the property and destroyed them as deputies held back firefighters.
The 27-year-old rapper's attorney in the civil matter, Mark Gann, did not return calls for comment.
Agents confiscated several classified documents in his possession and interrogated him.
Also hurting was news General Motors GM.N was to issue $10 billion in debt, in part to plug a hole in its pension plan.
The helicopter was owned by Las Vegas-based Sundance Helicopters Inc., according to the sheriff's office.
"I am advised that certain allegations of criminal conduct have been interposed against my counsel, J. Michael Boxley,'' the Silver statement said. "
Mr Blair went on: "I think we did the right thing in relation to Iraq.
His lawyer, a cousin, Basil Russin, did not attend the hearing and did not return phone messages.
License sales, a key measure of demand, fell 21 percent to $107.6 million.
Hispanics have officially overtaken African Americans as the largest minority group in the US, according to a report released by the US Census Bureau.
"He hasn't got much choice," said the Bishop of Armidale, Peter Brain.
The plant would employ 1,000 people when fully built out, the company said.
The judge scheduled another oversight hearing for late January.
The Philadelphia Stock Exchange's semiconductor index .SOXX jumped 6.10 percent.
"I have the opportunity to congratulate the governor-elect of the great state of California, and I'm looking forward to it."
And I really liked him, and I still do.
For the 12-month period ending June 30, high-speed lines installed in homes and businesses increased by 45 percent.
It will appear in the next few weeks on the Web site of the Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences.
Junya Tanase, forex strategist at JP Morgan Chase, said "I expect Japan to keep conducting intervention, but the volume is likely to fall sharply."
The developers, The Related Cos. and Apollo Real Estate Advisors, hope sales top $1 billion.
Missouri Education Commissioner Kent King said he was disappointed by the scores.
When Ragin's address was raided, authorities found more than 1,000 credit cards and duplicating machines.
Home Depot reported a 22 percent jump in third-quarter profit behind a nearly 8 percent rise in same-store sales.
SCO changed its name to Tarantella, and Caldera later changed its name to the SCO Group.
A convicted killer and two other inmates cut through two fences topped with razor wire and escaped from a state prison on a busy street.
It ain't coming to me, but it's only about a third of what I owe in the world.
That's when officers threw him to the ground and handcuffed him, according to testimony.
Altria Group Inc. MO.N fell 50 cents, or 1.2 percent, to $41.81.
Officials are trying to retrieve the bodies from the water," police official J.D. Tambe told Reuters.
The number of households acquiring music fell from a high of 14.5 million in April to 12.7 million in May and 10.4 million in June, according to NPD.
"This case is wholly without merit, both factually and legally," Judge Denny Chin scoffed.
At 12:10 p.m. EDT, Canada's benchmark S&P/TSX composite index was up 6.87 points or 0.1 per cent to 6,979.29.
Maximum sustained winds were around 40 mph, with stronger gusts.
The world's first portal potty was soon to be rolled out at summer festivals in Great Britain.
Prices for Treasury securities also rose, with the yield on the benchmark 10-year note falling to 4.19 percent.
DRINKING green tea can dramatically reduce the risk of men contracting prostate cancer, a study by Australian researchers has discovered.
Edie Falco was not nominated for "Frankie and Johnny."
Hickenlooper clobbered city Auditor Don Mares, 46, in the Tuesday runoff.
Watches or warnings could be issued for eastern Cuba later on Thursday.
Sunnis make up 77 percent of Pakistan's population, Shiites 20 percent.
The Communications Workers Union, which represents more than 2,300 Comcast employees, called the executive pay package excessive when a typical union employee makes about $27,000 annually.
It generated $4.47 billion of profit and $20 billion of revenue in the year's first half, 53 percent of Citigroup's totals.
GALLOWAY TOWNSHIP, N.J. >> Annika Sorenstam and Michelle Wie drew the crowds, but Angela Stanford took her first LPGA victory.
"Saddam is gone, but we want the (U.S.) occupation to end."
Under NASD regulations, Mr. Young can file a response and request a hearing before an NASD panel.
British Airways plans to retire its seven Concordes at the end of October.
Academic achievement -- including grades, test scores and high school curriculum -- are given the highest priority.
Security analysts said the new version, W32/Sobig.C-mm, had already reached a "high level" outbreak status by mid-afternoon on Monday.
Another person, a man from Fort Worth, Texas, also was missing.
Wall Street moved tentatively higher Tuesday as investors weighed a trio of reports showing modest economic improvement against an urge to cash in profits from Monday's big rally.
But the United States' ultimate goal was not just to topple Mr. Hussein but to stabilize the country and install a friendly government.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC declined 16.68 points, or 1.01 percent, at 1,636.94.
AFTRA, on the other hand, approved the merger by a whopping 75 percent.
The currency briefly weakened on Monday morning but rebounded to trade at 55.25/29, little changed from Friday.
While some other parts of Africa have been used as Al Qaeda staging grounds, Malawi had previously not been a major focus of investigations into the group.
On Sunday, a U.S. soldier was killed and another injured when a munitions dump they were guarding exploded in southern Iraq.
"I'm really excited about going to Cleveland," James told ESPN.com.
According to law enforcement officials, the individual decrypted passwords on the server.
Excluding patent litigation, RIM's loss for the quarter was $700,000, or 1 cent per share.
The Dow Jones industrial average .DJI jumped 2.09 percent, while the Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX leapt 2.23 percent.
The intervention force will confiscate weapons, reform the police, strengthen the courts and prison system and protect key institutions such as the Finance Ministry.
"Our outcomes are very encouraging," George Mason researcher Ken Alibek said.
Selenski used the mattress to scale a 10-foot razor wire, Fischi said.
Rapper C-Murder has been convicted of second-degree murder, a crime that carries an automatic life sentence, in the shooting death of a 16-year-old inside a Jefferson Parish nightclub.
Kernan, who was O'Bannon's lieutenant governor, friend and political partner, was sworn in six hours after O'Bannon died Saturday.
Wells' other series include NBC's "ER" and "Third Watch."
Thirty-four of the men have been arrested and the others are being sought, US Attorney Daniel Bogden said yesterday.
Fujitsu Siemens Computers on Tuesday made good on a promise to offer a workstation based on Advanced Micro Devices' Opteron processor.
Five-time Tour de France winner Lance Armstrong is in Denver today for a meeting about surviving cancer.
Hope is survived by his wife; sons Anthony and Kelly; daughters Linda and Nora Somers; and four grandchildren.
Police used pepper spray and rubber bullets to disperse a downtown march and rally last night by activists protesting an annual police intelligence-training seminar.
The most common side effects after getting the nasal spray were nasal congestion, runny nose, sore throat and cough.
The department ordered a 12 percent reduction for State Farm Lloyds, the state's largest insurer, and an 18.2 percent reduction for Allstate Texas Lloyds, the third-largest.
Analysts surveyed by Thomson First Call had expected Kodak to earn 68 cents a share for the quarter.
Colgate shares were down 30 cents at $56 in morning trade on the New York Stock Exchange.
Several shots rang out Wednesday night, but no gators were killed then.
Corixa's stock barely flinched on the news, dipping 12 cents to close at $6.88.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC was up 7.42 points, or 0.45 percent, at 1,653.44.
Together, we will find creative ways to communicate the unique strengths of Kmart to the 'new America' consumer."
Republicans had pledged to complete a Medicare drug package by August, then extended it to Oct. 17.
Supermarket chains are accusing union leaders of breaking off contract talks prematurely over the weekend as grocery clerks gear up for a possible strike.
Next week, John S. Reed, the former Citicorp chief executive who Sunday became interim chairman and chief executive of the exchange, will take up his position.
The Arizona-based ISM reported Monday that its non-manufacturing index rose to 50.7 last month, from 47.9 in March.
On Wednesday next week, Mr Bush will meet Israeli Prime Minister Ariel Sharon and new Palestinian leader Mahmoud Abbas in Aqaba, Jordan.
The privately held Google is believed to be profitable.
Its safe to assume the Senate is prepared to pass some form of a cap....The level of it is to be debated.
Asked if he felt any regret about theOctober 12 attack, the answer was an adamant "no".
Rambus Inc. (nasdaq: RMBS - news - people) shot up 38 percent, making it the biggest percentage gainer on the Nasdaq.
Emily Church is London bureau chief of CBS.MarketWatch.com.
"If you pass this bill," Rep. John Mabry Jr., D-Waco, told colleagues, "Big Brother will be watching you."
Douglas Robinson, CA senior vice president, finance, will fill the position in the interim.
Intel on Wednesday unveiled its next-generation processor for cell phones, PDAs, and other wireless devices.
Following California's lead, several states and the federal government passed similar or tougher bans.
Still, he noted that Miami must decide whether to seek A.C.C. membership by June 30 to adhere to Big East guidelines.
He refused to say what percentage of domestic flights had security officers on board.
The Hulk trailed last month's Marvel Comics adaptation, X2: X-Men United, which grossed $85.6-million in its opening weekend.
On Monday, EchoStar (DISH: news, chart, profile) shares shrank $1.40, or 4.4 percent, to $30.63.
To force a recall election of Davis, the valid signatures of 897,158 registered California voters must be turned in to election officials.
Further out the curve, the benchmark 10-year note US10YT=RR shed 18/32 in price, taking its yield to 3.24 percent from 3.17 percent.
The MDC called the week-long protest to urge Mugabe either to resign or to negotiate a settlement of the crisis gripping the country.
An Ohio law that bans a controversial late-term abortion procedure is constitutionally acceptable and the state can enforce it, a federal appeals court ruled yesterday.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> climbed 19.11 points, or 1.2 percent, to 1,615.02.
The McLean, Virginia-based company said newspaper revenue increased 5 percent to $1.46 billion.
That compares with January 2000, when laptops represented less than 25 percent of sales volume, NPD said.
The other semifinal between Guillermo Coria of Argentina and Martin Verkerk of the Netherlands is also compelling.
The S&P 500 had climbed 16 percent since its March low and yesterday closed at its highest since Dec. 2.
Mr. Powell told a crowd at a cemetery with a thousand headstones, many of them marking the graves of entire families.
CBS said the show "does not present a balanced portrayal of the Reagans for CBS and its audience.
"There's very strong interest in getting money back to the ratepayers as quickly as possible," Commissioner Susan Kennedy said.
She insisted, though, that it not be published until after her death.
Both studies are published on Thursday in Nature, the British weekly science journal.
The same survey found the median household income rose by $51, when accounting for inflation, to $43,057.
Bush said U.S. and European Union leaders, at an annual Washington summit, agreed on the need to keep Iran from developing nuclear weapons.
The company also said it would cut wholesale prices on cassettes and change the suggested retail price to $8.98.
He moved to Syria, where he underwent further religious training in traditional Islamic beliefs.
On Wednesday, attendees will vote on resolutions that express the Southern Baptist view on issues, but are not binding on individual churches.
But the inadequate performance of students in various subgroups, such as race, pushed the state onto the needs-improvement list under the federal No Child Left Behind Act.
This led last month to the recovery of the 600-pound Cancun altar, Vanderbilt University in Nashville and the National Geographic Society announced Wednesday.
Shares of Allergan were up 14 cents at $78.40 in late trading on the New York Stock Exchange.
They say second-quarter earnings reports will be key in giving investors that guidance.
They will not elect as president a Democrat who sounds an uncertain trumpet in these dangerous times."
That saw the benchmark 10-year note US10YT=RR slip 5/32 in price, taking its yield to 3.36 percent from 3.34 percent late on Thursday.
The report also claims that there will be up to 9.3 million visitors to hot spots this year, up again from the meagre 2.5 million in 2002.
Doctors concluded Erbitux, the cancer drug that enmeshed ImClone Systems in an insider trading scandal, worked just as well as an earlier company-sponsored study said it did.
Shares of M&T, which is based in Buffalo, fell 41 cents, to $91.51.
Mr Levine said she had been offered $400,000 to tell her story to an Australian TV network.
Perry has since called two special legislative sessions to try force the redistricting plan through.
Early Monday, insurgents threw a homemade bomb at a U.S. convoy in northern Baghdad, killing an American soldier.
Consumer groups oppose the changes, saying they would concentrate too many outlets in too few media empires.
Trish York, a spokeswoman for Boeing, declined to comment on the deal.
The lawsuit named Secretary of State Kevin Shelley, a Democrat, and the registrars of voters in Los Angeles, Orange and San Diego counties.
Negotiators said Friday they made progress during their latest round of free-trade negotiations between the United States and five Central American countries this week in Houston.
"It is very difficult to do large syndicated loans in Japan," says one banker.
The case decided Monday centered around an Illinois fund-raiser, Telemarketing Associates.
A grains management committee normally meets each Thursday in the Commission's agriculture unit -- another target of Wednesday's raids -- to decide the outcome of a weekly export tender.
"I urge Congress to quickly resolve any differences and send me the final bill as soon as possible so that I can sign it into law," he said.
Pingeon said an attorney for his organization, Massachusetts Correctional Legal Services, interviewed Assan Tuesday.
Yee grew up in the United States and graduated from the U.S. Military Academy at West Point.
James Rohr, chairman and chief executive officer, said PNC regretted the incident.
Mr. Swan's group supported the governor's Democratic opponent, Bill Curry, in the 2002 election.
The two invading countries later fell out, and have since backed rival factions.
Health officials confirmed today that a northeast Kansas woman has the state's first case of monkeypox and the first case west of the Mississippi River.
Meantime, the Direct Marketing Association said its members should not call the nearly 51 million numbers on the list.
Hollywood and the world are gearing up to celebrate legendary entertainer Bob Hope's 100th birthday on Thursday.
Navistar shares rose a penny to $41.64 at late afternoon on the New York Stock Exchange after earlier falling as low as $39.93.
Secretary of State Colin Powell said yesterday that contacts with Iran would continue.
Advancers outnumbered decliners by nearly 8 to 3 on the NYSE and more than 11 to 5 on Nasdaq.
The Reagan, a floating airfield with a flight deck covering 4.5 acres, is the ninth Nimitz-class carrier to be built at the Newport News shipyard.
"I´m very proud of the citizens of this state," Gov. John Baldacci said after votes from Tuesday´s referendum were counted.
Stout comes to Sprint from GE Capital, where he served as chief technology and information officer.
Only Intel Corp. has a lower dividend yield.
A woman was listed in good condition at Memorial's HealthPark campus, he said.
The victim, who was not identified, was taken to Kings County Hospital where he was pronounced dead.
A Microsoft spokesman was not immediately available to comment.
The new analysis found that 32 of 16,608 participants developed ovarian cancer in about 5 1/2 years of follow-up, including 20 women taking hormones.
Symptoms include a stiff neck, fever, headache and sensitivity to light.
"We've become like total strangers," John told a pal two days before his death.
Davey started attending Northwest College, which is affiliated with the Assemblies of God, in 1999 with plans to become a minister.
Character actor Hume Cronyn, 91, died Sunday at his home in Connecticut.
Best Minister, Scrimshaw, and Ten Most Wanted all had workouts on Monday morning.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX gave up 11.91 points, or 1.19 percent, at 986.60.
State radio said it was the last test before the missile was delivered to the armed forces.
"Your withdrawal from our country is inevitable, whether it happens today or tomorrow," added the voice, which signed off giving the date as "mid-September."
Deirdre Hisler, Government Canyon's manager, said the state long has coveted this piece of property, and is eager to complete the deal.
Florida's Speaker of the House Johnnie Byrd, is expected to introduce ''Terri's Bill'' during a one-day special session of the state legislature being held today in Tallahassee.
Other businesses are volunteering to put the alerts on their electronic signs and billboards.
The euro's rise against the yen and speculation of Japanese intervention helped the dollar firm to 117.25 yen , well above a 10-month low of 116 yen hit on Thursday.
South Africa's Nobel laureate Archbishop Desmond Tutu says he does not understand all the fuss about appointing a gay bishop, but he has urged homosexual clergy to remain celibate.
The weekend arrest of Russia's richest man, Mikhail Khodorkovsky, chief executive of oil major YUKOS, on charges of fraud and tax evasion unnerved financial markets.
Reuters witnesses said public squares were packed with crying children and people left homeless, huddled in blankets to protect them from the cold.
This is an increase from the $22.5 million and 5 cents a share previously forecast.
Four months later it signed a joint marketing agreement with Hewlett-Packard Co.
To watch pay television, consumers would insert into the set a security card provided by their cable service.
Yesterday, the Concorde seemed to launch itself straight out of the rising sun.
The federal standard for ozone is 0.12 parts per million.
Hernandez filed an Equal Employment Opportunity Commission complaint and sued.
The supermarket chains have used managers and replacement workers to keep their stores open, often at reduced hours.
The committee would propose a replacement for the "Robin Hood" school finance system.
Other countries are owed at least $US80 billion ($108.52 billion).
Under the law, telemarketers who call numbers on the list can be fined up to $11,000 for each violation.
The bomb exploded while authorities waited for a bomb squad to arrive.
He explained that he found antetonitrus when he came to Wits in 2001 while a post-doctoral research assistant at Bristol University in Britain.
The No. 11 airline in the world, Air Canada has been under court protection from creditors since April 1.
The security official's backup was on active duty, and the lottery association didn't have a replacement in New Jersey, Strutt said.
Gonzales was found guilty of using excessive force by spraying Olvera with pepper spray.
The bodies of many of the dead, pulled from under the partially derailed train, were laid out by the tracks awaiting identification.
Garner said self-proclaimed Baghdad mayor Mohammed Mohsen Zubaidi was released 48 hours after his detention in late April.
"Enron company executives engaged in widespread and pervasive fraud to manipulate the company's earnings results," Buell said.
"Leaving aside attorney fees, we're dealing with bragging rights of who wins and who loses," said Gammerman.
Retail pricing for SMS 2003 with 10 device client access licenses is $1,219.
The 2001 Aboriginal Peoples Survey released Wednesday by Statistics Canada says living standards have improved but still lag for the Inuit and those who leave their often impoverished reserves.
The recent turnaround in the stock market and an easing in unemployment claims "may signal more favorable economic times ahead," she said.
The Standard & Poor's 500 stock index ended the quarter up 120 points, a gain of 14 percent, the best performance for that broad market benchmark since 1998.
Phoberomys' skeleton was unearthed 250 miles west of Caracas, Venezuela.
"But at no stage did ONA receive intelligence material indicating that Jemaah Islamiyah was planning to mount an operation in Bali."
However, the Saudi interior minister, Prince Nayef, denied the reports.
Chief financial officer Andy Bryant has said that hike had a greater affect volume than officials expected.
The U.S. women, who are defending champions, will play on Sept. 25 in Philadelphia and conclude group competition on Sept. 28 in Columbus, Ohio.
Though the judge can reduce the punishment to life in prison without parole, experts say Virginia judges rarely take that opportunity.
Mr McDonnell wants to establish if the Italian business followed Grant Thornton's audit procedures.
A spokesman at Strong Memorial Hospital said Doud was under evaluation Tuesday evening in the emergency room.
Ray Brent Marsh, 29, also faces charges of abuse of a body, and theft.
After Hedges' microphone was unplugged for a second time, Pribbenow told him to wrap up his speech.
For the full year period ending June 30, 2003, high-speed lines increased by 45 percent.
Missouri kicked Ricky Clemons off its team, ending his troubled career there.
US officials said downward "rotor wash" generated by the hovering helicopter stripped the flag from the tower.
Meantime, the Direct Marketing Association said its members should not call the nearly 51 million numbers on the list.
The $85 million agreement was reached in September, less than two months after Archbishop Sean O'Malley took over as leader of the nation's fourth-largest diocese.
U.S. Capitol Police evacuated the Capitol yesterday after a sensor detected a possible biohazard in the Senate wing, but authorities later said it was a false alarm.
His spokesman Jim Kennedy said the former president also gave more than 70 speeches in 2002 without compensation.
Standard & Poor's 500 stock index futures for June were down 2.60 points at 965.70, while Nasdaq futures were down 7.50 points at 1,183.50.
Designed to compete with Microsoft Corp., Project Mad Hatter is being positioned by Sun as a cheaper, secure alternative desktop operating system to Microsoft's various desktop offerings.
General Dynamics was sued when it changed its retirement benefits in 1997.
The tech-heavy Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC was off 0.11 percent, or 1.78 points, at 1,594.13.
A key player in former state Treasurer Paul Silvester's corruption scheme testified on Tuesday about kickbacks and bribes Silvester traded for state business.
"The mission of the CAPPS II system has been and always will be aviation security," they said.
Hovan "did not wake up that day" intending to hurt anyone, defense attorney John Speranza said.
"We believe that it is not necessary to have a divisive confirmation fight," Daschle of South Dakota wrote the Republican president.
Another 152,054 are from IP services company NTT/Verio, and 129,378 from InfoSpace, the survey found.
NASA is scheduled to launch the Space Infrared Telescope Facility on Monday morning.
MedImmune Vaccines, the maker of FluMist, made between 4 million and 5 million doses this year.
She appeared in federal court Wednesday, but did not enter a plea.
In CNN's latest move to rejuvenate ratings, the network has ousted Teya Ryan, general manager of U.S. programming.
Samudra, 32, is suspected of being a key figure in the al-Qaida-linked terror group Jemaah Islamiyah, which has been blamed for carrying out the bombings.
"We were seconds away from having that happen," Albuquerque Fire Chief Robert Ortega said.
The Marlins only said: "The issue has been resolved."
On Monday, China said nine more people had died from SARS and that 160 more were infected with the virus.
A leading U.K. medical journal called Friday for a complete ban on tobacco, prompting outrage from smokers' groups.
McDonald's shares rose $1.83 to close Friday at $23.89 on the New York Stock Exchange.
The incremental step, reported by researchers at UC San Francisco, is the latest in a decade-long effort to infect mice with the virus.
He said FDA hopes Congress and the courts will bring clarity to the situation and some financial relief to consumers — perhaps before the 2004 elections.
Ernst & Young spokesman Kenneth Kerrigan said the firm admits no wrongdoing.
But police say the driver of the truck has not been found and is wanted for questioning.
The witness was a 27-year-old Kosovan parking attendant, who was paid by the News of the World, the court heard.
Surrounded by singers from Harlem, Bush said: ''The artistry of black musicians has conveyed the experience of black Americans throughout our history.
Their differences on energy and Medicare have become so pointed other members say it is embarrassing to the party.
Geraldine Andrews, Reynolds' daughter-in-law and a friend of Wilson's family, said Robinson had recently taken Wilson out of a mental health facility.
He then stabbed two passersby as he fled along a promenade by the Mediterranean Sea.
He attributed some of the communication gap to doctors feeling pressed for time; patients cited discomfort discussing financial issues.
As many as 30 people were believed to be trapped inside initially, the state police said.
Baker called a pregame meeting, believing the the corked-bat episode had distracted the team.
She was taken to Charing Cross Hospital, where she remained critically ill last night.
Mr. Bush did not discuss this when he issued a brief statement yesterday thanking the commission for its work, and saying, "Our journey into space will go on."
"The Hulk" took in $62.6 million at the box office, a monster opening and a new June record.
The governor is going to Jackson, where 13 people were killed.
Time magazine named the American soldier its Person of the Year for 2003.
After a weak start, the Dow Jones Industrial Average ended the day up 26.26 to 9,217.35, while the S&P 500 index rose 3 to 980.59.
Samudra not present in Bangkok, the indictment said, but attended a series of meetings before the attacks, recruiting fellow bombers and coordinating the operation.
Primary Care Trusts and Mental Health Trusts have also been formally rated for the first time this year.
Among other things, Microsoft is to comment on proposed remedies in its response.
Relief is in sight for Texans saddled with skyrocketing homeowners insurance premiums.
Six Democrats and two Republicans are running for her seat and have qualified for the Feb. 3 primary ballot.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index .IXIC was down 1.55 points, or 0.09 percent, at 1,744.91.
Crews worked to install a new culvert and repave the highway so motorists could use the eastbound lanes for travel.
"We believe KBR delivered fuel to Iraq at the best value, the best price and the best terms," Halliburton spokeswoman Wendy Hall said.
Elecia Battle dropped her purse after buying the Mega Millions Lottery ticket last week and believes the ticket blew away.
MediaQ's customers include major handheld makers Mitsubishi, Siemens, Palm, Sharp, Philips, Dell and Sony.
Such was the case Thursday night when the Cleveland Cavaliers won the "LeBron James Lottery," otherwise known as the NBA draft lottery.
"Short workers had worse hearing than expected by age -- three times more often than taller workers," writes Barrenas.
Neither OLAF nor the Belgian prosecutors have specified if it was this system that was at the centre of the investigation.
The computers are currently sold in Canada, the United States, and Korea.
In the memo, Ballmer reiterated the open-source threat to Microsoft.
Standard & Poor's 500 stock index futures declined 4.40 points to 983.50, while Nasdaq futures fell 6.5 points to 1,206.50.
Talabani told him Iraqi leaders would "need U.N. assistance and advice in implementing the new decisions which have been taken" on organising an interim Iraqi government by June.
Stanford (46-15) plays South Carolina (44-20) on Friday in the opening game of the double-elimination tournament.
One month ago in the same poll, Katz was leading 46 to 40 percent.
The Standard & Poor's 500 Index gained 10.89, or 1.2 percent, to 931.12 as of 12:01 p.m. in New York.
"We are aware of the situation," said Assistant US Attorney Todd Greenberg, a counter-terrorism prosecutor in Seattle.
But they don't realize that until it's too late (of course) because they're potential victims.
An attorney for plaintiff schoolchildren said he plans to appeal.
The euro has slipped as much as four cents since matching a record peak near $1.1935 last week and hitting a record high of 140.90 yen in late May.
Texas, which has more than three times Michigan's inmate population, is treating 328 of its 16,298 infected inmates.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> climbed 19.11 points, or 1.2 percent, to 1,615.02.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index <.SPX> edged down 9 points, or 0.98 percent, to 921.
With the Expose (ex-poh-SAY) feature, all the open windows on the desktop immediately shrink to fit on the screen but are still clear enough to identify.
Instead he left the courtroom a free man after authorities dismissed criminal charges.
Jim Wolfcale, the jury foreman and a minister, said, "This case was both mentally challenging and emotionally exhausting."
Mr Bush arrives on Tuesday on the first state visit by an American President.
The acquisition has been approved by both companies' board of directors and is expected to close in the third quarter this year.
The firm had predicted earlier this year a 4.9 percent increase.
The Senate might support capping noneconomic damages beyond the $250,000 Gov. Jeb Bush proposes, said Senate President Jim King.
More than 100 officers launched the London raids in the final phase of a two-year operation investigating a cocaine and money laundering ring.
Earnings were 59 cents a share for the three months ended May 25 compared with 15 cents a share a year earlier.
But at the age of 15, she weighed a whopping 117kg and came to a difficult decision: it was time to try surgery.
The new deal would be valued at $1.75 billion, including $863 million in cash and 52.6 million PeopleSoft shares.
This is a hospital that treats everybody as people, and if we could do that throughout the world, we could end terrorism."
Buoyed by advice imparted by Nicklaus, Howell shot an 8-under 64 on Thursday to enter today's round with a one-stroke lead over Kenny Perry.
In his Jan. 28 State of the Union message, Bush said, "The British government has learned that Saddam Hussein recently sought significant quantities of uranium from Africa."
That is up from $1.14 billion during the same quarter last year.
If it's the Sunday night before Comdex, it must be time for yet another Bill Gates keynote.
He was arrested last week for allegedly punching a parking attendant outside a nightclub in LA.
Jodie Singer, a sixth-grader from Washington, D.C., anxiously awaited her turn at the microphone.
The American Cancer Society and several scientists said the study was flawed in several ways.
Tatar was being held without bail in Armstrong County Prison today.
A few miles west are the pyramids of Teotihuacan, where corn may first have been domesticated 4,000 years ago.
The free service was originally intended to block about 80 percent of telemarketer calls.
Of the 24 directors who are not exchange executives, half are representatives of the securities industry and half are designated public members.
"Our strong preference is to achieve a financial restructuring out of court," Mirant CEO Marce Fuller said in a prepared statement early Friday.
The executives fined included former Chief Executives Paul A. Allaire and G. Richard Thoman as well as former Chief Financial Officer Barry Romeril.
The Episcopal Diocese of Central Florida voted Saturday to repudiate a decision by the denomination's national convention to confirm a gay man as bishop.
Chera Larkins, 32, of Manhattan, charged with perjury and filing a false instrument in three marriage applications.
Boston Scientific said it has gained 51 percent of the coated-stent market in Europe.
The Senate Banking Committee is scheduled to hold a hearing on Tuesday, when Donaldson will be questioned about hedge and mutual funds.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX was down 0.04 points, or 0 percent, at 971.52.
"The petitioners are entitled to respect for their private lives."
His partner Bijan Darvish is charged with filing a false police report.
The mock explosion of a radioactive "dirty bomb," the first event in the weeklong drill, occurred on several acres in the south Seattle industrial area.
Bruce N. Hawthorne, 53, was named executive vice president and chief staff officer.
Patton also appointed Conner to the Kentucky Lottery Board and appointed Seth Conner to the Agriculture Development Board, the commission says.
McGill also said a dark glove was stuffed into a hole that had been cut in the Caprice's trunk.
Analysts had forecast second quarter sales of $614 million, according to the Thomson First Call Web site.
Parents received letters informing them of the possible contamination yesterday.
Grasso quit last week in the wake of a firestorm of criticism over his $140 million compensation package.
The servers can run Solaris x86 operating system or the standard Linux operating system.
Sliding down the embankment, the two rescuers hit the spongy, rocky floor of the river and immediately felt the pull.
Cadbury Schweppes has unveiled plans to slash 5,500 jobs and 20 percent of its factories over four years to cut costs brought about by an acquisition spree.
Sweeney was to outline plans for the campaign in a speech on Saturday night at the annual meeting of the American Political Science Association.
It seemed like an isolated incident,'' said graduate Ariel Dean of Washington, D.C.
TVT Records sought $360 million in punitive damages and $30 million in compensatory damages, officials said.
The damages included $24 million in compensatory damages and $52 million in punitive damages for IDJ.
The two Democrats on the five-member FCC held a news conference to sway opinion against Powell and the panel's two other Republicans.
In May 2002, LCDs accounted for only 22 percent of monitor sales.
Besides a sales slump, Siebel is sparring with some shareholders over management stock option windfalls.
That was more than double the $102 million, or 13 cents a share, for the year-earlier quarter.
Rice (57-12) and Stanford (51-17) will meet in a winner-take-all matchup at 6:05 p.m. Monday.
But the economy hasn't shown signs of sustainable growth.
The newly unsealed 32-count indictment alleges money laundering and conspiracy and "strikes at one of the very top targets in the drug-trafficking world," Jiménez said.
On Sunday, a U.S. soldier was killed and another injured when a munitions dump they were guarding exploded in southern Iraq.
California's lost tax revenue was mostly due to international corporate tax shelters.
In other markets, U.S. Treasuries inched higher as declining stocks raised the appeal of safe-haven debt.
"We're not looking for a Robin Hood remedy," said Michael Rebell, the campaign's executive director.
"I was believing that I was confident I could do this, but only in the case I would play my best tennis.
Dotson was arrested July 21 after telling FBI agents he shot Dennehy when Dennehy tried to shoot him, according to the arrest warrant affidavit.
He said that dogs are second only to humans in terms of being the subject of medical research.
PG&E Corp. shares jumped $1.63 or 8 percent to $21.03 on the New York Stock Exchange on Friday.
Closer Eric Gagne earned his 17th save in as many opportunities as he struck out three of the four batters he faced in the ninth.
Britain included the accusation in a September 2002 dossier setting out the case for war in Iraq.
Energy prices dropped by 8.6 percent, the biggest decline since July 1986.
The spacecraft is scheduled to blast off between next Wednesday and Friday from a launching site in the Gobi Desert.
Australia was flat, Singapore was down 0.3 percent by midday and South Korea added 0.2 percent.
Several SUVs parked on residential streets in Monrovia were tagged with ``ELF'' and other slogans, said Sgt. Tom Wright.
The broader Standard & Poor's 500 Index .SPX gave up 11.91 points, or 1.19 percent, at 986.60.
There’s also at least three suspected cases in Illinois and 11 in Indiana.
The ingredients of such a polypill would contain aspirin, a cholesterol-lowering statin, three blood pressure-lowering agents in half dose, and folic acid.
"What they are doing right now is they drive around in their cars, while people are being killed 500 metres away.
At the hearing he pleaded not guilty to the burial service fraud and false statements charges.
How would the extra premiums be collected?
The Pentagon had hoped to retain control of the postwar effort, so the decision was seen by some insiders as a victory for Powell and the State Department.
The findings appear in Wednesday's Journal of the American Medical Association.
Intel Corp.'s second-quarter profits doubled and revenues grew 8 percent from a year ago as the chip-making giant reported stronger-than-expected demand for personal computer microprocessors.
"We are very pleased with the judge's decision," Merrill said yesterday.
Trans fats are created when vegetable oil has been partially hydrogenated, solidifying it and increasing the shelf life of certain products.
Stefani's remarks further stoked tension after Italian Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi last week compared a German member of the European Parliament to a Nazi concentration camp guard.
The update packages help "automate the management of server hardware, applications and operating systems patches using one tool," which is unpleasantly vague.
From the top of the embankment, Moriarty thought, "He'll be swept over any minute or just die of the cold."
The rebels are also calling for the deployment of a U.S.-led peacekeeping force.
"The executive board decided to refer this to the capitals," the Korean Energy Development Organization said.
But skeptics are concerned about the ease at which these hardware-based security features could be used to set digital rights management policies by vendors.
Sally Baldwin, from York, was killed instantly when a walkway collapsed and she fell into the machinery at Tiburtina station.
The agency has yet to fully formulate a strategy for the creation of an independent engineering technical authority.
WorldCom's financial troubles came to light last year and the company subsequently filed for bankruptcy in July, 2002.
The benchmark 10-year note was recently down 17/32, to yield 4.067 percent.
They asked that the autopsy reports be unsealed after portions of the autopsy report on Peterson's unborn son that were favorable to the defense were leaked to the media.
Volume came to 439.66 million shares, below 450.39 million at the same point Wednesday.
Penn Traffic stock closed Wednesday at 36 cents, up 2 cents, or 6.2 percent, from Tuesday's close.
Legislation that would change state takeover law and help Bloomfield Hills-based Taubman Centers Inc. fend off a $1-billion takeover won committee approval Tuesday.
The powerful CGT and other unions remained opposed to the plans, however, and demanded the government renegotiate the reform with them.
The searches were conducted simultaneously with raids on strip clubs in San Diego and Las Vegas.
Above that, seniors would be responsible for 100 percent of drug costs until the out-of-pocket total reaches $3,600.
A few thousand troops, most from the division's 3rd Brigade Combat Team based at Fort Benning in Columbus, began returning last week, with flights continuing through Friday.
In the second quarter, consumer advertisers continued to spend the most online, slightly increasing their share.
Prairie dogs are believed to have become infected in a pet shop through a Gambian rat imported from Africa.
Defense lawyers cannot appeal the ruling until after trial, in the appellate courts.
Symptoms include chronic diarrhoea, abdominal pain, weight loss and extreme tiredness.
The public hearing is the second for the panel created by Defense Secretary Donald Rumsfeld under pressure from Congress.
Powell is serving time in a different case -- killing his landlady in 1982.
Seifert, he testified, had a gunshot wound in the back.
McCloskey died Sunday afternoon in his home after a year-long battle with bladder cancer.
The Connecticut Hospital Association joined the Red Cross Monday in calling for more blood donors.
It is priced at $5,995 or $195 on a per user licensing plan with a minimum of five users.
A man is riding a bike.
A man and woman are dancing in rain.
Someone is dancing.
A man and a woman are talking to each other.
A woman is cutting an onion.
A person is preparing shrimp.
A woman is slicing broccoli.
A woman is playing the guitar.
Two men fistfight in a ring.
A baby is playing with a dog.
A man is drawing.
A woman is cutting a tomato.
A small dog is laying on a bed.
A person is buttering a tray.
Two men are practicing football.
The girl is playing the guitar.
A man is slicing potato.
A kid is playing a guitar.
A man is slicing potato.
A man is slicing a potato.
A woman is puncturing a potato with a fork.
A girl is waking up.
A little boy is playing a keyboard.
A woman is cutting through an onion.
A toy train strikes a toy car.
A man is playing the flute.
A cat is opening a drawer and climbing inside.
A woman is deep frying food.
A woman is playing the flute.
A woman is cutting an onion.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is singing on stage.
A woman is riding a donkey.
A man is playing a guitar.
A woman brushes some shrimp.
A man is dancing on the ceiling of a room.
A man is playing an acoustic guitar.
A woman is slicing onions with a large knife.
A man plays a keyboard.
A man is playing the guitar.
A woman peels a potato.
A man is holding a frog.
A man is peeling shrimp.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a piano.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a guitar.
Two women are hugging on a couch.
A man is slicing a cucumber.
A kitten is playing with a toy.
People are sweeping water out of a house.
A dog is barking at a toy.
A man folds a tortilla.
A kitten is drinking milk.
A man is driving a car.
A tortoise is walking.
A cow is eating hay.
A woman is chopping garlic.
A man is screaming.
A woman puts on sunglasses.
A man is playing guitar.
A man is cutting a plantain.
A woman is peeling a potato.
A woman is slicing carrot.
A man is playing a guitar.
Two women are running.
A woman is tapping her fingers.
Someone is cooking okra in a pan.
A man is mixing.
A man is playing drums.
A man is diving into a pool.
A woman is slicing a leek.
A woman is playing a guitar.
A man dives into a swimming pool.
A boy is playing guitar.
A man is smashing some garlic.
A man is cutting up carrots.
The man is dancing.
The men are talking.
A woman is putting gel on her hair.
A man is playing a guitar.
A group of people are dancing in concert.
A man and a woman are hugging and kissing each other.
The man is shooting a gun.
A man plays a piano.
Someone is slicing a onion.
A man is cutting cucumbers.
A woman is eating a cupcake.
A man is chopping an onion.
A baby is playing a guitar.
A man is playing the drums.
Two girls talk on the phone.
A man is chopping a tree trunk with an axe.
A woman is climbing a rock face.
A man slices an onion.
A polar bear is chasing a group of walruses.
A person is slicing a garlic into pieces.
A woman is walking with a dog.
A man is talking.
Someone is pouring milk into a blender.
A kitten is playing with a ball.
A woman is playing a flute.
A woman is cutting tofu.
A girl is playing a flute.
Someone is playing guitar.
A cat is playing a piano.
A girl is exercising.
A person is slicing octopus.
A man and woman are riding a motorcycle.
A man poured ric-a-roni into a pan.
Two men are fighting in a cattle pen.
A man is pouring oil into a pan.
A young girl makes her bed.
A cat is playing with a watermelon.
A girl is jumping onto a car.
A man is breaking tiles with his hands.
A girl is playing a piano.
A man is dancing.
A man is running.
A cat is playing.
A man is dancing.
A man is singing.
A man is singing.
A man is dancing.
A man is carrying someone on his shoulder.
A woman is slicing a tomato.
A woman is slicing a potato.
Someone is slicing a tomato.
A woman is slicing a tomato.
Two robots are kissing.
Two boys are playing a video game.
A man is tracking in the wood.
A woman is squeezing juice out of a lemon.
A man is playing a violin.
A man is playing guitar.
A woman is riding a horse.
A man is slicing a tomato.
A man is slicing a tomato.
A woman is slicing lemons.
A girl is filing her nails.
A man walks down a staircase.
A man is riding a horse.
A person is playing a guitar.
A man is playing a guitar and singing.
Two people are riding a bike.
A woman is playing an electric guitar.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man and woman is walking in the grand.
Kangaroo eating.
A man is exercising.
A man is singing.
A animal is eating.
A man and woman is dancing in the rain.
A man drives a car.
A woman grates onions.
Two men are fighting.
A man is driving a car.
A man is driving a car.
A man is eating a food.
A man is slicing a bun.
A man is carrying a tree.
A woman is cutting meat.
The man is slicing bread.
A man is playing a piano.
A baby elephant eats a sapling.
The man is peeling a potato.
A person is slicing a potato.
A woman is cracking eggs.
A boy is playing a key-board.
A boy spanks a man with a plastic sword.
A person is cutting an onion into pieces.
A man is slicing a line of water bottles with a knife
A man plays a guitar.
A man is writing on a paper.
A man is talking.
A man is playing a keyboard piano.
A woman is slicing a big pepper.
A person is eating at a table.
The man is stirring the rice.
A woman is taking a bath.
A man is playing guitar.
A man is playing a harp.
Women are dancing.
A man is dancing.
A man is speaking.
The man is walking.
A man is thinking.
The man erased the work on the board.
A man is riding a motorcycle through a town.
A man is riding a motorcycle.
A woman is slicing some onions.
A person is brushing a cat.
A woman is cutting broccoli.
A woman is peeling a potato.
Someone is slicing fruit.
A woman is dancing.
A man is spitting.
A man is mooing.
The man played his guitar.
A cat addresses the camera.
A baby is laughing and crawling on the floor.
A man is playing the trumpet.
A woman shoots a shotgun.
A man is playing guitar.
A woman is dancing in railway station.
A man rides a horse.
A woman is exercising.
A young boy is playing a wind instrument.
A man breaks a bottle with a sword.
A woman is peeling a potato.
A woman is cutting potato.
A man peels an apple.
A monkey is riding a bus.
A puppy is trying to get out of a bathtub.
The man is playing with a skull.
A solenodon is walking along the ground.
A woman is dancing on a stage.
A woman is playing the guitar.
A little girl is playing the piano.
A man is eating food.
A group of men are dancing.
A woman is playing guitar.
The little boy swung at the golf ball.
A cat is spun around by a ceiling fan.
A boy is removing his sunglasses.
A man is reading his email.
A girl is playing a flute.
A woman is cutting an onion.
A monkey brushes a dog.
Someone is slicing an onion.
A woman is cutting a potato.
A woman is playing a guitar.
A woman is straightening her hair.
A woman is shooting a gun.
The man is eating cereal.
A girl jumps on top of a car.
A woman is taking a bath.
A person crashes on a motorcycle.
A man is feeding a mice to a snake.
A man and woman are walking through the jungle.
The lady poured the rice pudding into a bowl.
A man looks out the window.
A woman is cutting a lemon.
Someone is peeling a banana.
The comedic mimes performed on stage.
A cartoon woman is diving off a board.
A woman puts a baby in a trash can.
Someone is playing paino.
A person is quickly chopping mushrooms with a knife.
A woman is cracking three eggs into a bowl.
A man skateboards on a half pipe.
A man is speaking at a podium.
A man in a hat is playing a harp.
A man is playing a guitar.
A person is slicing a shallot.
A man is playing his guitar.
A man is dancing upside-down on the ceiling.
Two women are shopping.
Someone is seasoning two raw eggs in a bowl.
The woman is slicing green onions.
A person is peeling a potato.
A gibbon is swinging in the trees.
Someone is carrying a fish.
A woman is cutting broccoli.
A woman is combing her hair.
A man is slicing a potato.
A man is dancing.
A deer jumps over a cyclone fence.
A woman is dancing in the rain.
A woman is sitting at a desk.
A monkey is playing drums.
The girl is playing the guitar.
A woman is picking tomatoes.
A lion tries to climb over a wall.
A guy is talking into a microphone.
A man is cleaning a cd.
A boy cuts grass with scissors.
A woman is chopping a peeled potato into slices.
A man in a library is talking.
A girl is riding a scooter.
A woman is cutting broccoli.
A man is walking down a sidewalk.
The man is pouring broth into the pot.
The man is playing the piano with his nose.
A cat is playing.
The animal is hopping.
A man is lifting a barbell.
A man runs with a truck.
A man is sitting on a rock.
A cat is licking its paw.
A woman is adding oil to a dish.
A cat is licking itself.
A man is performing tricks with a soccer ball.
Racers are running down a track.
A woman is looking out a window.
A woman is cutting potatoes.
A woman is applying eye liner.
A woman is slicing carrots.
Three shirtless men are dancing in the street.
A rooster pecks at a dead mouse.
A woman is chopping garlic with a knife.
The woman is slicing a tomato.
A man is slicing bread.
A woman is cutting big pepper.
A woman is riding a horse.
A woman is coating a pork chop.
A woman is cleaning a shrimp.
The man is peeling a potato.
A man is talking.
A woman is making some food.
A man is laying on the ground shooting a rifle.
A man is pouring pasta onto a plate.
A man is singing into a microphone.
A man shoots a shotgun.
A man is shaking another mans hand.
The target was being shot with bullets.
A man is playing a flute.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man is riding a horse in an arena.
A plane is landing on a runway.
A woman is lying in a raft.
A man is mixing.
A woman is exercising.
A man is dancing.
A woman is hitting a man.
A man is laying on the ground.
A woman is riding on a horse.
A man is playing a guitar.
A woman is rowing a boat.
A person is cutting a green pepper.
Someone is putting rice in a pan.
A boy is playing an instrument.
The lady measured the other woman's ankle.
A man is sprinkling shredded cheese on a pizza.
A man puts pieces of meat into a plastic bag.
A boy is playing the trumpet.
A man is riding a motorcycle.
A man is slicing a vegetable.
A woman is cutting a carrot.
A woman is slicing a potato.
A woman is playing flute.
A man is riding a bicycle around a parking lot.
A band is playing and singing on a stage.
A person is placing a baby komodo dragon into a container.
The woman is riding a horse.
A man is playing flute.
A woman is dancing.
A woman is slicing ginger.
A person throws a cat in the air and it grabs onto the ceiling.
A man tosses a bag down an escalator.
The tortoise is walking.
A man is firing a rifle.
A man is shooting a gun.
The woman is singing.
A man is adding oil to car.
A dog is eating some water melon.
A man is putting papers on a dish.
A man and woman walking hold each other.
The man slced through a thick rope with a sword.
A man is playing a guitar.
A dog is eating a doll.
A person is tearing paper.
A guy is peeling a potato.
A rat is running.
A woman is talking on a telephone.
A woman is peeling a tuber.
A women slicing lemons.
A man is running on rope.
A man is drawing some figures.
A man is playing a flute.
A kitten is walking.
A man is breaking an egg.
A woman is cutting meat.
A man is playing guitar.
A woman is washing a bowl.
A man is striking clay pots.
A man is playing a keyboard.
A woman is riding an elephant.
A man an woman are dancing in the rain.
A man is holding huge sunflowers.
A woman is cutting a tomatoe.
The bomb exploded in the desert.
A man is dancing.
A American flag is blowing in the wind.
A lion is walking around.
A tiger walks around aimlessly.
A person is pouring olive oil into a pot on the stove.
A woman is riding a horse.
A man is showing a bread.
A man is speaking to an audience.
A parrot is talking into a microphone.
A woman is slicing some tuna.
A person is chopping an onion.
A man is dancing in the rain.
A man is putting rice in a bowling pot.
A dog is barking at an electronic toy duck.
A woman is mixing an egg in a bowl.
A woman is seasoning a piece of meat.
A person is dicing a clove of garlic with a knife.
A cat, perched on a table, looks out the window.
A woman lifts weights.
A man is exercising.
A young boy is running toward and from the ocean waves.
A man is peeling a banana.
A man is playing a wooden flute.
A man is riding a horse in the desert.
A person is playing a keyboard piano.
A woman is painting the face of a man.
A woman puts chopped eggplant into a skillet.
The dog took something out of the refrigerator.
A man is playing a musical instrument.
A person is burning cameras.
A woman, in a kitchen, peels a lemon.
A lion is trying to climb up over a wall.
A man is tying a noose.
A woman is dancing.
A woman is cutting potatoes.
Two teams play soccer.
The girl is spraying the plants with water.
A man is getting into a car in a garage.
A person is peeling a potato.
A woman is chopping garlic.
A woman is slicing an onion.
A man is dancing.
A man is speaking.
A woman fixes her hair.
A soccer player kicks the ball into the goal.
A woman is scrubbing a zucchini with a vegetable brush.
The puppy tried to get out of the tub.
A little girl is playing a grand piano on stage.
A man is drawing on a digital dry erase board.
The monkey swung from branch to branch.
Two boy are playing on a trampoline.
A person folds a piece of paper.
A women slicing green pepper.
A baby panda plays with a stick.
A man is putting anti-freeze into a car.
Several people are carrying large bags.
The woman is pouring oil into the pan.
A man is moon-walking across a store.
A man is climbing a rope.
A person is playing a piano keyboard.
A boy is playing in the mud.
A person is slicing cantaloupe.
A man is riding a motorcycle.
A woman is climbing a rock wall.
A man is adding water to pan.
A woman is riding a horse.
Some people are throwing a dummy off a cliff.
A potato is being peeled.
The woman is eating.
A woman is playing a guitar on streets.
A woman is slicing a pineapple into pieces.
A woman adds ingredients to beef.
The cook pouring oil into the pan.
A man is seasoning some dough in a pan.
Two boys are playing in the beach.
The monkey scratched his tummy.
A man is throwing blades into a close target outside.
A woman is riding a horse.
The woman is putting on lipstick.
A man is tying in the machine.
A woman is applying eye shadow.
A person is slicing a small pieces of ginger.
A man is squeezing water.
Someone is playing guitar.
A man is chopping egg plant.
A guy is mowing the lawn.
A person is hitchhiking on a road.
The cowboy rode his horse in the desert.
A person is performing tricks on a motorcycle.
A man seasoning quail.
A big cat opens a plastic drawer with his paws and then hops inside.
A woman is grating an orange food.
A man is playing a guitar.
A woman is slicing a red pepper.
A woman is rock climbing.
A dog is rolling from side to side.
A kid plays the guitar.
The man is balancing on the wire.
Someone is playing with a toad.
A man is on a roof dancing.
A dog is watching a store counter.
A man is shown slicing a carrot with a knife.
A man drills wood.
Someone is pouring tomato sauce into a pot of meat.
A man is petting a tied up dog.
A man is drivong a car.
A man is playing a trumpet.
A live rabbit is playing with a stuffed animal bunny.
A woman is ridint a horse.
A monkey pratices martial arts.
A woman is getting doused in green slime.
Someone is removing the seeds from a bell pepper.
The man took a piece of pepperoni pizza out of the box.
A man is adding sliced vegetables to a cooking bowl with water.
A man jumps into a wall.
A man is rapidly lifting small weights.
A man is walking down stairs.
A man is teasing a snake with a mouse.
The man added seasoning to water in a bowl.
A clown is singing.
A woman is chopping up garlic.
A man carries a women.
A man is rinsing a large steak.
A BMX biker rides along the top of a fence.
A man is showing magic.
A woman is slicing some leaves.
A woman is chopping an onion.
A man is sitting and playing a small guitar.
Women models are walking down a catwalk.
A woman is exercising with a barbell.
A man is hiking.
A bird picks up a plastic cup containing a liquid with it's beak and puts the cup into a bowl.
A car is driving along the road.
A man is holding a slow loris.
A man is lifting himself.
A woman is exercising her abs.
A woman is riding a seadoo.
A woman is slicing a tomato.
A woman is chopping some shiso leaves.
A small child is drinking water from a cup.
A kitten eats some food.
A woman is slicing a meat into pieces.
A man opens a can and pours the contents into a bowl.
A man is beating two eggs in a bowl with a fork.
A bird is eating from a bowl.
A video clip of Rihanna leaving a taxi.
A woman breaks an egg into a pan.
A man is loading a rifle with bullets.
A woman is stabbing a potato with a fork.
The woman is cutting potatoes.
A woman is chopping green onions.
A man is playing a guitar.
A man talks on his cell phone.
A woman is carrying a wallaby in a bag.
A baby is being fed peas.
A man is standing in the rain.
A man is walking on a rope.
A woman rubs a baby's leg.
Smeone is laying down.
A man is breaking pots.
A woman dips a shrimp in batter.
The dog played with a bug on the carpet.
A jet is flying.
A man is playing the electric guitar.
A man is riding a horse.
A man is eating his food.
A man is cutting a mat.
A man is singing and playing a guitar.
A person is performing a card trick.
One woman hands volleyballs to another woman who serves them.
A person makes fire.
A man is cooking a tortilla in a skillet.
A band is playing instruments.
The man is holding a skunk.
The baby is laughing and crawling.
A man is peeling an onion.
A man is cutting a boot with a sword.
Someone is cutting a piece of meat.
A person is descaling a fish.
One boy is talking with other man.
The little girl rode a horse.
Someone is putting ingredients into a wok.
A man is slicing a plastic container with a sword.
A man pushes another man into the ocean.
Someone is playing a gameboy.
A man is making a phone call.
A panda bear is chewing on a stick.
A man is turning foods.
A woman is putting on makeup.
A man lifts weights.
Two couple are talking with each other.
A cat is swinging on a fan.
A white cat is licking and drinking milk kept on a plate.
The women are feeding the animal.
A woman is washing a bowl.
A man is finely chopping a green substance.
Ferrets climb down from a shelf.
A boy is filling a pitcher with water.
A woman is washing off the top of a freezer.
The woman is shooting a rifle.
A woman is beating two eggs in a bowl using a wire whisk.
The man is adding seasoning to the beans.
A woman is shooting off a gun.
A solenodon is walking along the ground.
The men are jogging on the beach.
A man is stuffing himself full with food.
A dog is trying to get through his dog door.
A dog closes a refrigerator door.
A man is doing push ups.
The man is playing the guitar.
A woman is abusing her child.
The girl applied face makeup to a man.
A man pours a plate of shredded cheese into a pot of sauce.
A man is delivering a lecture at an event celebrating the game of cricket.
A cat is crawling upside down under the couch.
A moose drinks from a sprinkler.
A woman slices a fish.
A masked man sings.
A clown is singing.
A boy is running in front of fish hanging on fishing rod.
A man is doing back flips on a trampoline.
The man is seasoning the vegetables.
A man is taking pictures of ant.
A chef is slicing a shrimp.
A man is petting two dogs.
A man is cutting a trunk with an axe.
A woman is putting meat in a pan.
A woman falls on a sand castle.
A woman is slicing some onions.
A girl is riding a bicycle.
The sun is rising behind trees.
A man is driving a car.
A man is playing a guitar.
A woman is cracking an egg.
Three men are practicing karate moves in a field.
A man is dancing.
A boy is onstage playing the violin.
A man is playing a guitar.
A woman is peeling a potato.
The man drew on the white paper.
A cat is rubbing against a baby.
A chef is peeling a potato.
A small animal is chewing on a finger.
A man is peeling an onion.
A guy is singing while playing his guitar.
Women swimmers are diving in from the starting platform.
Two boys are skate boarding.
The chef poured oil in the pan.
A pig is agitating a lion.
A man is playing an instrument.
A cat is licking a bottle.
A ferret and kitten play together.
A guy is playing a trumpet.
A band is singing.
A woman is chopping herbs.
A guy is talking into a microphone.
A man in a suit is standing at a microphone and singing.
A car is taking reverse.
A slow loris is eating.
A man is emptying a plastic container.
A cat is walking on hardwood floor.
A woman is cutting up a carrot with a knife.
A person is driving a motorcycle on a road.
A person is chopping shrimp with a knife.
A woman is pouring oil in a bowl.
The man is playing the guitar.
A man guts a fish.
Two women are sitting close to each other and talking.
Two women are slicing some lemons.
A man removes food from a bag.
A flag is waving.
A man ties a noose.
The man is riding the horse.
A horse is standing.
A man is loading a rifle.
A woman is stirring meat in a bowl.
Girls are walking on the stage.
A man is opening a package containing headphones.
A person is kicking a soccer ball back and forth between his feet.
A baby is laughing.
A woman is applying eye makeup.
A woman is putting on makeup.
A woman is stroking a lemur.
A wallaby is licking a woman's hand.
A dog pushes a toddler into a rain puddle.
A woman is putting on eyeshadow.
A boy plays a handheld game.
A man is riding a motorcycle.
The cat fished a straw out ouf his water dish.
A bird is bathing in a sink.
A man is singing and playing a guitar.
A man rises from a swamp.
A man is petting a dog.
The man swept the empty living room.
Men and women are dancing slowly.
A man pours some cooking oil into a pot.
A man is dancing in the street.
A man is taking pictures of a lake.
A baby is sucking on a pacifier.
Two men are playing table tennis.
Someone is rinsing a large beef steak at the kitchen sink.
The cat cleaned his face with his paw.
The man tased the food.
A woman is slicing egg plant.
A hamster is eating some seeds.
A man is working on his laptop.
A man cracks an egg.
A man is riding a mechanical bull.
A black pet dog runs around in the garden of a house.
A woman is walking along a road and a man in a motorcar pulls up beside her.
A woman is dancing, and singing.
A dog is catching a fish in a river.
A woman is dancing to music standing near a bonfire.
A man is doing pull-ups.
A woman is cutting shrimps.
A dog is pulling a child down a hill.
A man wearing a hard hat removes his glasses as he speaks.
Boys are dancing in front of people.
A woman is making a bed.
A man is swinging nunchucks.
A man breaks a slab of concrete that is lying on a prone man with a sledge hammer.
A woman places a container of noodles in a pan of water.
A tiger attacks a man.
A girl is putting on makeup.
A baby panda relaxes on some logs.
Two kids push an inflatable crocodile around in a pool.
Two women are dancing.
A person is peeling a potato.
A woman is putting oil into a skillet.
Doctors are trying to revive a man.
A person grates a potato into a bowl.
A man is pouring oil into a pan.
A baby is laughing.
The cat tried to eat the corn on the cob.
A boy is trying to say firetruck.
A man is eating a food.
A person is drawing a picture.
A woman places two eggs into a pot of water.
A man pours gasoline.
A man is putting cheese on a tortilla.
A woman is slicing tofu.
Swimmers are racing in a lake.
A person is slicing a meat into pieces.
A man is putting barbecue sauce on chicken.
A woman is riding a horse.
A boy is playing a key-board between the people.
The girl sat on the couch to crochet.
A monkey pratices martial arts.
A young man is playing the guitar.
A woman is peeling a potato.
A cat is eating a slice of watermelon.
A man is riding a skateboard.
A man is kick boxing with a trainer.
A person draws on a dollar bill.
A woman is chopping an onion into small pieces.
The cook is slicing bell peppers.
A little boy is vacuuming the floor.
A woman cuts up some meat.
A boy is playing on a toy phone.
A man is riding a motorcycle.
A woman opens a closet.
A dog is swimming in a pool.
A person opening a banana.
A man plays a wooden flute.
A man is playing guitar.
In Nigeria, the whole ijaw indigenous showed Chevron to encourage the violence against them and of up to pay Nigerian soldiers to shoot the demonstrators at the naval base from Warri.
I know that in France, the principle of slaughter of whole herd has been implemented and that this is not the best way to combat this phenomenon.
Unfortunately the final objective of a European Constitution would be exactly the opposite and obviously we cannot approve it.
The right for a government to draw aside its constitution arbitrarily is the definition characteristic of a tyranny.
This Parliament has also fought for this reduction in the funds available for innovative actions should be compensated for by the use of the framework of flexibility, defined in a statement on the financial perspective.
The right for a government to dismiss arbitrarily its constitution is the definition of a characteristic tyranny.
Indeed, it is not absolutely certain that the definition of fair price which is better than another, because the definitions used in the Member States in all amply sufficient.
They can in fact wish to more and better, but I think that it is a good start.
It should be the real coordination of the network of national agencies which, in turn, will speed up and a network of centres of excellence of food at regional level.
Madam President, I would ask you, on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries and in my own name, to send a message of condolence on the part of Parliament to the families of the victims and the local authorities of Brittany as Marín, city of Galicia, where originating from most of the victims.
One can indeed wish more and better, but I believe very honestly that it is a good start.
It passes in lawsuit next on January 8. It is reproached to him for having taken part in a meeting of Tunisian opponents in France, which besides it denies.
Thank you very much, Mr Commissioner.
The creation of a provisional unit of judicial cooperation is a step in the right direction, not to which the European Parliament has been seeking for a long time already.
A budget line finance programmes of mine clearance and prevention for years.
The other point of view, illustrated by the initial aim of the rapporteur and shared by many colleagues, is to promote the regulations and codes of conduct necessary to establish, between insurers, the forms of cost option guaranteeing all the supply of good quality of care and to counter the risks of discriminatory practices and a selection of risks and customers.
The only case for which no tax is still perceived "is an example of supply in the European Community from a third country.
It is obviously necessary to determine the reasons for the increase in the incidence of BSE, not only in France but also in other Member States.
Mr President, we can see the Commission's position in terms of public access to documents by reading the internal manual which was given on 11 October, with the Commission officials in order to explain the way in which they were to deal with the requests from the Members with regard to access to documents.
I insist on this point because the market cannot regulate all and that, accordingly, it does not have there nor cannot have there of competition without limits.
Indeed, it is not absolutely certain that the definition of fair price proposed is better than another, because the different definitions are currently used in the Member States are enough is enough.
Mr. President, my honourable Members, I would like to intervene on the joint resolution that obviously we will vote.
I also voted against a text which requires the incorporation of the Charter of the fundamental rights in the future treaty which will be adopted in Nice.
A budget line finances clearance programmes and of prevention since years.
Of those who signed the letter, 57 are senators, including 24 Republicans.
I find it a little strange to now obliging the Commission to a motion for a resolution and to ask him at the same time to draw up a Green Paper on the current state of voluntary insurance and supplementary sickness insurance.
The economic activities Commons generating peaceful links between people.
Spain has developed a remarkably positive the difficult that always existed between Europe and North Africa and between Spain and Morocco.
The creation of a Provisional Judicial Cooperation Unit is a step in the right direction, which the European Parliament is not a long time ago.
I urge the French Presidency to do everything in its power to bridge this gap, particularly destructive.
As the European Parliament, in its resolution of 16 March 2000, that they initiatives does the Council intend to take to play a more active role in order to ensure the full and entire application of the UN peace plan?
On the contrary, the power of the national restricting still further the right of veto and to give more power to the Parliament of the EU.
Mr President, in my speech I shall focus on the report by Mrs Lalumière report, which I find formulated well thought-out and clearly.
I stress this because the market cannot regulate everything and that, in this sense, there cannot be any competition without limits.
Just like the Court of the human rights, the Council of Europe has to him also a solid experiment with regard to such forms of control. We can take it for base.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to speak on the joint resolution that obviously we vote.
I invite Prague to take this message, this invitation, this request for dialogue, to act and to make it so that, together with this House, these being nationalistic period relics may be abandoned.
It must be the true brain coordination of the network of national agencies, which, in turn, must activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence of food safety at regional level.
Therefore, it is urgent that the personnel of the inter-service group are very quickly reinforced at the heart of the Secretary-General of the Commission, so that all the proposals of the Act of general interest can be accompanied, during their examination by the Commission on the basis of Article 299 (2) of a detailed fiche d'impact.
By withdrawing our resolution, I am, however, convinced that Parliament would have done better by making its voice heard, in view of the Nice European Council, a separate and specific resolution on the issues which are so important and so difficult for the Intergovernmental Conference, rather than treating them in the context of a single resolution including also all the other items on the agenda of the Council.
Just as the European Court of Human Rights, the Council of Europe has also considerable experience with regard to these forms of control; we can take as a basis.
We have started to have discussions on this issue, making it clear that all the Member States wish to maintain this ceiling after enlargement.
Firstly, that of simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
Thus, it is urgent that the staff of the interservice group are very quickly strengthened at the heart of the Secretary-General of the Commission, so that all the proposed act of general scope can be accompanied, during their examination by the college on the basis of Article 299 (2) of a fiche d'impact detailed.
Without doubt, was better to have no agreement only have an agreement that is bad and, in this case, the American proposal was a proposal to the rebate, totally unacceptable for Europe.
The situation is worse when it comes to women's distant countries which have accepted this work by necessity and who have no alternative to continue supporting themselves to their vital needs.
The joint debate is closed.
This is a development of this kind that I wish the other Member States of the European Union.
If we want to help Indonesia, we must intervene now with money and actions, and not just with words.
Without doubt, it was better to have no agreement have an agreement that is wrong and, in this case, the American proposal was a watered-down proposal totally unacceptable for Europe.
That is the position defended by the rapporteur and shared by the European People's Party.
We must clearly define the reasons for the increase in the incidence of BSE, not only in France but also in other Member States.
If employment is the political priority of the Union, fisheries, as an economic sector, cannot remain on the sidelines.
Finally, and this is a subject more controversial, the Commission invited vigorously to use the fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
They continue to put pressure. The money they earn with distribution beyond the bounds of 150 grammes allows them to strengthen their position.
If we want to help Indonesia, we must speak now with money and concrete action, and not just with words.
A budget line is funding programmes for mine clearance and prevention for years.
Vessels, without which there is the slightest, Mr Gayssot.
I invite Prague to seize this sign, this invitation, this request for dialogue, to take action pursuant and to make to it so that, in.liaison.with this Parliament, these one nationalist era old relics can be abandoned.
Nevertheless, I would like to say to the House this afternoon that we must not lose sight of the fact that the European Union spends only 1% of the GDP of the Member States and that the bulk of this money is managed in the Member States.
. (IN) the British Labor Members of group PSE are pleased with the favourable response reserved for the contribution which they made to the ongoing work of the IGC on the reinforced cooperation, without adhering completely to all the details of this one.
In Nigeria, the indigenous people All-Ijaw Chevron have been accused of inciting violence against them and to go so far as to pay Nigerian soldiers to draw on the demonstrators in the Warri naval base.
I know that in France, the principle of the slaughter of whole herds was applied and that does not seem to be the best way to combat this phenomenon.
These objectives, the overriding goal and secondary objectives, will be the yardstick by which we judge the concrete proposals put forward by the Commission.
The European Council will discuss the state of progress of accession negotiations, and therefore of enlargement.
My party has profound reservations about the regulation of the sale of consumer goods by means of Community legislation, as it expresses reservations about the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
The other point of view, illustrated by the initial matter of the rapporteur and shared per number of Members, consists in promoting the regulations and the codes of conduct necessary to found, between insurers, the forms of mutualisation of the costs guaranteeing to all the supply of an high quality of care and to counter the risks to see developing discriminatory practices and a risk selection and customers.
I wonder if the Commissioner, for the steps which they show that we consider and as the representative of the Serbian people and as the partner with which the European Union will have to deal with.
All those who are currently engaged in undeclared work e.g. employment in decent social conditions.
That is why I also believe that this reconciliation can take, but the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the issue of universities and to many other problems, needs the visible signs of success as well as a strong support, on pain of being threatened peace in the region as a whole.
We must obviously determine the reasons for the increase in the incidence of BSE, not only in France but also in other Member States.
Without doubt, it was better to have no agreement at all than to have an agreement that is wrong and, in this case, the proposal was a proposal to you, totally unacceptable for Europe.
As the European Parliament has called for in its resolution of 16 March 2000, they initiatives European Council Presidency intend to take to play a more active role in order to ensure the full implementation of the UN peace plan?
The maintenance of the universal service to the assistance of a compensation Fund which enable engaging the advantage of public service will probably long fire.
I wonder if the Commissioner already provides the steps that will make it possible to show that we consider Koitunica as the legally elected representative of the Serbian people and as a partner with which the European Union will now address.
The labelling of beef which has been decided, which is a minimum and labelling which is in force for two and a half months, does not properly to trace the origin of the animals and we have banned quite late specified risk materials.
We speak with a single voice within the WTO.
They will continue to put pressure on the money they gain the distribution beyond the bounds of the 150 grams enables them to strengthen their position.
It must be welcomed that the European Parliament has succeeded in bringing together a broad majority in favour of greater transparency.
The annual report aims to identify such potential improvements.
The recent incidents against the Greek minority of Himara make more imperative that we need to promote measures for democratisation, institution-building and respect for human rights in Albania.
I call on Prague to seize this sign, this invitation, this request for dialogue, to follow them up and to ensure that, together with this House, these relics of a nationalist era can be abandoned.
The labelling of beef and veal, which has been decided, which is a minimum and which is in force for two and a half months, does not make it possible to trace the origin of the animals properly and we have banned well late at risk.
And I say this to you very clearly: we must give its opportunity to Kostunica and I therefore hope that it will ensure an amnesty during the weeks or months ahead; but in the meantime, I wish, however, that, in political terms and in budgetary terms, the political conditions are linked to the introduction of these two new budget lines, namely democratisation and reconstruction.
This Parliament has, however, also fought for this reduction in the funds allocated to the innovative actions to be compensated for by the use of framework of flexibility, defined in a statement on the financial perspective.
Finally, in a word, the fourth pillar dedicated to equal opportunities reinforces the integrated approach to equality by gender mainstreaming and specific guidelines.
On the contrary, the power of national democracies is still more force to limit the right of veto and to give more power for the European Parliament.
Greek ship sank, without the least storm in exist, Mr Gayssot.
It is recognised that the knowledge of foreign languages is a prerequisite for mobility.
It must be the true brain coordination of the network of national agencies, which, in turn, must activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence food safety at regional level.
The lesson that this House in this morning's debate must learn is that we are forced to conclude that the maritime laws are all over the world, in a state of chaos, and that we must set about the task to sort all this out.
We have heard that the previous presidency has restructured first and then dismantled the Ministry of equal opportunities.
The technology-laced Nasdaq Composite Index <.IXIC> rose 6 points, or 0.41 percent, to 1,498.
It is the position defended by the rapporteur and shared by the European popular party.
The safeguarding of universal service to a compensation fund which would engage in private profits for the benefit of the public service will probably long.
(Parliament accepted the oral amendment)
. (ES) Mr. President, widening is essential for the construction of a strong and plain continent of Europe.
Certainly, it was not to have an agreement better than to have an agreement which is wrong and, in this case, the American proposal was a proposal to the reduction, totally unacceptable for Europe.
On the situation in Burma.
For this cooperation, for your support and also for your warm welcome, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, the French Presidency thank you.
The lesson that must retain this House in her this morning's debate is that we are forced to conclude that the laws are maritime, throughout the world, in a state of mess, and that we must set about the task of them to bring order.
Secondly, we must say 'no' to the concept which would be admitted that big bang, but at the same time, a large group of countries, because this would be in contradiction with the principle of the admission of each country on its merits.
Secondly, we must say 'no' to the big bang concept which would admit that at the same time, a large group of countries, because that would be at odds with the principle of the admission of each country according to its merits.
Unfortunately the final objective of a European Constitution would be exactly the opposite and of course we cannot agree.
The creation of a provisional unit of judicial cooperation is a step in the right direction, which the European Parliament has been striving for a long time.
The debate is closed.
Those who reject the enhanced cooperation have the same freedom of movement that passengers in the back seat of a car.
In my opinion, there is nothing worse than having to inform the people to be made in their favour could be that a series of words and have no worries on their existence.
By withdrawing our resolution, I am, however, convinced that Parliament would do better to devote its voice, in view of the Nice Council, a specific resolution separate and the extremely important subjects and difficult if the Intergovernmental Conference, rather than treating them within the framework of a single resolution including also all other items on the agenda of the Council.
I would also have liked the report of the Court of Auditors was a little more user-friendly and that it had submitted some clear recommendations - for example, one or two recommendations per chapter.
In recent weeks, three important progress has been made.
This is a disgrace when we think that the European Union is a champion of the modernisation of economic life.
In Nigeria, the All-Ijaw natives showed Chevron to incite with the violence in their opposition and of going until paying Nigerian soldiers to shoot at the demonstrators at the naval base from Warri.
Slovakia is not condemned to remain in the second group and it is logical that it wishes to join the Union at the same time as the Czech Republic.
We welcome the provisions proposed in this respect by the preparatory committee and decided by the General Assembly in relation to the method of accreditation of non-governmental organisations, at the preparatory process and the special session in September 2001.
You do not want to incorporate in the Treaty, which demonstrates that this text should be set aside.
It is not clear on this point, and it is not impossible that can also remain in force more restrictive measures, especially on this point than we tabled amendments.
Greek ships were sunk, without any storm around, Mr Gayssot.
Unfortunately the ultimate objective of a European Constitution would be opposite and obviously we cannot support it.
I make an urgent appeal to the Presidency to do everything in its power to fill this role.
A policy which has been strongly capital.
This is a development of this type that I wish to other States of the European Union.
It is right in saying that the Committee on Legal Affairs continues in the refusal of a ceiling and the maintenance of a minimum rate which cannot be less than 7%.
Things deteriorate when it is a question of women from countries which have accepted this work and who have no other possibility to continue to provide their basic needs.
It must be the true brain of coordination of the network of the national agencies which, in their turn, will have to activate and coordinate a network of centers of excellence of food safety at the regional level.
All those who work currently out a job in social conditions.
It goes trial on 8 January of next year. It is accused of having participated in a meeting of Tunisian opponents in France, as indeed it denies.
The labelling of beef which was decided, which is a minimum labelling and which came into effect only since two months and half, does not make it possible to suitably recall the origin of the animals and we prohibited well tardily the specified risk materials.
Since 1996, the European Parliament had decided in favour of a prohibition of the use of the bone meals in the European Union, in accordance with the precautionary principle - so only it had been listened to.
You do not even want to incorporate into the Treaty, which shows that this text should be set aside.
Faced with criticism, especially those in Ireland and France, the British Chancellor of the Exchequer gave a new interpretation of it: it is now a tax for all users, including the British drivers of heavy goods vehicles.
And I say to you very clearly: we must give its chance Kostunica and I therefore hope that it will provide an amnesty during the weeks and months ahead; but in the meantime, I hope, however, that, politically and in terms of the budget, the political conditions are linked to the introduction of these two new budgetary lines, namely democratisation and reconstruction.
It is a development of this type which I hope in the other States of the European Union.
You do not even want to incorporate into the Treaty, that proves that this text should be set aside.
Above all, unipersonnelle when a company or a society with fewer than 250 employees has a project, it must be possible to receive financing not only with a guarantee to 120%, but also on the basis of a good idea.
I find it a little strange to try now to force the Commission to a motion for a resolution and ask him at the same time to draw up a Green Paper on the current state of voluntary insurance and supplementary sickness insurance.
I stress this point because the market cannot solve all and, in this sense, there cannot be any competition without limits.
Undoubtedly, was it not to have an agreement better than to have an agreement which is bad and, in this case, the American proposal was a proposal with the reduction, completely unacceptable for Europe.
We must welcome the fact that Parliament has managed to gather a large majority in favour of greater transparency.
On the contrary, the power of the national democracies decreases in force of limiting increasingly the right of veto and to give ever more power in Parliament of the EU.
The European Council will also discuss the State of progress of the negotiations on membership, and therefore of the '.
I invite Prague to seize this, this invitation, this request for dialogue, to respond and to ensure that, together with this House, these relics of a nationalist age can be abandoned.
Those who refuse closer cooperation to enjoy the same freedom of movement that passengers in the back seat of a car.
Given the criticisms, particularly those of Ireland and France, the British Chancellor of the Exchequer has given a new interpretation: it would now a tax for all users, including the lorry drivers in the UK.
We have heard that the previous presidency was first restructured can dismantled the Ministry of equal opportunities.
Finally, in a word, the fourth pillar dedicated to equal opportunities reinforces the integrated approach to equality by the mainstreaming and by specific guidelines.
This rule can also apply to all drugs récréationnelles but dangerous as far as the consumer of drugs should be the only to run risks.
When we are confronted with a potential risk, it is important to implement the precautionary principle.
We welcome the proposed provisions in this respect by the preparatory committee and decided by the General Assembly as regards the way accreditation non-governmental organisations, the preparation process and the special session in September 2001.
Above all, when a business or a society with fewer than 250 a project, it must be possible for a means not only with a guarantee to 120%, but also on the basis of a good idea.
The creation of a provisional unit of legal cooperation constitutes a step in the right direction, not to which the European Parliament aspires for a long time already.
I already answered on this point and I subscribe completely so that he said on the need for improving the public debate considerably. I will not return on what I said, but it is true that, too often, the citizens feel foreign with decisions which are made in authorities that they do not know.
These objectives, the secondary primary objective and objectives, will represent the stone of key enabling us to consider the concrete proposals presented by the Commission.
When we are faced with a potential risk, it is important to implement the precautionary principle.
Since the first, on this issue, which took place at the European level on the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission is in relation to the Member States to promote an action intended to what we could consider as a culture, on the standard them in the matter of respect for the rights and freedoms of the citizens, and effectiveness in the fight against crime.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to speak on the joint resolution that of course we will.
These objectives, the objective of primary and secondary objectives, the cornerstone of allowing us to judge the concrete proposals by the Commission.
on the situation in Burma.
By withdrawing our resolution, I express however the conviction that our Parliament would have better done to hear its voice while devoting, for Conseil of Nice, a resolution specific and distinct with the so important and so difficult topics to the intergovernmental Conference, rather than to treat them within the framework of one only resolution also including all the other points of about an agenda of the Council.
Those who refuse and enjoy the same freedom of movement as the passengers out of a car.
I know that in France, the principle of the whole and that it does not seem to be the best way to combat this phenomenon.
There is urgency and that is why we have decided to put this item on the agenda.
That is what we have done: we have avoided a budgetary crisis by returning to Article 272; the financial perspective has been maintained, even if we have used the flexibility instrument.
The establishment of a provisional unit of judicial cooperation is a step in the right direction, not to which the European Parliament wants a long time ago.
I appeal urgently to the French Presidency to do everything in its power to bridge this gap particularly destructive.
These last weeks, three significant progresses were made.
It is not the moment to be hesitant.
We can indeed want more and better, but quite honestly that I believe this is a good start.
I would also have liked to see the report of the Court of Auditors a little more user-friendly and if he had presented a few clear recommendations - for example, one or two recommendations by chapter.
Secondly, we must say 'no' to the concept being recognised that the big bang, but at the same time, a large group of countries, because this would be in contradiction with the principle of the admission of each country on its merits.
The only way for which no tax is not yet seen is that of supply in the European Community from third countries.
I have already replied to this point and I agree entirely with what he said about the need to improve considerably the public debate I will not repeat what I said, but it is true that, all too often, citizens feel alienated to decisions that are taken in bodies that they do not know.
Given these realities, the need for greater involvement and greater efficiency in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment is essential.
My party has serious reservations about the regulation of the sale of consumer goods through Community legislation, as it expresses reservations about the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
Faced with this situation, the need for greater involvement and greater effectiveness in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment is essential.
That is why I also believe that this reconciliation can take; however, the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the issue of universities and many other problems, needs visible signs of success and a strong support, otherwise the peace threatened in the region as a whole.
The only case for which no tax is a delivery is still seen in the European Community from a third country.
The task, which is however capital, did not arouse an lively interest on behalf of the public yet.
It is on trial on 8 January is accused him for having taken part in a meeting of Tunisian opponents in France, which also it denies.
When we are faced with a potential risk, it is important to put into practice the principle of precaution.
(B5-0794 / 2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Linkohr, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists and the Group of the Party of European Socialists, from a Spanish in the negotiations with the;
We have heard that the previous presidency first restructured then dismantled the Ministry for equal opportunities.
In my view, however, there is nothing worse than to have to inform people that a ruling in their favour can only be a series of reassuring words and have no practical effect on their existence.
(ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and United European continent.
Either we are part of the club, or we are not and we must therefore we bow to that decision.
This is a disgrace when you think that the European Union raises a champion of the modernisation of economic life.
It is what we did: we avoided a budgetary crisis while returning in article 272; the financial perspectives were maintained, even if we used the flexibility instrument.
The declarations must be followed concrete actions to identify, freeze, seize and confiscate the products of the crime.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to speak on the joint resolution that obviously we shall vote.
I urge the French Presidency to should do everything in its power to bridge the gap particularly destructive.
The most urgent task, which is, however, has not yet a lively interest on the part of the public.
I invite Prague to seize this sign, this invitation, this request for dialogue, to follow up and to ensure that, together with this House, these reliques an era nationalist may be abandoned.
Finally, and this is something which is most controversial, the committee has called vehemently to use the fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
There is, of course, a very important point is the fact that we started in category four, with its approach, but we do not yet know very well if we managed to resolve the issue, not least because the Council does not wish to participate sufficiently in the reflection.
This is why I also think that this reconciliation can hold. However, the government, which very courageously found a solution with the question of the universities and many other problems, needs visible signs of the success as well as strong support, under penalty of seeing the peace threatened as a whole of the area.
It is the position defended by the rapporteur and shared by the European People's Party.
Approval of the Minutes of the previous session
(The House accepts the oral amendment)
Thirdly, the acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the various countries and the EU as a whole dependent – the example of Denmark is there for us to show it – elimination on social and democratic deficits for European policy.
Faced with the criticism, especially those in Ireland and France, the British Chancellor of the Exchequer, gave a different interpretation: it is now a tax for all users, including the British drivers of heavy goods vehicles.
The resolution on the Nice Summit, which just does not.
The only case for which no tax is still being EU is one of a - in the change from a third country.
(The meeting, stopped with 14:06, is taken again at 3 p.m.)
I know that in France, the principle of demolition of the whole herd was applied and that does not seem the best means of fighting this phenomenon.
Question No 6 by (H-0886 / 00):
In 1996, the European Parliament decided in favour of a ban on the use of meat and bone meal in the European Union, in accordance with the precautionary principle, if only we had listened to.
It is agreed that the knowledge of foreign languages is a necessary precondition for mobility.
I have also voted against a text which asks for the incorporation of the Charter of fundamental rights in the future Treaty which will be adopted at Nice.
Spain has developed a remarkably positive way the difficult neighbourhood that has always existed between Europe and North Africa and between Spain and Morocco.
The situation is worsening, when it comes to women distant countries which have accepted this work by necessity and which have no alternative to continue to meet their basic needs.
That is not the time to take hesitant.
The European Council will also discuss the progress of the accession negotiations, and therefore of enlargement.
If we want to help Indonesia, we must intervene now with money and concrete actions, and not only with words.
Just as the Court of human rights, the Council of Europe also has a solid experience in this regard such forms of control and we can take as a basis.
The other point of view, illustrated by the comments by the rapporteur and a number of colleagues, is to promote the regulations and codes of conduct for dialogue, between a good supply of guaranteeing the provision of a good practices and to counter the risk of discriminatory practices and a series of risks and customers.
Finally, in a word, the fourth pillar devoted to equal opportunities reinforces the integrated approach of equality by gender mainstreaming and specific guidelines.
Since the first thoughts on this issue, which took place at European level on the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission is committed to the Member States to promote action to develop what we could consider a European police culture, based on the highest standards in terms of ethics, respect for citizens' rights and freedoms, and effectiveness in the fight against crime.
It is a policy of this type that I wish to other States of the European Union.
There is urgency and that is why we decided to put this item on the agenda.
Mr President, in my speech I shall focus on the report by Mrs LalumiÃšre report, which I think is well thought-out and clearly formulated.
This is not the time to be hesitant.
Do you think that the model of the "-" - namely the majority - will be in the future as a means of taking in ignoring the European institutions and to a new institution, or a new Group, to be able to bypass the rule of unanimity in the Council?
It is our priority fight so that the affirmation of fundamental rights is implemented in political choices.
It is an evolution of this type which I wish in the other States of the European Union.
Those who refuse enhanced cooperation enjoy the same freedom of movement that passengers in the back seat of a car.
My party expresses serious reservations about the regulation of the sale of consumer products by means of Community legislation, as it makes reservations about the concept of the mutual recognition of standards.
It must be true brain of coordination of the network of national agencies which, in turn, will have to activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence in food safety at regional level.
Approval of the Minutes of the previous sitting
The creation of a Provisional Judicial Cooperation Unit is a step in the right direction, not to which the European Parliament is aiming for a long time.
Slovakia is not to remain in the second Group and it is logical that it wants to join the Union at the same time that the Czech Republic.
In recent weeks, three significant progress has been made.
When we are faced with a potential risk, it is important to put into practice the precautionary principle.
We will speak with one voice grace within the WTO.
We are pleased with proposed arrangements in this respect by the committee preparatory and decided by the General Assembly with regard to the mode of accreditation of the governmental organizations, with the preparatory process and the extraordinary session of September 2001.
This is a disgrace when we think that the European Union presents itself as the champion of the modernisation of economic life!
I find exemplary that France will be resolved to take this step.
I have already answered on this point and I support completely what he has said on the necessity of improving the public debate, and I will not go back on what I have said, but it is true that, all too often, the citizens feel the decisions that are taken in the authorities that they do not know.
Madam the President, I ask you, in the name of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries and in my proper name, to send a message of sympathy on behalf of the Parliament to the families of the victims and to the local authorities both of Brittany and of Marín, town of Galicia, from where are originating the majority in the victims.
Mr President, the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and Internal Affairs has prepared with great care the Karamanou report.
This is the position defended by the rapporteur and shared by the European People's Party.
- (ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and unified European continent.
Mr President, in my speech I shall focus on the report by Mrs Lalumière, report that I think it is well thought-out and clearly formulated.
In view of these realities, the need for greater involvement and greater efficiency in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment is essential.
Thus, it is urgent that manpower of the Interdepartmental Group are very quickly reinforced with the cur of the General Secretariat of the Commission, so that all the proposals of act of general scope can be accompanied, during their examination by the college on basis of Article 299, paragraph 2, of a detailed impact statement.
There is, of course, a very important point is the fact that we have begun the heading four, with its approach, but we do not yet know very well if we managed to resolve the problem, particularly because the Council does not wish to participate enough food for thought.
For this cooperation, for your support and also for your reception, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen of the European Parliament, the French Presidency thanks you.
First, that of a simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
It must be the real brains of coordination of the network of national agencies which, in turn, will have to activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence on food safety at regional level.
The Greek ships have sunk, without there being the slightest storm in its neck of the woods, Mr Gayssot.
(B5-0794 / 2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Linkohr and Mr Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on the abduction by Colombia of a Spanish Jesuit engaged in negotiations with the guerrilla movement.
We need to know today, since we are still in uncertainty, which are the scientific data, which are the measures to be taken.
Vis-a-vis these realities, the need for a greater implication and a greater effectiveness in the fight against poverty and the underdevelopment is essential.
Do you think that the Austrian 'model' - the majority decisions to be taken in future bilateral - it will be an instrument to take decisions by ignoring the European institutions and to set up a new institution, or a new group, in order to get round the unanimity rule in the Council?
Thirdly: the positive acceptance of enlargement and its prospects for the various countries and the EU as a whole largely depend - the example of Denmark east there for us to show it - elimination on the social and democratic deficits for the European policy.
Those who reject reinforced cooperation enjoy the same freedom of movement that passengers back the seat of a car.
The joint debate is closed.
The right to a government of arbitrarily its Constitution is the definition of a dictatorship.
If we want to help Indonesia, we must intervene now with money and concrete action, and not just with words.
Question No 6 by (h 0886 / 00):
Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a European continent strong and united.
For this cooperation, for your support and for your kind welcome, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, the French Presidency thank you.
This rule can also apply to all récréationnelles but dangerous drugs as far as the consumer of drugs is the only one to risks.
If we want to help Indonesia, we now have to intervene with money and concrete actions, and not only with words.
This Parliament however also fought so that this reduction of the funds allocated with the innovative measures is compensated by the use of the framework of flexibilisation, defined in a declaration on the financial perspective.
In Feira, he recognised the quality of potential candidates for accession to the countries participating in the stabilisation and association process.
The lesson which this Parliament in her debate of this morning must retain is that we are forced to conclude that the maritime laws are, all over the world, in a state of disorder, and that we must harness ourselves with the task to put order at it.
Approval of the official report of the previous sitting
Thirdly: the acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the various countries and for the EU as a whole depend – the example of Denmark is there for us to show this - the elimination of social and democratic deficits of European policy.
Indeed, there is absolutely no doubt that the definition of fair price that is proposed is better than another, because the definitions used in the Member States currently sufficient all amply.
Thus, it is imperative that the inter-service Group are very quickly, of the Commission, so that all the proposals to act can be, during their examination by the force on the basis of Article 299, paragraph 2, a detailed impact.
(The sitting was suspended at 14h06 and resumed at 3 p.m.)
Finally I accomodate the idea favorably to give us an annual appointment in order to take stock of the setting in uvre program.
In Feira, it has recognised the quality of potential candidates for accession to the countries participating in the stabilisation and association process.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to speak on the joint resolution that we will obviously vote.
And I say it very clearly to you: it is necessary to give its chance to Kostunica and I hope since it will take care of an amnesty during the weeks or of the months to come; but meanwhile, I wish however that, on the political plan and the budgetary term, of the political conditions be coupled with the introduction of these two special budget headings, namely democratization and the rebuilding.
We started discussions on this issue, which show that all the Member States wish to maintaining this ceiling after enlargement.
We must organise ourselves in fifteen Member States, to be able to welcome in good conditions for the countries which are knocking on our door.
Thank you very much, Mister the Police chief.
Those who deny the enhanced cooperation enjoy the same freedom of movement as passengers in the back seat of a car.
The European Council will also be discussing the state of progress of accession negotiations, and therefore of enlargement.
Mr President, we know the position of the Commission on public access to documents in reading the internal manual, which was submitted, on 11 October, the Commission's officials in order to explain the way in which they were to deal with the requests from the Members regarding access to documents.
This Parliament has, however, also fought for this reduction of funds for innovative actions should be compensated for by the use of flexibility, defined in a statement on the financial perspective.
We should obviously determine the reasons of the increased incidence of the ESB, not only in France but also in other Member States.
It must be respected and protected.
Finally, and this is a more controversial topic, the Committee has called with vigour to make use of the fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
The debate must be followed by concrete actions to identify, freeze, seize and confiscate the proceeds of crime.
B5-0794/2000, Misters Medina Ortega, Linkohr and Fava, in the name of the Europeans Group of the European Socialist, on removal in Colombia of a Spanish Jesuit engaged in the negotiations with the guerrilla;
Furthermore, we would have a chance to demonstrate to Europe that we are able to develop their own constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia, recognising the true democratic principles.
That is what we have done: we have avoided a budgetary crisis by returning to Article 272; the financial perspectives have been maintained, even if we have used the flexibility instrument.
This rule can, moreover, apply to all drugs récréationnelles but dangerous provided that the consumer of drugs is the only run the risks.
Finally, in a word, the fourth pillar dedicated to equal opportunities reinforces the integrated approach of equality by gender mainstreaming and specific guidelines.
We will speak with one voice disgracieuse within OMC.
Let us organise itself to 15 in order to be able to welcome the right conditions for countries which are knocking on our door.
I thank the rapporteur for the Committee on foreign Affairs, Mr Brok, for his clear and comprehensive report.
Above all, when a one-person business or a society with fewer than 250 employees has a project, it must be possible to receive financing not only to guarantee to 120%, but merely on the basis of a good idea.
I have already replied on this point and I entirely agree with what he has said about the need to improve considerably the public debate, and I will not repeat what I said, but it is true that, all too often, citizens feel alienated to decisions that are taken in the bodies that they do not know.
- (ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and united continent of Europe.
This is why I also think that this reconciliation can hold. however, the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the question and to many other problems, need visible signs of success so that a strong support to the peace in the whole of the region.
I thank the rapporteur of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Mr Brok, on his clear and comprehensive report.
Nevertheless I would wish to say to the Parliament this afternoon that we should not lose sight of the fact the fact that the European Union spends only 1% of the GDP of the Member States and that the largest part of this money is managed in the Member States.
You do not even want to incorporate into the Treaty, which proves that this text should be put to one side.
I launch an urgent appeal with the French presidency so that it does all that is in its capacity to fill this particularly destroying ditch.
We have heard that the first and then the inequality of opportunity.
On the contrary, the influence of the national democracies decreases by limit always more the right of veto and to give always more capacity to the Parliament of the EU.
Finally, and this is a more controversial subject, the Commission to make use of the procedure for the implementation of this legislation.
First of all, the simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
This is of such a development that I hope the other Member States of the European Union.
Mr President, I voted for the García-Margallo y Marfil report, which concerns the taxation of services provided by electronic means.
Firstly, that of a simplification of the Treaties.
Thank you very much, Commissioner.
That is why I also believe that this reconciliation can have, however, the Government, which has very courageously a solution to the issue of universities and many other problems, needs visible signs of success as well as strong support, otherwise the threatened peace in the region as a whole.
The things are not clear on this point, and it is not impossible that can also remain in force more restrictive provisions. It is in particular on this point that we introduced amendments.
I think it is exemplary that France is resolved to take that step.
Spain has developed a remarkably positive the difficult neighbourhood, which has always existed between Europe and North Africa and between Spain and Morocco.
It happening in trial on 8 January. He is accused of having attended a meeting of Tunisian opponents in France, which he denies.
I would also have liked to see the report of the Court of Auditors fusse a little more user-friendly and it would have put forward some clear recommendations - for example, one or two recommendations by chapter.
These objectives, the primary objective and secondary objectives, will be the yardstick for judging the concrete proposals put forward by the Commission.
The right for a government to remove arbitrarily its constitution is defining characteristic of a tyranny.
These objectives, the secondary objective and objectives, will represent the touchstone of enabling us to consider the specific proposals presented by the Commission.
It is just that the Committee on legal Affairs of the refusal of a ceiling and in the maintenance of a minimum rate which cannot be 7%.
We have started to have exchanges on this issue, where it emerges that all the Member States want the maintenance of this ceiling after enlargement.
Greek vessels flowed, without any storm in around, Mr Gayssot.
B5-0794 / 2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Mr Linkohr and Mr Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on Colombia removal of a Spanish Jesuit engaged in negotiations with the guerrilla;
Let us to organise ourselves Fifteen to welcome in good conditions to the countries knocking at our door.
We speak with a single voice Language‒describes within the WTO.
For this cooperation, for your support and also for your reception, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, Europe, the French Presidency would like to thank you.
This is our priority struggle for the affirmation of fundamental rights has found expression in political choices.
I would have also wished that the report of the Court of Auditors was a little more convivial and that it had presented some clear recommendations - for example, one or two recommendations per chapter.
In my view, however, there is nothing worse than having to warn people that a ruling in their favour could not have been a series of words réconfortants and do not have any consequences concrete on their existence.
I find a little strange to want as of now forcing the Commission with a motion for resolutions and to ask him in the same time to establish one Green Paper on the current state of the voluntary insurances and the complementary health insurances.
They will continue to put pressure. The money that they earn with the distribution beyond the limit of 150 grams allows them to strengthen their position.
I wonder whether the Commissioner already provides steps which will show that we regard Kostunica as the legally elected representative of the Serbian people and as the partner with which the European Union must now address.
A budget line financing demining and prevention programmes for years.
As requested by the European Parliament in its resolution of 16 March 2000, that these initiatives the presidency of the European Council is going to take to play a more active role in order to ensure the full implementation of the UN peace plan?
I have already replied on this point, and I entirely agree with what he has said on the need to improve considerably the public debate I will not go back to what I said, but it is true that, all too often, the citizens feel foreigners to decisions that are taken in the bodies that they do not know.
The economic activities of links between the people.
The other point of view, illustrated by the original words of the rapporteur and shared by many colleagues, is to promote the regulations and the codes of conduct needed to establish, between insurers, forms of mutual costs guaranteeing to all the provision of a good quality of care and to counter the risk of seeing develop discriminatory practices and a selection of risks and customers.
If employment is the political priority of the Union, the fishing industry, as the economic sector, cannot remain on the sidelines.
Thus, it is urgent that the inter-service group staff should be strengthened very quickly at the heart of the General Secretariat of the Commission, so that all proposals to act of general scope can be accompanied, during their examination by the college on the basis of Article 299(2), a detailed impact statement.
The common economic activities create peaceful links between people.
This House but also fought so that this reduction in funds allocated to the innovative actions is offset by the use of framework of flexibility, as defined in a statement on the financial perspective.
The safeguarding of the universal service to the aid of a compensation fund which would make it possible to engage in private profits for the benefit of the public service will probably long.
Above all, when a company unipersonnelle or a company with fewer than 250 employees is a project, it must be possible to receive financing not only with a guarantee to 120%, but also on the basis of a good idea.
I would also have liked the report of the Court of Auditors fusse somewhat more user-friendly and he seen tabled a few clear recommendations - for example, one or two recommendations by chapter.
Finally, in a word, the fourth pillar of the approach of the approach adopted by the gender mainstreaming and guidelines.
Lastly, in a word, the fourth pillar dedicated to the equal opportunity consolidates the integrated approach of the equality by the gender mainstreaming and specific guiding lines.
In Nigeria, the indigenous people all-ijaw accused Chevron to incite violence against them and to pay Nigerian soldiers to draw on the demonstrators in the warri naval base.
Furthermore, we would have a chance to demonstrate to Europe that we are able to develop only constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia, recognising the real democratic principles.
The task, which is essential, has not yet been a keen interest on the part of the public.
Slovakia is not condemned to remain in the second group and it is logical that it wants to join the Union at the same time as the Czech Republic.
All those who are currently working to obtain an undeclared employment in decent social conditions.
But I would like to say to the House this afternoon that we must not lose sight of the fact that the European Union spends only 1% of the GDP of the Member States and that the bulk of this money is administered in the Member States.
Spain has developed in a way the positive extremely difficult neighbourhood that has always existed between Europe and North Africa and between Spain and Morocco.
Mr President, I voted in favour of the report García-Margallo y Marfil, which concerns the taxation of services provided by electronic means.
Thus, it is urgent that the staff of the interservice group are very quickly strengthened at the heart of the secretariat of the committee, so that all the proposed act of general scope can be accompanied by the college in their discussion on the basis of Article 299, paragraph 2, a fiche d'impact detailed.
These objectives, the overarching objective and secondary objectives, represent the touchstone allowing us to judge the concrete proposals presented by the Commission.
In fact, it is by no means certain that the definition of fair prices which is being proposed is better than another, because the different definitions currently used in the Member States all are quite adequate.
. (ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and unified European continent.
- British Labour members of the Group of the Party of European Socialists welcome the welcomed contribution to the continuous work of the IGC on closer cooperation, without fully adhere to all the details of it.
That is why I believe that this reconciliation can take. However, the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the issue of universities and many other problems, needs visible signs of success and a strong support, otherwise the threatened peace throughout the region.
Without doubt, worth it better not to have an agreement that will have an agreement that is wrong and, in this case, the American proposal was a watered-down proposal, unacceptable for Europe.
We speak with one voice disgracieuse within the WTO.
We started to have exchanges on this question, from where it arises that all the Member States wish the maintenance of this ceiling after widening.
If we create a clear framework and binding on the Member States, the different systems to meet these requirements should have a longer period of put to the test.
Finally, I welcome the idea of giving us an annual meeting in order to make an assessment of the implementation of the programme.
In Nigeria, the indigenous All-Ijaw accused Chevron to encourage violence against them and to go as far as to pay Nigerian soldiers to draw on the demonstrators in the naval base of Warri.
The report aims to identify such improvements.
We welcome the measures proposed in this respect by the preparatory committee and decided by the General Assembly with regard to the system of accreditation of non-governmental organisations, with the preparatory process and the special session in September 2001.
It is an urgent matter and it is to this that we have to put this point to the order of the day.
Those which refuse the reinforced cooperation enjoy the same freedom of movement as the passengers of the back seat of a car.
Statements must be matched by action to identify, freeze, seize and confiscate the proceeds of crime.
The European Council will also discuss the progress of the negotiations of adhesion, and thus widening.
We must be aware today, since we are still in uncertainty, what are the scientific data, what are the measures to be taken.
The only case for which no tax is still perceived is that of a delivery in the European Community starting from a third country.
As the European Parliament asked it in its resolution of March 16, 2000, that they initiatives the presidency of the European Council does hope to take to play a more active part in order to guarantee the application full and whole peace plan of UNO?
Things are not clear on this point, and it is not impossible that can also remain in force more restrictive provisions. This is particularly on this point that we have tabled amendments.
If we define a clear framework and constraining for the Member States, the various systems having to satisfy these requirements should have more a long period of setting with the test.
As the Court of Human Rights, the Council of Europe has also solid experience as regards such forms of control. We can take as a basis.
Madam President, I would ask you, on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries and on my own behalf, to send a message of condolence from Parliament to the families of the victims and the local authorities of both Brittany and MarÃ­n, city of Galicia, which most of the victims.
In Feira, he has recognised the quality of potential candidates for accession to the countries participating in the stabilisation and association process.
Spain has developed in a remarkably positive the difficult neighbourhood which always existed between Europe and North Africa and between Spain and Morocco.
The recent incidents against the Greek minority in Himara make it more imperative the need to promote measures for democratisation, strengthening the institutions and respect for human rights in Albania.
Thus, it is urgent that the staff of the interservice group are very quickly strengthened at the heart of the secretariat of the committee, so that all the proposed act of general scope can be accompanied, during their examination by the College on the basis of Article 299 (2), a fiche d'impact detail.
We need to know today, since we are still in uncertainty, what are the scientific data, what are the measures to be taken.
The task, which is capital, has not yet been a lively interest on the part of the public.
(B5-0794/2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Linkohr and Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on the kidnapping in Colombia of a Spanish Jesuit engaged in negotiations with the guerillas;
I would urge Prague to seize this sign, this invitation, this request for dialogue, to follow them up, and to ensure that, together with this House, these relics of a nationalist era can be abandoned.
It is necessary to know today, since we are always in uncertainty, which are the scientific data, which are the measures to be taken.
Mr President, we have to know the Commission's position in relation to public access to documents on reading the internal Manuel which has been submitted, on 11 October, to the Commission officials in order to explain how they deal with the requests of Members regarding access to documents.
Mr President, the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and Internal Affairs has prepared carefully the Karamanou report.
I would like to thank the rapporteur of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Mr Brok, for his clear and comprehensive report.
If the employment is the policy of the Union, the Community, as a sector, cannot remain on the sidelines.
Things are not clear on this point, and it is not impossible that we can also remain in force more restrictive provisions, but particularly on this point that we have tabled amendments.
The lesson for us within this House in its debate this morning is that we are forced to conclude that the maritime laws are in the world, in a state of control, and that we must get down to the task to put its house in order.
We welcome the proposed provisions in this respect by the preparatory committee and decided by the General Assembly as regards the method of accreditation non-governmental organisations, the preparatory process and the extraordinary session of September 2001.
In Feira, he recognized the quality of potential candidates to adhesion with the countries taking part in the stabilisation process and of association.
It is a disgrace when we think that the European Union raises champion of the modernisation of economic life!
I would also have liked to see the report of the Court of Auditors was a little more user-friendly and that he had tabled a number of clear recommendations, for example, one or two recommendations by chapter.
In it, he has recognised the quality of potential candidates for membership in the countries participating in the stabilisation and association process.
By withdrawing our resolution, I am nevertheless convinced that our Parliament would have done better to its voice heard by spending, for the Council of Nice, a resolution specific and separate with so important and so difficult issues to the Intergovernmental Conference, rather than to deal with them in the context of a single resolution including also all the other items on the agenda of the Council.
The common economic activities create peaceful links between the people.
There is, of course, a very important point is the fact that we have started category four, with his approach, but we do not yet know very well if we managed to solve the problem, particularly because the Council does not wish to participate in the discussion.
It is gratifying that Parliament has managed to gather a large majority in favour of greater transparency.
For this cooperation, for your support and also for your welcome, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen of the European institutions, the French Presidency thank you.
If we create a clear and binding framework for the Member States, the various systems have to meet these requirements should have a longer period of put to the test.
The resolution on the Nice Summit, which has just been adopted, does not reflect it.
Things are getting worse when it is a matter of women from distant countries which have accepted this work by necessity and which have no alternative to continue to provide for their vital needs.
I know that in France, the principle of slaughter of the whole herd has been applied, and that this does not seem to be the best way to combat this phenomenon.
Unfortunately, the final objective of a European Constitution would be exactly the opposite and obviously we cannot endorse it.
Finally, I welcome the idea of giving us an annual meeting in order to take stock of the implementation of the programme.
Nevertheless, I would like to say to the House this afternoon that we must not lose sight of the fact that the European Union spends only 1% of the GDP of the Member States and that most of this money is managed in the Member States.
(Parliament accepts the oral amendment)
That is what we have done: we avoided a budgetary crisis back to Article 272, the financial perspective has been maintained, even if we use the flexibility instrument.
Spain has developed a remarkably positive the difficult neighbourhood which has always existed between Europe and North Africa and between Spain and Morocco.
Since the initial reflections on this issue, which took place at European level at the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission is committed towards the Member States to promote action to develop what we could consider it as a police European culture, focused on the highest standards in the field of ethics, respect for the rights and freedoms of the people, and effectiveness in the fight against crime.
We welcome the proposed provisions in this respect by the preparatory committee and decided by the general meeting with regard to the method of accreditation of non-governmental organisations, the preparatory process and to the special session in September 2001.
Vis-a-vis criticisms, particularly those of Ireland and France, the British Chancellor of the Exchequer gave a new interpretation of it: it would be now about a tax for all the users, including the British drivers of heavy lorries.
Mr President, the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and Internal Affairs has prepared very carefully the Karamanou report.
The recent incidents against the Greek minority in Himara make more imperative the need to promote measures to democratisation, the strengthening of institutions and the respect for human rights in Albania.
The resolution on the Nice Summit, which has just been adopted, does not reflect.
The joint economic activities create peaceful links between peoples.
The only case for which no tax is not yet seen is one of supply in the European Community from a third country.
However, I would like to say to the House this afternoon that we must not lose sight of the fact that the European Union is spending that 1% of GDP in the Member States and that most of this money is managed in the Member States.
The right for a government to dismiss its Constitution arbitrarily is the defining characteristic of a tyranny.
This could also apply to all drugs but dangerous insofar as the consumer of drugs is the only to run risks.
It is obviously necessary to clarify the reasons for the increase in the incidence of BSE, not only in France but also in other Member States.
We can indeed wish more and better, but I think quite honestly that it is a good start.
The statements must be followed by specific actions to identify, freeze, seize and confiscate the proceeds of crime.
I know that in France, the slaughter of whole herds principle was applied and that it does not seem to be the best way to combat this phenomenon.
(the sitting was suspended at, is resumed at 3 p.m.)
They will continue to put pressure on the money they earned with distribution beyond the bounds of 150 grams enables them to improve their position.
I also voted against a text which requires the integration of the Charter of Fundamental Rights in the future Treaty which will be adopted in Nice.
Mr President, my dear colleagues, I would like to intervene on the common resolution which of course we will.
It is on trial on 8 January. He is accused of having participated in a meeting of Tunisian opponents in France, which incidentally it excludes.
I thank the rapporteur for the Committee for the foreign affairs, Mr Brok, for his clear and complete report/ratio.
Mr President, we can hear the Commission's position on public access to documents from the internal manual, which was submitted on 11 October, the Commission's officials in order to explain to them how to deal with the requests of Members as regards access to documents.
From 1996, the European Parliament has declared itself in favour of a ban on the use of meat and bone meal in the European Union, in accordance with the precautionary principle - only if we had listened.
I find it a little strange to now force the Commission to a motion for a resolution and ask him at the same time to draw up a Green Paper on the current state of voluntary and insurance supplementary sickness insurance.
Do you believe that the Austrian model "’ – namely bilateral majority decision-making - will in future an instrument to take decisions by ignoring the European institutions and start a new institution, or a new group, to get round the unanimity rule in the Council?
It is accepted that the knowledge of languages is a reference to the mobility.
It is not the time to be hesitant.
Just as the Court of Human Rights, the Council of Europe also has a solid experience in terms of such forms of control. We can to base.
It is not clear on this point, and it is not impossible that can also remain in force for more restrictive provisions. This is particularly on this point that we have tabled amendments.
It is right that the Committee on Legal Affairs persists in refusing a ceiling and a minimum rate which cannot be below 7%.
As the Court of Human Rights, the Council of Europe also has a solid experience with regard to such forms of control we can take it as a basis.
Mr President, we cannot know the position of the Commission in the matter of public access to documents in reading the Commission has that has been postponed, on 11 October, the officials of the Commission in order to explain the way in which they had to deal with the requests in this regard access to documents.
If we define a clear framework and binding on the Member States, the different systems to meet these requirements should have a longer period of being tested.
A development which made capital borrowed heavily dependent.
That is why I also believe that this reconciliation can take, and the government, which has very courageously found a solution to the issue of universities and many other problems, needs visible signs of success and a strong support, otherwise the peace threatened in the region as a whole.
This is what we have done: we have a budget crisis in coming to Article 272; the financial perspectives have been maintained, even if we have used the flexibility instrument.
Faced with these realities, the need for greater involvement and of greater efficiency in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment is essential.
I know that in France, the principle of slaughter of the entire herd has been implemented and that this does not seem to be the best way to combat this phenomenon.
Finally I welcome the idea of giving us an annual meeting in order to make an assessment of the implementation of the programme.
Unfortunately the final objective of a European Constitution would be exactly opposite and obviously we cannot approve it.
The creation of a provisional judicial cooperation is a step in the right direction, which the European Parliament for a long time.
The things worsen when it is question of women of distant countries who accepted this work by need and who do not have any other possibility to continue to provide for their vital needs.
If we define a clear and binding for the Member States, the different systems to meet these requirements should have a longer period of put to the test.
The statements must be matched by action to identify, freeze, seize and confiscate the proceeds of crime.
The task, which is nevertheless capital, has not yet aroused great interest on the part of the public.
Either we are part of the club, or we are not and we must therefore abide by this decision.
Let us hold to fifteen in order to be able to welcome in the right conditions which countries knocking at our door.
A development which has made the heavily dependent on capital borrowed.
I appeal urgently to the French Presidency to do everything in its power to fill that gap particularly destructive.
We have heard that the previous presidency was first restructured then dismantled the Ministry of equal opportunities.
Faced with these, the necessity of a greater involvement and greater effectiveness in the fight against poverty and is essential.
In Nigeria, the indigenous people all ijaw Chevron have accused of encouraging the violence against them and to go up to pay Nigerian soldiers to draw on the demonstrators at the naval base of Warri.
I appeal urgently to the French Presidency to do everything in its power to fulfil this particularly destructive gap.
The recent incidents against the Greek minority in Himara make more imperative that measures to promote democratisation, strengthening the institutions and respect for human rights in Albania.
The labelling of beef which has been decided, which is a minimum labelling and which has only been in force for two and a half months, does not make it possible to properly remind the origin of the animals and we banned very late specified risk material.
Things worse when it comes to women's distant countries which accepted this work by need and which have no other option to continue to provide for their vital needs.
Furthermore, we would like to have a chance to prove to the Europe that we are able to develop only the constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro in Yugoslavia, recognising the genuine democratic principles.
They will continue to put pressure. The money they earn with the distribution beyond the limit of 150 grammes enables them to strengthen their position.
I wonder whether the police chief envisages already stages which will make it possible to show that we regard Kostunica as the legally elected representative of Serbian people and as the partner with whom the European Union will have henceforth to treat.
It is urgent and it is for that reason that we have decided to put this item on the agenda.
The resolution on the Nice Summit, which has just been voted, does not reflect it.
Madam President, I would ask you, on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries and on my own behalf, to send a message of condolence from Parliament to the families of the victims and the local authorities of both Brittany Marín, that the city of Galicia, which are from most of the victims.
In my view, there is, however, nothing worse than having to warn people that a ruling for them could only be a series of words pleasing and have no practical effect on their existence.
The other point of view, illustrated by the original subject of the rapporteur and shared by many colleagues, is to promote the regulations and codes of conduct to be found, between insurers, the forms of mutual cost guarantee to all the supply of good quality care and to counter the risks to see developing discriminatory practices and a selection of risks and customers.
Criticism, especially those of Ireland and France, the Chancellor of the Exchequer has given a new interpretation: it is now a tax for all users, including the British lorry drivers.
We can indeed wish more and better, but I quite honestly believe that it is a good start.
B5 0794 / 2000, by Mr Medina Ortega, Mr Linkohr and Mr Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on the kidnapping of Colombia a Spanish Jesuit engaged in negotiations with the guerrilla;
The annual report is to identify such potential improvements.
You do not want to even integrate it in the Treaty, which proves that this text was to be put on side.
This is our priority for the affirmation of fundamental rights to be implemented in political choices.
Let us, here in order to be able to welcome in good conditions the countries that are knocking at our door.
Either we are part of the club, we are not and we must, therefore, we have to comply with this.
I wonder whether the Commissioner already provides for steps to show that we regard Kostunica as the legally elected representative of the Serbian people and as a partner with which the European Union must now address.
We have started to have exchanges on this issue, it emerges that all the Member States wish to the maintenance of this ceiling after enlargement.
They continue to put the pressure that they earn. money with the distribution of the limit of 150 grammes allows them to strengthen their position.
Since the first thoughts on this issue, which were held at European level on the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission is committed to Member States to promote an action intended to develop what we could consider a European police culture, focused on the highest standards in terms of ethics, human rights and freedoms, and efficiency in the fight against crime.
Since the first reflexions on this file, which took place at the European level on the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission committed itself with respect to the Member States promoting an action intended to develop what we could regard as a European police culture, centered on the highest standards as regards deontology, of respect for the rights and freedoms of the citizens, and of effectiveness in the fight against crime.
All those who are currently working on the black would get jobs under decent social conditions.
Mr President, I voted in favour of the Garcia-Margallo y Marfil report, which concerns the taxation of services provided electronically.
Mr President, we know the position of the Commission on public access to documents in the internal manual, which was submitted on 11 October, the Commission's officials in order to explain how to handle applications by Members as regards access to documents.
This rule can apply besides to all récréationnelles but dangerous drugs in so far as the consumer of drug is the only one to run risks.
I find exemplary that France will be to take this step.
Secondly, it is necessary to say “not” to the concept big-bang which would like that one admits at the same time an major group of country, because that would be in conflict with the principle of the admission of each country according to its merits.
Lastly, and it is there a subject more discussed, the commission invited with strength to make use of the procedure accelerated to put in uvre this legislation.
The safeguarding of the universal service with compensation fund which would make it possible to initiate private profits for the benefit of the public service will probably failure.
This Parliament has, however, also for this Fund actions by the use of framework, defined in a statement on the financial perspective.
Above all, when a company unipersonnelle or a society with fewer than 250 employees has a project, it must be possible to benefit from funding not only with a guaranteed to 120%, but also on the basis of a simple idea:
(The Parliament accepts the oral amendment)
In addition, we would like to be likely to prove in Europe which we are able to develop only the constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia, by recognizing the true democratic principles.
And I would say to you very clearly: it must be given a chance to Kostunica, and I therefore hope that it will provide an amnesty over the coming weeks or months; but in the meantime, I hope, however, that, in political terms and in budgetary terms, the political conditions are linked to the introduction of these two new budget lines, namely democratisation and reconstruction.
A budget line has programmes to de-mining and prevention for years.
We congratulate the provisions proposed in this respect by the Committee and by the general Assembly of the United Nations with regard to the method of non-governmental organisations, and the extraordinary session of September 2001.
I find exemplary that France has resolved to take that step.
By withdrawing our resolution, I am nonetheless convinced that our Parliament would have done better in devoting its voice to the Nice European Council, a specific resolution and separate issues so important and so difficult to the Intergovernmental Conference, rather than to deal with them in the context of a single resolution including also all the other items on the agenda of the Council.
In 1996, the European Parliament was in favour of a ban on the use of meat meal in the European Union, in accordance with the precautionary principle - if only we had listened to.
We shall talk with one voice disgracieuse within the WTO.
The labelling of beef which has been decided, which is a minimum labelling and which has only been in force for two and a half months ago, does not make it possible to trace the origin of animals properly very late and have banned the specified risk material.
Without doubt, just better to have no agreement than having an agreement that is wrong and, in this case, the US proposal was a watered-down proposal, which is totally unacceptable for Europe.
It is allowed that the knowledge of foreign languages is a necessary precondition with mobility.
In my view, there is, however, nothing worse than to have to warn the people a ruling in their favour could be a series of reassuring words and have no concrete result on their existence.
Either we belong to the club, or we are not and we must therefore be packed with this decision.
The preservation of the universal service with a compensation fund which would make it possible to initiate private benefits for the benefit of the public service will probably long fire.
. The British Labour Members of the PSE Group welcomes the support given to the contribution to the work of the IGC on closer cooperation, without adhere entirely with all the details of this.
Mr President, I shall concentrate in my speech on the report by Mrs Lalumière report, that I find well thought-out and clearly formulated.
We should be pleased that Parliament has succeeded in bringing together a large majority in favour of greater transparency.
A development which made them dependent on the borrowed capital.
A budget line has programmes for mine clearance and prevention for years.
Things are not clear on this point, and it is not impossible that can also remain in force more restrictive measures, and that is particularly on this point that we have tabled amendments.
This is the position defended by the rapporteur and by the popular Party.
My Party to serious and about the rules of the sale of consumer products by means of the Community, just as it sets about the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
A development which made highly dependent on capital borrowed.
It is necessary to be delighted that the Parliament succeeded in gathering a broad majority in favour of a greater transparency.
In view of the criticism, especially those in Ireland and France, the Chancellor of the Exchequer has given a new interpretation: it is now a tax for all users, including the British lorry drivers.
The lesson that must keep this Assembly in its debate of this morning is that we are forced to conclude that the maritime laws are, all over the world, in a State of mess, and that we should get down to the task to put in order.
All those who are currently working on the black market to obtain an employment in decent social conditions.
In addition, we would like to have a chance to prove to the Europe that we are in a position to alone the cause of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia, while recognizing the principles.
Mr President, I voted in favour of the Garcia-Margallo y Marfil report, which deals with the taxation of services provided electronically.
Thirdly, the acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the different countries and for the EU as a whole - depends on the example of Denmark is for us to show - largely of the elimination of social and democratic deficits in European policy.
Mr. President, we can know the position of the Commission as regards access to public documents by reading the internal handbook which was given, on October 11, with the Commission officials in order to explain the way to them in which they were to treat the requests emanating of the deputies with regard to the access to the documents.
It is right that the Committee on Legal Affairs persists in refusing a ceiling and the maintenance of a minimum rate which cannot be less than 7%.
The maintenance of the universal service means of a compensation fund which could initiate private profits for the benefit of the public service will probably deal fire.
Thirdly: the acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the various countries and for the EU as a whole depend - the example of Denmark is here to show this - largely to the elimination of social and democratic deficits in European policy.
Mr. President, the Committee on Citizens and of the rights of citizens, justice and the businesses interiors prepared with much care the Karamanou report/ratio.
The recent incidents against the Greek imperative more the need to promote measures, of strengthening the institutions and the respect of human rights in Albania.
In my eyes, there is however nothing worse than to have to inform people that a judgment delivered in their favour could be only one series of comforting words and not to have any practical consequence on their existence.
In withdrawing our resolution, I am, however, convinced that our Parliament would have made its voice heard in dedicating, in view of the Nice Council, a resolution and traditional so important and so difficult to the Intergovernmental Conference, rather than to deal in the framework of a single resolution including also all the other points of the agenda of the Council.
I have already replied on this point, and I entirely agree with what he has said about the need to improve considerably the public debate. I will not repeat what I said, but it is true that, all too often, citizens feel alienated to decisions that are taken in the bodies that they do not know.
These weeks, three important have been achieved.
For this co-operation, for your support and also for your reception, Madam the President, Mesdames and the European Deputies, the French presidency thanks you.
Mr President, I shall concentrate in my speech on the report by Mrs Lalumière, report that I find well and clearly.
Greek ships ran, without there being the least storm in trimmings, Mr Gayssot.
The recent incidents against the Greek minority of Himara more imperative the need to promote measures of democratisation, strengthening of the institutions and respect for human rights in Albania.
Since the first thoughts on this issue, which took place at European level on the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission is committed to the Member States to promote action to develop what we might regard as a European police culture, based on the highest standards in the field of ethics, respect for the rights and freedoms of the citizens, and effectiveness in the fight against crime.
Let us organise ourselves in fifteen in order to be able to welcome in the countries that are knocking at our door.
That is the position advocated by the rapporteur and supported by the European People's Party.
It should be delighted that the Parliament together a broad majority in favour of greater transparency.
It is accepted that knowledge of foreign languages is a necessary precondition to mobility.
I find it a little strange to want as of now forcing the Commission to a motion for a resolution and to ask him at the same time to draw up a Green Paper on the current state of voluntary insurance and supplementary sickness insurance.
However, I would like to say to the House this afternoon that we should not lose sight of the fact that the European Union spends only 1% of GDP of the Member States and that most of this money is managed in the Member States.
Furthermore, we would like to be able to demonstrate in Europe which we are able to develop only the constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro within Yugoslavia, recognising the true democratic principles.
Indeed, it is absolutely not certain only the definition of fair price which is proposed is better than another, because the various definitions used currently in the Member States are enough all amply.
The right to a government to remove arbitrarily its Constitution is the defining characteristic of a tyranny.
I have also voted against a text that calls for the incorporation of the Charter of Fundamental Rights in the future Treaty to be adopted in Nice.
Things are not clear on this point, and it is not impossible that can also remain in force more restrictive measures, which is particularly on this point that we have tabled amendments.
Do you think that the “Austrian” model - namely decision making majority bilateral - will in the future constitute an instrument making it possible to make decisions by being unaware of the European institutions and to found a new institution, or a new group, to be able to circumvent the rule of unanimity within the Council?
The safeguard of the universal service using compensation funds which would make it possible to engage of the private profits to the profit of the public service will probably make failure.
Thirdly: the approval of the enlargement and its positive prospects for the different countries and for the EU as a whole and - the example of Denmark is for us to the point - matters of the social and economic policy.
It is a shame when they believe that the European Union presents itself as the champion of the modernisation of the life!
My Party expresses serious reservations about the regulation of the sale of consumer goods by means of Community legislation, as it makes reservations about the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
Madam President, I ask you, on behalf of my colleagues of the Commission and on my own behalf, to send a message from Parliament to the families of the victims and the local authorities of both of city of Galicia, where they are in the majority of victims.
I urge that to seize this motion, this invitation, this request of dialogue, to give further and to make sure that, together with this Assembly, these relics of a nationalist might be.
Ships Greeks have sunk, without that there are the slightest storm in the exist, Mr Gayssot.
The common economic activities create peaceful bonds between the people.
Secondly, it is necessary to say "no" to the concept to accept at the same time an important Group of countries, because this would be in contradiction with the principle of the admission of each country according to its merits.
Let us can organize itself to Fifteen in order to be able to accomodate under right conditions the countries which strike with our door.
The annual report aims to identify potential such improvements.
This is our struggle for priority that the affirmation of fundamental rights to be implemented in political choices.
I have also voted against a text which calls for the incorporation of the Charter of Fundamental Rights into the future Treaty which will be adopted in Nice.
Secondly, we must say 'no' to the concept which bang would admit that at the same time an important group of countries, because that would be at odds with the principle of the admission of each country on its merits.
. The British Labour Members of the Group of the Party of European Socialists welcomes the support given to the contribution they have made to the work of the IGC on closer cooperation, without adhering fully to all the details of it.
On the contrary, the influence of the national democracies fall into force by the further restriction of the right of veto and to increasing the power of Parliament to the EU.
The resolution about the Summit of Nice, which has just been voted, does not reflect it.
This is not the time to show.
Initially, that of a simplification and a clarification of the Treaties.
We need to know today, since we are still in uncertainty, what are the scientific data, what measures are to be taken.
On the contrary, the power of the national democracies is being reduced by the further restriction of the right of veto and by the fact that the European Parliament is being given more power.
(it) the British labour Members of the Group of the Party of European Socialists is very welcome to the contribution that they have continuous work of the IGC on the cooperation, without all the details of this.
Spain developed in a remarkably positive way the difficult vicinity which always existed between Europe and North Africa and between Spain and Morocco.
Secondly, we must say 'no' to the concept bang who would like to see the same time admit a large group of countries, because that would be in contradiction with the principle of the admission of each country according to its merits.
There is, of course, a very important point, it is the fact that we started the heading four, with its approach, but we do not know yet very well if we managed to solve the problem, in particular because the Council does not wish to take part sufficiently in the reflexion.
In Nigeria, encouraging the violence in their employment and go up to pay soldiers to draw on the demonstrators at the basis of warri.
The European Council will discuss also of the state of progress of accession negotiations, and therefore, of enlargement.
I thank the rapporteur for the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Mr Brok, for his clear and comprehensive report.
I stress this point because the market cannot regulate everything and that, in this context, it is not or cannot be competitive without borders.
We can, in fact, want more and better, but I believe that it is a good start.
It is rightly that the Committee on Legal Affairs and Citizens' Rights persists in the rejection of a ceiling and in the maintenance of a minimum rate which cannot be below 7%.
We have started to have discussions on this issue, which show that all the Member States want to keep the ceiling after enlargement.
We have started to have trade on this issue, where it appears that all Member States wish to maintain this ceiling after enlargement.
I wonder whether the Commissioner already provides steps which will make it possible to show that we regard Kostunica as the legally elected representative of the Serbian people and as a partner with whom the European Union will now have to deal with.
The other point of view, illustrated by the rapporteur's original and shared by many colleagues, is to promote the rules and codes of conduct needed to build, between insurers, forms of degree of costs guaranteeing all the supply of good quality care and to counter the risks of discriminatory practices and a risk selection and customers.
Unfortunately the final objective of a European Constitution would be exactly the opposite course and we cannot approve it.
Thirdly, the acceptance of enlargement and its positive prospects for the various countries and for the whole of the EU depend - the example of Denmark is here to show this - largely to the elimination of social and democratic deficits of European policy.
Slovakia is not doomed to remain in the second group, and it is logical that it wants to join the Union at the same time as the Czech Republic.
I would like to thank the rapporteur of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Human Rights, Common Security and Defence Policy, Mr Brok, for his clear and comprehensive report.
Finally, and this is a most controversial issue, the Commission has called vigorously to use the fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
Mr. President, I have voting in favour of the report García-Margallo there Marfil, which relates to the tax on the abundant services with electronic way.
Either we part of the club, or we are not, and we must therefore we bow to this decision.
On the situation in Burma.
The other point of view, illustrated by the example of the original rapporteur and shared by many colleagues, is to promote the regulations and codes of conduct needed to create, between insurers, the forms of mutual costs guaranteeing to all the provision of high-quality care and to counter the risk of seeing develop discriminatory practices and a risk selection and customers.
The task, which is important, however, did not arouse great interest on the part of the public yet.
The lesson must retain this House in its debate this morning is that we are forced to conclude that the maritime laws are in the world, in a state of mess, and that we must get down to the task of up.
It is a shame when it is thought that the European Union is posed as a champion modernization of the economic life!
And I say this very clearly: it is necessary to give its chance to Kostunica and I hope that it will take time to a clear in the course of the coming weeks or months; but in the meantime, I hope, however, that, in terms of policy and in terms of the budget, the political conditions are the introduction of these two new budget lines, namely the and reconstruction.
Furthermore, we would have a chance to demonstrate to Europe that we are in a position to develop the constitutional equality of Serbia and Montenegro, in Yugoslavia, recognising the real democratic principles.
If we want to help Indonesia, we must intervene with money and concrete actions, and not only with words.
I am a bit of him now to compel the Commission to a motion for a resolution and ask him in a time to establish a Green Paper on the current State of voluntary insurance and health insurance.
There is, of course, a very important point, is the fact that we have initiated within category four, with his approach, but we do not yet know very well if we managed to solve the problem, not least because the Council does not wish to participate enough food for thought.
A development which has made heavily dependent on capital loans.
Slovakia is not condemned to remain in the second group and it is logical that she wants to adhere to the Union at the same time as the Czech Republic.
question nº 6 of (H-0886/00):
In my view, there is nothing worse than having to warn people that a judgment in their favour could only be a series of reassuring words and have no practical effect on their existence.
Firstly, that of a simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
If employment is the political priority of the Union, fishing, as an economic sector, cannot remain on the sidelines.
We have heard that the previous presidency has first restructured and then dismantled the Ministry of equal opportunities.
It is necessary to know today, since we are still in the uncertainty, which are the scientific, what are the measures to take.
I insist on this point because the market cannot regulate everything and that, in this perspective, there is neither can be no competition without limits.
They will continue to put the pressure. The money that they gain with the distribution beyond the limit of the 150 grams makes it possible them to reinforce their position.
I also voted against a text which calls for the integration of the Charter of Fundamental Rights in the future Treaty which will be adopted at Nice.
If we define a clear and binding framework for the Member States, the various systems to meet these demands should have a longer period of put to the test.
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to speak on the joint resolution that we shall, of course, be voting.
Question 6 (H-0886 / 00):
That is our fight priority for the affirmation of fundamental rights is implemented in political choices.
As the Court of Human Rights, the Council of Europe has also a solid experience regarding such forms of control; we can take to basis.
As the European Parliament called for in its resolution of 16 March 2000, they initiatives the European Council Presidency intend to take to play a more active role in order to ensure the full implementation of the UN peace plan?
There is, of course, a very important point is the fact that we have begun category four, with his approach, but we do not yet know very well if we managed to solve the problem, not least because the Council does not wish to participate in the discussion.
If we want to help Indonesia, we must act now with money and concrete action, and not only with words.
Firstly, the simplification and clarification of the Treaties.
This rule can apply to all drugs récréationnelles provided that the consumer but dangerous drugs is the only to run risks.
Unfortunately the ultimate goal of a European Constitution would be exactly the opposite and, of course, we cannot approve it.
Everyone who works are currently obtiendraient undeclared work in decent social conditions.
Do you think the Austrian model '' - namely the bilateral majority decision-making - will in future an instrument to take decisions by ignoring the European institutions and to set up a new institution, or a new group, in order to get round the unanimity rule in the Council?
The labelling of beef which has been decided, which is a minimum labelling and which has only been in force for two and a half months ago, does not properly to trace the origin of animals and we have banned rather belatedly specified risk material.
Do you believe that the 'Austrian model' - namely the taking of bilateral majority decisions - in the future will be an instrument for taking decisions ignoring the European institutions and to build a new institution, or a new group, to be able to circumvent the rule of unanimity in the Council?
Either we belong to the club, or let us not be we and we thus should be folded with this decision.
I stress this because the market cannot solve all and that, accordingly, there is not and cannot have competition without limits.
As the European Parliament has called for in its resolution of 16 March 2000, that they initiatives will the presidency of the European Council intend to take to play a more active role in order to ensure the full implementation of the UN peace plan?
Nevertheless, I would like to say to the idea that we must not lose sight of the fact that the European Union does not believe that 1% of the GDP of the Member States and that the bulk of this money is managed in the Member States.
In recent weeks, three major progress has been made.
It is a disgrace when it is believed that the European Union has set itself up as a champion modernisation of economic life.
Mr President, in my speech I shall focus on the report by Mrs Lalumière report, which I think is well thought-out and clearly formulated.
Above all, when a company or unipersonnelle a society relying less than 250 employees has a project, it must be possible to receive funding not only with a guarantee to 120%, but also on the simple basis of a good idea.
It must be the true brain coordination of the network of national agencies, which in turn will activate and coordinate a network of centres of excellence food safety at regional level.
I would also that the report of the Court of Auditors was that it had some clear recommendations - for example, one or two recommendations by chapter.
The resolution on the Nice Summit, which has just been voted, do not reflect.
Since the first thoughts on this issue, which took place at European level on the initiative of the European Parliament, the Commission committed itself in relation to the Member States to promote an action intended to develop what we could describe as a European Commissioner culture, based on the highest standards of ethics, respect for human rights and freedoms, and effectiveness in the fight against crime.
Madam President, I ask you, on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries and on my own behalf, to send a message of condolence from Parliament to the families of the victims and the local authorities of both Brittany that Marín, city of Galicia, where are from most of the victims.
I stress this because the market cannot solve all and that, in this sense, there is no cannot be competitive without limits.
Faced with these realities, the need for greater involvement and greater efficiency in the fight against poverty and underdevelopment is essential.
Mr President, the Committee on citizens' freedoms and rights, justice and internal Affairs has prepared with great care the Karamanou report.
In 1996, the European Parliament has voted in favour of a ban on the use of meat and bone meal in the European Union, in accordance with the precautionary principle - if only we had listened to.
Mr President, the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and we are to retain any prepared very carefully the Karamanou report.
The UK Labour Members of the PSE Group welcome the favourable reception reserved for the contribution they have made to the ongoing work of the IGC on reinforced cooperation, without endorsing totally at all the details of this.
A budget line, programmes and of many years.
Finally, and this is a controversial issue, the Commission has called with force to use the fast-track procedure to implement this legislation.
I find it a little strange to try to now force the Commission to a motion for a resolution and ask him in a same time to establish a Green Paper on the current state of voluntary insurance and health insurance complementary.
(B5-0794 / 2000 by Mr Medina Ortega, Mr Linkohr and Mr Fava, on behalf of the Group of the Party of European Socialists, on the kidnapping of a Spanish sophistry in Colombia engaged in negotiations with the guerillas;
Since 1996, the European Parliament decided in favour of a ban on the use of meat meal in the European Union, in accordance with the precautionary principle - if only we had been listened to.
Finally I welcome the idea of us to give an annual assessment of the implementation of the programme.
I wonder whether the Commissioner already provides for steps to show that we consider Kostunica as the legally elected representative of the Serbian people and as a partner with which the European Union will now have to deal with.
By withdrawing our resolution, I nevertheless expresses the conviction that our Parliament would have done better its voice heard in devoting, in view of the Nice European Council, a specific and separate resolution to the issues so important and so difficult for the Intergovernmental Conference, rather than dealt with in the context of a single resolution including also all the other items on the agenda for the Council.
This is a development of the kind that I wish the other States of the European Union.
The only case for which no tax is still seen is that of a provision in the European Community from a third country.
I think it is exemplary that France is resolved to take this step.
Madam President, I ask you, on behalf of my colleagues in the Committee on Fisheries and on my own behalf, to send a message of condolence from Parliament to the families of the victims and to the local authorities of both Brittany and of Marín, city of Galicia, which is from the majority of the victims.
These objectives, the primary objective and the secondary objectives, will represent the stone of hitting enabling us to judge the concrete proposals presented by the Commission.
On the contrary, the power of the national democracies is increasingly to restrict the right of veto and of giving Parliament more power for the EU.
My party issues serious reservations in connection with the regulation of the sales of products of consumption by the means of the community legislation, just like it issues reserves in connection with the concept of mutual recognition of the standards.
I find that France exemplary committed itself to take this step.
It is, of course, a very important point, it is the fact that we have the section four, with its approach, but we do not yet know very well if we managed to solve the problem, in particular because the Council does not wish to participate enough.
And let me make it very clear: it is necessary to give its chance Kostunica, and I therefore hope that it will ensure an amnesty in the weeks and months ahead; but in the meantime, I wish, however, that, politically, and the budgetary level, the political conditions be coupled with the introduction of these two new budgetary lines, namely democratisation and reconstruction.
It is rightly that the Legal Committee persists in the refusal of a ceiling and the maintenance of a minimum rate which cannot be lower than 7%.
Mr. President, I will concentrate in my intervention on the report/ratio of Mrs. Lalumière, report/ratio which I find formulated well conceived and clearly.
I find exemplary that France determined itself to cross this step.
For this cooperation, for your support and also for your warm welcome, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen of the European Parliament, the French Presidency thank you.
The situation is worsening, when it comes to women distant countries who have accepted this work by necessity and which have no alternative to continue to meet their basic needs.
In the debate is closed.
It is right that the Committee on Legal Affairs continues in the refusal of a ceiling and the maintenance of a minimum rate which cannot be less than 7%.
(The sitting was suspended at 14h06 p.m. and resumed at 3 p.m.)
The recent incidents against the Greek minority of Himara make more imperative the need to promote democratisation measures, of institution building and respect for the rights of the man in Albania.
The UK Labour Members of the PSE Group welcome the favourable response given to the contribution they have made to the continuing work of the IGC on closer cooperation, without adhering fully to all the details of this.
Mr President, I voted in favour of the García-Margallo y Marfil report, which concerns the taxation of services provided by electronic means.
The statements must be followed up by practical actions to identify, freeze, seize and confiscate the proceeds of crime.
Do you think that the ‘ Austrian 'model – namely decision-making majority bilateral - will in future be an instrument for making it possible to take decisions by ignoring the European institutions and to establish a new institution, or a new group, to be able to get round the unanimity rule in the Council?
When we are faced with a potential risk, it is important to put the precautionary principle into practice.
It is our priority for the assertion of fundamental rights is in political choices.
We heard that the previous presidency initially restructured then dismantled the ministry for the equal opportunity.
This rule can also apply to all drugs rÃ©crÃ©ationnelles but dangerous, provided that the consumer of drugs is the only one to run risks.
It is our priority combat so that the assertion of fundamental rights is concretized in political choices.
Mr President, I voted in favour of the García-Margallo y Marfil report, which concerns the taxation of services provided by way.
I thank the rapporteur of the Committee on Foreign Affairs, Mr Brok, for his clear and comprehensive report.
Finally, I welcome the idea of giving an annual meeting in order to make an assessment of the implementation of the programme.
Especially, when a unipersonal company or a company less cash than 250 paid has a project, it must be possible to be given a financing not only with one guarantee with 120%, but also on the simple basis of an good idea.
If employment is the priority Union policy, fishing, as an economic sector, cannot remain in margin.
You do not want in the Treaty, which shows that this text must be put aside.
In fact, it is not absolutely certain that the definition of price that is proposed is better than another, because the different currently in the Member States all fully.
I have already said on this point and I fully endorse what he said on the need to improve the public debate considerably I will not repeat what I said, but it is true that, all too often the citizens feel alienated by decisions taken in authorities that they do not know.
Thank you very much, Mr Commissioner.
There is urgency and that is why we have decided to put this issue on the agenda.
The lesson for us within this House in its debate this morning is that we are forced to conclude that the laws at sea are, in the world, in a state of chaos, and that we must get down to work to bring order.
Either we are part of the club, or we are not and we must therefore we abide by this decision.
The right to a government to remove arbitrarily its constitution is defining characteristic of a tyranny.
Indeed, it is not at all convinced that the definition of fair price which is proposed is better than another, because the different definitions used in the Member States are sufficient all amply.
The labelling of beef which has been decided, which is a minimum labelling and which entered into force for two and a half months, does not allow for properly tracing the origin of animals, and we have belatedly banned specified risk material.
It happening in trial on 8 January. he is accused of taking part in a meeting of Tunisian opponents in France, what to do deny it.
When we are confronted with a potential risk, it is important to put the precautionary principle into practice.
Question No 6 by (H-0886/00):
In 1996, the European Parliament is in favour of a ban on the use in the European Union, in accordance with the precautionary principle - if only they had.
An evolution which made them strongly dependent on the borrowed capital.
Mr President, the Committee on Citizens' Freedoms and Rights, Justice and internal affairs has prepared with great care the Karamanou report.
The debate is closed.
I also voted against a text which calls for the incorporation of the Charter of Fundamental Rights in the future Treaty, which will be adopted in Nice.
You do not even want to incorporate it into the Treaty, which shows that this text was to be put to one side.
As the European Parliament called for in its resolution of 16 March 2000, that these initiatives is the Presidency of the European Council intend to take to play a more active role in order to ensure the full implementation of the UN Peace Plan?
All those which currently work with the black would obtain an employment under decent social conditions.
We need to know today, since we are always in uncertainty, what are the scientific data, what measures are to be taken.
- (ES) Mr President, enlargement is essential for the construction of a strong and united Europe.
There is urgency and therefore we decided to put this point at the order of business.
The resolution on the Nice Summit, which has just been passed, does not reflect the.
This Parliament has, however, also fought for this reduction in the funds allocated to the innovative actions should be compensated for by the use of flexible framework, set out in a statement on the financial perspective.
Approval of the Minutes of the previous sitting.
Faced with criticisms, particularly those of Ireland and France, the British Chancellor of the Exchequer has given a new interpretation: it is now a matter of resources for all users, including the drivers of heavy goods vehicles.
It crosses the 8 January of this year. it is to have a Union of Tunisian opponents in France, which Moreover it.
If we create a clear framework and binding on the Member States, the various systems to meet these requirements should have a longer period test.
And I say to you very clearly: we need to give its opportunity to Koitunica, and I therefore hope that he will ensure an amnesty over the coming weeks or months; but meanwhile, I hope, however, that, in political terms and in budgetary terms, political conditions are linked to the introduction of these two new budget lines, namely democratisation and reconstruction.
The annual report is designed to identify such potential improvements.
It is urgent and that is why we have decided to put this item on the agenda.
We can actually want more and better, but I think quite honestly that it is a good start.
(Parliament accepted the oral amendment)
My party serious reservations about the regulation of the sale of consumption by means of Community legislation, as it has reservations about the concept of mutual recognition of standards.
He drove a rose colored car.
any large deep body of water.
an actor who plays a principal role.
reach or come to rest.
the act of choosing or selecting.
a numeral or string of numerals that is used for identification.
the event of something being raised upward.
the act of climbing something.
shine intensely, as if with heat.
cause something to pass or lead somewhere.
a V-shaped mark at one end of an arrow pointer.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
coerce by violence or with threats.
cease to operate or cause to cease operating.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
have flavor; taste of something.
behave in a certain manner.
a visual representation of something.
a specialized division of a large organization.
a person who is appointed to a job or position.
contribute to the progress or growth of.
a narrow channel of the sea joining two larger bodies of water.
the act of cracking something.
the act of cracking something.
the act of changing one thing for another thing.
the act of breaking something.
the state of being connected.
change the nature, purpose, or function of something.
sell something to or obtain something from by energetic and especially underhanded activity.
a surface forming part of the outside of an object.
a state of being relaxed and feeling no pain.
extend or spread outward from a center or focus or inward towards a center.
place or put on the ground.
a visual representation of something.
get sexual gratification through self-stimulation.
the act of projecting out from something.
express audibly; utter sounds (not necessarily words).
the state of being excluded.
the act of having and controlling property.
relieve (someone) from work by taking a turn.
a brief experience of something.
appear in a certain way.
turning or twisting around (in place).
increase in extent or intensity.
the verbal act of offering.
make sense of; assign a meaning to.
the act of hiring something or someone.
(computer science) matter that is held in a computer and is typed or printed on paper.
limit in quality or quantity.
search (as the bottom of a body of water) for something valuable or lost.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
the act of pursuing in an effort to overtake or capture.
expel or eject (saliva or phlegm or sputum) from the mouth.
the act or means of getting rid of something.
the act of describing something.
an opinion formed by judging something.
return to a former condition.
take liberties or act with too much confidence.
the act of testing something.
make a film or photograph of something.
the act of rejecting something.
the act of testing something.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
the physical position of something.
the popular taste at a given time.
an intuitive understanding of something.
cause to become alive again.
let or cause to fall in drops.
the act of testing something.
hold back; keep from being perceived by others.
a power of attorney document given by shareholders of a corporation authorizing a specific vote on their behalf at a corporate meeting.
the act of retaining something.
the act of chipping something.
perceive by inhaling through the nose.
the intended meaning of a communication.
cause to adopt a new or different faith.
cause to become violent or angry.
the act of losing someone or something.
a short account of the news.
engrave by means of dots and flicks.
the act of raising something.
decide how much is to be paid on an insurance claim.
make a noise typical of an engine lacking lubricants.
be in direct physical contact with; make contact.
the quality of being of practical use.
arrange a program of or for.
give an interpretation or rendition of.
the act of dwelling in a place.
a store or supply of something (especially of food or clothing or arms).
suggest the necessity of an intervention; in medicine.
a person who is in charge.
the act of dragging (pulling with force).
the act of expelling or projecting or ejecting.
the act of concealing the identity of something by modifying its appearance.
the act of forcing out someone or something.
the act of winding or twisting.
oppose, as in hostility or a competition.
move as if through a sieve.
administer or bestow, as in small portions.
to wind or move in a spiral course.
induce into action by using one's charm.
a series of connected underground tunnels occupied by rabbits.
hold in a tight grasp.
the shape of a wave illustrated graphically by plotting the values of the period quantity against time.
the lower part of anything.
the act of liberating someone or something.
the action of putting something into operation.
cause (someone) to undergo something.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
make a dry crackling sound.
cover, fill, fix or smear with or as if with gum.
the act of sharing in the activities of a group.
the act of applying paint to a surface.
a growth of similar plants (usually trees) in a particular area.
the act of cracking something.
the physical position of something.
a boundary marking the extremities of something.
reach a destination; arrive by movement or progress.
the act of expelling or projecting or ejecting.
argue or speak in defense of.
cause to happen or be responsible for.
to put down by force or authority.
cause to march or go at a marching pace.
the act of reducing the amount or number.
equip with armed and armored motor vehicles.
the last section of a communication.
the act of indicating or pointing out by name.
the act of disturbing the mind or body.
the condition of being motivated.
lower the pitch of (musical notes).
the act of making a proposal.
break open or apart suddenly and forcefully.
the speech act of making something evident.
make ready for action or use.
the act of breaking something.
get the meaning of something.
make a copy of with the intent to deceive.
any affliction that causes great suffering.
the act of drawing or hauling something.
to remain emotionally or intellectually attached.
the state of being rejected.
the solid part of the earth's surface.
the act of starting something.
cover with a primer; apply a primer to.
make a logical or causal connection.
extend in a different direction.
the act of beginning something new.
the act of giving a false appearance.
observe or plot the moving path of something.
the act of breaking something.
have a disagreement over something.
give an incentive for action.
the act of cutting something into parts.
give surety or assume responsibility.
move from one place to another.
the act of dropping something.
give a performance (of something).
any new participant in some activity.
turn the paddle; in canoeing.
the act of drawing or hauling something.
the last section of a communication.
the relation of comprising something.
serve as a reason or cause or justification of.
remove from a position or office.
the act of starting something for the first time; introducing something new.
the act of starting something.
cause to become widely known.
an event that does not accomplish its intended purpose.
the act of giving up (a claim or office or possession etc.).
exclusive control or possession of something.
take something or somebody with oneself somewhere.
money in the form of bills or coins.
a state of extreme poverty.
the act of attaching or affixing something.
the act of rejecting something.
have a wish or desire to know something.
take (gas, light or heat) into a solution.
the act of rending or ripping or splitting something.
pronounce with an initial sibilant.
an upward slope or grade (as in a road).
a relatively long narrow piece of something.
shrivel or wither or mature imperfectly.
recognize as being; establish the identity of someone or something.
the act of starting something.
an obligation to pay or do something.
to incline or bend from a vertical position.
preserve in a can or tin.
dress in a certain manner.
the act of raising something.
give a deceptive explanation or excuse for.
the principal activity in your life that you do to earn money.
the act of drawing or hauling something.
the act of becoming more distant.
the act of retaining something.
the last (12th) month of the year.
the activity of protecting someone or something.
the act of troubling or annoying someone.
a company that performs a public service; subject to government regulation.
get involved or mixed-up with.
a gradual decline (in size or strength or power or number).
a brief experience of something.
the act of chipping something.
make even or more even.
take away the legal force of or render ineffective.
give an interpretation or rendition of.
hit before it touches the ground.
the state of being unsure of something.
the action of putting something into operation.
fix or set securely or deeply.
the story that is told in a novel or play or movie etc..
the act of rending or ripping or splitting something.
a mercantile establishment for the retail sale of goods or services.
twist suddenly so as to sprain.
resist immunologically the introduction of some foreign tissue or organ.
the act of stopping something.
the price at which buyers and sellers trade the item in an open marketplace.
the act of damaging something or someone.
the act of forming or establishing something.
support on the back and shoulders.
contrast with equal weight or force.
the quality of not being useful or convenient.
the quality of being important and worthy of note.
a restraint that confines or restricts freedom (especially something used to tie down or restrain a prisoner).
change toward something smaller or lower.
a chance to do something.
cause to be in an appropriate place, state, or relation.
the trait of wasting resources.
have flavor; taste of something.
cause to run in panic.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
the act of forming or establishing something.
cause to turn on an axis or center.
set into opposition or rivalry.
the physical position of something.
the act of hearing attentively.
the act of designating or identifying something.
the act of liberating someone or something.
the act of dropping something.
failure that results in a loss of position or reputation.
the last section of a communication.
process or result of becoming less or smaller.
the last section of a communication.
reduce to small pieces or particles by pounding or abrading.
the range of interest or activity that can be anticipated.
the act of damaging something or someone.
twist and turn so as to give an intended interpretation.
the state of being rejected.
agriculture considered as an occupation or way of life.
a military aircraft that drops bombs during flight.
the act of liberating someone or something.
adapt or conform oneself to new or different conditions.
the temperature at which a liquid boils at sea level.
the act of cracking something.
maintain with or as if with a bet.
the act of stopping something.
rein in to keep from winning a race.
cause to come out in a squirt.
cover or swamp with water.
the amount that can be contained.
have or contain a certain wording or form.
a channel for communication between groups.
lengthen or extend in duration or space.
take or have a position relative to others.
the act of dropping something.
the act of losing someone or something.
burn slightly and superficially so as to affect color.
give certain properties to something.
(American football) a position on the line of scrimmage.
the act of fastening things together.
cause a sharp or stinging pain or discomfort.
the act of dropping something.
serve as the inciting cause of.
come up, as of a liquid.
become less tense, rest, or take one's ease.
adapt to a specified measurement.
alternative names for the body of a human being.
lure or entice away from duty, principles, or proper conduct.
make up something artificial or untrue.
break from a meeting or gathering.
the act of ending something.
a special set of circumstances.
protect, hide, or conceal from danger or harm.
the basic unit of money in Kyrgyzstan.
the act of cracking something.
cause to move back and forth.
the state of being active.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
the act of expelling or projecting or ejecting.
get the meaning of something.
take a risk in the hope of a favorable outcome.
the act of applying force to propel something.
alternate dramatically between high and low values.
the act of designating or identifying something.
cause to be balanced or suspended.
plan something for a specific role or purpose or effect.
the act of forcing out someone or something.
cause to have, in the abstract sense or physical sense.
understanding of the nature or meaning or quality or magnitude of something.
do something that one considers to be below one's dignity.
(sports) a division during which one team is on the offensive.
the act of clipping or snipping.
the sovereign and his advisers who are the governing power of a state.
the act of raising something.
the act or means of getting rid of something.
the quality of being significant.
improve or perfect by pruning or polishing.
the act of applying force to propel something.
register formally as a participant or member.
lever that activates the firing mechanism of a gun.
the act of ending something.
the act of liberating someone or something.
a reason for wanting something done.
a cooperative game in which a ball is passed back and forth.
take up, as of debts or payments.
cause to be hanging or suspended.
the act of changing one thing for another thing.
a way or means to achieve something.
the act of liberating someone or something.
time during which some action is awaited.
reverse (a direction, attitude, or course of action).
an established or recognized right.
the act of forming or establishing something.
the occupants of a floor.
the successful action of solving a problem.
cover with flakes or as if with flakes.
a member of a police force.
the address where a person or organization can be communicated with.
spur on or encourage especially by cheers and shouts.
limit in quality or quantity.
the act of hiring something or someone.
the event consisting of the start of something.
engrave or cut by chipping away at a surface.
something recalled to the mind.
the act of constructing something.
a concrete representation of an otherwise nebulous concept.
affect with or as if with a cramp.
become liquid or fluid when heated.
the act of making up your mind about something.
something additional of the same kind.
the act of removing or getting rid of something.
react to a stimulus or command.
a formal association of people with similar interests.
free from obligations or duties.
the act of dropping something.
the act of putting something in a certain place.
the official currency issued by a government or national bank.
advance or set forth in court.
make a written note of.
the allotment of some amount by dividing something.
a native of ancient Troy.
the act of rending or ripping or splitting something.
the act of terminating a life.
the act of moving hurriedly and in a careless manner.
the act of describing something.
raise from a lower to a higher position.
the act of retaining something.
the rate of increase in size per unit time.
the first part or section of something.
the act of constructing something.
supply with water, as with channels or ditches or streams.
the act of testing something.
cause to be interested or curious.
the act of making or enacting laws.
the intended meaning of a communication.
come into the possession of.
react to in a certain way.
the state of being covered with unclean things.
the act of choosing or selecting.
make a film or photograph of something.
move or establish in a new location.
adapt or conform oneself to new or different conditions.
an obligation to pay or do something.
a collection of things sharing a common attribute.
urge with or as if with a goad.
a disease of the heart.
decorate (manuscripts) with letters painted red.
the act of liberating someone or something.
check or regulate (a scientific experiment) by conducting a parallel experiment or comparing with another standard.
part; cease or break association with.
put a new heel on.
the act of raising something.
make (images or sounds) sharp or sharper.
expel or eject (saliva or phlegm or sputum) from the mouth.
measure the depth of (a body of water) with a sounding line.
narrate or give a detailed account of.
a theme that is repeated or elaborated in a piece of music.
the act of looking or seeing or observing.
have a strong desire or urge to do something.
the act of removing or getting rid of something.
a friend who is frequently in the company of another.
hold or carry in equilibrium.
the management of someone or something.
work as a tinker or tinkerer.
the act of forming or establishing something.
the termination of a meeting.
attack as if with claws.
a formal or official social gathering or ceremony.
believe to be the case.
make a sudden movement in a new direction so as to avoid.
the act of climbing something.
sever or remove by pinching or snipping.
cause to become widely known.
any area set aside for a particular purpose.
the act of climbing something.
accuse formally of a crime.
the act of creating written works.
the state of being excluded.
collect discarded or refused material.
a business firm that publishes newspapers.
the act of motivating; providing incentive.
the act of examining resemblances.
make small marks into the surface of.
take up with the tongue.
the act of clipping or snipping.
be equal to in quality or ability.
return in thought or speech to something.
the act of climbing something.
the management of someone or something.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
put an end to a state or an activity.
move or arrange oneself in a comfortable and cozy position.
emit a steady even light without flames.
the act of starting something.
an act (or failure to act) that disappoints someone.
a unit of military aircraft.
the state of taking in or encircling.
a person who plants bombs.
suit to a special purpose.
strike with horror or terror.
establish something as being earlier relative to something else.
throw into great confusion or disorder.
a public enclosure for stray or unlicensed dogs.
the system by which one currency is exchanged for another; enables international transactions to take place.
the natural process of laying down a deposit of something.
the act of choosing or selecting.
the perceptual effect of the juxtaposition of very different colors.
the act of retaining something.
add cream to one's coffee, for example.
consider as part of something.
suit to a special purpose.
the act of losing someone or something.
the state of being depleted.
conform to a metrical pattern.
a small thin branch of a tree.
the act of starting something.
make (a solid substance) liquid, as by heating.
form intrigues (for) in an underhand manner.
the act of forcing out someone or something.
a form of foot torture in which the feet are encased in iron and slowly crushed.
walk as if unable to control one's movements.
something (as property) held by one party (the trustee) for the benefit of another (the beneficiary).
provide with (something) usually for a specific purpose.
the act of winding or twisting.
cause to lean to the side.
an indication of some hidden activity.
the state of being suspected.
stop functioning or cohering as a unit.
the last section of a communication.
be in some specified state or condition.
the act of escaping physically.
make by combining materials and parts.
give a performance (of something).
the act of projecting out from something.
limit the range or extent of.
the act of dropping something.
the act of perceiving the odor of something.
the act of hiring something or someone.
the justification for some act or belief.
(music) the presentation of a musical theme.
let or cause to fall in drops.
to move or cause to move in a sinuous, spiral, or circular course.
cause to spread in another part of the world.
the act of making a proposal.
a committee appointed to judge a competition.
maintain (a theory, thoughts, or feelings).
settle into a position, usually on a surface or ground.
sever or remove by pinching or snipping.
the act of damaging something or someone.
form the boundary of; be contiguous to.
the charge for exchanging currency of one country for currency of another.
the graduated arc that is attached to an instrument for measuring angles.
the act of testing something.
the act of retaining something.
two people who are married to each other.
give certain properties to something.
the activity of supplying or providing something.
the act of raising something.
enclose in or as if in a frame.
make believe with the intent to deceive.
the act of distributing things into classes or categories of the same type.
fly in or as if in a glider plane.
the act of testing something.
open (a place) to members of all races and ethnic groups.
go after with the intent to catch.
the center of an object.
an appraisal of the value of something.
form a carpet-like cover (over).
room where work is done.
the act of testing something.
take temporary possession of as a security, by legal authority.
refer for judgment or consideration.
send from one person or place to another.
the act of dwelling in a place.
the act of projecting out from something.
the act of projecting out from something.
cause to overturn from an upright or normal position.
the act of dropping something.
the end or completion of something.
the act of projecting out from something.
a document granting an inventor sole rights to an invention.
the center of an object.
the act of colliding with something.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
the act of stopping something.
the act of rending or ripping or splitting something.
have a distinctive or characteristic taste.
be a sign or indication of.
the general outward appearance of something.
know and comprehend the nature or meaning of.
make something, usually for a specific function.
get rid of as if by submerging.
the act of choosing or selecting.
adapt or conform oneself to new or different conditions.
the act of troubling or annoying someone.
a watch with a hinged metal lid to protect the crystal.
organize or be responsible for.
compete for something; engage in a contest; measure oneself against others.
the act of cracking something.
remove from a position or office.
the act of colliding with something.
ride on someone's shoulders or back.
the act of mixing together.
a solid piece of something (usually having flat rectangular sides).
the act of moving from one place to another.
the act of admitting someone to enter.
rewrite so as to make fit to suit a new or different purpose.
an entertainer who attracts large audiences.
dispose of (something useless or old).
the state of being excommunicated.
appear or become visible; make a showing.
correct by punishment or discipline.
lessen in force or effect.
the act of climbing something.
the act of affirming or asserting or stating something.
a list of items (names or tasks etc.) to be checked or consulted.
the act of stopping something.
the act of damaging something or someone.
put into a certain place or abstract location.
the act of perceiving the odor of something.
the act of administering medication.
lessen in force or effect.
get on board of (trains, buses, ships, aircraft, etc.).
the act of removing or getting rid of something.
covering for a hole (especially a hole in the top of a container).
to cause to separate and go in different directions.
cause to vibrate in a definite pattern.
the act of adding one thing to another.
decide upon or fix definitely.
provide a feast or banquet for.
the act of rending or ripping or splitting something.
a meeting devoted to a particular activity.
give new life or energy to.
doing as one pleases or chooses;
being or characteristic of or appropriate to everyday language;
win something through one's efforts;
a standard or typical example;
lacking in specific resources, qualities or substances;
place (something) where one cannot find it again;
failure to be present
meet by design; be present at the arrival of;
an account of the series of events making up a person's life
provide (usually but not necessarily food);
territory over which rule or control is exercised;
abstain from doing; always used with a negative;
engage for a performance;
the period during which something is functional (as between birth and death);
having succeeded or being marked by a favorable outcome;
come to believe on the basis of emotion, intuitions, or indefinite grounds;
discipline in personal and social activities;
a concept of quantity involving zero and units;
inhabit or live in; be an inhabitant of;
(phonetics) an individual sound unit of speech without concern as to whether or not it is a phoneme of some language
what something is used for;
suffer the loss of a person through death or removal;
a period of time considered as a resource under your control and sufficient to accomplish something;
hit against; come into sudden contact with;
a request for something to be made, supplied, or served;
slightly and pleasantly intoxicated from alcohol or a drug (especially marijuana)
satisfy a condition or restriction;
a group of people (often temporary) having a common purpose;
devoid of or deficient in light or brightness; shadowed or black;
a commercial document used to request someone to supply something in return for payment and providing specifications and quantities;
the continuum of events occurring in succession leading from the past to the present and even into the future;
the way something is with respect to its main attributes;
having a strong physiological or chemical effect;
a committee having supervisory powers;
greater than normal in degree or intensity or amount;
financial assistance in time of need
of major significance or importance;
exercise authority over; as of nations;
succeed in reaching; arrive at;
belonging to or participated in by a community as a whole; public;
the occupation for which you are paid;
unlike in nature or quality or form or degree;
a social unit living together;
(physiology) regulation or maintenance of a function or action or reflex etc;
a line leading to a place or point;
make a proposal, declare a plan for something;
a process in which something passes by degrees to a different stage (especially a more advanced or mature stage);
lead a certain kind of life; live in a certain style;
unique or specific to a person or thing or category;
an instance or single occasion for some event;
having or producing a comfortable and agreeable degree of heat or imparting or maintaining heat;
a collection of things sharing a common attribute;
do duty or hold offices; serve in a specific function;
be adjacent or come together;
a participant in a date;
a mechanism that controls the operation of a machine;
fail to keep or to maintain; cease to have, either physically or in an abstract sense;
a transparent opening in a vehicle that allow vision out of the sides or back; usually is capable of being opened
(used of color) having a dark hue;
a record in which commercial accounts are recorded;
the front of the human head from the forehead to the chin and ear to ear;
contend against an opponent in a sport, game, or battle;
the condition of living or the state of being alive;
be larger in number, quantity, power, status or importance;
of good quality and condition; solidly built;
drive something violently into a location;
having or producing a comfortable and agreeable degree of heat or imparting or maintaining heat;
have life, be alive;
spend time in prison or in a labor camp;
give instructions to or direct somebody to do something with authority;
having or producing a comfortable and agreeable degree of heat or imparting or maintaining heat;
deserving or inciting pity;
how a result is obtained or an end is achieved;
act of improving by expanding or enlarging or refining;
a record or narrative description of past events;
the effect of one thing (or person) on another;
having little impact;
a printed circuit that can be inserted into expansion slots in a computer to increase the computer's capabilities
narrate or give a detailed account of;
the specified day of the month;
(music) the section of a composition or movement (especially in sonata form) where the major musical themes are developed and elaborated
serve a purpose, role, or function;
the land on which real estate is located;
a body of rules followed by an assembly
the period of time a prisoner is imprisoned;
free of clouds or rain;
the discipline that records and interprets past events involving human beings;
consistent with fact or reality; not false;
worthy of being depended on;
a sequence of numbers or letters that opens a combination lock;
be used by; as of a utility;
family based on male descent;
work for or be a servant to;
the time period that is considered best for starting or finishing something;
(used of hair or skin) pale or light-colored; ;
the striking or working surface of an implement
a recent event that has some relevance for the present situation;
a range of mental vision;
a major division of a long written composition;
be the winner in a contest or competition; be victorious;
having strength or power greater than average or expected;
a stout length of sawn timber; made in a wide variety of sizes and used for many purposes
give help or assistance; be of service;
speak, pronounce, or utter in a certain way;
the territory occupied by a nation;
establish the validity of something, as by an example, explanation or experiment;
a prison term lasting as long as the prisoner lives;
put into service; make work or employ for a particular purpose or for its inherent or natural purpose;
be aware of the truth of something; have a belief or faith in something; regard as true beyond any doubt;
deliver a sharp blow, as with the hand, fist, or weapon;
having skin rich in melanin pigments;
seek information from;
look at, interpret, and say out loud something that is written or printed;
be able to distinguish, recognize as being different;
imply as a possibility;
a formal association of people with similar interests;
stemming from evil characteristics or forces; wicked or dishonorable; -Thomas Hardy
recite or repeat a fixed text;
power to direct or determine;
fail to keep or to maintain; cease to have, either physically or in an abstract sense;
unsparing and uncompromising in discipline or judgment;
suggest the necessity of an intervention; in medicine;
a flat portable surface (usually rectangular) designed for board games;
record a charge in a police register;
interpret something that is written or printed;
(usually plural) the status or rank or office of a Christian clergyman in an ecclesiastical hierarchy;
a written work or composition that has been published (printed on pages bound together);
having or producing a comfortable and agreeable degree of heat or imparting or maintaining heat;
the state of being absent;
affect or afflict suddenly, usually adversely;
a narrow channel of the sea joining two larger bodies of water
very pleasing to the eye;
an indefinite period (usually marked by specific attributes or activities);
fill or meet a want or need
characterized by an absence or near absence of agitation or activity;
a relation such that one thing is dependent on another;
(chemistry) the three traditional states of matter are solids (fixed shape and volume) and liquids (fixed volume and shaped by the container) and gases (filling the container);
free of noise or uproar; or making little if any sound;
be familiar or acquainted with a person or an object;
(of a baseball) hit between the foul lines;
a collection of things that have been combined; an assemblage of separate parts or qualities
a vertical surface on which information can be displayed to public view
look forward to the probable occurrence of;
help to some food; help with food or drink;
a pane of glass in a window;
the feelings expressed on a person's face;
a district that has been developed to serve some purpose;
be or become visible or noticeable;
devoted (sometimes fanatically) to a cause or concept or truth;
immune to attack; incapable of being tampered with;
surpassing what is common or usual or expected;
decide with authority;
the territory occupied by one of the constituent administrative districts of a nation;
intensely or extremely bad or unpleasant in degree or quality;
activity directed toward making or doing something;
(biology) taxonomic group containing one or more families
a particular day specified as the time something happens;
having little money or few possessions;
a standard against which other conditions can be compared in a scientific experiment;
not faint or feeble;
living things collectively;
a number of sheets (ticket or stamps etc.) bound together on one edge;
having no special distinction or quality; widely known or commonly encountered; average or ordinary or usual;
not excessive or extreme;
relatively large in size or number or extent; larger than others of its kind;
make an addition (to); join or combine or unite with others; increase the quality, quantity, size or scope of;
separate and distinct from others of the same group or category;
decide on and make a declaration about;
a language unit by which a person or thing is known;
established customary state (especially of society);
showing a brooding ill humor;
rhythm as given by division into parts of equal duration
make a discovery, make a new finding;
a characteristic state or mode of living;
animation and energy in action or expression;
(architecture) one of original three styles of Greek architecture distinguished by the type of column and entablature used or a style developed from the original three by the Romans
a place where work is done;
(usually followed by `to') having the necessary means or skill or know-how or authority to do something;
establish after a calculation, investigation, experiment, survey, or study;
state or say further;
involving substantial risk;
take or consume (regularly or habitually);
to hear and understand;
material in the top layer of the surface of the earth in which plants can grow (especially with reference to its quality or use);
(biology) a taxonomic group containing one or more genera;
come upon after searching; find the location of something that was missed or lost;
(often plural) a command given by a superior (e.g., a military or law enforcement officer) that must be obeyed;
an indication that something has been present;
finish third or better in a horse or dog race;
Suspected drug lord known as ‘El Taliban’ held in Mexico
SC dismisses govt's review petition on Vodafone tax verdict
Explosion hits pipeline as Assad attacks cities
NATO soldier killed in S. Afghanistan
Fidel Castro celebrates 86th birthday
Israeli ex-spy boss: no trust in leadership over Iran – video
U.S. Supreme Court issues split ruling on Arizona immigration law
NATO Leaders Commit to Afghanistan Transition
Damascus 'suicide bombing' kills 10
Sachin Tendulkar scores cricket's first 100th century
Tropical storm warnings for Southeast coast
Australian PM defiant under pressure over leadership
Obama says clear rules needed to calm South China Sea
Teenager kills 8 in knife attack
Free Syrian Army moves headquarters from Turkey to Syria
7 states sue over Obama administration's birth control rule
Israel's Netanyahu set to call early vote
Greece secures biggest debt deal in history
Polls open in Russian presidential election
Suicide bomber kills 21 in NW Pakistan
Julian Assange Plans to Run for Australian Senate
Sandusky found guilty in child sex abuse trial
7 Tibetans self-immolate in China
Fact check: Obama's Supreme Court remarks
Putin, Annan meet on Syria crisis
Occupation to confiscate 30 dunums of Palestinian land in Deir Estia
Saudi Women Allowed To Compete At Olympics
Nigeria: University Bombed in North
U.S. ready to help Chinese activist: official
China's Wen promises job creation
Russia, China veto UN Security Council resolution on Syria
Green Lantern to be relaunched as gay superhero
Military plane crashes in southeastern Turkey, 1 dead
Tropical Storm Joyce forms, stays in open Atlantic
2 Gaza rockets hit Israel; no injuries
Third man arrested in Savile sex abuse probe
Romney names Ryan as running mate
Stocks edge higher after Greek debt deal
Suicide bombers attack Yemen military posts
Three NATO troops killed in one day in Afghanistan
Moscow protest against Vladimir Putin smaller and quieter
Nigeria church blast kills at least 12
French presidential election: first round - live updates
Australia creates world's largest marine reserves
Two British soldiers killed by Afghan policeman
Two UK Soldiers Killed In Afghanistan
Abbas proposed as PM in interim unity government
Egypt's Coptic Church Prepares to Choose Pope
Malawi confirms President Mutharika's death
Mali rebels declare independent 'Azawad'
Lance Armstrong plots strategy after loss of titles
Polls open in France for presidential election
The perception of Spain has changed dramatically with this government
Reopen Madeleine case, police urge
16 killed in north Iraq attacks
Mayday: fears for asylum seekers
NATO says four troops killed in "insider" attack in Afghan south
Coty bids $10 billion for Avon
UN Security Council to vote on up to 300 Syria monitors
Gunman kills six in shooting at Sikh temple in Wisconsin
Probe into motor insurance market
Hurricane Isaac batters US coast near New Orleans
China state news agency: There's still hope for Syria peace
AU forces intensify attack on Somali rebels
South Korea to boost nuclear power?
Nigeria opens probe into deadly air crash
'Iran won't accept pre-conditions to nuclear talks'
AOL to sell 800 patents to Microsoft for $1 billion
Thousands flock to Amsterdam for Queen's Day
Middle East: Iraq: 17 Prisoners Escape in Kirkuk
US Navy Jet Crashes into Apartment Block
Woman dies after cliff collapses in Dorset
Greece looks set for repeat election
U.S. and Turkey Tighten Coordination on Syria
Rep. of Congo: 236 Dead After Arms Depot Blasts
I'll Have Another wins Preakness
Journalists smuggled out of Homs
New rules for US Secret Service
Iranians “confess” to nuclear scientist murders
Mohamed Morsi sworn in as Egypt's President
Mandela released from hospital
180 killed in Iran earthquake
Congolese warlord sentenced to 14 years in landmark case - video
British Christians take complaints to European court
Turkey seeks to relocate some Syrian refugees
Nine killed in Syrian-linked clashes in Lebanon
Three al Qaeda suspects arrested in Spain
5.9 quake hits Indonesia s Sumatra: USGS
IAF strikes Gaza terror cell; 1 dead
Israel air strikes kill 4 in Gaza; death toll now at 38
9 killed, 31 wounded in car bombs in Iraq's Kirkuk
Israel to free Palestinian hunger striker
Hezbollah says it sent drone over Israel
Free Syrian Army captures Syrian officers
Doctor treating Aurora shooting suspect had medical reprimand
6.6 quake rocks Indonesia's Papua: US Geological Survey
US decries Pakistan doctor's fate
What time is the Paralympic Opening Ceremony? Everything you need to know about the big curtain-raiser
US school bans hugging
Iran steps up relief efforts after quakes kill 227
Tsunami warning after Canada quake
US toll in Afghanistan hits 2,000
Apple to pay $2.65/share dividend, buy back $10B stock
3 killed, 14 injured in attacks in Iraq
2 dead in shooting outside Empire State Building
French unemployment rate rises to 10 percent
Sandy strengthens as nears coast; Wall Street shut
Halliburton Q1 profits rise on strong North America sales
Syria deploys more troops despite peace deal
12 killed in U.S. drone strike in NW Pakistan
China stocks open lower Friday
Tunisia lifts curfew after riots
UN monitors shot at on way to Syrian massacre site
Soldier killed in Afghanistan blast
Local Militia Bolsters Islamist Militants in Mali
Opening ceremony gives Olympics a rocking start
Schiphol airport evacuated due to bomb threat
Man dies in French 'anti-terror operation'
Salvador Dali painting snatched from New York gallery
Capello resigns as England manager
1 dead, 4 wounded in Ohio school shooting
Four Palestinians killed in IAF strike
Pakistan convoy heads to protest US drone strikes
Hurricane Sandy gains speed, batters US east coast
Sarkozy to sue after Gaddafi cash claim bursts into campaign
The Note's Must-Reads for Wednesday, May 30, 2012
Senior cleric: Iran will attack Tel Aviv if Israel strikes
Annan urges end to Syrian violence
Supreme Court possibilities if Romney wins election
Poll: Putin to win Russia presidential vote
Syria says troops have begun pullout – video
4 Chinese among Nigeria plane crash victims
CMIE cuts 2012-13 growth forecast to 6.3%
Venezuela mourns oil refinery blast deaths
Strong earthquake strikes near Acapulco
Russia, China in double veto of UN Syria resolution
Lawyers: Colo. shooting suspect is mentally ill
Suicide bomber kills 23 at Afghan wedding
Pakistani Plane Crashes With 130 People On Board
UN orders global sanctions against Haqqani network
Foreign militants killed in Somalia in strike on car
Saudi Arabia arrests suspected militants, state media reports
Hurricane Sandy takes aim at US East Coast
Chicago teacher strike poses test for unions
Panetta: Afghanistan Tops NATO Conference Topics
Four men admit London bombs plot
Manmohan in Tehran, asks NAM to take a stand on Syria
Israel attacks in Gaza Strip after rocket fire
12 bodies found at Russian jet crash in Indonesia
Messi scores 4 to send Guardiola off with victory
Syria's tenuous truce takes hold
US soldier kills up to 16 Afghan civilians in shooting spree
Rupert Murdoch set for second day of grilling
Barclays boss falls to rate fixing scandal
China's yuan advances to 6.3103 against USD Wednesday
South Africa train crash kills 26
Nissan to offer steer-by-wire systems in some Infiniti cars
Teenage Tibetan monk dies after setting himself on fire in China
Tech capital Bangalore costliest Indian city to live in: Survey
Man quizzed over Megan-Leigh murder
Israel airstrikes kill Hamas commander, 5 others
Taliban launch coordinated Afghan attacks
Gusmao powers on in East Timor
UN monitors unable to reach site of Syria killings
Russia, China veto U.N. draft backing Arab plan for Syria (Reuters)
NATO strongly condemns Syria's downing of Turkish jet
Activist says Syrian citizen cameraman killed in Homs
Turkish army stages tank exercises near Syria border
At least 20 killed in Syria Saturday
Syria forces launch Aleppo attack
Israel braces for Arab protests
Gazans fire 89 rockets; cabinet approves reserve call-up
John Demjanjuk, convicted Nazi death camp guard, dies aged 91
Johnson re-elected London mayor
Breivik gets 21-year sentence
Brother of EastEnders actress Gemma McCluskie is charged with her murder
Jersey Murder Trial: Killer 'Hearing Voices'
Madoff's brother to plead guilty to fraud
Polls open across France in presidential election
Libyan militia takes control of Tripoli airport
Clinton warns Kenya on cost of election unrest
Arkansas Justices Strike Down Death Penalty
Mandela Discharged From Hospital
NZ to increase exports to China
Al-Shater to run in presidential election in Egypt
Donna Summer, Queen of Disco, Dies at 63
Muslims torch Buddhist temples
Six Police Officers Killed in Attacks in Dagestan
Pope rips into dissident priests on celibacy
10 killed, 12 injured in E. Afghan airport suicide blast
Low expectations for Iran nuclear talks
British Girl And Grandad Drown In Portugal
Romney, in comeback, has narrow Maine caucus win
Bahrain rejects activists' appeal
Hurricane Sandy moves towards US
Plastic artist calls for greater support for new talents
Syria launches ground assault in Aleppo
Algerian national turnout of parliamentary vote reaches 44.38 pct
Security personnel killed in Pakistan raid
US stocks slip on Wall Street as Greek talks drag on
Romney to tap Ryan as vice presidential running mate
NATO helicopter makes hard landing in E. Afghanistan
Mubarak's sons face new charges of insider trading
India allows Pakistan investment
Bomb Kills 19 In Northwest Pakistan
Suicide bomber kills 37 at mosque in Afghanistan
NATO Soldier Killed in Afghan Blast
Nadal through to seventh French Open final
Russia, Ukraine foiled plot to kill Putin, report says
Putin wins disputed Russian presidential election
Israeli army orders settlers out of Hebron house
Finance minister promises no new taxes
Remains of 167 people found in Mexico cave
Alps attack: Girl returns to UK
Obama takes offensive against Romney in debate
Poland honors president killed in 2010 plane crash
U.S., Iran prepare for Istanbul nuclear talks
Thousands gather in Moscow for rival rallies
Syrian forces kill 3 protesters in Damascus-activists
Google appoints Dennis Woodside to run Motorola Mobility
Hurricane Sandy takes aim at US East Coast
Egypt's President-Elect Morsi Starts to Form Government
2 rockets hit Eshkol; none injured
Japan thanks Taiwan for quake aid
8,000 Syrian refugees flee to Turkey overnight
Assange to appeal extradition to UK's top court
Strong quake hits eastern Indonesia
Syrians hold solution to Syria crisis
Activists: Syrian troops kill dozens near Damascus
Pakistani Mob Kills Man 'for Burning Koran'
U.S. drone strike kills 10 in northwest Pakistan: officials
Salvador Dali painting snatched in NYC
Will Putin's Election Victory in Russia Be Greeted with Protests?
France's Nicolas Sarkozy makes his reelection bid official
US, UK Set to Agree Emergency Oil Stocks Release
Police treat suspicious object at Tel Aviv bus station
Eurozone unemployment at record high in June
French Socialists win absolute parliament majority
Second Islamist hunger striker dies in a Tunisian prison
Dominique Strauss-Kahn faces questions over French prostitution ring
Romney eyes US Republican primary endgame
Suspected drone strike kills 4 in Pakistan
At least 12 killed in Nigeria church bombing
3 traffic accidents leave 56 dead in China
Hall of Fame beckons for Capriati
Strauss-Kahn charged in prostitution vice ring
Sony forecasts record annual loss of $6.4bn
Ictu, Ibec in move on airline strike
19 Killed in Iraq Attacks ahead of Ramadan End
Barclays hit by fresh US probe
Closed roads in Armenia
Royal Mail to create 1,000 jobs
EU imposes new sanctions on Syrian regime
US drone strike kills four in NWA: officials
Tens of thousands rally against Putin's rule (AP)
Bahrain race goes ahead amid unrest
Chinese stocks open mixed Wednesday
Sheryl Crow Has a Benign Brain Tumor
Obama's delicate dance on same-sex marriage
Iraq searches Syrian-bound Iranian plane
Afghan parliament approves U.S. partnership
Senator Reid involved in Las Vegas car crash: CNN
Israeli, Palestinian negotiators meet in Jordan
US astronaut Neil Armstrong dies
Amnesty investigator: Syria rebels also committing abuses
Romney wins Florida Republican primary
Joachim Gauck elected as German president
South Africa hosts 'peace talks' in mine standoff
Syria fighting rages in capital, Russia pressed
35 dead and 165 missing in India boat accident
Erdogan's party aims for Turkish presidency
Santorum wins Kansas caucuses
Jordan Opens First Refugee Camp for Syrians
First man on moon Neil Armstrong dies at 82
Turkey, US weigh no-fly zones for Syria
WA man arrested in police drug raid
Fla. Democrats want extended early voting hours
British Warship Sets Sail for Falklands
QPR 1-2 West Ham: Match report, pictures & video highlights
Progress reported in Palestinian prisoner hunger strike talks
Palestinians: 12 killed in IDF strike in northern Strip
Egypt confirms Mubarak's PM back in presidency race
US Marines killed in base attack
US helping get arms to Syria rebels
UN observers reach Syria massacre village
PBS publishes new guidelines on impartiality
Romney pledges to 'stand with Israel' on Iran threat
Greek PM calls for May 6 general election
Government of Canada Supports Women's Safety in Regina
No problem if Mulayam forms third front: Digvijay
Bahrain court upholds sentences against uprising leaders
Charges over dog attack on police
Plane Crash in Ghana: How the international media reported it
Gu Kailai's Murder Trial Ends in China
Eurozone agrees Greece bail-out
6 NATO troops killed in Afghanistan
Syrian forces kill 54 ahead of Annan peace mission
Obama, Romney compete for undecideds, stoke base
Two blasts rock Syrian capital
BBC Director General Resigns amid Newsnight Scandal
Rick Santorum notches a victory in Kansas caucuses
Egyptian Christians choose new pope
US Pledge to Rebuild Haiti Not Being Met
Chinese stocks open mixed Wednesday
Greece to vote on 2013 budget
Obama says he's not 'hiding the ball' on Russia
U.S., EU welcome Iran's offer to restart nuclear talks
Obama backs same-sex marriage
Clinton warns Kenya on repeat of 2007 vote chaos
England captain Strauss retires from cricket
Anti-American fury sweeps Middle East over film
Israeli delegation marches in 2012 Olympics opener
Tokyo stocks open lower
WikiLeaks Releasing Trove of Syria Documents
Officials: Gaza man killed in Israeli airstrike (AP)
Mali's President Formally Resigns
War crimes: China backs Lanka on UN resolution
60 killed in Nigeria cattle market attack
FACTBOX-Security developments in Pakistan, March 13
Jordan biased over Palestinians from Syria
Israel among top arms exporters and importers
Somali MPs to elect new president
Federer captures 7th Wimbledon title
Al-Qaida Leader Urges Kidnapping of Westerners
Chinese stocks close higher midday Friday
Sachin Tendulkar's reaches 100 centuries - in pictures
Police disperse east China chemical plant protesters
15 killed in crash in India
Putin sworn in as Russia's president for 6 years
Tense calm returns to south Tel Aviv
Five things to watch in the presidential debate
Dozens of 'flytilla' activists protest at Paris airport
Custody, images at stake in Cruise-Holmes divorce
Syria blames rebels for Houla massacre of over 100
S. Sudan accuses Sudan of bombing in blow to talks
Day begins amid panic
US jobless rate seen rising, offering Obama no relief
Five million citizens get unofficial salary in Ukraine
Syria demands written guarantee for troop pullback
Minn. Terminal Reopens After Bag Causes Evacuation
Westwood in front a Dubai Desert Classic
Pakistan's PM orders YouTube halt over anti-Islam film
Polls close in Senegal's presidential election
Chavez set for more radiotherapy in Cuba
Chinese president concludes state visit to Denmark
Russian Orthodox Church rallies faithful after criticism
Clinton Warns Against Undermining Grameen Bank
Mali's Interim President Sworn Into Office
Putin 'wins' Russia's presidential election
U.S. closes embassy in Damascus due to Syria violence
EU sanctions Assad's wife; mortars hit Homs
Women testify at Air Force instructor's sentencing
More than 30 striking miners killed in South Africa
Israel blames Iran for attacks on its diplomats
Music industry mourns Whitney Houston
Iron Dome intercepts two rockets fired at Beersheba
Mali Islamists destroy more holy Timbuktu sites
Chinese stocks open higher Thursday
Nintendo trims red ink, lowers forecast for year
Butler to be tried in "Vatileaks" case
Romney has narrow Maine caucus win
Sectarian clashes rock Lebanese city, 3 killed
Repsol blasts Argentina over oil nationalization
49 feared dead in Buenos Aires train crash
Burma's Aung San Suu Kyi to address parliament on June visit
US man recovers car 42 years after theft
Larry Page says Android important, not critical
Morsi to take oath as first Egypt civilian president
Iran MPs say ready to ban oil exports to some EU states
At Least Six Dead in Pakistan Gunfight
Iranian painter Mansoureh Hosseini dies
Romney Promises to 'Restore America'
'Kony 2012' director hospitalized
Syrian opposition leader criticizes U.S.
Israeli president released from hospital
Sunderland 2-2 Bolton: Davies in at the double
Jaya Prada likely to join BJP, Amar Singh to decide for her
Over 120 dead in Pakistan factory blaze
Hezbollah calls for more anti-Islam film protests
Syrian forces and rebels clash in coastal province
Tennis: Nadal defeats Djokovic for Monte Carlo title
Childcare 'costing £15,000 a year'
Obama urges Europe to act quickly on crisis
Choc powder recalled over salmonella concerns
Obama, Romney prepare to debate
Raiders kill 38 in latest land clashes in Kenya
Kidnapped UK aid worker killed in Pakistan
CPAC 2012: Mitt Romney Struggles to Connect with Conservative Base
Ten rockets from Gaza land in southern Israel; none hurt
Britain savors golden night on track
Greek protesters, police clash as bailout deal in limbo
Five NATO soldiers killed in Afghanistan
Press Releases: Yemeni Presidential Election
BBC faces questions for pulling Savile case
Eurozone unemployment hits record high
James Murdoch quits role at BSkyB
Science fiction legend Ray Bradbury dead at 91
US presidential election 2012
Four foreign soldiers killed in Afghan east
UN team investigates Syrian massacre
AP Poll: Majority Harbor Prejudice Against Blacks
Redskins trade for No. 2 pick
China's defence spending to rise 11.2%
Strong Italy Quake Kills at Least Six
Ecuador yet to decide on Assange's asylum
News Summary: Apple buying AuthenTec for $356M
US offers $10 million for Pakistani militant chief
6 NATO troops killed in Afghanistan
Osama Bin Laden movie to be filmed in India
Egyptians go to polls in historic election
JetBlue pilot who caused disruption on flight not guilty
Tsunami warning after Aceh quake
U.S. transfers Bagram prison to Afghan control
Jeremy Hunt clings on as SpAd quits over News Corp emails
Obama Secret Service agents sent home
Blitzbokke beaten by NZ
Team Anna yet to decide on contesting state polls
Hollywood trade publication Variety put up for sale
Sex attack on woman investigated
Toulouse shooting: France was on the highest level of security of security alert
Eight more bodies found on ship
Thoughts on race relations under a black president
Bairstow hits ton in India tour match
Australian speaker steps aside
Wind farm developers using 'tricks' to make turbines look smaller
US missiles kill 15 in Pakistan: officials
Arsenal 0-0 Chelsea: Match report, pictures & video highlights
US spends $50m on carp invasion
Nigeria police make arrests after college massacre
Focus Shifts to Greece After Spain Secures Bank Bailout
Heavy fighting reported in Damascus
France's Hollande backs Greece but urges credible reform
The Hunger Games breaks US box office record
British Soldier Killed In Afghanistan
Spanish dilemma gets more acute
Two Aust soldiers wounded in Afghanistan
China stocks open lower Friday
Palestinian leadership backs Fatah-Hamas Doha deal
Romney wins Maryland Republican primary
Texas man finds his car 42 years after it was stolen
Sylvester Stalloneâ€™s son, Sage Stallone, found dead in Hol
5 aid workers freed in operation in Afghanistan
Russian court to rule in Pussy Riot trial
Eurozone avoids recession in Q1, thanks to Germany
Israel bars German author Grass over poem
The Note's Must Reads for Wednesday July 4, 2012
U.S. says saddened by shooting on Afghan civilians
East Timor votes in presidential election
Lance Armstrong calls it quits in fight against doping charges
Russia tells Syria chemical arms threat is unacceptable
Fitch restores Ford credit to investment grade
Syria peace dashed as deadline passes
Oil rises after Greek election result
Clashes erupt as Greek vote nears
6 dead, several missing in Mont Blanc avalanche
Taliban soldiers posing as pretty women on Facebook to get troops' secrets
Chinese activist renews call to fight injustice
2 dead in shooting outside Empire State Building
Mursi sworn in as Egyptian president
Two British soldiers killed in Afghanistan
Aid workers freed in Afghanistan raid
Spate of Iraq attacks kill at least six
Torres finishes 4th, misses out on sixth Olympics
Obama to visit Korean DMZ
Pakistan demolishes Osama bin Laden hideout
Sudan accuses Israel of airstrike on arms factory
Negotiators reach deal on Congress payroll tax cut bill
Britain's Prince Philip hospitalised, to miss jubilee
Tropical Storm Isaac threatens dam
'Housewives' actress Kathryn Joosten dies at 72
Rocket fired from Gaza damages home in Sderot; none hurt
100 pro-Palestinians seek to enter Israel at Allenby
Suicide bomber kills 37 at mosque in Afghanistan
Stocks rise on hopes for a Fed stimulus
Gore Vidal, celebrated author, playwright, dies at 86
Egypt prepares to bury Coptic Pope Shenuda III
Asia stocks fall ahead of Greek debt deal deadline
South Africa police say they killed 30+ miners
Isaac nears Haiti with homeless quake population
Who cares about the Syrian people?
Police to detonate devices in Colorado shooting suspect's home
U.S. relaxes deportation rules for young people: Napolitano
Microsoft's Surface tablet promising, but questions remain
Mobster "Whitey" Bulger's girlfriend gets 8 years
Mauritanian president shot at
Syria TV says govt troops free captive journalists
Man sets self afire outside Breivik trial
US drone in Pakistan kills 10 suspected militants
9,000 U.S. Marines to move out of Okinawa: statement
Wal-Mart lowers fee for holiday layaway program
EU plans major new sanctions against Iran
Iran steps up sensitive nuclear work - IAEA
Donna Summer, the queen of disco
Assad makes Red Cross pledge
Attacks in Iraq kill general and 4 others
180 dead, 1,300 injured in northwest Iran earthquakes
Brazil's 'Pop-Star Priest' Gets Mammoth New Stage
Washington: Court Upholds Voting Rights Act in Alabama Case
Putin claims victory in presidential vote
Clinton a tough act for Obama to follow
Romney chooses Ryan as GOP running mate
European Ministers Are Poised to Approve Greek Rescue
Edwards found not guilty on one count; mistrial on others
Ukraine's Korobka gets four-year doping ban
Killer may have filmed France school shooting
Hong Kong stocks open 0.62 pct higher
Coroner confirms Whitney Houston found in bathtub
Suicide bomber targets Nigerian church
Malaysia to extradite Iranian for attack on Israelis
Israel reaches deal with Palestinian hunger strikers
Oklahoma wildfires destroy homes - in pictures
'Hunger Games' sets box office records
Putin 'wins' Russia's presidential election
German court weighs delay to euro fund ruling
Putin to win Russia's presidential election
Insight: U.N. chief finds his voice, but remains cautious on China
Some Syria violence qualifies as civil war -Red Cross
Libyans transfer weapons to army
Archbishop of Canterbury to step down amid rifts
Punjab Mail derails near Rohtak in Haryana, 19 injured
George Zimmerman to be charged in Trayvon Martin case, official says
India: Maoist rebels in talks on freeing Italians
City Room: Empire State Building Shooting
At least 63 dead in Pakistan factory blaze
Penn State football slammed with NCAA sanctions
Israeli minister wants Palestinian leader's ouster
NATO leader plays down risk of Turkey-Syria clash
Girl accused of burning Koran bailed
Manchester United Reveal Share Price Details
Romney shifts focus to Santorum ahead caucuses
Summer solstice celebrated at Stonehenge despite rain
U.N. concerned at possible Syria chemical weapons
'Life-Threatening' Storms Feared for Midwest
General strike ends: Histadrut, Treasury reach agreement
Indonesian president to visit Australia
ICC lawyer held in Libya faces 45-day detention
Storm lashes Florida, delaying Republican convention
Freight train derailment, explosion prompts evacuation
At least 18 killed in Afghan bomb attacks: officials
President John Evans Atta-Mills Must Resign Now -NPP Germany
Miami Heat clinches NBA Championship
Japan switches off last nuclear power plant this weekend
Ryanair chief hails report findings
Russian air force's 100th anniversary
NATO Soldier Killed in Afghanistan
China's yuan weakens against USD for third day
Apple iPad mini makes debut in Asia
Romney leads Santorum in GOP Super Tuesday contests
Putin sworn in as Russia's president for 6 years
ArQule stock plunges as lung cancer study shelved
Three killed in horror crash are named
6.1-magnitude quake hits Papua, Indonesia -- USGS
Two American Officers Murdered As Afghan Unrest Continues
Breivik: Jail term 'ridiculous'
Obama addresses Secret Service scandal
Japan marks one year since quake and tsunami disaster
Syrian PM defects to Jordan
Syrian Arab Republic (the): More than 70 killed in Syria ahead of Annan return
Suicide bomber kills 12 in Nigeria church
Myanmar announces release of prisoners
UK Airline Cancels 'Flytilla' Tickets on Israel Objections
Spaniard on trial for Cuban dissident’s death
Venezuelans urged to vote in presidential election
Peace lies over the South China Sea
Senior journalist killed in Pakistan
SpaceX Dragon Docks With International Space Station
Romney taped at secret donor talk
Million Muppet March planned to defend U.S. backing for PBS
Syrian Opposition Council to Establish Envoy in France
Romney won't volunteer budget differences
Facebook boosts size of IPO by 25 percent
Iran's parliament questions President Ahmadinejad
Afghan suicide car bomb kills at least seven: officials
Sunday Times journalist, French photographer 'killed in Syria'
KL shares lower at mid-morning
Chicago teachers union delegates could end strike
GOP presidential hopefuls clash in Southern races
NATO Soldier Killed in Afghanistan
Rodney King death ruled accidental
2 British soldiers killed in Afghan insider attack
Eurozone to lend Spain up to 100 bil. euros
British Red Cross doctor kidnapped in Pakistan found beheaded
Afghans, US sign deal on night raids
China truck accident kills 20
Australian PM defiant under pressure over leadership
Pussy Riot verdict greeted with defiance
Secret Service sex scandal 'regret'
Activists storm Syria embassy in Kuwait
Rapturous welcome for Aung San Suu Kyi's historic trip
Key wants Waitangi marae visit to stay
Norway Marks Anniversary of Breivik's Massacre
S. Korean economic growth falls to near 3-year low
When an ally declines
RBA delivers another rate cut
Euro zone to Greece: No rescue without reforms
Israel asks US for arms that could aid Iran strike
Obama to meet Batman gun victims
Romney takes lead over Obama with convention "bounce": Reuters/Ipsos poll
Russia, China veto UN resolution on Syria killings
Two dead, 7 injured in Finland shooting
Pope’s butler arrested in scandal over Vatican leaks
Anti-Putin protesters form human chain
Jerry Sandusky convicted of child sexual abuse
George Washington's copy of US Constitution sells for $9.8m
Lakers fire Mike Brown after 1-4 start
US, Canadian imams issue fatwa against honour killings
UN Assembly to Vote on Syria Resolution
US soldier ‘doesn’t recall massacre’
French President Francois Hollande's plane hit by lightning en route to Berlin
Libyan assembly rejects new cabinet, dismisses PM
4 French Soldiers Reported Killed in Afghanistan
Syrian forces bombard Homs, Russia warns of civil war
25 injured in anti-Islam film protest in Islamabad, Pakistan
Investigators seek answers to Whitney Houston's death
North warns of retaliation for Seoul's naval drill plan
Lesser of two evils triumphs in Super Bowl
Two killed in new Israeli strike on Gaza: medics
What is Russia thinking on Syria? A brief guide
Four injured in motorway crash
Syria's besieged Baba Amr is deserted, Red Cross says
Dozens killed in Kenyan clashes
Second day of Egyptian presidential election
Actor Ben Gazzara dies at 81
2 British soldiers killed in Afghan insider attack
Avalanche buries over 100 Pakistani soldiers
Inflation falls to 15-month low
Susan G Komen in U-turn over Planned Parenthood funding cut
Forex & Gold 19 July 2012
Afghan parliament votes to remove key ministers
Iran says nuclear talks with UN 'constructive'
USDA Confirms Case of Mad Cow Disease in California
BP sells Gulf of Mexico assets to Plains for $5.55 bn
UK: 300 potential Savile abuse victims emerge
Romney: I left all management of Bain in 1999
Armstrong standing down from Livestrong
U.S. drone strikes kill 16 suspected militants in Yemen
Sept. 11 defendants enrage families at hearing
Syrian opposition reports 'massacre'
Chinese stocks higher at midday Friday
Voters in Myanmar hopeful as Suu Kyi's party claims win
Obama's big Hispanic win worries Republicans
4 foreign soldiers killed in Afghan east
Man in Afghan army uniform kills NATO soldier
Syria opposition unites as Israel fires warning shots
Cheap cancer drugs no cure for India's poorest
Egyptians wait for key presidential vote results
South Africa train crash kills 26
Syrian forces bombard Homs, Lavrov arrives for talks
Egyptian election result delayed
EU Moves Closer to New Iran Sanctions
Dozens arrested in Russian TV tower protest
Norway marks anniversary of massacre
Senior US general linked to Petraeus scandal
Maldives court issues arrest warrant for former president
Chinese stocks gain at midday Monday
Report: Jordan biased over Palestinians from Syria
N. Korea vows to expand nuclear deterrent
Maldives president quits after weeks of protest
Two NATO soldiers killed in Afghanistan
Al Qaeda clashes, blasts kill 35 soldiers in Yemen
U.S. Navy Jet Crashes Into Virginia Apartment Buildings
US stocks open higher despite GDP miss
Major snowstorm barrels down on Central Plains
U.S. Drone Strike Kills 3 in Pakistan
Chicago teen arrested in Chicago car bomb plot
David Miliband: my brother and a return to old Labour
Syrian Regime Bids To Retake City Of Aleppo
Commerce secretary to take leave of absence
Sylvester Stallone's Son Found Dead At Home
Wall Street Ends Mixed
Clinton: US, Europe Must Work to Defeat Tyrants
Oil prices rise on hopes for stimulus
Syria army takes northern rebel stronghold
Stock index futures signal early losses
Man charged with murder in flat
Chinese stocks open lower Friday
US waives riders for Pak aid
Drone strike kills four suspected militants in Pakistan
Syrian rebels retreat from besieged Homs district
US orders non-essential staff to leave Tunisia, Sudan
Egypt's Mubarak in critical condition
Eastern U.S. storms leave 2 dead in Va., 2 million without power
Obama and Romney take stage for first debate
Assad Accuses US of Fueling Syrian Uprising
Complaints in Russian election mount
Iran and world powers set for nuclear talks
5 die in strikes on Gaza, militants barrage Israel
Navy jet crashes into Virginia apartments,9 hurt
British soldier killed in southern Afghanistan
Spain's jobless claims hit new high
Roadside bomb kills 5 Afghan policemen
Turkey scrambles jets to Syrian border
Supreme Court to hear corporate human rights case
Two year doping ban for Contador
The Presidential Planner - The White House Science Fair
Syria gunmen kill three Syrian officers: NGO
Malawi confirms President Mutharika's death
China rocked by twin earthquakes
Bank of England deputy denies ordering rate-rigging
Libya postpones landmark election to July 7
Red Cross negotiating Syria ceasefire to bring aid
Syrian forces, rebels clash near Turkey
German parliament endorses Greek bailout
Bombings, clashes as Syria opposition seeks arms
London 2012 Olympics: Opening Ceremony to be a 'green and pleasant land', says Danny Boyle
Burma activists say go slow on easing sanctions
Facebook mobile gains drive revenue growth: reaction
'India police name 3 Iranians in embassy attack'
Heavy fighting rocks eastern Syria - residents
China yuan retreats to 6.2697 against USD Thursday
5 wounded in Ohio school shooting
Indonesia police shoot dead suspected militants in Bali
Romney concedes election to Obama in phone call
Armenia's parliamentary vote a test for president
Pakistan blocks Twitter over 'blasphemy'
Annan to visit Syrian refugees in Turkey before Iran
Venezuelan leader returning to Cuba for treatment
MP Sachin Tendulkar says no to govt bungalow
Best’s great day brings West Indies cheer
U.S. Navy Jet Crashes Into Virginia Apartment Buildings
Romney wins Illinois primary
Yahoo names Google exec Mayer as CEO
US soldier accused of killing Afghan civilians identified
5.9-magnitude quake hits Sunda Strait, Indonesia: USGS
US designates Haqqani network as terrorists
Button boasts best time after first practice
Rangers voted into third division
Syrian ceasefire brings uneasy calm
Newark mayor rescues neighbor from burning house
Abduct Israelis to free prisoners, Gaza leaders say
A day of rage in Bahrain
DealBook: Stock Exchanges Prepare to Open
China's industrial output growth slows to 9.2 pct in July
Homs offensive kills 200
Funeral set for Ohio shooting victim
Bombs in Thailand kill 14, wound 340
Somalia lawmakers to vote for new president
French gunman wants to 'die with weapons in hands'
10 rockets in 20 minutes in Eshkol Regional Council
May Day marked by protests against austerity cuts
Rebels kill two park rangers in eastern Congo
Trade: Pakistan, India agree to take it a step ahead
At least 73 die in Egyptian soccer pitch invasion
Southwest China quakes kill at least 50
Hurricane Sandy reaches Jamaica
Gazans fire four rockets into Israel; no injuries
Remarks With Foreign Minister Koichiro Gemba
Iraq Said to Release Hezbollah Operative
Pakistan avalanche: rescuers search for buried soldiers
Obama aide holds talks in China after Syria veto
Geagea also discussed the elections in Ba'bda 'Alay,
Parliament Deputy Walid Junblatt released a set of statements that can be read as indicators of what the situation will lead to
The visit by de Vries to the Philippines is part of his Asian tour, which will also include Australia, Thailand and Indonesia.
It is said that suicide by hanging is the easiest, quickest method and least expensive and not requiring anyone else, this is not to speak of less pain. In comparison
The Front said in a statement: " it challenges these results and they're not recognized.
mexico wishes to avoid more violence.
spain currently holds the osce's presidency.
the cfe treaty was signed in 1990.
gorgich and pashtoon were executed for trafficking heroin in sistan-baluchestan province.
djamel badaoui was sentenced to five years.
uranium is a radioactive material which is the primary basis for generating dirty weapons of mass destruction and terrorism.
fulvio berghella stated that the digital worm named sq hell has a very high capacity to replicate itself and the digital worm named sq hell is slowing down the poste italiane computer network and making some computers inoperable.
ingo kober stated that some nations had stronger intellectual property rights than others.
russian investigators stated that the british company was a cia cover.
russian parliament voted unanimously to suspend russia's participation in the conventional forces in europe (cfe) treaty.
the united states and other nato members have refused ratify the amended treaty until russia completely withdraws from moldova and georgia.
russia would not hesitate to increase military strength along russian borders if the need arises.
the center will formally open in 2009.
the police officers surrounded the slums north of rio de janeiro to rid them of violent drug traffickers and seize weapons and drugs.
the second proposal was that regional and international non-proliferation issues should be addressed through dialogue and negotiations.
a bombing occurred in afghanistan but police have not yet stated who is responsible.
the cyber attacks follow russian military strikes launched against georgia late last week.
switzerland's trade and diplomatic relations with the islamic republic have been criticized in recent months after foreign minister micheline calmy-rey traveled to tehran in march 2008 to sign a gas deal.
the conventional forces in europe treaty was signed by russian and nato members in 1990.
the african union has proposed a peacekeeping mission to aid the struggling transitional government in stabilizing somalia, particularly after the withdrawal of ethiopian forces.
u.n. experts have begun analyzing reports that state the syrian government was concealing a nuclear facility at the attacked site.
methamphetamine is also known as ice.
the global community must cooperate to end illicit trade of small arms and light weapons.
religious extremism continues in pakistan despite the banning of militant groups by the pakistani government.
antonov spoke the day before a conference on the conventional forces in europe treaty.
president vladimir putin signed a decree suspending russia's participation in the conventional forces in europe treaty.
myanmar was formerly called burma.
puerto cabezas is located 557 km northeast of managua, nicaragua.
russia's decision to suspend participation in the cfe is a step in the wrong direction.
these human rights violations include summary executions, torture and the recruitment of child
general nikolai n. urakov is the longtime director of the the state scientific center of applied microbiology.
alstom is competing against japanese company shinkansen and german company ice for the contract.
the legislation is the most recent effort by japan to ascribe more freedom to the tightly controlled military technically known as a self-defense force.
south korea has had a bullet train system since the 1980s.
russia is a member of the nsg.
soviet-built a-135 missile defense system around moscow is obsolete and inefficient.
the iaea has been investigating iran's nuclear activities for 4 years.
zhang yan stated that all countries should abide by non-proliferation obligations in order to enhance mutual trust and create a sound environment for international cooperation in nuclear energy.
alstom may sign a contract to build a high-speed rail link between beijing and shanghai.
the drug has been around in other forms for years.
the accord said that there were no remaining issues and ambiguities regarding iran's nuclear program and activities.
beijing police apprehended more than 20 people in suspicion of using and trafficking drugs in 2 downtown bars.
russia has ratified the amended version but the united states and other nato members have refused to do so until the russian government withdraws troops from the former soviet republics of moldova and georgia.
violence continues despite conflicting opinion on the extent of damage suffered by the rebel groups.
helmand province is the world's largest producer of opium.
police stated that-- chung has been on the run.
2 of the zambians arrested are juveniles.
mexican president felipe calderon has sent 2800 special agents and soldiers to sinaloa to fight drug trafficking.
russia suspended its participation in a key european arms control treaty that governs deployment of troops in europe.
the osce meeting was held in madrid.
the cfe treaty was established in 1990.
iran insists that its nuclear program is for peaceful purposes
china is an important force for promoting world development.
north korea denies involvement in any syrian nuclear project.
chinese authorities were not immediately available for comment.
kim myong-chol stated that north korea would retaliate with a nuclear missile attack on major cities such as new york and washington dc.
the islamic republic is the most prolific applier of the death penalty in the world after china.
at un assembly chinese government urges increased efforts toward global arms control and disarmament.
the treaty was amended in 1999 to reflect changes since the soviet breakup.
kashmir is claimed by both india and pakistan.
china will resolutely oppose the proliferation of mass destructive weapons.
western countries' failure to sufficiently compensate libya will deter iran and north korea from disarming.
russia ratified the updated treaty in 2004.
a staff of 30 specialists will conduct research and training on cyber warfare.
jamaat-i-islami's youth wing's demonstration was against a us attack on iraq.
the islamic republic is the most prolific applier of the death penalty in the world after china.
china has always opposed the proliferation of weapons of mass destruction.
a breakdown of order in china will be worse than in afghanistan or yugoslavia.
north korea has boasted of nuclear ambitions and north korea is now reported to have missiles trained on
tskhinvali is the capital of georgia.
the us and allies have accused iran of attempting to develop nuclear weapons under the guise of a civilian nuclear program.
abuja is the capital of
during armed clashes in southeastern iran police seized nearly 5 metric tons (5.5 tons) of opium and morphine.
iran insists that its nuclear program is for peaceful purposes
china will resolutely oppose the means of the delivery of mass destructive weapons.
north korea is a reclusive state.
shalgam's visit to london is the first by a libyan foreign minister since 1969.
it presents a major threat to global security.
syrian and russian officials signed an agreement of cooperation in combating drug trafficking.
russia imprisons people without evidence of illegal activity.
bruguiere stated-- restraining extremist groups particularly across europe was becoming increasingly difficult because of how the groups are financed.
khoramabad is a city in western iran.
iguaran stated that the detainees will be accused of homicide, criminal collaboration, kidnappings and the funding of terrorism.
experts stated that the rods could produce 3-6 atomic bombs in 6-8 months.
the international atomic energy agency plan draws out negotiations for many months.
myanmar government stated myanmar is on track to be drug-free by 2014.
the anti-defamation league took out full-page advertisments in swiss and international newspapers earlier in april 2008 accusing switzerland of funding terrorism through the deal.
britain provides fuel tanks and gearboxes.
capital offences in iran include murder, rape, armed robbery, serious drug trafficking and adultery.
bae systems is the uk's largest military
u.s. secretary of state condoleezza rice demanded russia withdraw its forces.
the resolution includes a broadened list of individuals and entities subject to an assets freeze.
withdrawal from the conventional forces in europe treaty would allow russia to bolster forces near russian borders.
fan stated the commission will ensure the commitments are upheld once the investments are under way.
spokesman themba maseko stated as long as administrative papers are in order south africa cannot intervene to prevent weapons being transported through south african territory to zimbabwe.
the statement was posted on the kremlin web site and carried by state news agencies.
sistan-baluchestan borders afghanistan and pakistan.
the number of executions increased dramatically in 2007 amid a campaign which iranian authorities state is aimed at improving security in society.
syria denies the existence of an undeclared nuclear program.
the international institute for strategic studies is located in london.
the number of executions in iran in 2007 was calculated by an afp count compiled from press reports.
the iranian government says the nuclear program is peaceful.
donohue said it is very difficult to manipulate radioactive isotopes without leaving a trail.
lima is the capital of
the official spoke on condition of anonymity.
russia has repeatedly threatened withdrawal from the cfe in opposition to plans for the extension of the us missile defense shield to eastern europe.
the plan for nigeria and mozambique is the creation an electronic database for real estate.
china has been praised especially by the asia-pacific states for efforts to resolve the korean peninsula nuclear issue.
russian officials stated that russia will not reconsider the suspension.
arms smugglers and drug cartels abet terrorists.
the purpose of the new law is to remove any legal obstacles to building more advanced spy satellites and to encourage innovation in japans's space industry.
zhang yan stated that china opposes using non-proliferation as a pretext for restricting and depriving non-nuclear-weapon states of the right to peaceful use of nuclear energy.
senior fellow at the international institute for strategic studies mark fitzpatrick stated that-- the international atomic energy agency plan is superficial.
the conventional forces in europe treaty limits the number of military aircraft, tanks and other non-nuclear heavy weapons in europe.
officials in estonia including prime minister andrus ansip have claimed that some of the cyber attacks came from russian government computers including computers in the office of russian president vladimir putin.
the uk agreed to supply saudi arabia with typhoon jets in a deal worth an estimated 8 billion pounds (approximately 13.9 billion us dollars) to the uk defense company bae systems.
the poppies yielded the raw ingredient for heroin.
south korea has so far taken a cautious stance on the issue of the north korean nuclear reactor project.
in a statement the british ministry of defense stated-- the agreement aims to establish wider cooperation covering national security and the fight against global terrorism.
many of the people executed are hanged in public.
the united states and some european nations believe that iran's nuclear projects are for the purpose of making nuclear weapons.
the cfe is a cornerstone of european security.
indian troops already fighting rebels are now also engaged in a massive operation to destroy poppy crops in kashmir.
the iaea report is restricted.
nato regrets russia's decision to suspend participation in the cfe.
the u.s., other western nations and nato demanded a cease-fire.
drug traffickers from foreign countries constitute the largest percentage of foreign inmates in nepal.
the court accused raghad saddam hussein of funding terrorism.
myanmar's military rulers incinerated the drugs to mark the international day against drug abuse and illicit trafficking.
the number of executions increased in iran last year amid a campaign that is aimed at improving security in society.
india accuses pakistan of funding and training the cross-border guerrillas.
an ensuing battle killed at least 10 militants.
the panamanian foreign ministry communique stated that panama and brazil signed 3 juridical-issue treaties that included an extradition
vietnam's drug laws are among the world's strictest laws.
india has prohibited direct or indirect export and import of all items, materials, goods and technology that could contribute to iran's nuclear weapons delivery systems.
the vietnam news agency reported that the ministry of public security stated that police admitted that drug trafficking into vietnam is increasing but actions to prevent and stop the drug trafficking along the borders remained limited.
saferworld team leader on transfer controls and small arms roy isbister stated that -- the eu embargo explicitly states that no military equipment should be supplied either directly or indirectly for use in myanmar.
the united states and other nato members have refused to do ratify the updates cfe.
the treaty limits deployments of tanks and troops in nato and former easter european warsaw pact countries and establishes confidence-building, transparency and cooperation measures between member
drug-trafficking activity is rampant in the southeastern part of the balkan peninsula.
this is the last chance to build security in the middle east based on trust and cooperation rather than on the possession of nuclear arms.
the international atomic energy agency insists that the iranian government's simple denials of the intelligence presented to the international atomic energy agency board are not good enough to allay western countries suspicions.
the treat was originally signed in 1990.
the conventional forces in europe treaty was a key soviet-era arms control treaty.
nicaragua commemorated the 25th anniversary of the sandinista revolution.
10 kurds are under investigation in france on suspicion of money-laundering for a terrorist organization known as kurdistan workers' party (pkk).
the osce meeting lasted two days.
105 inmates are serving sentences for drug trafficking.
after talks at nato headquarters baluyevsky repeated russia's opposition to u.s. plans to install antimissile defenses in europe and dismissed u.s. assertions that the interceptors were needed to defend against potential threats from iran.
hong kong universities have collaborated with tertiary education, business and government sectors of mainland china to direct training programs and research centers to promote research commercialization and technology transfer.
the ecuadorian foreign ministry said in a statement that delegates from the organization for the prohibition of chemical weapons (opaq) will also take part in the meeting.
since 2006 mexico has adopted a series of measures against drug trafficking and organized crimes.
the statement did not specify how many warheads the missile can carry.
it presents a major threat to global security.
nicaragua has not reconciled how to approach the anniversary of the sandinista revolution.
russian president vladimir putin states that the decision is a response to u.s. plans to establish missile defense sites in eastern europe and to nato's failure to ratify an amended version of the treaty.
a hp/detijd journalist learned about tno's chemical weapons experiments from the defense ministry's archives.
government-affiliated hackers in china are at the forefront of a burgeoning cyber cold war.
the treaty limits the number of aircraft, tanks and other non-nuclear heavy weapons around europe.
estonian officials stated that the attacks originated in russia.
bulgarian police arrest head of drug trafficking group.
ozawa said that if japan rises to the occasion then japan will never be beaten even in terms of military power.
syria has signed the nuclear nonproliferation treaty and has allowed agency experts to inspect its only known nuclear facility.
france is a leader in the european space agency.
myanmar has a military junta.
dozens of such criminals have been hanged in public.
the amnesty international report was compiled by european and international non-governmental forums.
the report said there are 27 weak states that pose a threat to britain's national security as the states could provide bases for terrorists.
iran insists that its nuclear program is for peaceful purposes
members of the proliferation security initiative are considering ways of intercepting ships or aircraft suspected of carrying weapons of mass destruction.
the third proposal was that countries should advance with the times and seek a fair, reasonable and effective way to enhance the nuclear non-proliferation regime through broad consultation.
the amnesty international report was titled indian helicopters for myanmar: making a mockery of the eu arms embargo?
the defendants smuggled more than 11 kilograms (24 pounds) of heroin.
court official tran dao stated the 12 people were among 29 people convicted by the quang ninh people's court of participating in a drug ring that trafficked heroin from vietnam to china.
durban port authorities and police explosives inspectors could not be reached for comment.
china stressed that opposition of weaponization and an arms race in outer space.
france, belgium, germany, sweden, italy and britain provide parts and technology for the advanced light helicopter that india plans to sell to myanmar.
illegal arms trafficking has increased in kenya and raised concern about security.
mohanty stated that the upgrade will be done soon as it has almost been finalised by the defense research and development organisation, hindustan aeronautics limited and the indian air force.
elbaradei was quoted as saying that a peace deal between israel and its arab neighbors must be reached in parallel with a security agreement based on eradicating all weapons of mass destruction from the region.
afghan drug trafficker was caught in tajikistan.
the international atomic energy agency is the u.n.'s nuclear watchdog.
wen stated that the purpose of his visit to germany is to advance trade, economic and technological exchanges.
hill is the head american negotiator on north korea's nuclear weapons program.
during the clash 7 seven police officers were killed and 4 seriously wounded.
defense chiefs from estonia, latvia, lithuania, germany, italy, spain and slovakia signed the agreement.
the bill for the new law was already approved by the japanese government's lower house last week.
van der merwe suspended geiges' sentence to 5 years imprisonment.
bam is a city in southeastern
putin warned that russia would take retaliatory actions.
china has stated that the united states pressure on china to stop and search north korean ships could trigger military clashes.
unger stated brazil's new national defense plan calls for establishing partnerships with countries including russia and france to build a state-of-the-art weapons industry.
some of the accused will also be charged with money laundering, tax evasion and corruption.
the alh's arsenal includes-- rocket launchers from belgium rockets, guns and engines from france brake systems from italy fuel tanks and gearboxes from britain self-protection equipment from a swedish company.
indian defense ministry has increased defense spending for new purchases by 33 percent.
the killers escaped.
the conventional forces in europe treaty was amended in 1999.
sheik doon salad ilmi stated that civilian casualties resulting from overnight mortar and rocket attacks are admitted to the hospital nearly every day.
the cfe is 1 of several issues negatively impacting russia's relations with the united states and europe.
the resolution says that the high level of readiness increases the risk of the use of such weapons and that the unintentional or accidental use would have catastrophic consequences.
blix was visiting new zealand and said that it is essential that greater efforts be made to eliminate nuclear arms and weapons of mass destruction.
the areva group is the world's largest nuclear engineering firm.
the area near town of mirjaveh has been the scene of frequent conflicts between iranian police and drug smugglers.
physicist valentin danilov was found guilty of selling classified information on space technology to china.
myanmar is the world's largest producer of illicit opium according to the latest u.s. state department anti-narcotics report.
the abductee support group will use the survey to press parliament to pass new laws.
francisco santos stated that colombian police found the evidence on two computers discovered with raul reyes.
grenell is spokesman for the u.s. mission to the united nations.
a siemens spokesman in germany stated that heinrich von pierer stated that gerhard schroeder stated that gerhard schroeder is not against the sale of the plutonium-processing facility in principle.
vietnam's drug laws are among the world's strictest laws.
governance institutions have been ineffective for a long time in somalia.
putin stated that russia could discard the treaty entirely if western nations refuse to ratify its amended version.
russia ratified the amended treaty.
the osce discussed kazakhstan's bid to hold the osce presidency in 2009.
mohammed elbarade is the international atomic energy agency's director general.
the nuclear nonproliferation treaty is reviewed every 5 years.
chinese foreign ministry spokesman qin gang was asked to respond to cheney's speech on china's military development.
the plant will be constructed next to an existing plant also supplied by china and operational since 1999.
nato considers cyber attacks a growing threat to military and civilian computer networks.
abe urged more assertive foreign policy for japan and the international community.
in a statement naif arab academy for security sciences announced-- it will sponsor a 2-week workshop for 50 anti-terrorism experts.
80 percent of the opposition democratic party supports economic sanctions.
iran is an islamic republic .
suspected islamic militants with alleged al-qaida links have been arrested in malaysia and singapore.
in september 2007 the united states signed an accord with jordan aimed at supporting the peaceful development of jodran's new nuclear program.
according to the statement the prototype rs-24 rocket is unlike the topol-m in that it is equipped with multiple independently targetable warheads to overwhelm defense systems.
zahedan is the capital of sistan-baluchestan province.
iran lies on a major drug trafficking route between afghanistan and europe, as well as the persian gulf states.
the u.s. plans have angered the russian government.
p5+1 members are britain, china, france, russia, germany and the united states.
jordanian prime minister maaruf bakhit said in july 2006 that raghdad hussein and her family were living under the protection of king abdullah ii after iraq issued its
a siemens spokesman in germany refrained from commenting on the political aspect of the sale of the plutonium-processing facility.
the cyber attack occurred after french president nicolas sarkozy's meeting with exiled tibetan spiritual leader the dalai lama.
south africa's foreign ministry stated that south africa's foreign military assistance act prohibits the recruitment of people inside or outside of south africa for mercenary or foreign military assistance.
france is a leader in the european space agency.
the north korean government stated if the south korean government participates in the proliferation security initiative program it would result in unspecified catastrophic consequences.
lee stated that the coa has spent the past several years setting up relevant mechanisms and drafting a set of promotional measures to enhance development of china's knowledge-based agriculture and applications of agricultural technology.
the agreements were signed during iranian majlis (parliament) speaker gholam-ali haddad-adel's visit to cuba.
tibet suspects chinese government of launching the attack.
godzhayev and godzhayev's lawyers were not immediately available to comment.
the western governments include the united states and france.
the chinese government has strictly censored china's chemical imports and exports according to the law in recent years.
afriforum stated that the group would organize protests along the route to zimbabwe.
the cfe treaty does not duly protect the russian federation's security interests.
ahmad lodged a formal complaint with the independent police complaints commission alleging that british police concocted intelligence reports to implicate ahmad in terror activities and desecrated ahmad's copy of the islamic holy book the koran by putting the koran on the floor during a search of ahmad's home.
the united states and other nato members have refused to ratify the amended version until russia withdraws troops from former soviet republics moldova and georgia.
the united states and the allies of the united states believe iran is pursuing nuclear arms.
paris is the capital of france.
one indian government official who studied the blueprints stated the science was old and dated but still functional.
amending regulations on dual-use nuclear technology will prevent nuclear terrorism.
in 2002 japanese prime minister junichiro koizumi attended an summit in north korea with north korean leader kim jong il.
the opposition japanese communist party was against the bill proposing the new law.
some officials stated the task would be difficult for asean members because of varied legal and political systems.
iraq's new leaders have been lobbying for the united nations security council to stop using the iraq's oil revenue to pay the salaries of the inspectors and to have all money remaining in the united nation's oil-for-food account transferred to the iraqi government.
the cfe treaty is a key european arms control treaty.
helmand province is the world's largest producer of opium.
the united states said it would stand up to nuclear blackmail and has ruled out negotiations.
the meetings lasted 2 days.
the ministers from china, laos, india, myanmar and thailand will discuss how to find markets for goods produced under crop substitution and other related programs such as eco-tourism and handicraft manufacturing.
china is a permanent member of the un security
north korea is currently in the process of dismantling its nuclear weapons program.
according to court documents -- on 25 july australian television reporter peter lloyd faced 3 new drug charges in singapore.
russian president vladimir putin signed a decree suspending russia's participation in the conventional forces in europe treaty due to circumstances that affect the security of the russian federation and require immediate measure.
spokesman for the swiss justice ministry folco galli stated that the extradition conditions stipulate that mejri can only be prosecuted on a single charge of falsifying documents for which italian authorities could provide sufficient evidence to prosecute.
the attacks occurred after a dispute between the governments of russia and estonia over the relocation of a soviet war memorial.
israel remains outside the treaty.
russia is a member of the quartet on the middle east.
warned that russia would withdraw from the treaty if western nations refuse to ratify its amended version.
this was particularly after ethiopia withdraws its forces.
iranian officials have increased executions in 2007 as officials enforce a campaign purportedly aimed at promoting virtue and boosting security in society.
the rapist was identified as hossein safarlou and had also been convicted of drug trafficking.
neighboring kyrgyzstan has also experienced raids by taliban-backed islamic militants in recent years.
it is a serious threat to international security.
the dans stated the gang engaged in illegal activities including racketeering, blackmail, arms smuggling, cigarette smuggling and money laundering.
the state scientific center of applied microbiology has been working with western scientists to convert the complex into a biomedical manufacturing site.
the international atomic energy agency is based in
the official stated that this was a complete technology transfer.
105 inmates are serving sentences for drug trafficking.
russia's suspension of obligations under the cfe treaty is temporary.
executive director of the arms control association in washington daryl kimball stated the israeli document could affect the debate over india.
the treaty is one of several issues causing tense relations between the governments of russia and the u.s. and europe.
korobeynichev's laboratory worked with other scientific institutes.
lugar and nunn awarded the prime minister a medal.
russian military officials stated the decision would depend on whether the united states proceeds with its plan to deploy missile defense components in poland and the czech republic.
the agreement was signed during a regular meeting of chiefs of defense staff from the 26 nato allies.
in early may 2002 the philippines, malaysia and indonesia signed an agreement to share terrorism intelligence.
leaders from albania, bosnia and herzegowina, croatia, macedonia and serbia and montenegro met for the first time with european union leaders to pursue joining the european union.
resolution 1540 requires all countries to adopt laws to prevent non-state actors from manufacturing, acquiring or trafficking in nuclear, biological or chemical weapons, the materials to make them, and the missiles and other systems to deliver them.
international atomic energy association is the united nations watchdog.
there is much work to be done.
the report urged belgium to begin immediate talks with india in order to prevent future weapons sale to myanmar.
capital offenses in iran include murder, rape, armed robbery, serious drug trafficking and adultery.
saudi arabia is an absolute monarchy and has a consultative council appointed by the government.
kamynin said there will be an exchange of opinions on topical international and regional matters based on a joint working relationship at the heart of the un.
a visit to libya by the russian foreign minister was announced.
indian and pakistani governments each conducted nuclear tests in may 1998.
iguaran stated that the detainees were also involved in the murders of police members of an anti-kidnapping group.
1 suspected extremist was provisionally released without bail.
the accused will be charged with international drug trafficking.
north korea should not act further to aggravate the situation.
Also, who's to say there aren't testimonies from "real" health experts on there?
Then the captain came back.
The problem is simple.
PACIFIC REQUIREMENTS .
I am moving on to ask you the question: " Where ' s the beef " ?
You're asking me to prove a negative?
I AM OK WITH MEDICAL USE!!
The prices of everything you own IE assets have gone down.
A WAR in the middle east.
Originally Posted by zaf I give up.
Imagine a place with % men and % women.
there is no chance at a fair trial.
Nirvana is NOT oblivion.
Originally Posted by zaf We in Britain think differently to Americans.
If you answer no to but yes to then you are probably straight.
Who does it now only produce enough for billion?
Appropriate deferments for the time, eh?
**smooches Ran** Hey, Blue-Eyes, How's things in London?
but it seems it would have less "impact" if they didn't call him white.
According to Zimmerman he did.
My teachers have told me it is bad for you.
Originally Posted by Odins eye .Nazi is a slang term for the NSWP.
This is why I support the death penalty.
Well, whatever, you're aware of it now.
Think about all the things you can't "eat, wear, or live in".
Matt Holliday owns, y'all.
People bent the laws.
And here I thought I knew me some math.
I have years of "Neener Neener" rights Hi Wiggies!
You should stop prefixing or suffixing everything with you hate Jews.
I wood have at least asked if a threesome was out of the question.
It's you who makes no sense.
More expensive cars.
Zimmerman replied, "What are you doing here?"
SUBJECTIVE DVORAK INTENSITY ESTIMATES FROM TAFB AND SAB INCREASED TO KT.
"Satyrs don't exist" - fine.
That's what I find curious.
I compared homo phobia with a developmental disorder.
If you asked , progressives, the numbers would be skewed to the left.
I didn't mention restraining order either.
Eye of the Tiger We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
 warmed.C from the year prior.
Holy poo poo, this show.
their great wealth is protected by the govt.
Fundamental difference?
How exactly are they being punished?
You claimed Zimmerman " Stalked him down, then shot him ".
God bless I'm not outraged, I'm disappointed.
Where does the money come from in the first place?
If freedom of speech has consequences then it is not free.
My teachers have told me it is bad for you.
As to would I kill person to save , I have no idea.
It's imposing a law.
Depends on how you define "extreme".
Mexico has ZERO claim to California.
personally i would read the bible to learn about christianity.
Ha, ha, ha, ha, ha, ha!
Still refusing to answer my questions?
You have to much intervention in free markets, not too little.
You could sign Lance Berkman at the end of the year I guess?
Why would the addition of more of Jesus words be left out of the canon?
You mean, you believe the word of the SpringHallConvert?
We are meant to move.
That Israel doesn't giva a **** what anybody else thinks.
I Want to Rock and Roll by Kiss We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
A dear friend from Ohio sent me this.
The new study shows that the Titanic story does not stand up to scrutiny imo.
Who makes money off google ad sense?
The bottom line is that the video clip doesn't show a gas chamber.
Warmer , almost certainly a record.
"Opinionated and stubborn" becomes treat with drugs".
What's your definition of nature?
Could be a simple mistake.
No extortion, no bribery, no money involved Only class E felonies.
Neander's revised version"?
Should I just wait it out and see how it goes?
PACIFIC REQUIREMENTS .
you have no witnesses for a missile at the pentagon.
I can't believe she is asking YOU to ask the helpful party guest for money!
Any woman that wants and abortion can get one.
Yes, it's legal to grow.
Pressing one does send a tone.
What was my opinion of Firefly in the interim?
Chuck Close We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
He definently has supporters.
Thus, ultimate sovereignty.
no, it's not an answer.
The Nazis lowered the minimum age to buy a firearm from to .
We can't do it without you."
No healthy person needs sex.
If it isn't a person, then WTF is it?
Do you see Obama calling for Cut, Cap and Balance?
"Elves don't exist" - fine.
i started it last night xanis.
Gotta love the EK factoid that "Iran is also a signed of the NPT and the IAEA.
"Satyrs don't exist" - fine.
Best way to turn it on its head is to get money out.
I have years of "Neener Neener" rights they are crack ups.
@NickFun, Has anyone heard from Dutchy?
Elementary Commodity-Capital Value-Form .
Therefore you are not a Christian.
I repeat: And the simple fact today?
and morals and honesty have everything to do with it.
You're such a bad person!"
- wolf I think stories like this are stupid.
TROPICAL CYCLONE FORMATION IS NOT EXPECTED.
Do you not understand what the word 'led' implies?
There is no freedom of speech.
Originally Posted by SolInvictus Ah.
How long after the obliteration should it no longer bother the kid?
Men and women are different yes?
As far as legality goes I can use jury nullification.
Facilitator : And why is she the dumb child?
Isn't that redundant and repetetive?
Originally Posted by Vienna To 'say' what?
Jingle Bell Rock by Bobby Helm We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
Other people have no confidence at all in teh people running these institutions.
It finished as a work of fiction.
If it wasn't alive, then it would miscarriage on it's own.
Hi Ollie: That is absolutely amazing.
Imagine a place that's % white and % black.
If freedom of speech has consequences then it is not free.
"Leprechauns don't exist" - fine.
Please, what about them are not true.
is even worse than talking about it and not doing anything.
"Being against using nukes" means "not wanting to use nukes".
My great niece is half black.
The Japanese population is nearly million.
We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
I hope everything is ok!
Those may be my top . The money I spent adopting Velociraptor.
GL, Terral Hi Corn: So, you actually believe every word of what Terral wrote?
It's not how it was sold, gb.
I'd hate to be him too.
Of course there were no weapons.
It's amusing to think it even might be true.
Again, personal responsibility.
And to be fair, do you notice the nonsensical things you are saying?
Does the census have an rear end in a top hat?
Where is the slant against Bush?
That's simple logic If it wasn't bollocks it wouldn't be homeopathy.
I've never accused him of doctoring a baseball.
The bailout was bigger than TARP This title is misleading.
officers have told me its bad for you.
His position is the way it is currently.
PACIFIC REQUIREMENTS .
You have never met anyone that is Pro-Abortion?
I have many problems with these men, way to many to state here!
No has has shut down the oil fields.
i don't want a president who is charasmatic.
I don't have a proposed model.
no missile witnesses.
officers have told me its bad for you.
I have the pregnancy ticker.
Then he is malevolent.
tin foil hat for the sarg, what size do u wear?
Or the year old boy shot dead with automatic weapons by marijuana dealers.
If your stick hits a guy in the face, you're getting a penalty.
ALL of the electrical energy ultimately comes from the alternator.
How many passengers said they saw an iceberg?
Imagine a place that's % white and % black.
It assumes that methane growth rate accelerates by .%/yr.
get a cooling trend from because of the recent decline.
Landon Memory from CATS We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
They are NOT as sovereign as they were before.
Out of touch and untrustworthy?
In fact, it's just the Dutch.
@Lustig Andrei, We're talking about angels and common pins again, right?
slanted blogs And when did I do that?
How much is spent on abortions services?
Did the transaction take place?
There is no more sperm cell.
Anyway, welcome back.
I don't know why anyone is making a fuss over the $, bet.
I haven't made any claims.
Ergo it offends me when Thatcherites call themselves libertarian.
the problem is who doesn't have money.
I don't believe there was any iceberg at all anywhere near the Titanic.
Gameday for the orioles game is frozen for me.
If so, alot of inventors, writers should take prescription drugs..
Yes what are his charges.
Was Ted Bundy a partial psychopath?
ooo strike TWO those who ignore history are doomed to repeat it.
its not an official deployment.
Nutrax The plural of anecdote is not data
not well Alright just got in.
I haven't read the books, but I saw the movie today.
This is the Moloch scene.
@edgarblythe, So Lyndon Johnson and John Kennedy were compatible?
You need to polish up on your logic skills.
The one that has three walks home and beats his wife.
and i'd forgotten what a whiny little bed wetter you are.
OMG, "Einstein didn't go to college."
Income tax, top rate: percent.
Being drunk is unacceptable.
He hasn't been funny since Larry Bud Melman was on the show.
Therefore, the universe has an explanation of its existence.
------ ----------- What do we get in return for doing the fighting for them?
And I don't fight for marriage.
If they were Catholics, I would call them Catholics.
She was a nice lady.
Why hate people because they are successful?
You seem as irritated as Henry.
Hilited your common sense/deductive reasoning thing.
-CryptoLutheran No. We have a Christian in office right now.
Ann Romney has never had to get out and be a part of the workforce.
It has never been ejaculated on as far as I know.
I said YOU had gotten soft.
Most times, % of the time, we are getting what we expect.
Ben, Stop trying to find excuses for the man.
So, short form, yes, it probably is different in different countries.
The physical evidence does not support your claim.
But he said EVERY level.
I ask again if God does not exist can anything be morally wrong?
It is mostly just the Dutch.
Eye of the Tiger We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
Nothing is stopping this thing from playing out in court.
Commiting a crime in a gang is a crime.
Chuck I'd offer Iran a deal.
Opinions are different.
It's imposing a law.
One word: Zombies Has Annie ever used her sexuality like that?
LIBERTARIAN/ANARCHO-CAPITALISM: You have two cows.
Why do people like you put scientist on a pedestal?
I then asked: What are they trying to hide?
That would make you a sort of accessory, I think.
"Would you like to wear your seatbelt?"
to repeat: They are NOT as sovereign as they were before.
I don't see him as evil at all.
We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
The point is an unarmed child was murdered who was black.
Martin said, "Why are you following me?"
Religion that doesn't do that I don't have a problem with.
If I'm hyper active, it will show up in one of those scans..
If you want to buy a house or a SUV, again, who cares?
Everyone in the world at the current "prosperity" level of Northwest Africa.
If you answer no to but yes to then you are probably straight.
Sometimes I, too, fantasise about bending people before my demented will.
My Sheriff has told me its bad for you.
It's also a stellar performer in terms of blithering idiocy.
How would Martin or anyone else know his intentions based on his actions?
"Get the government into everything?"
Hilited your common sense/deductive reasoning thing.
I've assumed this as well in my argument.
Jury nullification means a law isn't Constitutional?
I'm "a bunch of cells."
Mann's work and the HS was all about Tree rings.
I'm so sorry, Kelly.
I don't like many flavored drinks.
I hope your LO is ok.
Any woman that wants and abortion can get one.
Do you see Hitler killing Jews?
Your good friend Mitt.
Doesnt mean its a BAD option.
You need to reread what I wrote.
Imagine a place that's % white and % black.
My kids busted in and said 'whats that Dad?'
Jay My ex-fiance wouldn't use the VA or Navy doctor's.
The Judges orders a three-page letter to be filed.
@Lustig Andrei, Thank you, Lustig.
This breaks the daily record of set in .
Martin said, "Why are you following me?"
So, I don't know how legitimate this is but yeah.
Hasn't council tax been frozen for most people?
Your misogyny is getting messy.
Nah, that's not how it works.
buwhahahaha Breathe In, Breathe Out, Move On.
wait for the contractions to get stronger and closer together.
Obama is part of the extreme leftwing.
@Cyracuz, What you want to call it is up to you.
Jury nullification means a law isn't Constitutional?
What conviction would that be?
Furthermore I found this: So I actually read the OP and guess what I found out.
The government doesnt have to declare you married before you can be married.
Democracy has nothing to do with liberty.
How many threads do you plan on making?
So which system isn't working for us?
Particularly after stating that marriage is a fundamental human right.
Russians in Damascus!
Er, that's not how dilution works.
I don't think what she's saying is that controversial.
Chaos is merely people voting.
Originally Posted by eleanor.ellis
The theme song to Cheers: We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
They are NOT as sovereign as they were before.
and morals and honesty have everything to do with it.
i be having conversations will cornell west What the hell is this?
There is no "WAR" in the middle east.
- I didnt say he planned on apprehending him.
Put a Little Love in your Heart We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
I'm "a bunch of cells."
You are a girl douche.
No. Jury nullification does not mean that a law is unconstuitutional.
voted Voted It's definitely NOT what it used to be.
The manufacturer has to convince the government it's safe.
Again I think you are missing the point on the Twain quote.
"Goblins don't exist" - fine.
He stated that it was a mental illness in , how is that bigotry?
Play With Fire We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
And, Obama gets zero credit for the budget under him.
Or sin is removed upon entry to heaven.
How long after the obliteration should it no longer bother the kid?
Say What You Will We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
What will be the response in California?
See that makes no sense.
Refresh your memory: Who supposedly operated the homicidal gas chambers?
If the universe has an explanation of its existence, that explanation is God.
Genetic predisposition to Alzheimer is inferior genetics.
And to be fair, do you notice the nonsensical things you are saying?
Use of force by aggressor.
That's what the historical record shows.
The theme song to Cheers: We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
In fact, it's just the Dutch.
I like watching kids play.
@sozobe, I think Santorum's more likely than Gingrich.
Why are they looking at each other like that ?!?!
Are you driving a fucking Volt?
Irreligion that doesn't do that I don't have a problem with.
Would he be better for American society?
again, this is not a constitutional issue.
Hi Eots: YOU FOOLS..bought the cover-up..hook..
"Pressing the number one does English."
What conviction where you talking about before?
Originally Posted by objectivism Not wishful thinking, rather realistic.
The point you quote should say "I never said rehabilitation could never work."
Did anyone see the footage of this?
Red Fox standing by.
That just isn't how legal reasoning works.
You don't know if those factors account for the warming, or not.
He too notified Captain Lord.
Thus, Meta - System - atic Dialectic is Diachronico - Synchronic Dialectic.
Are you driving a fucking Volt?
Michigan IS a GOP controlled state.
 Foxe was mostly frozen.
@cicerone imposter, Frank, I observe and perceive.
Government spying on its own citizens, that's fine.
Landon And So This is Christmas We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
Lower than per cent but not very low.
It's not how it was sold, gb.
God probably does not exist.
buwhahahaha Breathe In, Breathe Out, Move On.
I think we all agree on the nature of the change.
The bad thing is there's space.
Ha, ha, ha, ha, ha, ha!
Your freedom of speech will be no more prohibited than it is today.
It is a question that needs to be answered.
I purport to value human life very highly.
The mosquitoes posts.
don't want a president that is compassionate.
Do you have anything to make it more compelling?
The point you quote should say "I never said rehabilitation could never work."
Time of the Season by the Zombies We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
Do we agree that they came down essentially in freefall?
Pro-choice people do not try to force an abortion on anyone.
Stop avoiding the question.
Haiti has been a shithole.
I don't believe there was any iceberg at all anywhere near the Titanic.
The worst part is that he's not even a Leafs fan!
I am hoping he is into a second term of office.
Voracek with the goal.
Sure, it is possible his home was affected, but not the school.
Because the people had awakened.
The California was a cargo ship.
And until they decide that, "the statute is presumed constitutional."
The ignorance is yours!
The people shouting for justice for Trayvon are all hypocrites.
How do you know which story is the right one?
Ah ha, ha, ha, ha, ha!
Natalie was a complete fool to have insulted their fan base.
Obama is Bush's fault.
I don't prefix or suffix everything with "you hate Jews."
Never, did I ever, did I say blacks were going to riot.
And you didn't have to.
John the Baptist was a Nazarite from birth.
Paul did not preach faith without works.
Everyone in the world at the current "prosperity" level of Northwest Africa.
Seismic data does not equal duration of collapse.
Originally Posted by Lone Fox And it's not all Iranian related either.
You might not like the positions he holds, but atleast he has them.
I absolutely do believe there was an iceberg in those waters.
This is rich coming from a conservative.
. Satan represents vengeance instead of turning the other cheek!
Just so long as the tax is paid.
Islam has always been political.
Originally posted by Vitchilo March is also the date for the uprising in CHINA.
I hope everything is okay.
Do you understand why non-US residents are also relevant to the statistics?
Respectfully submitted, Steve I have seen UFO over Warsaw in the past.
depending on which action furthers their lonny-tunes agenda.
So that you will admit and verify that I have made no claim.
His "friends" say that he was confronted by his car.
There is no war in the Middle east.
Pro-life also refers to just "opposition to abortion".
 - Income, top rate: percent.
The theme song to Cheers: We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
LOL, you are so ignorant.
Jingle Bell Rock by Bobby Helm We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
the problem is who doesn't have money.
Ford didn't accept taxpayer money to save the company.
The Hindus would say the same thing about the Bhagavad Ghita.
Then your confusion doesn't make me a liar either.
When Muslims are extreme it's terrorism.
Some believe not slaughtering the unborn is most important.
Atomic theory is not an opinion, not a belief.
You want others to decide over a woman body.
Where in the world is the MEDIA??
you have no remains of an A- at the pentagon.
For the trillionth time, I've never said rehabilitation doesn't work.
Everyone in the world at the current "prosperity" level of Northwest Africa.
my hair is pretty thing tho :/ woops!
And I don't fight for marriage.
People are responsible for their actions.
Did the transaction take place?
It's not the same thing.
Put a Little Love in your Heart We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
the problem is who doesn't have money.
It doesn't say that it didn't participate.
Look forward to seeing it!
Originally Posted by IZZY!
Candy - Thanks for starting us off today.
Except that they couldn't.
If I owe you a trillion dollars, you have a problem.
If a position is unverifiable; then it should be rejected.
Everyone in the world at the current "prosperity" level of Northwest Africa.
And, Obama gets zero credit for the budget under him.
Is there a test to own a firearm in the US?
I thought it was good, and I didn't find it confusing.
I ask again if God does not exist can anything be morally wrong?
To be unconsititutional means to violate the constitution.
Originally Posted by muslim girl its not a complete impossibility.
This is our country.
Originally Posted by zaf in the long term, yes.
Addie Joss Cone threw an game.
Edited by LashL: Edited to properly mask profanity in quoted post.
The quote you provide has nothing to do with jury nullification.
paranoid Got any proof?
you don't use the search button AT ALL, do you?
Paul doesn't have a shot.
Joy to the World We are all vessels filled with many wonders.
And to be fair, do you notice the nonsensical things you are saying?
What if they had a personal bias?
Specifically Gnostic.
And parts of the west coast.
We were talking about women as war bounty were we not?
Last night Japanese forces attacked the Philippine Islands.
What is your definition of "soul"?
Aye but they ARE responsible to their constituents.
The ideology was built around violent expansion and race superiority.
@ossobuco, Could this have been an enema?
taking advantage has the effect of reinforcing.
Op-Ed Columnist: Revolution Hits the Universities
In Hollywood Movies for China, Bureaucrats Want a Say
Bloomberg: Assault weapons ban is tough sell
Powerful Car Bomb Explodes Outside Afghan Intelligence Agency
What's in Feinstein's bill?
Opinionator: Misconceptions About Roe v. Wade
Smog cloud blankets Beijing
'American Taliban' wins right to group prayer
Hard Questions for Lance Armstrong
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Prospero Gallinari, a Terrorist, Is Dead at 62
The 46 Places to Go in 2013
With California Rebounding, Governor Pushes Big Projects
Global Update: A Genetic Link Found for Victims of Lethal Form of Leishmaniasis
Scores Dead as Fire Sweeps Through Nightclub in Brazil
U.S. man outsources job to China, surfs cat videos
Obama, Gun Policy and the N.R.A.
NRA draws heat for shooting game
Broken limbs, torn lives in Mali
Piers, guest clash over AR-15s
World Briefing | Europe: Norway: Cheese Fire Shuts Tunnel
Opinion: At Poly Prep, a Pedophile in Plain Sight
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Why we can't get enough Gosling (Duh!)
U.S. 'tough love' for Afghan troops
Charting a Post-Pollution Path for Cities - From London, 1952, through Beijing, 2013
Justice Thomas Breaks His Silence in Court
NATO: Patriot missile battery operational on Syrian border
What's wrong with the Dreamliner?
Richard Pryor and Dick Cheney Focus of Showtime Documentaries
A Milestone Looms for Farm-Raised Fish
Disruptions: Disruptions: Design Is Driving Technology Forward
Mickelson has a point on taxes
Pictures of the Day: Pakistan and Elsewhere
6 ways Vine's six seconds may change Twitter
?Selected Letters of William Styron?
Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify Against Cycling Officials
Bloomberg gives $1.1B to university
U.S. supported France's failed hostage rescue in Somalia
Op-Ed Columnist: Is Delhi So Different From Steubenville?
Mahony Shielded Abusive Priests, Documents Show
Djokovic: 3 Aussie wins in a row
Train Kills Man in 125th Street Subway Station
U.S. supported France's failed hostage rescue in Somalia
Microsoft's Windows 8 sales are big -- just not big enough
Aaron Swartz, Internet Activist, Dies at 26
Maybe There Is Such a Thing as Bad Publicity
Op-Ed Columnist: Revolution Hits the Universities
Op-Ed Contributor: Why We Must Help Save Mali
Talk: Ray Kurzweil Says We?re Going to Live Forever
Armstrong stripped of Olympic medal
Apple?s Profits Are Flat, and Stock Drops
Catholic hospital's lawyers argue fetus not a person
Opinion: U.S gets it wrong on Egypt, again
Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify Against Cycling Officials
This Life: Modifying a Child?s Behavior Without Resorting to Bribes ? This Life
Media Decoder Blog: New Video Game Features Disney and Pixar Mash-Ups
Dolphin Swimming in Gowanus Canal
Schumer Says He?s Satisfied With Hagel on Mideast
Producer of popular gun-related videos found fatally shot
Opinionator: Back When I Was Packing
?Bodega Clinicas? Draw Interest of Health Officials
Rome's Colosseum gives up secrets
Samsung profit soars to $6.6B record
Spanish police say seized items intended for Iran nuclear program
Economix Blog: Bruce Bartlett: Accounting for a $1 Trillion Platinum Coin
Urban Athlete: A Hotel Room Workout From Nicole Glor
Police deploy water cannon at Northern Ireland riot
Saudis defend maid's beheading
Video of stunt plane barely missing two people prompts FAA probe
IHT Rendezvous: The Clinton Doctrine of American Foreign Policy
Berlusconi Stirs Up Elections in Italy
Good grief! Charlie Brown actor charged
In the Subways, Geechee Dan?s Voice Stirs the Soul
CES: Young people are 'born mobile'
The New Old Age Blog: What You Need to Bring Your Loved One Home to Die
U.S. Warplanes Enter Somali Airspace
Climate change activists to Obama: Steer clear of Congress
Online activist Aaron Swartz commits suicide
Good grief! Charlie Brown actor charged
Our Generation: ?Set for Life? Documents Crisis Among Baby Boomers
Deepening Crisis for the Dreamliner
Editorial: What We Don?t Know Is Killing Us
India Ink: Woman Raped by Seven Men in Punjab, India, Police Say
Photos: Kim Jong Un and his military
Would-be judge suggests women enjoy rape
Bits Blog: Facebook Unveils a New Search Tool
Bits Blog: Facebook Unveils a New Search Tool
'Humanitarian emergency' in Syria
President Hillary Clinton? If she wants it
Kenyan rangers hunt poachers who killed 11 elephants for ivory
Riff: Once Upon a Time, There Was a Person Who Said, ?Once Upon a Time?
Review: Facebook's Graph Search is not very useful
Ukraine Signs Drilling Deal With Shell for Shale Gas
By numbers: Women in U.S. military
Exotic culinary tours around the world
Britney Spears, Jason Trawick call off engagement
Train Kills Man in 125th Street Subway Station
Man charged with murder in doctor's death, source says
Teen shot in West Bank by Israeli military, activists say
Big City: New Generation Confronts Unaffordable Luxury of Food
Exercise Can Boost Flu Shot's Potency
Smartphones Can Now Run Consumers? Lives
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
2013 Oscar nods: Who got snubbed?
Defense Official Hints That Israel Is Stepping Back From Plans to Unilaterally Attack Iran
In Thailand, a Broader Definition of Insulting Royalty
The Doomsday Preppers of New York
Can even Oprah save Lance Armstrong?
Notre Dame linebacker says he is victim of hoax
Disabled Athletes Suit Up, Raising Questions of Logistics and Fairness
At $1.1 Billion, Bloomberg Is Top University Donor in U.S.
Sheriff won't enforce 'unconstitutional' gun laws
U.S. man outsources job to China, surfs cat videos
Morsi?s Slurs Against Jews Stir Concern
How America's top general came to endorse women in combat
The front lines in fight for women
Study Shows College Degree?s Value During Economic Downturn
Dolphin stuck in New York canal dies
Insulin injection errors may have exposed veterans to viruses
Senator Unveils Bill to Limit Semiautomatic Arms
Mary Jo White to Be Named New S.E.C. Boss
Opinion: At Poly Prep, a Pedophile in Plain Sight
Why world grieves Aaron Swartz
Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify Against Cycling Officials
Gatorade Listens to a Teen And Changes Its Formula
From Reagan to Obama, how we have changed as a nation
Chinese Firm Buys an American Solar Technology Start-Up
French rally: No to same-sex marriage
Cuomo Raises Nearly $22.5 Million for Re-election Campaign
Next Made-in-China Boom: College Graduates
Livestrong has life after Lance
Your top 10 flu questions answered
Maker Aware of 40% Failure in Hip Implant
'Is there a worse way to live than this?'
Editorial: President Obama?s Plan for Gun Reform
National Briefing | Southwest: Arizona: Governor Relents on Medicaid
Pauline Phillips, Flinty Adviser to Millions as Dear Abby, Dies at 94
Myanmar Fighting Edges Toward China
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
French Jets Strike Deep Inside Islamist-Held Mali
9 calorie bombs at restaurants
Facebook's mobile app takes top spot
An Alarm in the Offing on Climate Change
Syria Launches Deadly Airstrikes in Damascus Suburbs
Ford Announces In-Car Voice Commands for Amazon's Cloud Music
NRA draws heat for shooting game
Our Generation: ?Set for Life? Documents Crisis Among Baby Boomers
787 Dreamliner fix: 'It's not easy'
Editorial: What We Don?t Know Is Killing Us
President Hillary Clinton? If she wants it
Poetry, Puppets and Playgrounds
Times Communications Executive Is Leaving
Conrad Bain, Actor on ?Diff?rent Strokes,? Dies at 89
Saudis defend maid's beheading
Fortunes of Facebook May Hinge on Searches
Deadly blazes: Nightclub tragedies in recent history
North Korea Issues Blunt New Threat to United States
Tibetan sets himself on fire to protest Chinese rule
Coca-Cola weighs in on obesity fight
Burt Reynolds 'feeling better' but still in ICU, rep says
'American Taliban' wins right to group prayer
Saudi activists say kingdom trying to silence them
What to do when doctors don't listen
Syria Launches Deadly Airstrikes in Damascus Suburbs
Restaurant Review: Arlington Club on the Upper East Side
New York Legislators Hope for Speedy Vote on New Gun Laws
Hacktivist group threatens Justice Department
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Here Is What Happens When You Cast Lindsay Lohan in Your Movie
Chinese Graduates Say No Thanks to Factory Jobs
Findings: Positive Procrastination, Not an Oxymoron
Why France is not pacifist nation
Image of Manti Te?o Becomes Puzzle as Theories Swirl
Washington?s Economic Boom, Financed by You
Opinion: Hypochondria: An Inside Look
Swatch to Buy Watch and Jewelry Business of Harry Winston for $750 Million
States Will Be Given Extra Time to Set Up Health Insurance Exchanges
Producer of popular gun-related videos found fatally shot
Kobe Bryant and wife call off divorce
Obama, Karzai to speed military transition
Vincent Sombrotto, Who Led Postal Strike, Dies at 89
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
News Analysis: America?s Productivity Climbs, but Wages Stagnate
Editorial: What We Don?t Know Is Killing Us
In the Subways, Geechee Dan?s Voice Stirs the Soul
Germany to Repatriate Some of Its Gold Reserves
Ada Bryant, Robert Haire ? Weddings
New York City Hospitals to Tie Doctors? Performance Pay to Quality Measures
Is 'Wild West' Era for Gas Drilling Coming to an End?
Report Criticizes School Discipline Measures Used in Mississippi
The Carpetbagger: 'Fruitvale,' Drama With Little Advance Buzz, Wins at Sundance
Brain Aging Linked to Sleep-Related Memory Decline
Parents? Financial Support Linked to College Grades
Sharapova takes on Australian boys
Disgusting, Maybe, but Treatment Works, Study Finds
Creative Cheesemongers Pen Clever Descriptions
DealBook: Dell Shares Surge After Report of Possible Buyout
Kaepernick Responds to Harbaugh?s Gamble With Resounding Performance
The Caucus: Republican Governors Open New Front in Tax Debate
The ?Karlie? Is Turning Heads
For the U.N. and North Korea: Game On
New Mutations Discovered in Melanomas
German Economy Probably Shrank in Fourth Quarter
U.N.: Stop the suffering in Syria
Op-Ed Columnist: Lessons From Guns and a Goose
Robot Makers Spread Global Gospel of Automation
Water brings new lows on Great Lakes
Britain Set to Join High-Speed Mobile Party
Tool Kit: Apps and Other Digital Tools Lend a Hand to New Mothers
Global Update: A Genetic Link Found for Victims of Lethal Form of Leishmaniasis
Pentagon Lifting Ban on Women in Combat
Germany to Repatriate Some of Its Gold Reserves
Secret Service dog falls to its death while on VP detail
Bits Blog: Security Firm Discovers Global Spy Campaign
GOP balks at gun control proposals
Interior's Ken Salazar stepping down
Nike unveils Rory: Tiger's heir apparent
Should babies just 'cry it out'?
T Magazine: Look of The Moment | Taylor Swift
NFL: Can Falcons turn it around?
New York Legislators Hope for Speedy Vote on New Gun Laws
?The World Until Yesterday,? by Jared Diamond
In his own words: Manti Te'o on girlfriend's death
Maker Aware of 40% Failure in Hip Implant
Op-Ed Columnist: Colorado?s Marijuana Muddle
Slap Shot: N.H.L.?s Sprint of a Season Includes Pitfalls
Putting Spice Into Dutch Cooking
Netanyahu Issues Veiled Response to Criticism From Obama
America, Saudi Arabia of tomorrow
9 calorie bombs at restaurants
The importance of a 'stop day'
Op-Ed Contributor: Australia Banned Assault Weapons. America Can, Too.
Recalling Pain of Guns? Toll, Mayors Urge Bills? Passage
Books of The Times: ?The River Swimmer,? Two Novellas by Jim Harrison
Grandparents: the new techies?
Kerry confirmation hearing
Fox News and Sarah Palin Part Ways
Pauline Phillips, Flinty Adviser to Millions as Dear Abby, Dies at 94
U.S. man outsources job to China, surfs cat videos
Op-Docs: ?The Long Wait?
Burt Reynolds in intensive care in Florida hospital after flu, rep says
Readers sue Armstrong for book refund
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Pentagon Lifting Ban on Women in Combat
Theater Review: ?Picnic? at American Airlines Theater
Priebus Re-elected to Lead Republican National Committee
New York to pass first gun control bill since Newtown shooting
Miss Montana on her autism
30 killed as bus plunges off cliff in Nepal
Op-Ed Contributor: Australia Banned Assault Weapons. America Can, Too.
Editorial: President Obama?s Plan for Gun Reform
In Court, N.A.A.C.P. Adds Voice Against Bloomberg?s Soda Ban
Opinion: U.S gets it wrong on Egypt, again
Hurricane-Flooded Cars Lure Unwitting Buyers
Obama Will Seek Citizenship Path in One Fast Push
Sheriff won't enforce 'unconstitutional' gun laws
Golden Globes kick off Hollywood award season
Mourners in Turkey protest killings of Kurdish activists
Chim: A Vivid Retrospective of Europe
An Added Mission for Arizona Sheriff?s Immigration Posse: School Patrols
Rome's Colosseum gives up secrets
Good grief! Charlie Brown actor charged
Man convicted in mob crimes says he's 'certain' where Hoffa is buried
Man held after woman thrown onto subway tracks in Philadelphia
Google Gains From Creating Apps for the Opposition
"Buried Memories" of Katie Beers
Coolest green buildings in the Gulf
N.R.A. Attacks Obama in Video
More than 800 NYC rape cases reviewed for mistakes
Public lashes out at Armstrong
ArtsBeat: Biden Getting an Autobiography From The Onion (Whether He Wants It or Not)
Miami?s Design District Looks for an Upgrade
Broken limbs, torn lives in Mali
Journalists, learn from blogger Sullivan
The Race Grows Sweeter Near Its Final Lap
N. Korea makes new threats against U.S.
Rise of Russians in Israel
Broken limbs, torn lives in Mali
Good grief! Charlie Brown actor charged
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Pauline Phillips, Flinty Adviser to Millions as Dear Abby, Dies at 94
At Remote Outposts, Border Agents Sift for Clues
IHT Rendezvous: Green Fashion on the Red Carpet
Japan Airlines Says 787 Jet Leaked Fuel During Safety Test
Bipartisan Filibuster Deal Is Taking Shape in Senate
Movement of Missiles by North Korea Worries U.S.
?South Park? Creators to Start Company, Important Studios
Helicopter crashes in London rush hour
Online activist Aaron Swartz commits suicide
Studio 54 Memorabilia to be Sold at Auction
An Alarm in the Offing on Climate Change
Extreme Weather Grows in Frequency and Intensity Around World
Ada Bryant, Robert Haire ? Weddings
Aaron Swartz, a Data Crusader and Now, a Cause
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Tibetan sets himself on fire to protest Chinese rule
WORLD: Green Questions About Greek Growth
Aaron Swartz, a Data Crusader and Now, a Cause
Dot Earth Blog: Draft Federal Report Sees Big U.S. Impacts from Global Warming
Producer of popular gun-related videos found fatally shot
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Op-Ed Contributor: Australia Banned Assault Weapons. America Can, Too.
Op-Ed Contributor: Diderot, an American Exemplar? Bien S?r
Good grief! Charlie Brown actor charged
Well: Long Term Effects on Life Expectancy From Smoking
Op-Ed Contributor: Racial Politics and Miss America
Britain risks new recession
'Million Man March' promises to paralyze Pakistani capital
America, Saudi Arabia of tomorrow
Twitter Ordered to Help Reveal Sources of Anti-Semitic Posts
9 calorie bombs at restaurants
Hospitals Place Restrictions on Visitors of Flu Patients
Scores Dead as Fire Sweeps Through Nightclub in Brazil
Supreme Court Hears Argument on Cellphone Towers
Op-Ed Contributor: Dim Hopes for a Free Press in China
Six arrested over new gang-rape on bus
The Learning Network Blog: Student Opinion | Does Facebook Ever Make You Feel Bad?
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Horsemeat found in hamburgers in Britain and Ireland
Pauline Phillips, Flinty Adviser to Millions as Dear Abby, Dies at 94
?The World Until Yesterday,? by Jared Diamond
Social media make us more honest
World's best place for water rafting?
Casey Anthony convictions thrown out
Opinionator | The Great Divide: The Rise of the Permanent Temp Economy
Online courses need human element to educate
Good grief! Charlie Brown actor charged
Opinionator: Misconceptions About Roe v. Wade
America's gun problem is not a race problem
Twitter Ordered to Help Reveal Sources of Anti-Semitic Posts
New York City Hospitals to Tie Doctors? Performance Pay to Quality Measures
The 6th Floor Blog: Taryn Simon and Aaron Swartz's Experiment with Images
In the Subways, Geechee Dan?s Voice Stirs the Soul
Microsoft's Windows 8 sales are big -- just not big enough
Your Money: A Shocking Death, a Financial Lesson and Help for Others
Critic?s Notebook: ?Real Husbands of Hollywood? and Lack of Black Male Leads
President Hillary Clinton? If she wants it
Mouse Study Discovers DNA That Controls Behavior
Social media make us more honest
Opinionator | The Stone: What is a 'Hacktivist'?
Public lashes out at Armstrong
After threats against U.S., North Korea turns ire to South
Senator Unveils Bill to Limit Semiautomatic Arms
Win for Anthony and for Knicks
Video shows fiery copter wreckage
Cond? Nast Contracts Cut Author?s Share in Film Deals
Photos: Fires across Australia
Note on napkin: 'This meal is on us'
Exercise Can Boost Flu Shot's Potency
Bits Blog: A Right to Unlock Cellphones Fades Away
Some GOP-led states look at electoral vote changes
Well: Turning to the Web for a Medical Diagnosis
DealBook: Moving From Wall Street to the Tech Sector Proves Tricky
Should babies just 'cry it out'?
The Cautious Calls of John Fox
Rivals Watch Travails of Shell Arctic Drilling
At War Blog: Russian Military Ordered to Switch Portyanki for Socks
Justice Thomas Breaks His Silence in Court
ASAP Yams, Partner to Hip-Hop?s ASAP Rocky
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Architect to build home using 3-D printer
ArtsBeat: Q. and A.: Manuel Gonzales on His Story Collection 'The Miniature Wife'
The Learning Network Blog: Student Opinion | Would You Feel Safer With Armed Guards Patrolling Your School?
More lives being saved: Cancer death rates drop 20%
Aaron Swartz, Internet Activist, Dies at 26
Weekend Miser: ?Making Room,? at Museum of the City of New York
Jeanne Vertefeuille Dies, 80; Helped Catch Aldrich Ames
'Universal background check': What does it mean?
News Analysis: America?s Productivity Climbs, but Wages Stagnate
Beheading: Inhuman and illegal?
Op-Ed Contributor: How to Get High-Speed Internet to All Americans
Times Communications Executive Is Leaving
Editorial: What We Don?t Know Is Killing Us
Benjamin Millepied to Be Paris Opera Ballet Director
Critical Java vulnerability due to incomplete earlier patch
Morsi Says Slurs of Jews Were Taken Out of Context
For Armstrong, a Confession Without Explanation
Op-Ed Columnist: She?s (Rarely) the Boss
Pakistan bomb victims to be buried after protest ends
Some GOP-led states look at electoral vote changes
Schumer Says He?s Satisfied With Hagel on Mideast
N.Y./Region: Geechie Dan Plays the 42nd Street Subway
Bits Blog: Security Firm Discovers Global Spy Campaign
A Saint in His City: Archie Manning in New Orleans
Staying Alive: Why I'm Looking for a New Bank
N. Korea makes new threats against U.S.
9 calorie bombs at restaurants
Disabled Athletes Suit Up, Raising Questions of Logistics and Fairness
Linda Riss Pugach, 1937-2013: Linda Riss Pugach, Whose Life Was Ripped From Headlines, Dies at 75
Sunni sheikh to al-Maliki: Hand over soldiers behind shootings or 'face losses'
Opinionator: India Is Losing the Race
Parents? Financial Support Linked to College Grades
New York to pass first gun control bill since Newtown shooting
More than 800 NYC rape cases reviewed for mistakes
Six arrested over new gang-rape on bus
'Bounty hunter' battles FIFA on Facebook
The Doomsday Preppers of New York
Boy given pot to manage his autism
Arts | Long Island: ?Attack of the Bloodsuckers!? at the Long Island Children?s Museum
Opinion: U.S gets it wrong on Egypt, again
Why world grieves Aaron Swartz
Female Film Directors Slowly Gain Ground
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Cosmos Unveil Plan for Soccer Stadium Near Belmont Park
Lives: We Were Joy Division
Smartphones Can Now Run Consumers? Lives
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Op-Ed Contributor: Why We Must Help Save Mali
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Six arrested over new gang-rape on bus
Police: YouTube leads to pot bust
Venezuela: Chavez is improving
Recipes for Health: Tunisian Style Baked Cauliflower Frittata ? Recipes for Health
Exotic culinary tours around the world
Cycling: Armstrong apologizes to staff
Clarence Thomas breaks silence on bench
U.S. man outsources job to China, surfs cat videos
Africa's top 5 stories this week
Notre Dame linebacker says he is victim of hoax
Disgusting, Maybe, but Treatment Works, Study Finds
Pauline Phillips, Flinty Adviser to Millions as Dear Abby, Dies at 94
Aaron Swartz, a Data Crusader and Now, a Cause
How all-American hero fell to earth
Tibetan sets himself on fire to protest Chinese rule
Opinionator: India Is Losing the Race
Jeanne Vertefeuille Dies, 80; Helped Catch Aldrich Ames
?Propaganda? By Gays Faces Russian Curbs Amid Unrest
Families of Newtown School Massacre Victims Organize Against Gun Violence
Man convicted in mob crimes says he's 'certain' where Hoffa is buried
Op-Ed Contributor: How to Get High-Speed Internet to All Americans
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Here Is What Happens When You Cast Lindsay Lohan in Your Movie
North Korea Turns Its Ire on South Korea
Catholic hospital's lawyers argue fetus not a person
For Armstrong, a Confession Without Explanation
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Readers sue Armstrong for book refund
F.A.A. Orders Grounding of U.S.-Operated Boeing 787s
Britney Spears, Jason Trawick call off engagement
Parenting.com's top baby names
Disabled Athletes Suit Up, Raising Questions of Logistics and Fairness
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
ABC to look at 'Star Wars' live-action series
Online courses need human element to educate
'Enough is enough,' Feinstein says in proposing new gun ban
Opinionator | The Great Divide: The Rise of the Permanent Temp Economy
Robert Wolf Said to Hire Goolsbee as Adviser for His Firm
Media Decoder Blog: Robin Roberts Plans February Return to 'GMA'
Who stole precious relics from church in Missouri town?
'Fireflies' to scope out space rocks for mining
Briton killed in Algerian gas field attack
Paul Theroux?s Travel Wish List
Commuting 40 Miles to Work on a Bike, With Thermals and Fleece
Coca-Cola weighs in on obesity fight
Egypt deploys troops to Suez to quell 'out of control' clashes
The importance of a 'stop day'
Gruesome toll of cluster bombs
Documents Illuminate Jewish Life in Ancient Muslim Empire
The Lede Blog: Updates on the Katie Couric Interview With Manti Te'o
App Smart: Apps Helps Skiers Get More Out of the Slopes - App Smart
Aaron Swartz, a Data Crusader and Now, a Cause
Pauline Phillips, Flinty Adviser to Millions as Dear Abby, Dies at 94
Big City: New Generation Confronts Unaffordable Luxury of Food
Motherlode Blog: An Interview with Dara-Lynn Weiss, Who Put Her 7-Year-Old on a Diet, and Wrote a Book About It.
Rivals Watch Travails of Shell Arctic Drilling
The Doomsday Preppers of New York
Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify Against Cycling Officials
Sheriff won't enforce 'unconstitutional' gun laws
Forms at the doctor's just got fun
Nothing ruled out as NTSB studies Dreamliner battery
Wal-Mart to Announce Extensive Plan to Hire Veterans
Strategies: Apple Stock Isn?t a Bellwether, Even if It?s Big
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Fortunes of Facebook May Hinge on Searches
Activist gets 10 years for king insult
Sheriff won't enforce 'unconstitutional' gun laws
Mining Electronic Records for Revealing Health Data
ArtsBeat: 'Mad Men' Set to Return on April 7
Greek FM: Small chance of euro exit
The front lines in fight for women
Pauline Phillips, Flinty Adviser to Millions as Dear Abby, Dies at 94
Country with freest economy is...
'4-hour' work guru on outsourcer
The Choice Blog: Part 4: Answers to Your Questions About the Fafsa
Op-Ed Columnist: Military Women and the Front Lines
Wal-Mart to Announce Extensive Plan to Hire Veterans
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Defense Secretary Leon Panetta Meets Pope
Q. and A.: With John Cale in Paris and Along the Borderline
Op-Ed Contributor: I Played Osama bin Laden in ?Zero Dark Thirty?
Here Is What Happens When You Cast Lindsay Lohan in Your Movie
Saudis defend maid's beheading
Winfrey?s Low-Rated Cable Channel Is Poised to Break Through
Op-Ed Contributor: How Turkey Can Make Peace With the Kurds
Making It Last: Conservative Meets Liberal, and 40-Year Marriage Begins
French Say Airstrikes in Mali ?Blocked? Rebel Advance
The new 'Bradys' of gun control?
NRA's video game hypocrisy
America's gun problem is not a race problem
Gatorade Listens to a Teen And Changes Its Formula
Pacino to Play Paterno in Film
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Opinion: Darwin Was Wrong About Dating
You're the Boss Blog: More Thoughts on Growing Your Business - and Helping Employees
Boeing 787s Are Grounded by Japanese Airlines
Editorial: What We Don?t Know Is Killing Us
Obama Gun Proposal to Look Beyond Mass Shootings
Gruesome toll of cluster bombs
Note on napkin: 'This meal is on us'
Jacki Weaver and the Lord of Greenwich Village
In the Garden: Camellias Ready for a Cold Snap
Obama to Ask Congress to Toughen Gun Laws
Pakistani Official Refuses Order to Arrest Prime Minister
Google Gains From Creating Apps for the Opposition
Big City: New Generation Confronts Unaffordable Luxury of Food
A 20-Something?s Web Site for Women Over 40
Eddie Huang Defies Description
A more equal military? Bring back draft
France vows to halt Mali jihadists
The Choice Blog: Lessons From a College Student: Finding Your Fit on Campus
N. Korea makes new threats against U.S.
Morsi?s Slurs Against Jews Stir Concern
Vine is Twitter's attempt to become the 'Instagram of video'
Sanford, Ex-Governor of South Carolina, to Run for Congress
The 46 Places to Go in 2013
Parenting.com's top baby names
Gun Found in 7-Year-Old?s Backpack at Queens School
Conrad Bain, Actor on ?Diff?rent Strokes,? Dies at 89
Bits Blog: Facebook Unveils a New Search Tool
Editorial: President Obama?s Plan for Gun Reform
Coke TV Ads Confront Obesity and Soda?s Role
High & Low Finance: Signs of a Housing Recovery Point to a Stronger Economy
Williams Starts Strong, but Nets Don?t Follow in Loss to Rockets
J.J. Abrams to Direct Next 'Star Wars' Movie
Wal-Mart to Announce Extensive Plan to Hire Veterans
In Britain, Basketball Is Somewhat of a Tough Sell
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Putting Spice Into Dutch Cooking
Man held after woman thrown onto subway tracks in Philadelphia
News Analysis: Military Tribunals and International War Crimes
Fox News and Sarah Palin Part Ways
New York Legislators Hope for Speedy Vote on New Gun Laws
Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify Against Cycling Officials
Hong Kong takes Internet speed title
Victim's son: It was a hate crime
Doctor and Patient: When the Doctor Returns to Doctoring
Sheen wants to return to 'Two and a Half Men'
Challenges of being woman in India
Richard G. Stern, a Writers? Writer, Is Dead at 84
Opinion: TV, The Thinking Person?s Entertainment of Choice
IHT Rendezvous: 2012: The Year of Extreme Weather
Bits Blog: Security Firm Discovers Global Spy Campaign
A Doll's Magic, Free to Renew
A New Housing Boom? Don?t Count on It
Cold Wave Cut Murders in New York City Significantly
Texas Secession Movement Unbowed by White House Rejection
New York City Talks on Teacher Evaluations
A New Housing Boom? Don?t Count on It
Working behind China's 'Great Firewall'
The Lede Blog: Live Updates on Armstrong's Oprah Interview
Six arrested over new gang-rape on bus
Booze saves puppy's life
U.S. Military Stops Sending Detainees to Some Afghan Prisons on Rights Fears
T Magazine: Street Style from the Couture in Paris
Give Lance another chance?
Today's photo: Thai temple
Pentagon Lifting Ban on Women in Combat
The Carpetbagger: Doing Good (and Burnishing Images, Too)
Iran Currency Falls Further on Concerns Over Bank
Well Pets: Holly the Cat's Incredible Journey
Union Membership Drops Despite Job Growth
Big City: New Generation Confronts Unaffordable Luxury of Food
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Google Gains From Creating Apps for the Opposition
Disruptions: U.S. Agency Warns of Java Software Problem
Acid attack on Russia ballet director
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Catholic hospital's lawyers argue fetus not a person
Kyle Stanley Gained from Pain of Squandered Lead at Torrey Pines
Hanging On: In Debt, and Digging Deeper to Find Relief
Helicopter crashes in London rush hour
American Single-Malt Whiskeys Serve Notice
Allergy bullying: When food is a weapon
World awaits Oprah's Lance Armstrong interview - but will it change anything?
America flunks its health exam
A Doll's Magic, Free to Renew
Senate key to fixing Washington
Cuba limits travel for athletes, workers
What Is Driving Growth in Government Spending?
Gatorade Listens to a Teen And Changes Its Formula
Reform is a long shot in current Congress
5 things we learned from Benghazi hearings
Why France is not pacifist nation
FiveThirtyEight: Electoral College Changes Would Pose Danger for Democrats
Critic?s Notebook: ?Real Husbands of Hollywood? and Lack of Black Male Leads
Fear, confusion in Algerian hostage crisis
Kobe Bryant and wife call off divorce
Broken limbs, torn lives in Mali
Slap Shot: N.H.L. Players Begin Voting on Labor Deal; Approval Expected by Saturday
How 5 Older Workers Saw a Chance to Remake Their Careers
A Casualty on the Battlefield of Amazon?s Partisan Book Reviews
6 trends from CES 2013
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Common Sense: Selection of the Boeing 787?s Battery Maker Raises Questions
Aaron Swartz, Internet Activist, Dies at 26
Good grief! Charlie Brown actor charged
Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify Against Cycling Officials
Morsi Says Slurs of Jews Were Taken Out of Context
App Smart: Apps Helps Skiers Get More Out of the Slopes - App Smart
Was Obama's historic speech divisive?
Gruesome toll of cluster bombs
How Facebook's Graph Search could disrupt online dating
U.S. steps up involvement in Mali
Op-Ed Contributor: Australia Banned Assault Weapons. America Can, Too.
Chinese Officials Fired Over Sex Scandal
Op-Ed Columnist: She?s (Rarely) the Boss
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Japanese airlines suspend Dreamliner flights after emergency landing
America's gun problem is not a race problem
Police, protesters clash in Pakistan
Egypt's Hosni Mubarak faces retrial
What?s in Obama?s Gun Control Proposal
Catholic hospital's lawyers argue fetus not a person
Biden Meets With House Democrats on Gun-Violence Proposals
Op-Ed Columnist: The Point of Lance Armstrong
Djokovic: 3 Aussie wins in a row
Pakistan?s Ashraf Intervenes in Fatal Fire Investigation
The Neediest Cases: After Foster Care, Becoming a Role Model for Her Sisters
GOP balks at gun control proposals
The TV Watch: Jodie Foster Lifts a Veil at Golden Globes
Op-Ed Contributor: I Played Osama bin Laden in ?Zero Dark Thirty?
Piers, guest clash over AR-15s
For Rape Victims in India, Police Are Often Part of the Problem
Movie Review: ?Gangster Squad? With Sean Penn, Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone
Former Prime Minister Is Elected President of Czech Republic
How to get 10 million followers on Twitter
Casey Anthony files for bankruptcy
IHT Rendezvous: Mali Need Not Be France's Afghanistan
Obama Gun Proposal to Look Beyond Mass Shootings
China Allows Media to Report Alarming Air Pollution Crisis
Doctor Returns to Congo and Is Hailed as a Hero
D. Brainerd Holmes, Top NASA Official, Dies at 91
House Approves $50.7 Billion in Emergency Aid for Storm Victims
On the Non-equivalence of Greenhouse Gases and Entitlement Spending
Pentagon Lifting Ban on Women in Combat
Image of Manti Te?o Becomes Puzzle as Theories Swirl
John Sheardown, Canadian Who Sheltered Americans in Tehran, Dies at 88
'Vampire Diaries' spinoff pilot coming to The CW
The Hard Decision Not to Rescue an Ailing Dolphin
Egypt deploys troops to Suez to quell 'out of control' clashes
Lance's classic quotes
Gas prices tick up slightly
Straight Sets: Indian Star Tells of Life and Marriage in Media Fishbowl
Families of Newtown School Massacre Victims Organize Against Gun Violence
Facebook introduces 'Graph Search'
The Carpetbagger: Parsing What Jodie Foster Did (and Didn't Say)
Aaron Swartz, Internet Activist, Dies at 26
New York Health Chief Defends Decision Not to Evacuate Hospitals
Disgusting, Maybe, but Treatment Works, Study Finds
Critics Take a Look Upstream in Doping Scandals
Wal-Mart to Announce Extensive Plan to Hire Veterans
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
The importance of a 'stop day'
Study: More to Meal Delivery Than Food
Opinion: Our Talking, Walking Objects
Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify Against Cycling Officials
Armstrong Admits Doping, and Says He Will Testify Against Cycling Officials
'Million Man March' promises to paralyze Pakistani capital
?South Park? Creators to Start Company, Important Studios
Good grief! Charlie Brown actor charged
French court: Twitter must identify racist users
Ask Well: Do I Need a Flu Shot if I've Had the Flu?
Kobe Bryant and wife call off divorce
Clinton: We can make a difference
Opinionator | Schooling: The Dicey Parent-Teacher Duet
Disruptions: Disruptions: Design Is Driving Technology Forward
Why we can't get enough Gosling (Duh!)
Critical Java vulnerability due to incomplete earlier patch
Pauline Phillips, Flinty Adviser to Millions as Dear Abby, Dies at 94
Robot Makers Spread Global Gospel of Automation
Florida tackling python problem with hunting contest
Media Decoder Blog: Homicide Tracking Site Expanding to Chicago
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Strategies: In Investing, at Least, It Makes Sense to Play for a Tie
Exercise Can Boost Flu Shot's Potency
Op-Ed Columnist: For Obama?s Second Term, Start Here
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Amazon giving you free MP3s of your CDs
Helicopter crashes in London rush hour
New York School Bus Drivers Go on Strike
Obama Will Seek Citizenship Path in One Fast Push
Parents? Financial Support Linked to College Grades
J.J. Abrams to Direct Next 'Star Wars' Movie
Teacher talks armed student into giving up, police say
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Fox News and Sarah Palin Part Ways
The Pour: In Describing Wines, 5 Words Not to Fear
In Quebec, a Winter Celebration on Skis
Catholic hospital's lawyers argue fetus not a person
North Korea Turns Its Ire on South Korea
In Court, N.A.A.C.P. Adds Voice Against Bloomberg?s Soda Ban
New York to pass first gun control bill since Newtown shooting
Spanish Joblessness Climbs Again, With No Relief in Sight
Apple?s Profits Are Flat, and Stock Drops
Bits Blog: Facebook Unveils a New Search Tool
Aaron Swartz, a Data Crusader and Now, a Cause
ArtsBeat: Second Stage Theater Adds 'Nobody Loves You'
Linda Riss Pugach, 1937-2013: Linda Riss Pugach, Whose Life Was Ripped From Headlines, Dies at 75
In Hollywood Movies for China, Bureaucrats Want a Say
Kobe Bryant and wife call off divorce
Times Communications Executive Is Leaving
Hundreds killed in Brazil nightclub fire
Property Values: Real Estate for $1.6 Million
Either With Him or Against Him
India?s New Focus on Rape Shows Only the Surface of Women?s Perils
9 calorie bombs at restaurants
U.K. Prime Minister Defends Decision to Seek E.U. Vote
Common Sense: Selection of the Boeing 787?s Battery Maker Raises Questions
Op-Ed Columnist: Military Women and the Front Lines
Justice Thomas Breaks His Silence in Court
Teachers among 50 arrested in child sex sting
Pentagon ends ban on women in combat
U.S., other nations ground Dreamliners
Op-Ed Contributor: Australia Banned Assault Weapons. America Can, Too.
Neighborhood Joint | West Village: 10,000 Rubber Stamps at Ink Pad in the West Village
ArtsBeat: James Brown Biopic Finally Gets Go Ahead
Parents? Financial Support Linked to College Grades
Ryo Ishikawa and Thaworn Wiratchant Get Invites to Masters
Are we living the capitalist's dilemma?
Pentagon to open combat jobs to women
Nigeria waits for 'African Spring'
Horsemeat found in hamburgers in Britain and Ireland
Online activist Aaron Swartz commits suicide
Exercise Can Boost Flu Shot's Potency
For Armstrong, a Confession Without Explanation
Disruptions: Disruptions: Design Is Driving Technology Forward
Pauline Phillips, Flinty Adviser to Millions as Dear Abby, Dies at 94
France Is Increasing Security at Uranium Sites in Niger
2 Linked to Smuggling Narwhal Tusks Plead Not Guilty
U.N. Security Council slams North Korea, expands sanctions
Personal Best: Training Insights From Star Athletes
Op-Ed Columnist: She?s (Rarely) the Boss
Are we living the capitalist's dilemma?
Prince Harry most eligible bachelor
DealBook: British Retailer HMV Enters Equivalent of Bankruptcy
Readers sue Armstrong for book refund
British Grandmother Sentenced to Death for Smuggling Cocaine Into Bali
?Selected Letters of William Styron?
A black and white cat is high up on tree branches.
Two green and white trains on tracks.
A white cat stands on the floor.
A large boat on the sea.
Red double decker bus driving down street.
A small bird standing on a log at the waters edge.
A passenger train sits in the station.
Woman at table busy with something.
A Macintosh computer sitting on the floor.
A side view of a horse's head.
Group of elderly people sitting around a table.
Two small boys in a woody area looking at a shed.
A jockey riding a horse in a pen.
A brown horse stands in a lush green field.
A man is riding a red motorcycle on the road.
A young girl riding a brown horse.
A black cow and a brown cow stands in a plain in front of an uprooted tree.
A black and white cat playing with a blanket.
A moped in front of ruins.
A man asleep in a chair holding a baby.
Four people eating dessert around a table.
A black dog standing in a field.
A close up view of a bottle of water.
A close up of an ostrich face.
A sheep grazing in a field.
A group of elderly people pose around a dining table.
A close up of a cat with its eyes closed.
A woman with a surprised look on her face is holding a smiling woman from behind.
A small white car parked at the gas station.
A person stands on the motorcycle seat and pops a wheelie.
A white cat looking out of a window.
a black and white photo of cows in their stalls.
A brown horse stands in a lush green field.
A black and white lamb with other lambs in the background.
A sheep in the morning mist with trees in the background.
The brown and white cows are eating in the trough.
A red and brown bird is perched on branches.
A girl wearing black shorts and boots is standing next to a blue motorcycle.
A group of people sit around a table with food and beer.
Black and brown table in living room setting.
A brown horse in a green field.
A black and white cow in a pen with hay.
The old lady is standing in the kitchen with two cats at her feet.
A race care driving along a dirt road.
Calico cat sitting on step in front of a door.
A camouflaged plane sitting on the green grass.
Two Indian women with two Indian girls near the water.
Double decker passenger bus driving with traffic.
The skinny cows are standing on the grass.
A group of horses grazing in a field.
A close-up picture of a desk with a computer and papers on it.
Messy computer desk with two monitors.
A man lies in a bed in a cluttered room.
The tan horse is in the pasture.
Man walking bicycle to patio of a coffee shop.
Cow walking under the tree in a pasture.
A black and white bird on a body of water with grass in the background.
four people sitting at a table.
A red two story bus driving along the street.
Two women sitting outside laughing.
A multi-colored bird clings to a wire fence.
The white ducks are standing on the ground.
A man and two women smiling at the camera while sitting on a blue sofa.
A young woman with a black top and a necklace.
Brown horse standing in middle of grassy field.
A cruise ship docked at shore.
The black and white cat with yellow eyes lounges in the dirt.
A brown and white cow standing in a grassy area with trees behind.
A man and women smiling at the camera while standing in a kitchen.
A man with glasses and two plastic bottles in the foreground.
a black and white photo of a cow under a tree.
A cat looking at the camera.
A double decker bus on a city street.
A jockey rides a horse at a gallop.
Large green boat floating on water.l.
The rear view of a red Chevrolet concept car.
A person wearing a bike helmet rides a bike on a path through trees.
A black and white photo of a motorcycle laying on the ground.
Black and white cat sleeping on a brown tarp.
Black and white lamb with tag in right ear.
A smiling woman holding a small baby.
A group of horses grazing in a field.
Three men sitting at the table with beer and food.
A person is standing underneath an overpass near a highway.
A young girl wearing a bike helmet with a bicycle in the background.
A man is watching TV on the foot of his bed.
Two bald eagles perched on a branch.
Domestic cat laying on back of cat litter.
Blue couch in room with sun shining in.
A man and woman are posing for the camera.
Room with several computer monitors.
Several cardinals stand in the snow.
The black and brown cow is standing on the green grass.
A black car parked in the dirt out in the country.
A passenger train waiting in a station.
A blackbird sitting on the ground.
A black and white dog looking at the camera.
a woman is standing by a pillar where "u2" is written.
A young blonde girl in riding gear sits on top of a gray and white horse.
Little black and white calf with a tag on its ear.
A boy doing a wheelie on a plank with the beach in the background.
Dining room with wooden dining table set with playmates.
The red scooter is sitting on the street in front of the building.
A little bird floating in the water.
A white cat stands on the floor.
Two dogs and a cat resting on a couch.
An Asian toddler girl sits next to a pot of flowers on a marble post.
A woman stands in front of a building in the snow.
Two women are posing for the camera and giving the thumbs up sign.
A mostly black train on a track.
Several sheep grazing in the field.
Two animals grazing next to a mountain, and a body of water.
Two black and white cows behind a metal gate against a partly cloudy blue sky.
A passenger train waiting at the city train station.
A white dog runs through a snow covered wood.
A bicycle is parked outside a bookstore.
The train is riding on the tracks in the snow.
A flat screen TV on the floor.
A bicycle in a dining room.
A ginger and white cat curled up and asleep on a leather chair.
A tan dog is lying on a couch and has its head on a white pillow.
A train on the train tracks.
A train on the train tracks.
Young couple sitting on couch.
A group of people are outside a decrepit building.
Man wearing a bib sitting on a green couch.
Two women sitting on couch posing for camera.
Two bald eagles perched on a branch.
Young couple sitting on couch.
There is a young boy with a red and blue jacket on feeding a sheep.
Two cats are looking at a window.
Red double decker bus with hood up.
A close-up of a woman with black boots next to a blue motorcycle.
A small orange and white dog with a collar and a bell relaxes on a flower print pillow.
The black and white bull is looking at the camera.
an African man hanging onto the back of a very full yellow van.
A group of people sitting around a table with food on it.
Two sheep are standing, looking at the camera, face opposite directions.
a black and white photo of a cat lying down.
A dark brown horse standing in a field.
An Apple computer sitting on the floor.
A dog sleeping under a table.
A bus drives down a busy road.
Sail boat sailing on the water.
A red sports car driving quickly on a track.
Two smiling women holding a baby.
Small dog sitting next to white wall.
A white tour bus with red, orange and yellow stripes.
A red double decker bus on a city street.
A young girl wearing a bike helmet with a bicycle in the background.
Large cruise ship floating on the water.
A BMW motorcycle parked between two cars.
A tan dog lying on a moggie bed looking up at the camera.
A cat looking out of a window.
A black and white photo of a cow walking under a tree in a field.
A potted plant with only a few sprouting.
Two green and white trains are sitting on the train track.
four people are on a boat on green water.
A tan and white dog laying in bed with a yellow coverlet.
A plane in the sky.
An old train sits idle on the tracks.
A room with tan walls and a washer and dryer.
A passenger train waiting in a station.
A passenger jet flies through the air.
A grey, black, and white cat looking at the camera.
A man dressed for a race relaxes.
Two smiling women holding a baby.
A girl wearing a red blouse riding a brown horse.
A grey cat laying on a dining table.
People sitting on acouch.
A group of horses grazing in a field.
A man riding on the back of an orange SUV.
Two trains are traveling on the track.
A group of people sitting around a table on a porch.
A sheep standing near her children.
Man with pink shirt sleeping on chair with infant.
A close up of an ostrich face.
A person jumping a motorbike in the air.
Many sheep standing on a green hill.
Bird with a green head and white chest perched on a tree branch.
Sail boat floating on the blue water.
Red and white plane flying through the air.
A man with a top hat riding a white horse.
A black and white photo of a cat sitting on a sofa.
A pink bicycle is in front of a building.
Smiling woman sitting wearing a viking hat.
A red and white double decker bus is parked.
A red double decker bus on a crowded street.
A woman taking her own photo from above.
A black faced sheep.
Two small birds perched on a metal bar.
A green bus drives down a road.
Wooden cabinets in kitchen.
An older Asian couple poses with a newborn baby at the dinner table.
A red and white plane flying on a sunny day.
A women wearing a bikini top and jeans.
Brown horse standing in middle of grassy field.
A pot of food is placed in the center of a red tablecloth.
A blue jay standing in a grassy field.
The white airplane is flying in the blue sky.
A woman in a pink top posing with beer.
A train sitting on the tracks in a train yard.
A girl sitting in a living chair.
Train gliding on tracks.
Two young kids dressed up sitting down on chairs.
Two Indian woman stand with two Indian girls on a beach.
four people sitting at a table.
A wooden table is set with candles, wine, and a purple plastic bowl.
A woman with a white horse.
A group of cows in a field with yellow tags in their ears.
A living room with large sofas and a dining table in the background.
An orange tabby cat sleeping on the sofa.
A large bird is flying through the air.
Two people padding in a yellow canoe down a river with trees in the background.
White bus parked in grass in front of building.
People riding horses in a fenced area.
Black train idle on the tracks.
A white Jeep parked on a street.
Two men talking in front of a plane.
A man wearing a dust mask riding a three wheeled bicycle.
The silver train is parked in a station.
A child sits in a large black leather chair.
People stand outside a bookstore.
A plane flying near the sunset.
Two eagles sitting on a long branch.
Red buses are parked by a large white building beside a formal garden.
A yellow and orange bird hold on to the side of a cage.
A black and white dog sniffing at a closed door.
Two men sailing in a small sailboat.
A motorcycle parked next to a car.
A red, double-decker bus.
Two police officers standing behind a van with a bus in the background.
The white dog is laying on the wooden floor underneath the table.
Man standing in front of a silver rail car.
Close up image of a sheep with it's tongue hanging out.
a black and white cow standing in the field.
A small bird perched on an icy branch.
A yellow bird eating fruit on a bird feeder.
A man riding a white horse.
Brown and white ducks walking on green grass.
A black and white cat standing in front of a window.
A train traveling down the tracks.
A small cat laying on a wooden beam looking up at the camera.
A bird standing on top of a wooden fencepost.
A man with a top hat riding a white horse.
Train pulling into a station.
Five cows grazing in a snow covered field.
A woman riding a brown horse.
A small bird perches on the bird feeder hanging from the tree.
There are some black cattle in a grassy plain with a large tree in the background.
A man in a blue shirt and tan pants is standing in front of a statue of a man, which is in a cobble stone paved plaza.
A girl in a red shirt is riding a brown horse.
A yellow and orange bird hold on to the side of a cage.
Three televisions, on on the floor, the other two on a box.
Sheep are grazing in the field in front of a line of trees.
a clear plastic chair in front of book shelves.
A dog laying in a pet jacket.
A large sheep standing on a hill.
a black and white cow standing in the field.
a blue and red airplane while in flight.
A woman in a black hat is standing by the subway.
The jockey is wearing purple and riding a brown horse.
A man is standing next to a yellow sports car.
Three men eating in a kitchen.
The man is standing on the sidewalk in front of the horse.
Man with blue shirt standing in front of a fountain.
The back of the stop sign is adorned with stickers.
Child milking a cow outside.
A sheep standing in a forest.
A flat-screen TV sits on the floor.
A close-up of a cat on a cream sofa.
Two men sailing in a small sailboat.
Two rams stand on snowy ground.
The train sits at the train station.
A room with four computer monitors in a row.
The yellow motorcycle is parked on the street.
a dog on the floor of a patio looks at a cat on the fence.
A large passenger jet flying close to the ground.
A white cow with big ears looking into the camera.
Three men in suits sitting at a table.
Three dark haired young women in white, red and black sweaters.
A black and white photo of an old train station.
The back of a sign with stickers on.
Two horses standing in a pen.
Living room with tan furniture and flat screen television.
The white airplane is flying in the sky.
A black and white horned cow standing in a field.
Two women are sitting in a cafe.
A red double decker bus driving down a street.
A black and white image of a cat laying on a rug.
A man and woman are posing for the camera.
A ginger cat sitting on an office chair.
A pretty white striped cat with his head hanging off the table.
A man and his bicycle laying down on the green grass.
Large white bird with long orange beak standing on the shoreline.
White bus parked in grass in front of building.
A woman wearing jeans, a dark bikini top, and a bracelet.
The train is riding on the tracks in the snow.
A school bus driving down a road with green trees and grass in the background.
The back of a pig under a tree with a cow in the background.
A man sits on a bed very close to a small television.
A passenger plane parked on a runway.
Close up of the headlights on a blue car.
A black and white cat sleeps on a purple blanket.
A passenger train sits in the station.
A close-up of a horse.
The bicyclists are crossing a bridge in the rain.
A red and white England bus drives down the street.
A lone cow sits in the cold of the yard.
A person dressed in white on a brown horse.
A jockey riding a horse in a pen.
Two dogs sit on a couch with many stuffed animals.
A kitchen with wooden cabinets and furniture.
A train is running down the track in a rural area.
A motorcycle is parked by a mural of a city in the evening.
A man stands on a mountain, watching a plane.
Birds fly low over water.
A large black bird is sitting in the water.
The black and white bull is looking at the camera.
A cruise ship docked at a coast.
A white bus partially in the snow on a public street.
A woman pets a dog in a gated yard.
A black and white cat gets into a basket of yarn.
This is a man riding a mountain bike over rocks on a clear day.
A ginger cat sitting on an office chair.
A brown horse grazing in a field of green grass.
A row of locomotives on a siding in a field.
Two woman pose in a dining room with a baby.
Three sheep in middle of gravel road.
Nine red and white aircraft flying in formation trailing smoke.
The blue train is at the station.
A baby is sitting in the grass.
A red double decker bus is picking up more passengers in a city.
Two women watching the street with their bikes to see when they may cross.
Two women in kitchen with one taking a picture.
A horse galloping while wearing the number 4.
A large bird of prey flying towards the camera.
Group of horses grazing in grassy field.
This is a black and white picture of a short squat Coca-cola bottle.
A yellow bird perched on a branch.
People on motorbikes in a city street.
Three sheep on a dirt road shot from a car.
A boy looking at a computer screen.
A group of people standing with two other people dressed as Elvis.
Red truck spinning tires and emitting smoke from behind.
A living room with a blue sofa, camp bed, wooden bench and dresser.
a woman sitting on a sofa holding a baby.
Two police officers standing behind a van with a bus in the background.
Four blue and yellow planes in flight.
A group of river barges with trees in the background.
Old green bottle sitting on a table.
Two people sit facing each other at a table as one points at the other.
A train is at a train station.
A train parked at a train station.
The birds are swimming in the water.
A white bird is steering a shopping cart.
Bird sitting on a log in a lake.
Man paddling a yellow canoe towards a the shore.
Two birds flying near bird feeders.
Horse standing in a field.
A row of beer bottles on the floor.
Two women standing outside of a bus.
A group of sheep are on a hill.
A man is standing in front of a raised statue,.
A white sheep on a hillside looking at the camera.
Two smiling young women giving the thumbs up sign.
a woman sitting on a sofa holding a baby.
A doubly decker red bus driving down the road.
Two women standing outside of a bus.
A grey, black, and white cat looking at the camera.
The sheep is standing under the trees.
Two people sitting at a table at a restaurant.
Two black and white cows behind a metal gate against a partly cloudy blue sky.
The black and white cat is looking up at the camera.
A man riding a white horse in an arena.
Two cows are drinking from a pond.
Three white sheep in an enclosure.
a black and white cow standing in the field.
A black dog lies on the grass.
An office with multiple desks and green walls.
Large cruise ship floating on the water.
Two people sit facing each other at a table as one points at the other.
A black and white photo of a man in a classic car and a man with a classic motorcycle.
A man with a beard and a skullcap and a boy walk along the ocean's shore.
A cat on its back looking at the camera.
A small black and white goat in a pen looking up at the camera.
A woman with her child.
A red double decker bus driving down a street.
Sailboat sailing on a cloudy day.
A bird is perched on a person's gloved hand.
Three people preparing to canoe.
A girl riding a brown horse.
A car parked in front of train tracks.
A young blonde girl in riding gear sits on top of a gray and white horse.
Two eagles are perched on a branch.
A social gathering of people in a restaurant.
A group of four people walking past a giant mushroom.
A small child in a pink dress sits on a table.
Than horse standing in a field in front of a fence.
A black dog is staring at a sheep.
A girl riding a tan horse.
A woman leading a white horse.
A runner is resting in the shade with a bottle of soda.
A red and brown bird is perched on branches.
A train on the train tracks.
A black dog looking at a brown sheep in a pen.
A home office with three computer monitors and other equipment on a desk.
A grey cat lying on a wooden table.
A black and white dog looking at the camera.
An aeromexico silver plane is on a runway.
A man on a motorbike jumping with the sky behind him.
A girl riding a brown horse.
Couple sailing in a small sailboat.
A blue motorcycle is parked on the sidewalk.
A group of cyclists in green and white with spectators looking on.
Several sheep grazing in the field.
A silver car parked on the side of the road in front of the hills.
A man sits looking at a laptop computer on a messy table.
A grey cat laying on a dining table.
A wooden table is set with candles, wine, and a purple plastic bowl.
Children looking a sheep.
A black and white cat lying on a blanket.
Two people in a red canoe on a clear lake.
A scantily clad woman standing next to a small red vehicle.
Red double decker bus with hood up.
Man sitting cross legged while wearing a brown cloth and holding a wooden stick.
A man fishing on a small boat while on a lake.
A dog is lying at the bottom of a staircase next to another standing dog.
Two elderly women sit at a dinner table with a man.
A mostly black train on a track.
The red bus is on the street.
A WWII fighter plane with its landing gear down.
a boat moving in a river.
A group of people sit at a table in an Italian restaurant.
An old fashioned wooden sailing ship is parked at the pier.
A large boat pulling a small white boat.
Ocean liner close to coast with houses in the background.
A black and white scene of a well furnished room with a view outlooking a forest.
A close up of a horse wearing a blue halter.
The birds are swimming in the water.
A siamese cat resting on a white sofa.
A person riding a dirt bike in the outdoors.
A yellow school bus parked in a field.
A bulldog sitting on a yellow chair beside a large waste receptacle.
The white sheep is standing on the green hill.
Woolly sheep at auction house.
Close up of a white sheep with a black head.
A orange and white cat laying on a blanket in a black leather chair.
The train comes down the track, between two rows of trees.
A wooden yacht on the ocean.
A black and white horned cow standing in a field.
A double decker bus drives on a city street.
A cat looking out of a window.
A television and a laptop computer are on in a hotel room.
A man is doing a wheelie on a bike.
Three goats are chased by a dog.
A person wearing a helmet sits on a bicycle on a sunny day.
A woman posing by a pillar with a U2 sign.
Tan puppy lying down on white carpeting.
A train traveling down the tracks.
A close-up picture of a desk with a computer and papers on it.
A woman in riding a brown horse.
A long-haired dog stands in a grassy wooded area.
Three men in suits sitting at a table.
A woman poses with a baby.
Four people are sitting around a living room with.snacks.
a train in a station.
A blue moped parked on the sidewalk.
Blue bird standing on green grass.
A red double decker bus driving down a street.
The train sits at the train station.
The woman is riding on the brown horse.
An empty office chair in a cubicle.
A woman with a white horse.
A black steam train traveling on the railroad tracks.
A man and women smiling at the camera while standing in a kitchen.
Four women and two men sit at a long table in a restaurant.
Young redheaded man holding two bicycles near beach.
A cruise ship docked at a coast.
A white Swiss airplane approaches the runway.
Two cows cross a paved street.
Five cows grazing on a patch of grass between two roadways.
A leather couch and wooden table in a living room.
A woman in a black hat is standing by the subway.
A black cow and a brown cow standing in front of a small copse of trees in a field.
A double decker bus on a city street.
A group of people sitting at a restaurant table.
Person in grassy field tending to sheep.
Close up of the rear of a red sports car.
Two women in a clothing store.
Group of people sitting at table of restaurant.
A close-up of a yellow school bus.
A brown horse is standing on grass and scrub.
Close-up of young horse walking next to a larger horse.
A women in glasses stands next to a cow in a field.
Two cats are looking at a window.
A dog is peeking out of the back of a van.
A woman in a blue dress cuts a cake.
A grey, black, and white cat looking at the camera.
A couple posing on a red and yellow motorcycle.
Grey and white cat sitting in bathroom sink.
A man is alone on the back of a tandem bicycle.
A small white dog wearing a jacket looks up at the camera.
Two women sitting in chairs in a shop.
A computer operating on a desk.
A small child sits on a cement wall near white flower.
A duck floating in the water.
Two women and a baby pose in front of a dining room.
A white bus with water and a barge in the background.
Small office space with bright green walls.
A blue train in a mountainous area.
A woman with a smiling baby sitting on the table.
A green car parked outside the saloon.
A yellow boat on shore.
A group of people sitting at a restaurant table.
A small kitchen and a cluttered table with a blue table cloth.
Trains inside an indoor station.
The cat is standing on the window sill looking at the camera.
The birds are swimming in the water.
Black and white cows behind a fence.
Red and white bus driving down road.
A cat sitting on sand looking up at the camera.
A double decker bus on a city street.
White and green commercial airliner taking off of runway.
Three cows grazing in a field.
The white train is sitting on the tracks.
A black and white photo of a cat sitting on a sofa.
Two baby kittens are sitting inside a cow-schemed, fur-covered dome.
A young blonde girl wearing a helmet sits with a red bicycle behind her.
A group of people sitting around a table on a porch.
A black and white cat lies in the dirt.
Front and left side of a red double decker bus.
A brown horse in a green field.
A side view of a horse's head.
Older gentleman sitting on couch with laptop.
A wooden yacht on the ocean.
A large sheep standing on a hill.
A group of people standing near a small child sitting on a horse.
A white airplane is on a runway.
A tan puppy being held and petted.
Two eagles sitting on a long branch.
An elegant pink dining room with wooden furniture.
Two men in shorts are sitting on a sofa.
Two dirt bikers riding over dirt hill.
A man on a bike jumping through the air.
A black and white dog looking at the camera.
A large pile of scrap wood.
A grey cat with green eyes looking into the camera.
Two dirt bikers riding over dirt hill.
A bottle of water sitting on a stone with other stones and a wall in the background.
A girl riding a brown horse.
a black and white photo of a cow under a tree.
Black and white cat sitting on wood chair looking up.
A large black and white cow in a field.
A man and woman posing on a field with a bottle of wine.
a black and white cow standing in the field.
A red double decker bus driving down a street.
A small white cat sitting in a sink.
A boy feeding a sheep hay.
A black dog stands in the middle of a construction site.
A girl wearing black shorts and boots is standing next to a blue motorcycle.
a close up of a woman holding a white puppy.
A sheep stands on a hillside.
A man with a cap and jacket walking between two large bottles.
A bus is on a road with a ferris wheel in the background.
A group of elderly people sitting around a dining table.
A black and white photo of an old wooden fence near a dirty street.
Two women are sitting in a cafe.
A brown horse stands in tall grass.
Two men stand with their bicycles outside a shop.
A silver AreoMexico Jet Liner sitting on the tarmac.
Five birds stand on the snow.
A man and boy walking along a beach with the sea in the background.
Man playing game in a store.
A group of people sitting around a table with food on it.
A group of elderly people pose around a dining table.
A women holds a small dog on a leash with chairs in the background.
The back of the stop sign is adorned with stickers.
A green bike parked outside a book store.
A double-decker bus driving in front of a ferris wheel.
A black headed sheep covered in thick white wool stands in a pasture with other sheep.
A white cat looking out of a window.
A brown horse in a green field.
A man in a tux on a white horse.
The cat is laying on an animal print blanket.
Two women standing in a living room with a black dog looking towards the camera.
two motorbikes on a dirt track.
Two people paddling in a red canoe with trees in the background.
Close up of the headlights on a blue car.
A person walks a dog along the water's edge.
Vehicles driving infant of an ornate building.
A women and a young girl walking pushchairs along the sidewalk.
A red and blue plane flying with its landing gears down.
A man is staring at a horse with a white mane.
A white cat laying on a sheet.
A black and white cat sleeps on a purple blanket.
Road with the rear image of the tail lights of a bus.
A group of people sitting around a table on a porch.
a woman sitting on a sofa holding a baby.
A black and white cat sleeping on its side on a purple blanket.
A black and white photo of a bicycle.
View of a living room with a dining room in the background.
Four women and two men sit at a long table in a restaurant.
A red and gray train travels through a tunnel amongst the trees.
An old Red London double decker bus with its hood raised.
A laptop and a PC at a workstation.
A woman leading a white horse.
A living room with large sofas and a dining table in the background.
Young couple sitting on a black couch.
A white cat laying on a sheet.
A small girl sits on a stone ledge near a white flowering plant.
Two women shearing a white sheep in a wooden stall.
A person wearing a helmet rides a bike near a white structure.
A white train pulling into a station.
A green bike parked outside a book store.
Two women standing in front of tour bus.
A man talking with two water bottles sitting in front of him.
A blue jay standing in a grassy field.
A room with tan walls and a washer and dryer.
Red double decker bus driving down a street.
A black swan flapping its wings on the water.
A grey cat lying on a wooden table.
A motorcycle parked next to a car.
A close-up of a horse.
The boy is lying on a couch with a puppy.
Black and white picture of a cat laying on a rug.
A large airplane parked at the airport at night.
Pile of wooden debris with chair on top.
Two men catching a fish in a swamp.
Eight bottles of Harp beer lined up on a wooden floor.
Small office space with bright green walls.
A man in a tux on a white horse.
A cat looking at the camera.
Person dressed in blue riding brown horse.
The wall-mounted flat-screen TV is showing a movie.
Bird perched on a flowerpot beside a stucco wall.
Grey and white cat sitting in bathroom sink.
Young girl in riding gear on a horse.
Two women in a sailboat.
A small bird perched on an icy branch.
Two eagles sitting on a long branch.
Two cats are sitting on the back of a couch and looking out the window in a sea photo.
Motorcyclist performing a wheelie next to a car.
A passenger train with a yellow engine.
Two women sheering a sheep.
A close-up of a black train engine.
A young female rider on a brown horse.
A group of people sitting at a restaurant table.
A white lamb with its nose against a wooden box.
A long train is on train tracks.
A Phillips flat screen TV with two remote controls.
Calico cat sitting on step in front of a door.
a little girl is riding a white and grey horse.
A black dog standing in a room being constructed.
A leather couch and wooden table in a living room.
A black swan flapping its wings on the water.
There is a black and white sheep standing on the grass.
A black and white cat laying on a cat bed.
The woman is riding on the brown horse.
A small turboprop plane being loaded on the tarmac.
A television with a show on.
Four people row a canoe in water.
A brown horse in a green field.
Kitchen with wooden table and cabinets.
Old style bicycle parked on floor.
A yellow bird eating fruit on a bird feeder.
Black bird standing on concrete.
Two men talking in front of a small plane.
A grey dog standing in a grassy field.
A young girl wearing a bike helmet with a bicycle in the background.
Two cats, one ginger, the other white laying on a bed.
Grey and white cat sitting in bathroom sink.
A train parked at a train station.
Couple with newborn baby.
Bird eating from a bird feeder.
A close-up of a sheep with a black head.
Brown horse standing in middle of grassy field.
A small boy laying on a sofa with a dog.
A small red and grey bird perched in a tree.
Yellow scooter parked in an alley way.
A grey, black, and white cat looking at the camera.
The brown train is sitting on the railroad tracks.
A train on the train tracks.
A small boy laying on a sofa with a dog.
A close-up of a silver train engine with a red stripe.
A woman in a sari drinks something while sitting at a table.
A black steam train traveling on the railroad tracks.
Red sports car on top of white semi truck.
A man stands on a platform in front of a silver train.
A cyclist in black and white lira speeding past spectators.
A small kitchen with items stacked on the shelves and on the counter.
A man is laying on the floor holding a baby up above him.
A black and white dog looking at the camera.
A room with a television, stereo and bookshelf.
A black and white cat laying on the ground in the sun.
A women riding a mountain bike on a large concrete area.
The cow is grazing in a field.
A bald man with a beard pets the nose of a black and white horse at the fence.
A man stands next to a yellow Corvette.
House with a red door.
Two women in a sailboat.
A woman leading a white horse.
A black and white photo of cattle at a trough.
A man looking at a red motorcycle.
Older woman holding newborn baby.
a brown double decker tour bus on a street with a ferris wheel behind it.
A flock of birds flying over a body of water.
Two black and white cows drinking out of a pond.
A small dog wearing a pink shirt tied to a railing.
A man stands on a platform in front of a silver train.
A small white plane parked in an airport on a cloudy day.
A boat is in the water and a small airplane is on the dock.
A domestic animal stands in a pen.
a computer on the floor.
The boats are on the water located in front of the mountain.
A dog sitting on a yellow chair next to a green dumpster.
A large dog stands next to a sheep in a field.
A group of elderly people pose around a dining table.
Black and white photo of couch with purse at one end.
Three women in Indian dresses in a crowded room smiling.
A black and white photo of a cat sitting on a sofa.
Brown and white cows are eating from a trough.
Two girls on a guy posing on the bow a boat.
Blue bird standing on green grass.
A black and white cat laying on the ground in the sun.
People ride mopeds in an urban setting.
A close-up of a lamb with its ear tagged, standing on grass.
Tan domestic cat under black tarp.
A group of four people walking past a giant mushroom.
Two green birds flying above the telephone wires.
A man stands next to a helmeted man on a motorcycle in an empty parking lot.
Two cows graze in a field.
TThe girl is standing in front of the open door of the bus.
A sheep is on the edge of a road with a lake and a mountain in the background.
A black and white photo of a man standing next to a bus.
A bird is perched on a person's gloved hand.
A group of people eat at a table outside.
A baby in a highchair holds a ketchup packet.
A close-up of a brown horse's head.
Two cats sit on the back of a couch looking out the window.
a train in a station.
Horse standing in a field.
A women holds a small baby while sitting on a sofa.
The small dog is wearing a sweater and looking up at the camera.
The bird is sitting on the branch.
A group of six people sitting at a table with salad served.
A white and grey cat in a bathroom sink looking at the camera.
A blue moped parked on the sidewalk.
a woman sitting on a sofa holding a baby.
A small red and grey bird perched in a tree.
In Kenya, attackers used 'less is more' strategy
Cambodia opposition leaders summoned to court
Weak earnings drag stocks lower on Wall Street
Magnitude 6.3 quake strikes off Solomon Islands: USGS
Liquid ammonia leak kills at least 15 in Shanghai
U.S., Friends of Syria recognise opposition as sole representative
Weiner shrugs off latest online sex scandal
Death toll rises to 39 in Italy coach crash
Indian PM snubs Commonwealth summit
Suicide bomber strikes in Syria
China detains 7 for "house sister" scandal
Syria military police chief defects to rebels
Boeing stock tumbles after fire on 787 Dreamliner
White House backs gay marriage
Teenagers among 5 dead in Belgian bus crash
Seven foreign workers kidnapped in Nigeria
Swiss tourist gang raped in India, say police
Palestinians clash with security forces in W. Bank
Israel launches airstrike into Syria
Keita Wins Mali Presidential Election
'9 Dead' in New Darfur Tribal Clash
6 killed in U.S. drone strike in NW Pakistan
10 killed in road accident in NW Pakistan
Carney sets high bar to changes at Bank of England
Four arrested as Bangladesh building toll rises to 352
Suicide bombers attack US base in Afghanistan
Afghan District Governor Defects To Taliban
North Korea 'postpones' family unions with South Korea
U.S. trade agency rules for Samsung, bans iPhone 4 imports
Gunmen kill 11 foreign climbers in Pakistan
David Beckham retires from football
Matt Smith quits BBC’s Doctor Who
G20 Summit ends divided over Syria
10 killed in Iraq bomb attack
Man 'who set himself ablaze' on National Mall dies
Series of attacks kill 10 police in Afghanistan
China yuan strengthens to 6.1696 against USD Thursday
Syrian prime minister 'survives assassination attempt'
Residents return to Texas blast site
Shinzo Abe is Japan's prime minister
Former first lady Barbara Bush leaves hospital
Bangladesh Islamist leader executed
Michael Schumacher still in a coma fighting for his life following skiing accident
Eleven killed in China police station attack
Mali Counts Votes After Presidential Runoff
Bradley Cooper in talks to play Lance Armstrong in biopic
Boeing airliner crashes in Russian city of Kazan, 50 killed
EU ministers hold crisis talks over horse meat scandal
Bill De Blasio sworn in as New York mayor, succeeding Michael Bloomberg
Thai opposition announces election boycott
Bangladesh building collapse death toll passes 1,000
Pussy Riot member Maria Alyokhina freed from jail
Telangana: Jagan to spend Thursday in hospital; blackout continues in Seemandhra
Plane crash lands at San Francisco airport
Central African Republic President, PM stepping down
Brazil held by England 2-2 as Maracana re-opens
China and Taiwan hold historic talks
California wildfire grows but officials say fire crews making progress
George W Bush weighs into immigration debate
Mandela hospitalised after he stops talking
South Korea confirms that North Korea has conducted controversial third nuclear test
Hundreds fall sick in Bangladesh factory
Female suicide bomber kills 16 at Russian station
Ten killed in Russia coal mine blast
Thai protesters storm army headquarters
Israel launches new airstrike against Syria
Police fire tear gas at protesters in Cairo
Blizzard wallops US Northeast, closes roads
Egypt opposition mulls response to Morsi dialogue call
Wrestling to feature in 2020 Tokyo Olympics
Hundreds dead or injured in China quake
May Housing Starts Up 6.8%
Two French journalists killed in Mali
Cuba's Castro to Take Over CELAC Presidency
Vehicles 'left burning' as smoke emits from Japan tunnel
5.6 magnitude earthquake shakes Iran
Rescuers race to find 20 still trapped in India building collapse
Nelson Mandela released from hospital
Daily Press Briefing: Syria
Islamists attack Malian troops in Gao
Cardinals enter Sistine Chapel to elect pope
Britain loses bid to deport radical cleric Abu Qatada
Russian parliament to consider ban on U.S. adoptions
Gunshots, explosions rock Thai protest day ahead of polls
Egypt's military takes control over Muslim Brotherhood, supporters
North Korea vows to restart nuclear facilities
Egypt Youth Leader Detained for Four Days
Today in History, Jan. 21
Ariel Castro sentenced to 1,000 years in prison
It's official: Deal reached on "fiscal cliff"
Zimmerman pulled over in Texas for speeding, given warning
Russia, China Concerned About Israeli Airstrikes in Syria
US allies get help to repel Iranian computer attacks
China stocks close higher on Wednesday
Russia unveils $25bn oil link to Pacific
4 dead after police standoff with gunman barricaded in US home
Dolce and Gabbana Fined in Italian Tax Case
7.7-magnitude earthquake hits SW Pakistan
West raises stakes over Syria chemical claims
China stocks close higher on Wednesday
Asteroid passes Earth in fly-by
EU to train Mali army to fight northern Islamist militants
Spain turning back the clock on siestas
Syria Loads Chemical Weapons into Bombs, Awaiting Assad Order
Rescuers search for survivors of Texas fertiliser plant blast
15 killed, 90 wounded in fresh attacks in Iraq
US says Syria may have used sarin gas in chemical weapons
Jenni Rivera, Mexican music star, dies in plane crash
British PM pushes Sri Lanka on war crimes
Zimbabwe: Mugabe declared winner in disputed vote
Indonesia: Death toll rises to 11 in Indonesia boat capsize
Egypt court bans Muslim Brotherhood 'activities'
Rouhani leads in initial Iran count
Israeli lawmakers call for internal probe into case of Prisoner X
Politicians in flag violence talks
Nigeria announces plans to change polymer Naira notes
North Korea proposes high-level talks with US
Indian rape victim dies in Singapore hospital
Gunmen Kill 11 Foreign Tourists in Pakistan
Statement by the spokesperson of the EU High Representative, Catherine Ashton, on the resumption of executions in Iraq
Egypt bracing for massive protests
Israel agrees to free 104 Palestinian prisoners
US files espionage charges against Snowden over leaks
Palestinians' first ever UN vote symbolic yet historic
Bangladesh building-collapse death toll climbs to 580
Britain summons Israeli envoy over settlements
Chinese general’s son gets 10 years’ jail for gang-rape
Nevada: 2 dead, 2 hurt in middle school shooting
Moderate earthquake hits southern Pakistan
Hamas in mixed-sex school 'ban'
1 Killed in Bangladesh Protest
Navy panel urges ouster of officer who faked death
Turkish Prime Minister signals return to hardline on protesters
Factbox: What to look for in Obama's State of the Union speech
Google 'are playing international tax game'
Iraq backs Egypt crackdown on Mohamed Morsi supporters
Russia gives initial approval to adoption ban
Kosovo: 3 get jail time in organ trafficking case
Hrithik Roshan, Sussanne to divorce
Gunman among 7 dead after Fla. apartment shootout
Thousands protest gay marriage in France
Car bombs kill at least 49 in Iraq
Obama puts Syria strike on hold
Air strikes wound civilians in Syria's Deraa
Militants kill 6 soldiers in northwest Pakistan
Two dead, 181 hurt in San Francisco air crash
Workers protest after Bangladesh building collapse
Missing cruise passenger is a NSW ambo
Diana and Fayed death info received new The deaths of Princess Diana and Dodi Al Fayed are being looked at again by police after they received information.
Snowden releases first Russia video
Chinese shares close higher Friday
Rafa Nadal to miss Australian Open
India’s Modi promises tough stance against Pakistan
Brazil leader breaks silence about protests
Calif. man pleads not guilty in terrorism case
Egypt court orders release of Mubarak
Boy Scouts of America delays vote on lifting ban on gays
Car bombing kills 14 in northern Iraq
Joran Van Der Sloots Plans To Get Married In Peru Prison
Tokyo stocks close down 1.53%
China stock index futures close lower -- Jan. 24
Pictures of the day: 11 April 2013
Two Palestinians Killed in an Israeli Air Strike on Gaza
Missing red panda returned safely to National Zoo
Jesse Jackson Jr., Wife to Plead Guilty to Fraud
U.S. expels Venezuelan diplomats
Stuart Hall Admits Sex Assaults On Children
20 killed, 44 injured in Philippine road accident
Stansted: Ryanair reports 13% rise in annual profits but warns of slower growth this year
Stocks to watch at close on Thursday
On 50th anniversary of JFK death, Dallas holds its first memorial
7.7-magnitude earthquake hits SW Pakistan
Report of two explosions at finish line of Boston Marathon
Google shares soar past $1,000 on strong earnings
Queen Beatrix of the Netherlands abdicates in favour of son
Cars trapped in tunnel collapse outside Tokyo
Italian journalist picked as presidential candidate
Gov't committee approves release of 26 Palestinian prisoners
Philadelphia building collapses; reports of people trapped
Obama meets Zuma and pays tribute to Mandela
U.S. Senate set to vote on gun control bill
Chinese students attacked in France
Car bombings kill 13 civilians in Iraqi capital
Syria talks agree military aid to rebels
Series of deadly attacks strikes Iraq
Egypt president declares state of emergency in three cities
Protesters clash with police at Jantar Mantar, 5 people detained
Turkish police fire teargas at protesters in Istanbul
Red grapes, blueberries boost human immunity
Saudi-born Nigerian charged with terrorism in New York
EU Receives 2012 Nobel Peace Prize
San Fermin bull-running festival starts
Briton among dead in Kabul suicide attack
Former CIA officer sentenced to 30 months in prison for info leak
Singapore stocks close 0.44 pct lower
Pakistan-UN report reveals alarming levels of drug use
McAfee to acquire firewall Stonesoft for $389 million
7.2 magnitude earthquake strikes Philippines
Bangladesh: Fugitive Sentenced to Death by War Crimes Tribunal
Alleged cop killer died from gunshot
At least 28 people die in Chinese coal mine explosion
Car Bomb Hits Swedish Consulate in Benghazi, None Hurt
Musharraf arrested in Pakistan
Iran Nuclear Talks in Geneva Spur High Hopes
12 militants killed in Afghan raids: ministry
North Korea launches short-range missiles
Thai protesters block polling stations in Bangkok
Hugo Chavez: Venezuelan officials for unity
NATO says North Korea nuclear test is grave threat to world peace
North Korea Confirms Third Nuclear Test
Indian stocks open lower
Macau gambling revenue hits record US$38b in 2012
Israelis, Palestinians begin talks
The Note's Must-Reads for Tuesday, October 8, 2013
Nelson Mandela dies: Live coverage
Some county officials pave the way for same-sex marriage
Tunisia president says confident can overcome political crisis
US Air Force helicopter crew killed in British crash
Tokyo wins race to host 2020 Olympics
Malaysia detains Australian lawmaker at airport
Mumbai police arrest fifth suspect in gang-rape case
Security agencies worry about new terrorist threats in Kenya
North Korea launches short-range missiles
EU ministers 'determined' to resolve horsemeat scandal
U.S. concerns grow about Syria's chemical weapons
12 killed in bus accident in Pakistan
U.S. military jettisons bombs near Australia's Great Barrier Reef
Taliban attacks US base in Afghanistan
Chinese yuan weakens to 6.2816 against USD
Russia invites Syrian opposition for talks
Google invests 200 million USD in Texas wind farm project
Egyptians Vote On New Constitution
Former England great Tom Finney dies at 91
Insurance is key to fostering economic growth
Car bomb hits Libyan Foreign Ministry in Benghazi
Roadside bomb kills 3 policemen in Afghanistan
Syria talks for Cameron and Putin
French-led troops control access to Timbuktu
Nato solider dies in Afghanistan
Gunmen kill 11 foreign climbers in Pakistan
North Korea blocks access to joint industrial zone
Delhi gang-rape verdict deferred again
Demolition work to begin at stadium
Most French support military operation in Mali
23 Missing as Typhoon Utor Hits Philippines
Egyptians vote on constitution change
Senate leaders appear close to US debt ceiling deal
Death toll from Egypt protests rises to 49
4.3-magnitude earthquake jolts SW China
6 dead, 33 hurt in Cotabato blast
Chairman of British no-frills airline easyJet to step down
Japan urges U.S. to quickly handle budget deadlock
Suicide Bomber Kills 11 in Afghanistan
US captures al-Qaeda leader but fails in Somalia attack
Senate Judiciary Committee nearing final big decisions in shaping immigration bill
NATO troops killed in Afghan 'insider attack'
Man arrested on suspicion of murder after stabbing in Suffolk
London Marathon observes silence for Boston victims
Football: Messi hits 300th Barcelona goal in comeback win
40 still missing in Canadian train wreck
Tunisia opposition leader slain; protests erupt
Ukrainian officials barred from Canada as protests continue
UN chief presses for major boost in Syrian aid
Stocks slump on Wall Street
Protests and appeals for calm after Zimmerman acquitted of Trayvon Martin murder
NSA whistleblower Edward Snowden leaves Hong Kong on flight to Moscow
2 killed, 6 wounded in clashes in northern Lebanon
All Eyes on Capriles as Venezuela Election Set
Radio prankster in tears over nurse’s death
N. Korea looks set to delay controversial rocket launch
NATO soldier killed in Afghan attack
Obama rejects GOP offer to ease shutdown
Gates blast rocks Obama administration
Jeff Bezos Pays $250 Million For The Washington Post
Brooks pleads not guilty at phone hacking hearing
Purge of Kim uncle sends chilling message to North Korea’s elite
South Africa's former PM Nelson Mandela back in hospital
Obama pledges to make new health care law work
Fresh rain brings more flooding
Thousands protest gay marriage in Paris
Zambia arrests ex-leader Banda over oil deal
The Note's Must-Reads for Friday, July 12, 2013
Iran nuclear talks start in Geneva
Thai protesters besiege more ministries
Amazon's Bezos buys Washington Post for $250-M
Obama encourages Boy Scouts to end ban on gays
Car bomb kills four in Hezbollah Beirut bastion: minister
Arab League welcomes US-Russian deal on Syria
Gun battles in Central African capital create fresh panic
Germany ready to help Syria chemical mission
EXCLUSIVE-UPDATE 1-Egypt pro-Mursi alliance signals flexibility in talks
David Beckham Retires From Football
Scottish police say at least one dead after helicopter crashes into pub
Libya closes borders, declares martial law in south
5.0-magnitude quake jolts Japan
Lara plans visit to Nepal
Taliban prison break: 250 militants escape after attack on Pakistan jail
Meteorite hits central Russia, 400 hurt
North Korea nuclear test
Blizzard wallops US Northeast, closes roads
NATO protesters convicted on non-terrorism charges
Obama: Congress, world credibility on line
At least 33 dead as big quake hits Pakistan
Many killed in Syrian air strike
Egypt's interior minister survives bomb attack
China yuan weakens to 6.1818 against USD Tuesday
Cameron loses parliamentary vote on Syria military action
Egypt freezes Muslim Brotherhood funds
Russian meteorite leaves building gaping open
Putin's security decree for Sochi draws ire of critics
Tony Abbott Sworn In As Australia PM
Egypt's military cracks down on Muslim Brotherhood
Assembly meets amid Chavez crisis
Egypt braces for more protests over Morsi, prays for calm
Syria opposition agrees to talks
Morsi backers defiant in face of Egypt govt threat
Suicide Bombers Kill 3 Soldiers in Pakistan
Ukraine protesters topple Lenin statue
Kabul Bank Heads Sentenced for Corruption
US drone strike kills seven in North Waziristan
Train service disrupted between Raffles Place and Marina Bay
US stocks ease in choppy trading
Briton jailed for 10 years for selling fake bomb detectors
China police seek eight suspects over crash
Suicide bomber kills 16 in Russia’s Volgograd
15 killed, 90 wounded in fresh attacks in Iraq
Bangladesh building-collapse toll tops 600
Kerry postpones visit to Israel in one week
EU jobless hits fresh record
Mugabe sworn in for another term
Nelson Mandela's health 'unstable'
Bailout terms prompt run on Cyprus banks
Americans scramble to sign up for Obamacare by deadline
Lance Armstrong confesses to doping in Oprah interview
David Cameron: Andy Murray deserves a knighthood
Hushen 300 Index closes lower -- March 12
State Dept security chief resigns after Benghazi
NRA official to face questions for first time since controversial remarks
Honduras ambassador resigns after alleged embassy orgy
Libya ‘destroys last chemical weapons’
Iran: Moderate candidate wins presidential vote
Three Afghans dead in new blast at US base in east Afghanistan
Suicide bombs hit Egypt military in Sinai, kill 4
Asian markets lifted by positive US, China data
South Africa: Mandela in hospital for tests
Iran, world powers agree nuclear deal
Suicide bomber kills guard at US embassy in Turkey
Dozens injured as Morsi supporters clash with security forces
5.5-magnitude quake hits off Taiwan
Pistorius officer on attempted murder charges
Vinnie Jones reveals he has skin cancer
Stocks close 2.47% higher
Pakistan Taliban vows revenge, to repay Hakimullah's killing in bloodshed
'Dozens killed' in Syrian air strike on bakery
Gunmen kill 6 polio workers in Pakistan
Raid on Boston Marathon bombing suspect captured on film
Destruction of Syria's Chemical Weapons Could Prove Difficult
California wildfire forces evacuation of homes, university
UN: US drone strikes violate Pakistan's sovereignty
Obama hails Mandela's inspiration effect
Kerry Welcomes Arab Plan for Israeli-Palestinian Talks
Oil firm asked rogue trader about meeting with minister
Death toll in Kenya bus attack rises to six
Russia, Syria Work on 'Concrete' Chemical Weapons Plan
Australian PM insists no argument with Indonesia
Asian stocks hit three-week highs on hopes of U.S. debt deal
'Palestinian Prime Minister Fayyad resigns'
South Africa admits possible 'mistake' over deaf signer at Mandela memorial
Iran vows to preserve "peaceful" nuclear program
Oh, little town of Bethlehem — for real
Peacekeeper killed in Abyei clash
Obama: Patriot missile batteries, troops to stay in Jordan near Syrian border
Stocks fall on third day of government shutdown
Equatoguineans vote in legislative polls
NATO troops killed in Afghan 'insider attack'
Israeli soldiers kill Palestinian woman in West Bank
Israeli official confirms second air strike at Syria
Egypt launches new assault against Sinai militants
A battle to retake north Mali: Hundreds of French troops drive back al-Qaida-linked rebels
India: Tear Gas Fired At Gang Rape Protesters
Syria, opposition agree 'in principle' to attend peace conference
Afghan president approves new election law
Algeria mulls international force for hostages
Asiana Air Boeing 777 crash lands at San Francisco airport
Myanmar police say 13 children die in electrical fire at mosque
Fiscal cliff: House delays vote on fiscal cliff deal - live
Delhi gang rape victim flown to Singapore hospital
Contraceptive pill 'doubles glaucoma risk'
Man Charged After Buckingham Palace Arrest
'5 snowboarders killed in Colorado avalanche'
Ban to review Syria chemical arms accord
Iraqi president in hospital after suffering stroke
Malaysia's ruling coalition wins majority
Yacimovich urges cabinet to approve Palestinian prisoners release
Two blasts near Iranian embassy in Beirut
Police: 19 hurt in NOLA Mother's Day shooting
Hagel defends proposed cuts in defense spending
US bans carry-on liquids on direct flights to Russia
Egypt: Muslim Brotherhood Stands Behind Morsi
Malaysia sets date for landmark elections
NATO strike kills 11 Afghan children
Iranian minister blames West for failed nuke talks
Flooding Forces 75,000 From Canada Homes
Eight NATO Troops Killed In Afghanistan
Typhoon Fitow slams into southeastern China
Mandela movie to open this month in South Africa
Exit polls shows Putin ally wins Moscow vote, Navalny cries foul
Not guilty plea for James Holmes – but insanity option still on table
At least 13 killed in triple car bombings in Iraq's Diyala
Dhawan ton sets up India Trophy win over South Africa
Chris Brown concerts cancelled new
Apple app sends drivers to airport
U.S. drone kills 4 militants in Pakistan
Dozens reported killed in Venezuela prison riot
Coptic priest shot dead in Egypt attack
North Korea postpones war-torn family unions
Pope Francis Slips Out of Vatican for Prayers
US Senate has Rare Sunday Session Days Amid Fiscal Impasse
Egypt's Muslim Brotherhood Set for Mass March
US presidents pay tribute to Mandela
Belarus, Latvia to set up border commission
Iraq violence kills seven
Protests continue in Brazil
US suspects Syria used chemical weapons
Bedouin release two Britons seized in Egypt's Sinai
Iran, six world powers clinch breakthrough nuclear deal
Israel called to account over latest settlement plans by European countries
Iran says it has seized U.S. drone; U.S. says it's not true
Egypt bans Muslim Brotherhood group
Obama pokes fun at critics during press dinner
Allen defends self against Farrow's abuse claims
Gunmen kill 3 policemen in Iraq
1000 prisoners escape from Libyan jail
Photos show N. Korea nuclear readiness
Forex & Gold 12 March 2013
Car bombs kill 20 in Turkish town near Syrian border
UN votes to eliminate Syria's chemical weapons
Edward Snowden's father in Moscow
US Congress may throw wrench into Iran nuclear deal
Pakistani Taleban chief killed in US drone strike
Now, militants battle Pakistani police
Muslim Brotherhood supporters die in Egypt clashes
Facebook profits jump as user base expands
Syria envoy calls for political change to end conflict
News summary for January 14
Thirty Dead In Italian Bus Plunge
Rogers, Videotron reach network-sharing, spectrum deal
China stocks close lower on Thursday
Bulgaria President Backs Protesters, Opposes Snap Elections
Indonesia: Six dead in Indonesian volcanic eruption
Bangladesh executes opposition leader
Iran President Hassan Rouhani wants nuclear deal in months
Italy to swear in new coalition government
South Africans mourn, celebrate Mandela
US Senate passes gay workers bill
For first time in history, Technion to teach engineering in Russia
Indian stocks open higher
Maldives holds fresh presidential election
Egypt orders arrest of Brotherhood chief Badie
One World Trade Center Named Tallest US Building
What the Papers Say, June 25, 2013
Israel unveils 1,800 more settler homes
Piers Morgan Interviewed by Police in Hacking Case
Syrian opposition meets to choose interim PM
Singapore stocks close 0.54 pct higher
Mumbai journalist gang-rape case: All five accused arrested
Israeli forces detain 2 in Hebron arrest raid
Pakistani girl shot by Taliban appears on video
Egypt's interim president swears in new Cabinet
Oscar Pistorius 'shot Steenkamp in bathroom'
China court sentences Bo Xilai to life imprisonment for corruption
End 'near' for Syria's chemical weapons
Egypt: Egypt crackdown sparks global outrage
Two New York firefighters in guarded condition after deadly ambush
Egypt army cracks down on Brotherhood
Suicide bomber kills 10 in Pakistan
Six rescued after boat capsizes in Dublin Bay
Freed Pussy Riot pair stir up anti-Putin protests
Pakistan Shi'ites demand protection from militants
Train driver in Spain crash questioned by judge
Singapore stocks close 0.31 pct lower
Men in China detained after taking girls to hotel
Russia asks UN to consider its inquiry of Syria chemical arms use
Philippines and rebels reach 'wealth deal'
Urgent: Death toll from NE China fire rises to 112
Israel launches air strikes near Damascus
Heavy rains leave 18 dead in Philippines
Wawrinka reaches first grand slam final
Imran Khan to contest elections from four NA seats
Trailblazing Israeli electric car company to fold
Texans coach Gary Kubiak in stable condition after collapse
Taliban commander killed in US drone strike
Ankeet Chavan granted bail to get married
Car bomb in northern Syria kills 20
North Korea Shuts Last Remaining Hotline to South
Over 70 dead in Spanish high-speed train crash
Egypt sentences Pakistani amid 5 to death for drug smuggling
French train passengers tell of crash ordeal
Former Reagan spokesman Larry Speakes dies at 74
Egyptians vote on divisive constitution
Obamas to meet Mandela family wont visit hospital
Iran threatens to trigger oil price war
Weak earnings drag stocks lower on Wall Street
Former plant chief who battled Fukushima disaster dies of cancer
Three feared dead after helicopter pub crash
Nigerian MP charged with accepting $3m bribe
Rupee up 22 paise against dollar in early trade
Iran says capable of jamming foes' communication systems
Israel's Peres calls for return to peace talks
Obama to deliver statement on Syria at White House at 1:15 PM
Indian stocks close lower
US makes case for action against Syria
Mourners clash with police in Tunisia
One World Trade Center Named Tallest US Building
South African police arrest 50 in farm protest
China flu death toll rises to six
Owner arrested as Bangladesh building toll reaches 372
25 more bodies found at Algerian gas plant
Questions arise over chemical weapons claims in Syria
Powerful new earthquake hits shattered Pakistan region
Indian troops raid Pakistani military post
Pope Benedict XVI departs Vatican for last time
Designer, Socialite Lilly Pulitzer Dies at 81
Chinese vice premier meets Australian Governor-General
Brazil leader promises reform vote
Tropical Storm Andrea to slide up East Coast
Japan, US hold talks linked to regional trade pact
Five dead as Indonesia train collides with fuel truck
Israel unveils plans for new settler homes
Miss New York is crowned Miss America
Websites fight nasty comments by taking away anonymity
Austrian man charged after 56 human skulls are found at his home
US House backs new sanctions before Iran inauguration
Suspected US drone kills 6 militants in Yemen
Man sets himself on fire at Washington's National Mall
27 killed in attacks across Iraq
Thousands protest gay marriage in France
India Ink: Image of the Day: March 20
Watch live: US Capitol on lockdown after reports of shots fired
Shanghai Free Trade Zone begins operation
6 killed, 12 injured in blast in NW Pakista
At least 200 killed in Bangladesh building collapse
Court upholds death sentences for Mekong murderers
Abduction teacher to be sentenced
Deadly Gas Cylinder Blast Hits Pakistan School Bus
N Korean ship carrying Cuba missiles seized
Israeli Forces Arrest Five Palestinians across West Bank
Protests planned across Brazil despite concessions
Merkel Wins Big in Germany Election
British police deny protecting sex abuser Savile
South Korean workers set to leave joint factory zone
Benedict comes home to new house and new Pope
Suicide bomber kills 14 at Russian train station
Held in Guatemala, software guru McAfee fights deportation
Cambodia opposition head turns to parliament in poll bid
Syrian opposition to name delegation for talks
Obama visits tornado hit Oklahoma
John Boehner: from humble origin, fiscal cliff may be his undoing
Biden calls for trust in building ‘new relationship’ with China
Sinai car bomb kills at least 10 Egyptian soldiers
Kerry: No deal yet in nuclear talks with Iran
Indian building collapse death toll rises to 72
98 dead in Central African Republic after clashes
Bomb threat forces evacuation at Princeton
Turkey unrest: Unions call for strike over police crackdown
Moody's upgrades Greek credit rating
Sudanese police block protest at human rights commission
Russia delivers humanitarian aid to Syrian refugees in Lebanon
8 soldiers killed in bomb attack in NW Pakistan
South Africa's Nelson Mandela Hospitalized
Ferrer beats Nishikori to advance to Australian Open quarterfinals
UBS settles US mortgage lawsuit and takes £600m charge
Pope Francis commemorates dead migrants at Lampedusa
Justice Adly Mansour sworn in as Egypt interim president
North, South Korea hold rare talks
Blast kills nine in southern Afghanistan: officials
Kenya: Pair Arrested By Anti-Terror Police
Obama to set out gun control plans
Only two bombs found in Boston Marathon attack
US to destroy Syria chemical weapon stockpile at sea
Pakistan PM for deeper economic ties with Sri Lanka
Three storey building collapses in Ebute Meta
Bomb explodes at Athens shopping mall, 2 wounded
Dozens killed in Laos plane crash
3 dead in Maryland mall shooting
'War crime': U.N. finds sarin used in Syria chemical weapons attack
6 killed in Mexico ‘monster truck’ crash
8 dead after heavy rains on island of St Vincent
Robber steals $53 million worth of jewels in Cannes, police say
Merkel Wins Big in Germany Election
Gunmen kill 5 female teachers in Pakistan
Virginia's ex-Gov. Bob McDonnell, wife charged with corruption
US sprinter Tyson Gay tests positive for banned substance
Magnitude-6.0 quake jolts Santa Cruz Islands: CENC
Pakistan to release senior Taliban commander on Saturday
Hard-hit hotels ready for price war
Egypt court orders Mubarak freed
Police converge on street in search for Boston bomb suspect
‘Nelson Mandela is recovering’
1 dead, 39 injured in E China road accident
Bollywood cuts costs as rupee crisis bites
Women drivers to face insurance premium rise
Tornadoes, damaging storms hit U.S. Midwest, killing 5
China opposes US arms sales to Taiwan
Singapore stocks end up 0.11 pct
IAEA, Iran to hold first nuclear talks since Rohani election
China Premier Li rejects 'groundless' US hacking accusations
US military aircraft shot at during evacuation mission in South Sudan
New Zealand votes to legalise same-sex marriage
Dzhokhar Tsarnaev charged in Boston Marathon bombing
Picture of the Day
Son of Chinese army singers gets 10 years' jail for gang rape
Police seek gunmen in New Orleans Mother's Day parade shooting
Egypt's interim president swears in new Cabinet
Pope thanks public for joining his Syria vigil
East Timor Bans Martial Arts Schools Amid Killings
Afghan president approves new electon law
Pak army adamant on fighting the other Taleban
Egypt's Morsi rules out talks as hostage video appears
South Africa holds state funeral for Mandela
Report of two explosions at finish line of Boston Marathon
Quiz crossword - Saturday 27th April
Costa Concordia survivors detail experience one year later
Israeli minister slams Kerry’s boycott warning
Kenya SC upholds election result
Angelina Jolie and the complex truth about breast cancer
Suu Kyi urges party unity amid squabbles
10 Things to Know for Today
White House, defense firms discuss automatic spending cuts
Venezuelan President Hugo Chavez dies of cancer at 58
Thousands told to evacuate in Colorado flooding
Zambia's ex-President Rupiah Banda arrested
US Senate Confirms Janet Yellen as New Central Bank Chief
Palestinian prisoner dies of cancer, unrest in Israel jails
Asian Markets up on Strong US Jobs Data
15 killed, 90 wounded in fresh attacks in Iraq
Indian policeman injured in gang-rape protest dies
Syria army continues mop-up operations near Damascus
Why Cyprus bailout is nothing more than usual euro nonsense
Bianca Ojukwu becomes APGA national leader
U.S. Sees No Conclusive Evidence of Chemical Arms Use by Syria
Five Killed in Blasts in India
Egypt: Muslim Brotherhood deputy head arrested
Strong earthquake in western China kills at least 75
Nobel laureate Doris Lessing dies at 94
Snowden thanks Russia for granting asylum
US Senate confirms Yellen as Fed's next chair
French forces seize key town
Bolivia's Morales says he would grant asylum to Snowden if asked
Boston bomb suspect buried in Virginia cemetery
Mom and baby among five killed as tornadoes rake Oklahoma City area
Nevada: 2 dead, 2 hurt in middle school shooting
Palestinian president wants Israelis to talk peace
3 killed, 138 injured in Boston blasts: media
Malala leaves British hospital
Internet service resumes in Syria
Man and woman found dead in Essex hotel swimming pool
Syrian PM survives bomb attack in capital
Pakistan condemns US drone strike in Miranshah
Residents return to Fallujah
South Africa unites in prayer and song for Nelson Mandela
Ahmadinejad may face charges over election appearance
Dozens of Morsi supporters killed in Egypt clashes
Portugal-China to strengthen scientific research ties
Singapore stocks close 0.5 pct higher
New glories for China in striving for renewal
Stock futures edge higher, all eyes on Fed
China stocks close lower on Friday
Apple stock plunges 11% after earnings disappointment
EU lifts diamond sanctions against Zimbabwe
occupied Palestinian territory: Palestinians Face a Route to Nowhere
50 survivors found in Bangladesh factory
Egypt seeks to lure investors ...
US-Russia reach agreement on Syria weapons
Hamas senior denies Gaza, PA coordinated on peace talks
Cambodian opposition rejects Hun Sen election win
Miss New York is crowned Miss America
Obama canceled meeting with Putin
KL shares mixed at mid-day
US drone strike kills at least ten in Pakistan
Egypt court turns down Mubarak's release request
François Hollande threatens legal action over affair claims
At least 47 Iranian exiles killed at Iraq's Camp Ashraf
Pistorius cop on seven attempted murder charges
Major quake kills 39 in Pakistan
Israeli credibility on line over Iran nuclear challenge
'Judge at polls directs voters on Egypt constitution vote'
Sri Lanka warned over war crime allegations
Former New Mexico Gov. Richardson pressing North Korean test ban
Protesters clash with riot police in Kiev
Egypt violence: Student killed in clashes at Cairo’s Islamic university
Helicopter crashes in London
Jakarta prays for metro to ease traffic chaos
Japan, S Korean military planes defy China's new defence zone
Typhoon Bopha kills 15 in S. Philippines
Car bomb rocks Hezbollah stronghold in Lebanon
S Korea opposition candidate closes poll gap
8 dead, 11 missing in SW China landslide
Senate confirms Janet Yellen as next Federal Reserve Chair
5 Taliban, 5 Afghan police killed in ambushes
Pakistani Taliban chief Hakimullah Mehsud killed in drone strike
At Least 47 Killed In Baquba Blasts
Britain Sees Evidence Assad Could Use Chemical Weapons
Algeria hostage death toll rises
French set for Mali ground combat
Testimony in trial of former FM Liberman begins
Storm death toll rises as wind, rain batters north. Europe
Pakistan releases seven Afghan Taliban fighters
Gunmen kidnap 2 Turkish Airlines pilots in Lebanon
New Zealand legalizes same-sex marriage
Weatherman Fred Talbot Held Over 'Sex Abuse'
Pakistan drone strike kills up to six
India building collapse kills 14; dozens trapped
Napthine takes the reins after Baillieu's leadership crumbles
Syrian rebels claim responsibility for killings in Lebanon
Syrian army pushes assault on rebel-held town
Israel releases 26 more Palestinian prisoners
More than 70 dead in clashes at Morsi rallies in Egypt
Thai protesters launch Bangkok 'shutdown'
Spanish train driver Garzon to be questioned by judge
France Welcomes US-Russia Deal on Syria
British soldier shot dead in Afghan ‘insider attack’
61 dead in Ivory Coast stampede
Glasgow Helicopter Crash: At Least Six Dead
Taliban denies involvement in Boston marathon bombing
Swiss tourist gang-raped in India
India issues red alert for cyclone Phailin
SFG meeting reviews situation in Mali
Discipline against student thought to be key to motive
Many killed in Syrian air strike
India govt rejects proposal to shut petrol pumps at night
Clinton returns to work, plans to testify on Benghazi attack
Tens of thousands line up to cast votes in Bhutan
Afghan president extends visit to Pakistan for Taliban talks
Thieves steal Channel swimmer's wheelchair
Three Killed In Crash At Tiananmen Square
Singapore shares open higher on Thursday
Obama to press Congress to act on economy
Kurdish rebels to withdraw from Turkey
Twin quakes kill 89 in China
Whitey Bulger gets life for racketeering, killings
Official says Kenyan forces caused mall collapse
Japan’s GDP growth downgraded to annual 1.1%
Islamist parties in Egypt unite for elections
Bangladesh building collapse: death toll climbs to 580
Algeria hostage crisis ends in bloodbath
Egypt: Child killed in Cairo clashes after pro-Morsi protest
South Africa: Mandela remains in hospital
China yuan strengthens to new high against USD
Police arrest suspect in deadly LA driving attack
the gradual process of acquiring knowledge.
thin strip of metal used to separate lines of type in printing.
abandon the intended prey, turn, and pursue an inferior prey.
the act of designating or identifying something.
make pure or free from sin or guilt.
fail to do something; leave something undone.
an unofficial association of people or groups.
the upper part of a column that supports the entablature.
sink to a lower level or form a depression.
create code, write a computer program.
grant relief or an exemption from a rule or requirement to.
charge falsely or with malicious intent; attack the good name and reputation of someone.
a company that performs a public service; subject to government regulation.
extend or spread outward from a center or focus or inward towards a center.
to distribute systematically or strategically.
form a mental image of something that is not present or that is not the case.
to make less distinct or clear.
free from a burden, evil, or distress.
a straightaway section of a racetrack.
emit a brief burst of light.
alter the shape of (something) by stress.
move as a crowd or in a group.
a temporary debarment (from a privilege or position etc).
the quality of being inadequate or falling short of perfection.
clear mucus or food from one's throat.
keep in safety and protect from harm, decay, loss, or destruction.
the address where a person or organization can be communicated with.
any organization that provides resources and facilities for a function or event.
support a person for a position.
try to cure by special care of treatment, of an illness or injury.
a long thin implement resembling a length of wood.
(grammar) the word in a grammatical constituent that plays the same grammatical role as the whole constituent.
reach a destination; arrive by movement or progress.
shrivel or wither or mature imperfectly.
part; cease or break association with.
a cue given to a performer (usually the beginning of the next line to be spoken).
draw from specific cases for more general cases.
burst open with a sharp, explosive sound.
make undue claims to having.
the head of a city government.
become quiet or still; fall silent.
move forward by leaps and bounds.
give up or agree to forgo to the power or possession of another.
come as a logical consequence; follow logically.
the event of fading and gradually vanishing from sight.
be afraid or feel anxious or apprehensive about a possible or probable situation or event.
travel along a zigzag path.
make a mess of or create disorder in.
the state of being employed or having a job.
a sculpture representing a human or animal.
be a distinctive feature, attribute, or trait; sometimes in a very positive sense.
travel or be transported in a vehicle.
fall or descend to a lower place or level.
the ability to recall past occurrences.
utter with a spitting sound, as if in a rage.
the sound of knocking (as on a door or in an engine or bearing).
ask for and get free; be a parasite.
the general condition of body and mind.
an area wholly or partly surrounded by walls or buildings.
raising the stakes in a card game by a factor of 2.
the act of losing or surrendering something as a penalty for a mistake or fault or failure to perform etc..
protect or fight for as a champion.
a relation of affinity or harmony between people; whatever affects one correspondingly affects the other.
save or relieve from an experience or action.
run around the rim of.
take (gas, light or heat) into a solution.
separate by passing through a sieve or other straining device to separate out coarser elements.
a plant originally cultivated but now growing wild.
speed up the progress of; facilitate.
provide evidence for; stand as proof of; show by one's behavior, attitude, or external attributes.
(computer science) a program designed for general support of the processes of a computer.
a time interval during which there is a temporary cessation of something.
a rhythmic thrusting movement of the legs as in swimming or calisthenics.
make more temperate, acceptable, or suitable by adding something else; moderate.
confine as if in a prison.
approach with an offer of sexual favors.
correct by punishment or discipline.
cause to go into a solution.
a movement back from an impact.
the action of putting something into operation.
disentangle and raise the fibers of.
framework consisting of an ornamental design made of strips of wood or metal.
an itemized statement of money owed for goods shipped or services rendered.
the positively charged dense center of an atom.
an event that causes someone to die.
declare in the capacity of an umpire or referee.
the trait of being active; moving or acting rapidly and energetically.
cause to be alert and energetic.
look through a book or other written material.
the last section of a communication.
go to see for professional or business reasons.
a gathering of spectators or listeners at a (usually public) performance.
provide an interlinear translation of a word or phrase.
leave or give by will after one's death.
cause to vibrate in a definite pattern.
compel to behave in a certain way.
travel across or pass over.
give up what is not strictly needed.
become less interesting or attractive.
have a disagreement over something.
undergo (as of injuries and illnesses).
process or manner of functioning or operating.
the event of something ending.
return to an original state.
the United States (especially the northern states during the American Civil War).
place too much a load on.
the act of furnishing an equivalent person or thing in the place of another.
form a mental picture of something that is invisible or abstract.
indicate a decision in regard to.
carry a burden, either real or metaphoric.
any piece of work that is undertaken or attempted.
the ordering of genes in a haploid set of chromosomes of a particular organism; the full DNA sequence of an organism.
stamp or emboss a title or design on a book with a block.
(medicine) the condition in which an organism can resist disease.
a group of sheep or goats.
(meteorology) a unit of pressure equal to a million dynes per square centimeter.
(tennis) a score consisting of winning a game when your opponent was serving.
someone sent on a mission to represent the interests of someone else.
the act of taking something that is offered.
hit before it touches the ground.
a cutting or thrusting weapon that has a long metal blade and a hilt with a hand guard.
breed animals or plants using parents of different races and varieties.
walk heavily and firmly, as when weary, or through mud.
pay unsolicited and usually unwanted sexual attention to.
release (gas or energy) as a result of a chemical reaction or physical decomposition.
rerun a performance of a play, for example.
a position given by its location to the side of an object.
the state of being controlled or governed.
an automobile race run over public roads.
the amount that can be contained.
institute legal proceedings against; file a suit against.
put into a certain place or abstract location.
the opening shot that scatters the balls in billiards or pool.
an instrument of torture that is used to heat or crush the foot and leg.
to cause to separate and go in different directions.
an informal right to something.
act of getting or draining something such as electricity or a liquid from a source.
communicate silently and non-verbally by signals or signs.
strike (the top part of a ball in golf, baseball, or pool) giving it a forward spin.
the act of spending or disbursing money.
a trench resembling a furrow that was made by erosion or excavation.
an aptitude that may be developed.
make liberal or more liberal, of laws and rules.
free from obligations or duties.
twist suddenly so as to sprain.
difficulty that causes worry or emotional tension.
the activity of managing or exerting control over something.
come as if by falling.
treat, process, heat, melt, or refine in a reverberatory furnace.
economics: raise demand, expand the money supply, or raise prices, after a period of deflation.
cleanse with a cleaning agent, such as soap, and water.
request earnestly (something from somebody); ask for aid or protection.
(baseball) the act of throwing a baseball by a pitcher to a batter.
break the skin (of a body part) by scraping.
set aside or apart for a specific purpose or use.
register formally as a participant or member.
twist and turn so as to give an intended interpretation.
organize anew, as after a setback.
catch in or as if in a trap.
an exclusive group of people.
be incompatible; be or come into conflict.
react to a stimulus or command.
provide (movies) with a soundtrack of a foreign language.
lever that activates the firing mechanism of a gun.
contribute to the progress or growth of.
occupy in an agreeable, entertaining or pleasant fashion.
the event that occurred at the beginning of something.
move together in a hive or as if in a hive.
rinse one's mouth and throat with mouthwash.
provide or equip with furniture.
make out of components (often in an improvising manner).
the lowest wage that an employer is allowed to pay; determined by contract or by law.
soft watery rot in fruits and vegetables caused by fungi.
room where work is done.
sever or remove by pinching or snipping.
become injured, broken, or distorted by pressure.
a single great stone (often in the form of a column or obelisk).
cause to grow thin or weak.
run or move very quickly or hastily.
prove to be false or incorrect.
provide with a covering or cause to be covered.
carry, as on one's back.
separate into constituents by soaking.
gnaw into; make resentful or angry.
glare or strike with great intensity.
(law) a right or legal share of something; a financial involvement with something.
shine brightly, like a star or a light.
rotary motion of an object around its own axis.
(slang) a person's girlfriend or boyfriend.
to grip, cut off, or tear with or as if with the teeth or jaws.
pass by, over, or under without making contact.
the outer part of a wheel to which the tire is attached.
to turn in (vouchers or coupons) and receive something in exchange.
the act of perceiving the odor of something.
relative darkness or lightness of a color.
change from one form or medium into another.
become or make oneself fresh again.
small workplace where handcrafts or manufacturing are done.
be intermediate between two taxonomic groups.
overflow with a certain feeling.
scoop up by plunging one's hand or a ladle below the surface.
the military action of resisting the enemy's advance.
to incline or bend from a vertical position.
wet with a spurt of liquid.
to move (the head or body) quickly downwards or away.
one of several parts or pieces that fit with others to constitute a whole object.
join or attach with or as if with glue.
transfer from one place or period to another.
make a great effort at a mental or physical task.
exhaust by allowing to pull on the line.
use up the whole supply of.
maintain in safety from injury, harm, or danger.
a nonresidential junior college offering a curriculum fitted to the needs of the community.
throw a glance at; take a brief look at.
an air force unit smaller than a squadron.
destroy the peace or tranquility of.
arrange or order by classes or categories.
prove capable or fit; meet requirements.
treat with an agent; add (an agent) to.
make by combining materials and parts.
cause to become ice or icy.
show to a seat; assign a seat for.
expose to cool or cold air so as to cool or freshen.
the act of committing a crime.
support by placing against something solid or rigid.
fail to make money in a business; make a loss or fail to profit.
a pointed tool for writing or drawing or engraving.
partake in a feast or banquet.
any new participant in some activity.
fasten by passing through a hole or around something.
place in a line or arrange so as to be parallel or straight.
the act of counting; reciting numbers in ascending order.
remove a constituent from a liquid.
study intensively, as before an exam.
decide how much is to be paid on an insurance claim.
obtain by purchase; acquire by means of a financial transaction.
a cell for violent prisoners.
souvenir consisting of a small gift given to a guest at a party.
run at a moderately swift pace.
oppose, as in hostility or a competition.
creating a picture with paints.
the territory occupied by a nation.
cause a gas or vapor to change into a liquid.
an operation that segregates items into groups according to a specified criterion.
force to go away by blinking.
the sensation produced by pressure receptors in the skin.
cause to go on or to be engaged or set in operation.
drag loosely along a surface; allow to sweep the ground.
influence or control shrewdly or deviously.
cause to be perplexed or confounded.
serve as a means of expressing something.
the act of decreasing something markedly.
thread on or as if on a string.
the act of changing one thing for another thing.
lack of agreement or harmony.
put together out of artificial or natural components or parts.
the act of looking or seeing or observing.
a fact or assertion offered as evidence that something is true.
stain with a dirty substance, such as soot.
appoint to a clerical posts.
make a prediction about; tell in advance.
give a definition for the meaning of a word.
immerse briefly into a liquid so as to wet, coat, or saturate.
a contract granting use or occupation of property during a specified time for a specified payment.
pass by means through a lock in a waterway.
put into a certain state; cause to be in a certain state.
a set containing all and only the members of two or more given sets.
cover with liquid before cooking.
raise to a higher energy level.
make certain of the failure or destruction of.
have certain properties when driven.
a set of pieces of creative work collected to be shown to potential customers or employers.
someone who takes photographs professionally.
reveal its presence or make an appearance.
reduce to small pieces or particles by pounding or abrading.
exhibit recognition for (an antigen or a substrate).
perform (a church sacrament) ritually.
impair the respiration of or obstruct the air passage of.
the motion of one object relative to another.
act in accordance with someone's rules, commands, or wishes.
the high value or worth of something.
a small unit serving as part of or as the nucleus of a larger political movement.
impose, involve, or imply as a necessary accompaniment or result.
regard or treat with consideration, respect, and esteem.
the act of raising something.
to incline or bend from a vertical position.
prevent the progress or free movement of.
the act of coming down to the earth (or other surface).
come down on or keep down by unjust use of one's authority.
remove facial hair by tying a fine string around it and pulling at the string.
direct the course of; manage or control.
the force by which one object attracts another.
deal with in a routine way.
cover with a protective sheathing.
reverse (a direction, attitude, or course of action).
a fixed charge by a restaurant or nightclub over and above the charge for food and drink.
the act of providing a subsidy.
draw air into, and expel out of, the lungs.
the opening page of a web site.
tag the base runner to get him out.
close with a snapping motion.
a party of people assembled for dancing.
a conveyance that transports people or objects.
the year (reckoned from January 1 to December 31) according to Gregorian calendar.
apply conditioner to in order to make smooth and shiny.
a vote to select the winner of a position or political office.
approach a certain age or speed.
fill (a ship's bunker) with coal or oil.
assign to a specific task.
leave stranded or isolated with little hope of rescue.
an animal or plant that nourishes and supports a parasite; it does not benefit and is often harmed by the association.
make synchronous and adjust in time or manner.
lock up or confine, in or as in a jail.
forceful exhalation through the nose or mouth.
the system of production and distribution and consumption.
keep in safety and protect from harm, decay, loss, or destruction.
the outcome of an event especially as relative to an individual.
regard something as probable or likely.
the rate of increase in size per unit time.
have a great affection or liking for.
stop for a moment, as if out of uncertainty or caution.
find out, learn, or determine with certainty, usually by making an inquiry or other effort.
something that serves to indicate or suggest.
a fee levied for the use of roads or bridges (used for maintenance).
obtain or retrieve from a storage device; as of information on a computer.
reestablish on a new, usually improved, basis or make new or like new.
obtain data from magnetic tapes.
improve or perfect by pruning or polishing.
mean or intend to express or convey.
strike heavily, especially with the fist or a bat.
any vehicle self-propelled by a rocket engine.
separate or cause to separate abruptly.
cause to match, as of ideas or acts.
cause to be firmly attached.
a chart or map showing the movements or progress of an object.
recognize as being; establish the identity of someone or something.
put or introduce into something.
a person or thing that takes or can take the place of another.
a school in a university offering study leading to degrees beyond the bachelor's degree.
subsist on a meager allowance.
obtain or provide money for.
an official responsible for control and supervision of a particular activity or area of public interest.
the activity of putting something in written form.
take or capture by force.
go after with the intent to catch.
a concerted campaign to end something that is injurious.
remove shells or husks from.
an aggressive willingness to compete.
pat or squeeze fondly or playfully, especially under the chin.
give a neat appearance to.
the set of elements common to two or more sets.
resist immunologically the introduction of some foreign tissue or organ.
the act of hiring something or someone.
make up something artificial or untrue.
billow up in the form of a cloud.
the act of testing something.
the first part or section of something.
the state of being active.
make weak by stunting the growth or development of.
the act of stopping something.
pull, or move with a sudden movement.
the last section of a communication.
make a retreat from an earlier commitment or activity.
the act of liberating someone or something.
the act of retaining something.
the state of being angry.
create and charge with a task or function.
the management of someone or something.
hurl as if with a sling.
register formally as a participant or member.
an act of delaying or interrupting the continuity.
the act of admitting someone to enter.
the act of retaining something.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
the state of inactivity following an interruption.
the act of looking or seeing or observing.
the trait of being well behaved.
get sexual gratification through self-stimulation.
the remains of something that has been destroyed or broken up.
the act of changing one thing for another thing.
separate with or as if with an instrument.
take away the legal force of or render ineffective.
be in some specified state or condition.
lift and reset in another soil or situation.
the speech act of making something evident.
put up with something or somebody unpleasant.
the act of forcing something out by squeezing or pressing.
a portion removed from the whole.
the act of looking or seeing or observing.
move or cause to move with a sudden jerky motion.
have flavor; taste of something.
the act of applying paint to a surface.
cause to have, in the abstract sense or physical sense.
to incline or bend from a vertical position.
the act of passing from one state or place to the next.
take measures in preparation for.
an established line of travel or access.
behave in a certain way.
make dirty or spotty, as by exposure to air; also used metaphorically.
the speech act of objecting.
get despite difficulties or obstacles.
act in accordance with someone's rules, commands, or wishes.
a disagreement or argument about something important.
the visual appearance of something or someone.
change the nature, purpose, or function of something.
make sense of; assign a meaning to.
a means or agency by which something is expressed or communicated.
the state of being in effect or being operative.
the act of perceiving the odor of something.
arranged for contracted work to be done by others.
create and charge with a task or function.
cause to be firmly attached.
the act of describing something.
make by combining materials and parts.
where you live at a particular time.
the act of colliding with something.
the act of rejecting something.
become less tense, rest, or take one's ease.
the occurrence of a uniting of separate parts.
the trait of wasting resources.
the state of being excommunicated.
to incline or bend from a vertical position.
to bring or combine together or with something else.
terminate, end, or take out.
the act of changing one thing or position for another.
reduce to small pieces or particles by pounding or abrading.
bring into a different state.
the upper part of anything.
the act of clipping or snipping.
a visual representation of something.
an exclusive circle of people with a common purpose.
the act of applying force to propel something.
the act of breaking something.
to cause to separate and go in different directions.
the act of spending or disbursing money.
make a copy of with the intent to deceive.
the act of testing something.
put up with something or somebody unpleasant.
the act of catching an object with the hands.
cause to happen or be responsible for.
compel to behave in a certain way.
the state of being active.
show consideration for; take into account.
the act of decreasing something markedly.
the activity of protecting something from loss or danger.
discourage or frighten with threats or a domineering manner; intimidate.
an appraisal of the value of something.
the act of taking of a person by force.
the state of being excommunicated.
the quality of not being useful or convenient.
a person who joins with others in some activity or endeavor.
the state of being connected.
the act of raising something.
narrate or give a detailed account of.
the act of constructing something.
the act of climbing something.
the act of damaging something or someone.
the act of testing something.
the removal of an opponent's piece from the chess board.
originate or come into being.
make or become more narrow or restricted.
move or arrange oneself in a comfortable and cozy position.
bind by an obligation; cause to be indebted.
matter that has been deposited by some natural process.
a visual representation of something.
a person who is a member of a partnership.
communicate or signal with a flag.
the state of being joined or united or linked.
the act of hiring something or someone.
give a neat appearance to.
place under suspicion or cast doubt upon.
make a request or demand for something to somebody.
the act of making up your mind about something.
the state of being depleted.
stir the feelings, emotions, or peace of.
the act of providing a subsidy.
the act of rejecting something.
to cause to separate and go in different directions.
declare in the capacity of an umpire or referee.
the act of damaging something or someone.
bring, lead, or force to abandon a wrong or evil course of life, conduct, and adopt a right one.
run at a moderately swift pace.
cause to make a snapping sound.
put or introduce into something.
send from one person or place to another.
search (as the bottom of a body of water) for something valuable or lost.
a restraint that checks the motion of something.
go one's own way; move apart.
the state or fact of being an owner.
the act of removing or getting rid of something.
set or ask for a certain price.
free from obligations or duties.
the speech act of making something evident.
the state of being rejected.
the space where a division or parting occurs.
attain success or reach a desired goal.
the act of damaging something or someone.
narrate or give a detailed account of.
piece (something old) with a new part.
be worthy of or have a certain rating.
run or move very quickly or hastily.
believe to be the case.
plan, organize, and carry out (an event).
the act of losing someone or something.
the act of decreasing something markedly.
administer or bestow, as in small portions.
the act of passing something to another person.
the act of spending or disbursing money.
the act of stopping something.
move from one place to another.
expose to cool or cold air so as to cool or freshen.
the act of choosing or selecting.
the act of breaking something.
the state of being connected.
have a disagreement over something.
the act of changing one thing for another thing.
the act of applying force to propel something.
lessen in force or effect.
come into the possession of something concrete or abstract.
a relation that provides the foundation for something.
the act of damaging something or someone.
register formally as a participant or member.
the trait of wasting resources.
a prominent attribute or aspect of something.
cause to come to the ground.
expel or eject (saliva or phlegm or sputum) from the mouth.
the visual appearance of something or someone.
change the arrangement or position of.
the act of affirming or asserting or stating something.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
act or move at high speed.
the bodily process of discharging waste matter.
the state of being actual or real.
rise or heave upward under the influence of a natural force such as a wave.
make a channel for; provide with a channel.
the act of spending or disbursing money.
combine so as to form a whole; mix.
get the meaning of something.
a relatively long narrow piece of something.
observe or plot the moving path of something.
put in a horizontal position.
a large or extra supply of something.
organize (the production of something) into an industry.
an appraisal of the value of something.
the act of exploding or bursting.
give a deceptive explanation or excuse for.
tie or fasten into a knot.
the act of branching out or dividing into branches.
bring to a certain spiritual state.
penetrate or cut through with a sharp instrument.
cause bodily suffering to and make sick or indisposed.
how something is done or how it happens.
a judgment of the qualities of something or somebody.
make receptive or willing towards an action or attitude or belief.
an energetic attempt to achieve something.
the act of rejecting something.
remove from a contest or race.
become less tense, rest, or take one's ease.
a loud resonant repeating noise.
the act of troubling or annoying someone.
remove or force out from a position.
the act of breaking something.
the activity of protecting someone or something.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
the activity of supplying or providing something.
the act of testing something.
get the meaning of something.
the act of forcing the enemy to withdraw.
the act of winding or twisting.
provoke someone to do something through (often false or exaggerated) promises or persuasion.
the power to use something or someone.
the disclosure of something secret.
the act of starting something.
create by putting components or members together.
something that floats on the surface of water.
the act of putting something in working order again.
the state of being excluded.
the amount that can be contained.
the part of the general public interested in a source of information or entertainment.
take out or up with or as if with a scoop.
the act of projecting out from something.
become or cause to become soft or liquid.
the enclosing frame around a door or window opening.
the act of cracking something.
the act of raising something.
put up with something or somebody unpleasant.
cause to skip over a surface.
lumber used in the construction of something.
come into the possession of.
put up with something or somebody unpleasant.
have a range; be capable of projecting over a certain distance, as of a gun.
enclose in or as if in a frame.
the act of applying paint to a surface.
move or arrange oneself in a comfortable and cozy position.
the speech act of making something evident.
the act of referring or consulting.
the act of starting something.
the act of putting something somewhere.
get or extort (money or other possessions) from someone.
the act of starting something.
the act of breaking something.
contribute to the progress or growth of.
cause to experience or suffer or make liable or vulnerable to.
remove from memory or existence.
the act of raising something.
get or find back; recover the use of.
change toward something smaller or lower.
an advantage to the benefit of someone or something.
carry out or perform an action.
droop, sink, or settle from or as if from pressure or loss of tautness.
cause (a liquid) to leach or percolate.
cause to appear in a new form.
the act of drawing or hauling something.
the act of constructing something.
draw up an outline or sketch for something.
cause to be agitated, excited, or roused.
remove from a contest or race.
narrate or give a detailed account of.
the act of rending or ripping or splitting something.
the act of choosing or selecting.
the act of breaking something.
the activity of protecting someone or something.
make a mess of or create disorder in.
the act of catching an object with the hands.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
run at a moderately swift pace.
assign a new time and place for an event.
give someone credit for something.
the state of being unsure of something.
write all the required information onto a form.
the act of choosing or selecting.
the act of forming or establishing something.
the end or completion of something.
lose clarity or turn aside especially from the main subject of attention or course of argument in writing, thinking, or speaking.
a negative aspect of something that is generally positive.
have an argument about something.
have a complexion with a strong bright color, such as red or pink.
be or act in association with.
a strong current of air.
the act of giving temporary assistance.
the act of starting something.
the amount that can be contained.
put in the mind of someone.
the condition of living or the state of being alive.
the act of hindering or obstructing or impeding.
administer or bestow, as in small portions.
the action of opposing something that you disapprove or disagree with.
the state of being actual or real.
the act of ending something.
an area that is approximately central within some larger region.
the rate of some repeating event.
the status or fact of being elected.
the state of being actual or real.
the state of being connected.
a formation of people or things one beside another.
the act of competing as for profit or a prize.
the act of stopping something.
the state of being excluded.
wipe with a sponge, so as to clean or moisten.
the act of hitting vigorously.
a body of students who are taught together.
contribute to the progress or growth of.
something serving as a cover or protection.
the act of making or enacting laws.
the act of climbing something.
to cause to separate and go in different directions.
move with a thrashing motion.
the act of coming to land after a voyage.
the act of perceiving the odor of something.
behave in a certain manner.
the disadvantage that results from losing something.
make ready for action or use.
cause to be interested or curious.
a unit of military aircraft.
the act of breaking something.
a concentrated example of something.
the act of designating or identifying something.
the act of ending something.
the date on which an obligation must be repaid.
put up with something or somebody unpleasant.
the act of removing or getting rid of something.
the state of being suspected.
the rate of moving (especially walking or running).
the act of making up your mind about something.
the act of raising something.
be in direct physical contact with; make contact.
the act of adding one thing to another.
the greatest possible degree of something.
cover with or as if with a cloak.
the act of starting something.
something copied or derived from an original.
the general outward appearance of something.
the act of raising something.
to cause to separate and go in different directions.
the path followed by an object moving through space.
a relation that provides the foundation for something.
the act of contacting one thing with another.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
the state of being excluded.
the act of flipping a coin.
behave in a certain way.
reduce to small pieces or particles by pounding or abrading.
the act of freeing a city or town that has been besieged.
carry, as on one's back.
the visual appearance of something or someone.
contribute to the progress or growth of.
a consequence of someone's efforts or of a particular set of circumstances.
concentrate on a particular place or spot.
move back and forth or sideways.
sell something to or obtain something from by energetic and especially underhanded activity.
the act of climbing something.
the event of something burning (often destructive).
the act of retaining something.
supply with water, as with channels or ditches or streams.
searching for or buying goods or services.
become or cause to become obstructed.
the speech act of making something evident.
show the form or outline of.
move through with or as if with a rake.
the act of explaining; making something plain or intelligible.
the act of forming or establishing something.
talk in a tearful manner.
the last or lowest in an ordering or series.
the act of choosing or selecting.
gather, as of natural products.
put up with something or somebody unpleasant.
make a mark or lines on a surface.
the act of adding one thing to another.
make a mark or lines on a surface.
the act of hiring something or someone.
the time period that is considered best for starting or finishing something.
make ready for action or use.
the act of rending or ripping or splitting something.
the act of adding one thing to another.
vary or move from a fixed point or course.
the amount by which something decreases.
move by turning over or rotating.
the act of decreasing or reducing something.
put into a certain place or abstract location.
maintain with or as if with a bet.
the act of raising something.
the last section of a communication.
the reduction of something's value or worth.
prefer or wish to do something.
the act of liberating someone or something.
supply with water, as with channels or ditches or streams.
(theology) God's act of bringing the universe into existence.
the act of damaging something or someone.
the act of damaging something or someone.
put up with something or somebody unpleasant.
If you need to publish the book and you have found one publisher that allows it.
You should read the copyright transfer contract that you have signed.
One of the consequences of not reporting failures is publication bias.
I have never heard of an academic journal specifically meant for high school students.
At the universities I've worked in North America, human-subject studies (esp.
There are probably several answers depending on the situation and on the standards in your field.
At this point I am a broken record: this is one of the situations I found myself in.
Age is not a PhD admission facor in the continental Europe, too.
Reviewing grant proposals as a student is tricky, at least in some fields.
If the award is sufficiently prestigious then you should list it, otherwise you should not.
Aside from having common exams, one possibility is to withhold the names of the instructors until the registration is finished.
I would not explicitly acknowledge people who have helped you access papers that you don't have access to.
As grauwulf comments, your job is to focus on the content.
Like so many other matters, your location plays a role in what is considered accepted or not.
I highly recommend Wunderkit (recently released) and Wunderlist for organizing to-do list, and taking notes.
Journals oftentimes make their procedures regarding varying types of corrections available on their website (e.g., Nature).
One recent conference I've heard that supports such an application is Ubicomp 2012.
Let's ask another question: is there at least one good reason not to go at the seminars?
Another thing is (in conjunction with the number of publications) the number of coauthors, i.e.
One difficulty is that it's far from clear what the ideal dropout rate should be.
This is about my experience in computer engineering I found that reading for breadth was the more important approach.
Figshare is a rather new service (compared to ArXiv) that is just starting to gain momentum.
If you don't mind hosting your files online, SlideShare is a good solution.
Some people publish their theses as part of a monograph series.
Why not just bring up the idea of staying in your current lab with your advisor?
I believe you should never include "Submitted to Journal of Blah"; it conveys no information and it's tacky.
I don't entirely disagree with the two previous answers: taking the offer you have now may be a fine choice.
You're going to find answers all over the map for this one (i.e., there probably aren't "standards").
My advice: don't read everything otherwise you will never finish!
An even easier solution that doesn't require anything except the ability to upload a BibTeX file is Exhibit.
Mathematica is actually good for making all sorts of graphics.
binary/plain text Other things to consider (for the future) is the movement towards standard meta-data items contained with the research articles (e.g.
Funding for non-research positions comes from either direct or indirect sources.
The problem I see with the GREs is that the scoring range is highly compressed.
And, as a small point, if one's work is confidential for the reason that it is so extremely useful/important/wonderful (!?!
You need to strategize with your advisor, or a trusted mentor, about this.
You can definitely apply in a different field than your undergraduate.
You can have a look at the arXiv cultoromics website at http://arxiv.culturomics.org, which however searches in articles on the arXiv.
On the one hand, it shows that you are engaged in this necessary part of scientific research that is peer-review.
There are certain things I look for when reviewing papers that are "show stoppers", i.e.
I applied to six graduate schools in my field, and was accepted at all of them.
In my school, redo exams have a maximum grade of the minimum grade to pass.
The first thing I would do is improve/repair your personal relationship with your adviser.
German copyright is very different from UK or US copyright.
For completeness, Apple's Pages has quite a few nice poster layouts.
Like a lot of things in academia, I think this will heavily depend on what discipline you're in.
The best practice is to include standard bibliographic information, a relatively stable hypertext link for current readers (e.g.
If you are writing proposals for NSF consider volunteering as a reviewer in your discipline.
Depending on which country you are talking about, there may be league tables for the universities in that country.
You can always ask, then it is the choice of the author to accept or not.
Most of the courses that I've seen explicitly state that you obtain no credit for doing the course.
The peer review process generally differs between predatory and non predatory journals.
Adding to Gopi's comment, here's a snapshot of Academic map at work.
Actually, I think the frame of this question isn't quite right.
If you have access to it, you can very easily do that with Thomson Reuters’ Web of Science portal.
You didn't mention if you want to do an MS in the UK or the US.
First of all: note that there is a difference between an academic CV and a resume.
From your description, it sounds like the problem is more likely to have been the MSc supervior than the student.
Whatever you are going to do after PhD is your business.
I would not accelerate things, to avoid getting worse grades that you want.
The preeminent author on this topic is Edward Tufte, who wrote "The Visual Display of Quantitative Information".
Many PhD programs in computer science (like my own) don't require GREs; read the application instructions carefully.
You could defer admission, but it's a little unusual to defer for a year.
I think this page has what you are looking for.
The answer can best be understood in terms of the intended goal of the researcher making the switch.
Like @Suresh says, in the US, I would expect that the advisor-advisee relationship would be separate from enrollment in the department.
In addition to Suresh's answer, I'd say that a postdoc is no longer a student.
There are two parts to this question: citation and copyright issues.
There are tough (read respectable) and relatively easy (read weaker) schools and PhD programs in both sides.
Everywhere I've attended and worked in Britain, I've called teachers by their first name and been called my first name.
Personally I hate signatures, I see it as trying to make a superficial impression based on a title.
There aren’t many ways for your to evaluate how your reviews stand against others, but there is at least one.
A gift to show your gratitude will always be appreciated.
Yes, the acknowledgements section of your paper is an appropriate place to thank anyone who provided valuable assistance.
There is no accepted numerical measure for an individual's academic productivity.
There seems to be no service or tool that let's you download articles in bulk.
Yes, I do indeed have some direct experience with them.
Well, as you said, there is no rule that explicitly says that the information mentioned in a “invitation to review” is confidential.
Have you tried asking your supervisor to deposit the papers?
I can think of three reasons why a faculty member might reveal how a student performed on a qualifying examination.
Second, I try to process 10 or so exams before actually marking any of them.
I think a script is actually more harmful than good.
I would say you are approaching it in the wrong way.
Email the work to someone (or yourself) well before you hand it over.
In my experience, the author syntax changes if you're using DOI or PMID.
I agree that reference formatting for a thesis tends to follow university and discipline specific guidelines.
I always view "we" as "you and the reader" and you and your reader journey through the subject together.
You should definitely consider publishing the algorithm, but not before you could say something more than merely a pseudocode.
I've known of a few cases of people prolonging their Ph.Ds to improve their CVs.
I think for an appropriate answer I'd need to know exactly what the 'bad' ideology is.
My personal preference is not to offer a compliment in this setting.
For questions 1 and 2: it depends: you have to find out from your individual advisor/department/university.
You will definitely need to check regulations regarding the wearing of costumes that conceal one's appearance.
I am a PhD student in Computational Science, which is an interdisciplinary major spanning mathematics, computer science, and engineerning.
I am sure a psychologist could provide an indepth analysis to a large part of this question.
Does doing a postdoc mean a commitment to an academic career?
It can be very difficult to get government financing depending on where you reside.
In mathematics, we already have a database of this sort - two them, in fact, with in MathSciNet and Zentralblatt MATH.
As others have said, not every (old) article has a DOI or a URL.
My armchair researching dug up a lot of articles about this.
It's complicated, and it depends on what you mean by "black hole".
The other answers here are fantastic at explaining in a technical sense.
Stars rotate due to the angular momentum of the gas they formed from.
As a matter of fact, yes, it is only a coincidence.
In a few billion years, the Milky Way and Andromeda will collide.
Stellar mass black holes and supermassive black holes likely form from very different mechanisms.
The metals that are forming in the sun come from nuclear fusion.
It is highly unlikely that we're made out of stuff from only one star.
The expansion of space means that objects in cosmological distances are receding away from each other.
If you're big enough and fluid enough, like an atmosphere, you would feel acceleration do to the Earth's motion.
The so called expansion of the universe is not as trivial as most people think.
Stars are rotating, but that's not the cause for their stability.
To answer your question: The speed of light is relative to the metric of the space itself.
The AAVSO data seems to indicate that it might have already peaked, at around 10.5 (visual).
I will be specific to answering the part regarding the prediction of solar flares.
Light may account for a small portion of dark matter, but it is unlikely to account for most/all of it.
The moon didn't abruptly change position, it is gradually and continually changing position.
There is no 'still' that is not relative to some other object.
When you gaze at the moon "live", you are not seeing a still image.
Globular clusters occupy an interesting place in the spectrum of composite stellar systems.
No, amateur astronomy equipment is not capable of doing such an analysis.
Any body with an irregular mass distribution will experience those wobblings.
Normally when two galaxies collide, it is the gas that interacts with each other.
If something crashed into it rearranging its content a bit, could its life be extended?
Speed of light being finite is one of the fundamentals of our Universe.
So far, we don't have anywhere near enough detail to identify weather on planets in other star systems.
According to Newton, any binary system revolves around the center of mass.
To add to TidalWave's answer, here's another way to think about it.
For a star to become a nova, it needs to have a mass at least 8 times greater than our sun.
The main flaw with your definition of a "generalised planet" would be the boundary between stars and planets.
In addition to @MBR's answer; there are other (less confusing) ways to represent the data.
A black hole has an event horizon which 'marks the point of no return'.
Any body with an irregular mass distribution will experience those wobblings.
No energy is in transit as GRBs, just like Gamma rays that started in a GRB.
I can't give you an explicit ant mathematical explanation but maybe this simulations give you a hint.
In addition to @MBR's answer; there are other (less confusing) ways to represent the data.
The easiest way to think of it is terms of the cube square law coming into play.
There are currently three classifications of black hole and these are stellar, super massive and miniature.
I don't think there are any in the Solar system.
Consider a binary system with a neutron star and a companion star.
No, Pluto is a so called resonant trans-neptunian object; the orbital period of Pluto is almost exactly 3:2 (1.5) times that of Neptune.
You only need two-dimensional trigonometry if you know the distances to the two stars and their angular separation.
To any observer between 'A' and 'B' where the light wave passes, it passes with the speed of light.
Yes, everything that is in this universe has to say Good bye to its existence.
Regarding the fact of using the scope indoors: it's understandable, but silly.
Particle like, molecule or atoms or any smallest particle behaves differently in different environment.
Yes, unless you want to get really particular with the "protoplanetary" part.
Here is my answer to a similar question posted on the physics stack exchange website.
Yes, there is are two python modules called astropy, and astropysics that both claim to have spectral analysis tools.
There are a couple of important distinctions between the two types of objects.
In the protostar stage of the Sun, it was surrounded by a (spinning) gas cloud.
When you sit in a car, and you suddenly brake, you feel the change in velocity.
Yes, it's true that the apparent size of the Moon is 30 arcmin.
Right Ascension is a celestial coordinate, not a terrestrial one.
The surface of the 4-dimensional ball (called 3-sphere) is a slice through the universe as a whole for a fixed cosmic time.
I think the question is referring to situating a very large mirror in space facing earth.
In these quantum theories, forces are mediated by particles called gauge bosons.
If the closing velocity is very low, the energy can be dissipated by the comets squishing.
Ummm this question made me think about a lecture from my teacher.
The aluminum oxide layer forms as soon as oxygen comes in contact with the mirror surface.
You might be interested in these two answers: How dense are nebulae?
You are making the mistake of thinking that there was a single spot in space that everything expanded from.
The tail particles from a comet are ejected, so they have a distinct velocity than that of the comet.
One star passes in front of another from our perspective.
Disclaimer: Most of what is written here is based highly on theory and speculation.
The redness of the moon is due to Earth's atmosphere refraction of Sun rays and pollution - dust particles etc.
Depends on how the angular momentum (that manifests itself as Earth's rotation) would be absorbed.
The correct answer is 8 (Mercury, Venus, Earth, Mars, Jupiter, Saturn, Uranus, Neptune).
It would require a very precise trajectory for an asteroid to end up in geostationary orbit.
It may be possible for a solar system like ours to exist outside of a galaxy.
It does not act as a solid lens, because it does not have a limit surface.
When an object is in orbit, there are two factors at play, not just one.
As Yashbhatt said, we can detect light: with our eyes (visible light only) and with special machines.
I think you mean to ask, "What is the local sidereal time of Greenwhich?".
No, it is not since Jupiter is not a star.
In order to know when a star will be above horizon, you'll need an equation with times, not "celestial latitudes".
Emission and Absorption lines are due to Kirchhoff's Laws that explain what happens when light passes through a gas.
There are a couple of different horizons you should care about.
The star reaches a critical mass and ignites, blowing away the surrounding material.
Rotation: One of the easiest way to show that galaxies rotates are Doppler observations of atomic or molecular lines.
Actually this is one of the possible ways we have in order to make Mars friendlier to humans.
In the image you are now refering to the only significant brightness difference is between the mare and the "highlands".
I would say on the gas giants: Jupiter, Saturn, Uranus and Neptune.
Constellations are human constructs to make sense of the night sky.
We DO have 2 summers and two winters - and 2 springs and autumns too.
There is one rule that is generally true for all deep sky objects (nebulae, stars, galaxies,...): Aperture matters!
Dates are set by progress through the currently used calendar.
The objects you are refering to are actually two different objects: asteroids and comets.
Density waves cause the build up of galactic material in to spiral arms.
Kepler did know the orbital period of the Earth, Mars, Venus, Mercury, Jupiter, and Saturn.
The caption for the graph in the article linked says "Raw Data".
You seriously cannot expect the sun to have a layer that would contain some of its harmful radiation.
Azimuth is conventionally calculated as a degree value between 0 (inclusive) and 360 (exclusive).
You could confirm with taking an image of the star trails.
As the definition says, a typeIII civilization does change the energy of the galaxy.
Light may account for a small portion of dark matter, but it is unlikely to account for most/all of it.
The earth similarity index (ESI) is a weighted geometric mean of four similarities.
As far as we know there is nothing that can stop a black hole.
If they exist, they are out of anything we can ever reach.
For the purposes of comparison, here's flat, Minkowski spacetime in spherical coordinates: $$\mathrm{d}s^2 = -\mathrm{d}t^2 + \underbrace{\mathrm{d}r^2 + r^2(\mathrm{d}\theta^2+\sin^2\theta\,\mathrm{d}\phi^2)}_\text{Euclidean 3-space}\text{.
Intrinsic reward is the emotional pay-off that you get by completing an activity.
Sort of, think of what it's like when you're asleep, not dreaming.
Wikipedia on time perception The Wikipedia article on "time perception".
Just for reference, I ended up writing simple web-based lexical decision task software myself.
Here's another approach: Typically, we are curious about things that are deemed "off limits," i.e.
I'm not a cognitive science expert, but I happen to have some experience in change management / trying to convince people.
On the surface, it does seem like social anxiety disorder and extroversion shouldn't both exist in the same person.
Technically speaking, an emotion is not different from thought the way it is processed in brain, both involve neurotransmitters.
According to current models of human concept learning, the answer to your question is both.
I'm afraid I have to disagree with Mozibur Ullah's answer.
I'd suggest checking out the Linear Ballistic Accumulator (Donkin et al., 2011) model for a scenario like this.
I like to think of multitasking as rapid task switching.
Computers interact with you and so we treat them like other, real people.
One relevant piece of research is the research on the “mere exposure” effect.
I would like to add a bit of terminology to @what's answer.
No, social psychology is not a subfield of educational psychology.
I think we should first clarify the difference between simple mathematical operators and a complete formal axiomatic system.
Well that looks like the behavior of any person with a strong passion and focus for his work.
The answer has its roots in the evolution of human morality and disgust.
In chimpz, we see stronger chimps beating up weaker chimps that have consensual sex.
Diederich & Busemeyer (2003) presented a diffusion model for three choice alternatives (p. 314).
There is no true frame rate of the eyes, but there are limitations.
Most of society can't agree entirely on how to define manliness.
The search terms "gradual-interval recall" may give you another area to research.
There are many arguments for why this is not the case.
You might be very interested in a paper by Felleman and Van Essen (1991).
The behavioral output itself can only indirectly affect memory, but the mechanism of reinforcement lies in its reception of attention.
There's the naïve version of spike triggered averaging, and the sophisticated version.
I like to think of multitasking as rapid task switching.
Multiple causes of not reading instructions As @crash notes, there are likely many explanations for not reading instructions.
I would like to put an answer based on my experience in training and coaching others.
Not entirely sure what specific stats you'd be interested in, but Wikipedia has plenty on prevalences of specific mental disorders.
One human-being reliance on other(s) awareness is defined by the level of trust between the humans.
If you change the items in a questionnaire, you have a different questionnaire.
the cognitive skills of a human population have a great variance.
Here is an article explaining trolling based on Sperber and Mercier's "argumentative theory" of human reasoning.
If any one want to be treated as genius then they should roam around fools.
From the physics(acoustics) perspective, the sensory input changes depending upon pitch.
An addition to the other answers: We must remember that we are watching a movie.
The problem that you are describing appears to be a problem of short-term memory.
I don't think this is a serious scientific theory at all.
This is a Mac related answer - I'm sure there are equivalent applications on other platforms.
Is there a psychological condition which promotes literal and overly complicated thinking?
According to Frederick Herzberg's two-factor theory of motivation, intrinsic rewards are motivators (e.g.
One relatively recent review on this topic is Rushton & Ankney (2009).
This short talk deals with issues of "cheating slightly" :Dan Ariely: Our buggy moral code.
OpenSesame is a recent entry that is cross-platform and seems to promote GUI-based design while allowing customization via Python scripting.
The Inter-University Consortium for Political and Social Research (ICPSR) provides 8000+ data sets.
Hallucinations are not necessarily present, although they use to be observed or reported.
Humans actually exhibit both slow and fast learning and they have somewhat different properties.
If you are looking for a 'brain model of visual navigation', you just have to google it!
This is just the beginning of an answer, based on what I've read so far.
As per self-regulatory theory people can have two types of regulatory focus: promotion and prevention.
FingerFriendlySoft has created an app for all iOS devices (that is, iPod touch, iPhone and iPad) that is called N-back Suite.
Basically, what you do is you compare each age group IQ to the standardization sample.
This is indeed possible, but I haven't seen it done experimentally for reasons other than feasibility.
Because Mary is in a relationship with John she likes him sexually.
Let's begin by being clear about terminology and what is involved in eye movements at a basic level.
There's a new program called "Paradigm" that has direct support for typed responses.
Indicator of genetic fitness argument There is an evolutionary psychology argument.
There's a great 2012 paper by A. Kheifets and Randy Gallistel showing a "probability sense" in animals.
“Show me a young Conservative and I'll show you someone with no heart.
This is a tricky topic and my answer will be clearly speculative.
Angst seems to fit your first example about as well as I could imagine any one word fitting.
I would recommend the 730 pictures Geneva affective picture database (GAPED).
In the fairly recent book "The Cambridge Handbook of Computational Psychology", chapter three is devoted to bayesian modeling.
Both of the above answers are incorrect to some degree.
I'm not sure what you mean by cognitive capacity, but I absolutely believe that language shapes the way we think.
The research literature on stress in general and burnout in particular would be relevant.
It looks like there is a developmental relationship between WM and general IQ: Fry, A. F., & Hale, S. (1996).
Leonardo da Vinci wrote both upside down, and in a mirror image.
im new here, so maybe i do not answer according to the rules, please tell me if so.
Following the comments you've received, I'll add my own subjective answer in the affirmative to your first question.
With your question you are limiting thinking to conscious and rational thought.
Not surprisingly, there's a huge load of stuff you need to consider when designing things for users.
'Reinforcement' is anything that increases the chances that an organism with repeat a behavior.
There is a classic paper by Halpern (1998) on the topic.
I would like to put an answer based on my experience in training and coaching others.
Schwarz (1999) reviews a variety of research on frequency estimation scales.
I'll address just the first of your three sub-questions, the others have been answered by Chuck Sherrington.
This is actually the reason why experiments begin in ethics.
SVM training is typically done in a batch processing, and thus the order of data presentation doesn't matter.
Your own theory is bad because it seems to follow from a Lamarkian interpretation of evolutionary theory.
I encounter a lot of situations like this in personality research.
@OfriRaviv provided a great answer, but I thought I'd add a third alternative I am aware of for completeness.
I think the difference comes down to awareness and control.
From an article entitled Can You Call a 9-Year-Old a Psychopath?
Adding to Jeromy's answer, the answer to your question would depend on what you want to study.
In some form yes if patient is mesmerized by visual heartbeats, acording to Sciencedaily.
Long story short: at least in facial affect perception/expression, there is not a definitive answer to this.
The Hare Psychopathology Checklist is considered the current gold standard for measuring potential psychopathy.
Artificial neural networks (ANNs) are mathematical constructs, originally designed to approximate biological neurons.
I think this is slightly tautologous, because we all turn to "belief" to explain the things that we don't understand.
Abstract algebra and n-dimensional space are constructs of the human mind.
Background on strategy selection We could categorise using tabs as a strategy for using a browser.
Building off of Nick Stauner's answer, the lobes are named after the cranial bones that cover them.
Charles Fletcher, one of my professors as an undergraduate, studies reading comprehension.
In the book "Six Impossible Things Before Breakfast: The Evolutionary Origins of Belief", Wolpert (2007) discusses the evolutionary origins of belief.
This is a bit of a tangential answer, but hopefully still useful.
There are numbers - as in groups of objects - that are easily divisible so may have the appeal of symmetry.
Wrap well in plastic (individually) and then put in a freezer bag.
If you use your whole beans within a week it's probably not worth storing it in the refrigerator or freezer.
Scalloped tomatoes - a great way to use up tomatoes and old bread!
Here are some of my favorite recipes for garbanzo beans: Crispy Roasted Chickpeas - Very simple.
If you want the ice to remain soft you have to stir it while freezing.
If you're looking for alcoholic alternatives then you could use O'Mara's or some other brand (see Wikipedia for a good list).
You could use it as the broth base to make a traditional minestrone.
Simple Syrup is sugar that is has been dissolved in water.
Use bacon to cover the breasts, and remove them for the last 15 minutes to brown them.
I prefer chopped onions, so you know you're eating onions.
I'd been using paper towels to oil the grill, and I just discovered that newspapers work a lot better.
On top of all of this, I look for conciseness.
Reusing your frying oil can actually add to the flavor, to a point.
Soak whole ears in the husk in a bowl of water.
As long as the black stuff won't rub off on the pizza, blackness shouldn't matter.
The difference is the amount of protein contained in the flour which can range from 5% to 15%.
First thing first, may be obvious but use a non stick pan.
Cinnamon is from the bark of a tree, and nutmeg is a seed.
I've only made a couple of bbq sauces, but they've always come out really well.
I just fill the sink with some hot water and slap it in there, covered by a clean towel.
The microwave caused heat which released oils from the coppa's spice blend, including capsaicin.
I managed to find this recipe, I think this is where I got the idea.
Use a little if color's the only thing you care about.
I don't boil eggs enough to keep a feel for the timing...
I use a Wiki now and used to use a phpBB forum.
The beer can shouldn't be able to rise above the boiling point of the liquid inside until it is empty.
By the wording of the question, I'm pretty sure you're using one of those pyramidal graters or a "sheet" grater.
So it turns out she doesn't have any volume measurements either, other than a measuring jug.
Its going to depend on the type of packaging and also the freezer.
The beans are always my favorite part of chili and I usually use several varieties.
lay down a knife horizontaly on the cloves and hit it.
The type of pan that you use to bake your sponge in can help determine how evenly it will bake.
Like the people say, open lid means directional heat from the coals.
A counter top/toaster oven can probably cover many of your needs.
Actually I do this, and I do it because my oven is old and tempermental.
The only way that the butter could be incorporated without creaming would be to melt it.
I've only made a couple of bbq sauces, but they've always come out really well.
In my experience, fresh garlic is great for when you want texture, or to slow down the flavour infusion.
It sounds like you may be searing the steak for too long.
Freezing kills the parasites in fish that are harmfully to humans.
Consider the castiron stuff from Le Creuset; my father-in-law has one that's at least 50 years old and it's still going strong.
Salmon is a great choice and it's readily available pretty much everywhere.
Cut it up and toast to make croûtons, or crumble into bread crumbs.
Wired Magazine had a recent guide on how to make crystal clear ice.
Starting with a whole chilled piece of meat, I quickly pour boiling water over all the outside surface.
Keep in mind that whipping cream or egg whites by hand may take longer than you expect.
Black pepper and white pepper are differing preparations of the fruit of the Piper nigrum plant.
I would suggest the best way is slow cold running water over the bottle in a bowl that covers it.
One reason is to remove some of the indigestible complex sugars that cause gas.
Just taking the "produce" part of your question, what about growing your own?
I place the bacon in a cold oven and then turn the oven on to 400F.
Tomatoes will last longer if kept in the fridge, but I actually recommend against keeping them there.
You should buy a pizza stone, but if you don't have one you can bake it directly over the grid.
This is little off the beaten path, but try a solvent gun cleaner (not oil).
Spraying or wiping your spatula with a little cooking spray may help you slide it under the egg.
OXO Good grips, definitely Canned or pre-cut vegetables Electric can opener Really sharp knives Magic Bullet or Ninja modular food-processors.
Counterintuitively, substituting Canadian bacon (peameal bacon) for regular bacon will reduce the fat and calorie count.
There are several alternatives, but the most common I know of are tapioca flour and arrowroot powder/flour.
The secret is simple: Cook them slowly, at lower temperatures.
I suspect it depends what kind of cheese the whey came from.
If you have a local deli, it's at least worth asking to see if they'd cut your meat for you.
In my opinion, all else being equal, Italian style water-boiled pasta tastes bland.
Here is the method I use for turning out a perfect steak every time.
You can replace the moisture provided by wine with just about any flavorful liquid, but you won't replicate the flavor.
BBC Good Food is a great UK based recipe site.
I echo the comments about sugar – but don't overdo the sugar either!
As others have said, you're essentially screwed if you're using volume to measure flour.
Eggs can't read calendars and so the expiration date is only a guide.
You just have to add more flour and water periodically so your yeast doesn't die.
Vacherin, Comté or Emmental, I wouldn't go for Gouda, it's not cheese from the fondue regions.
Try some using sesame oil to go with that garlic and ginger idea.
As the water in the muscle fibers freezes it expands and creates a mushy texture.
Whipped cream was made for centuries before the mixer was invented.
Dried herbs really do only last around six months, certainly no longer than a year.
I think you'll need to find a good source for each type of food, unfortunately.
I'd baste it regularly - that's essentially what rotisserie is doing, continual basting.
This site will convert weights to volumes, and says that you should use .53 of a US cup.
You absolutely don't need a bread maker for good bread.
White sugar was commonly used as a preservative in the past, in much the same way as salt.
There was a New York Times article from 2007 on cold-brewed iced coffee.
Flavor in most meats is generally determined by a few things.
There are basically two types of cakes: butter and sponge (or Génoise).
Flour is unusually variable in how densely it will settle, so this can make a big difference for some recipes.
Thin layer of olive oil on the crust before you add the sauce.
You can peel it and slice it, add some lemon and salt and eat it raw as a fresh salad.
Well, I can report that for this particular fillet, 20 minutes was probably a tad to long.
I run into this problem when the probe is placed wrong.
So from this - http://content.karger.com/produktedb/produkte.asp?typ=pdf&file=IAA2003131004234 - it sounds like they both share IgE-reactive (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Immunoglobulin_E) epitopes.
A very flexible pepper that is also good for canning is the hungarian pepper.
I'm sorry, but cooking is not a science, though you may apply many scientific principles to it.
All pasta needs to cook is hot water, it doesn't even have to be plentiful hot water at that.
Like Rowland said: use butter, and don't push it around too much.
White fish are, as a rule, more delicately flavored than darker fleshed fish.
In Greece, traditionally, they used Chicken or Goat as a white meat and lamb as a dark meat.
I fold in some cornflour to the meringue when making pavlova.
As for fruits (including, for example, tomatoes), ethylene gas is released by fruits and causes them to ripen.
If by effective you mean which drink is more quivering, then adding the lemon zest doesn't make much difference.
Seitan is good, and very easy to make at home.
I have two suspicions: One, you're undercooking your roux, the flour and butter mixture, and not fully incorporating the flour.
Probably subjective, but ... Good clad stainless steel will give you much better cooking performance per dollar than copper.
The first have covers both been more responsible and told you in that sentence.
There is no implication about Tom whatsoever in such a sentence.
I have never heard or seen the phrase you mention.
"I had mainly been" is fine, in the context you're using it.
A Blue moon is the second full moon in the same month.
For words which are commonly used in English (like "Paris") using the foreign pronunciation is guaranteed to sound pretentious.
It's "The hottest seat" and refers to the seat the guest(s) sit on.
As bikeboy389 said, you can learn a lot by looking at students' native languages.
I find the use of the word funny here in the US.
There are some cases "status" may be accounted of countable.
Inclusion is the act of including and exclusion is the act of excluding.
It's "if it were me", as opposed to "if I were it".
"A sick child throws a much bigger wrench into the machinery of a factory or retail or service worker’s life.
In my opinion, it depends entirely upon the intended audience.
Semicolon is used to join sentences that can stand alone, but are joined to emphasize their relationship.
Horsepowers is possible in some very limited contexts, but otherwise horsepower is standard.
It's a play on titles from self help programs which utilize ellipsis.
If I were filling in a chart, I would certainly capitalize both words, as in "High Cholesterol".
To my knowledge, they are all separate species within the Bovini genus.
For one thing, "Two Thousand" is shorter to say than "twenty hundred".
I always use the CLOOJ pronunciation, because that is how I've always heard it.
I think the variation in British usage is almost all between users, not between examples of use.
Named is preferred in your example, since you are formally giving a name to your method.
I'd say the expression I don't got... is generally rare in spoken AmE.
In most cases when this happens the person is really a non-native English speaker as you said.
If a pronoun is the subject of a verb, then you use I.
The difference between irritate and vex is small but definite.
"In almost all cases" sounds better to me, as almost refers to all: "almost all".
I would say "fewer people"; and it is indeed linked to count vs uncount nouns.
As Shinto pointed out, vulgar words exist in every language.
In situations like these, I tend to lengthen out the phrase.
The Corpus of Contemporary American English shows 4253 occurrences of “ironic” and 134 occurrences of “ironical”, that is 32 to 1.
I'm English, and would probably use 'toilet' most of the time, and always in the context of a private home.
You can use a possessive pronoun followed by a word with 's (i.e.
"Try and" has largely been relegated to colloquial use, and "try to" is generally considered the correct form.
Speaking as an Englishman: the first sounds much more natural.
I've seen the common pronunciation change in my region (American English) in the last 20 years or so.
The two words are synonymous, but "speak" often seems to be used in a gentler way.
I think eatable is more often used to mean palatable.
The names for Germany in different languages are quite varied.
Contracting the main verb in a sentence is perfectly fine.
The usual way is just to find the Latin root and add the suffix: quintuple, sextuple, septuple, nonuple, etc.
Thrice is somewhat common in America, but is generally considered pretentious.
Casual English is appropriate for a t-shirt since wearing clothing with phases on them is pretty casual.
A shadow is the silhouette cast by an object that blocks a source of light.
The form insofar is American English; the standard form in British and other English is 'in so far'.
Since et cetera means "and so forth", your question is very nearly identical to the serial comma question.
I was on the ANSI committee that defined the 5 1/4 inch floppy specification (ANSI X3-B8) back around 1980.
"Off" generally carries the connotation of removal in American English.
There is no correct plural for the word Prius at the moment.
Firstly, this is only American convention — in Britain for instance you wouldn't use it (except for a few publishing houses).
It's really not complicated or confusing if you think of it in terms of being a fraction.
Since "payment" is countable, I would go with "were" to reinforce the notion that there was more than one payment.
The word praxis is definitely an extremely formal academic word.
"Ten of six" probably means 5:50 but I have not heard it before.
There is not really a grammatical rule that governs this as far as I know.
In the context of stackexchange, "yearling" could be issued 12 months from when the account was opened.
In my experience, it doesn't matter how you phrase it, as long as you remain consistent.
I've never encountered anybody who thinks that "couple" doesn't even begin until 4!
I think the difference between probably and possibly is somewhat related to may and can.
I've thought about your question for a while, and it seems a bit open-ended.
Second one (for writing purpose), if I believe the "THEY/THEIR (SINGULAR)" article.
Here's a pseudo-scientific, fascinating look at dictionary use by region using Google Trends.
I agree with Shinto Sherlock's answer, but I might add "telephone conversations" to that list as well.
I felt this way when I started to watch the The Wire, and English is my first language.
The multiple definitions of "due" make several of you right.
When reading a book aloud for recorded books, the reader never says "quote / unquote".
I'm not sure how "Not at all" sounds in response to "thank you".
The word "cable" has its origins in the days of the telegraph.
I suspect the phrase originated in the habit of drawing the internet as a cloud shape on network diagrams.
I don't think anyone would word the sentence in the examples provided.
Jail is a municipal level, prison is on a state/federal/provincial/territory level.
Maybe solvency or a related term could convey what you intend?
When a sheriff in the deep south says, "I reckon I'm takin' you to jail.
Real English, as it was known 50 years ago, is dead today.
I upvoted @hellion's "strict" but you might also consider stringent, vigilant, or even hyper-vigilant.
The name soccer is derived from Association Football in the same way that rugger is derived from Rugby Football.
Merriam-Webster marks learnt as "chiefly British", and Wiktionary as "UK", adding that learned is the "Standard US English spelling".
Men-o’-war is a nice one: shows that irregular plurals are just as susceptible to this construction.
A good example of usage of this is when a government replaces one tax with another.
The two words are synonyms and may be used interchangeably.
Shifting away from he and she in general is out of the question.
Most style guides recommend against using the slash in phrases like “X and/or Y”, as well as “this is hard/impossible to do”.
These days, "press" would have a strong traditional-media connotation, likely excluding bloggers, since new-media publishers neither own nor use industrial printing equipment.
A map is seen as different routes placed usually on a two-dimensional plane.
Simply put, a semicolon connects two complete sentences that are strongly related.
Personally I think you should use whatever word you feel like using at the time.
I don't know of an adjective form of integrity, so I can't solve your issue directly.
All up in is generally used to refer to someone being overly nosey, annoying or disapproving.
Dishonesty and other vices are often seen as corruptions, or shortcomings in a person's character or composition.
Strictly speaking, "might" is the simple past tense of "may".
Both "set up something" and "set something up" are perfectly correct English, as "set up" is a phrasal verb.
This is a workaround to plug avalent verbs into the rigid English sentence structure.
While, as jcarmody says, fine is an adjective rather than adverb, phrases such as this are fine for informal contexts.
There might be a context where the definite article 'the' is used as an adjective.
In IPA, that's would've - /wʊdəv/ - WOULD-uhv should've - /ʃʊdəv/ - SHOULD-uhv could've - /kʊdəv/ - COULD-uhv where "uhv" is a schwa sound followed by a V sound.
Another meaning behind this quote aside from probabilities of winning a theoretical battle is the importance of knowing/understanding others.
If you are used to calling it "zed" then I recommend that you use that in your presentation.
The Wiktionary mentions 3 usages: 1/ (idiomatic) To give evidence regarding something; to attest for.
The rule is really made up to prevent primary school children splitting their sentences up randomly.
There are several different pushup variations out there and most of them provide a unique advantage.
No, don't support your weight on your arms Your hands simply aren't really made for supporting all that weight.
Any sport where you are working hard will burn calories and fat.
Too much protein is excreted so there are no health risks in that respect.
It's the arms and sholders that cause the shirt to move and cause the chafing.
Nick Evans to lose weight need a diet of 50% protein, 40% carbohydrates, 10% fat and a negative caloric balance.
If you are looking to build mass, you should rest 45-60 seconds between sets of 8-12 repetitions for optimal gains.
Neuromuscular Activation and Dynamic Stretching Here is an excellent video on a dynamic stretching routine for running.
It's fantastically unlikely that there are any appreciable differences between the two.
Stick with the program You're not strong enough to need to supplement your lifts.
A possible answer is that you are not getting enough sleep.
I did gymnastics as a kid and tried to get back into it two years ago.
What you're describing is the reason many people work different muscle groups on different days.
Body weight squats will help with leg strength and balance.
It appears you are flexible enough and your hamstrings don't need additional stretching.
It is absolutely impossible to target fat loss to any particular part of your body.
miernik, you say the only cohabitant in your room is mold?
Sweat rate is sweat rate, you can't really control it.
I agree with the previous answers about there being no way to 'target' belly fat.
The worst thing a heel can do when weightlifting is compress.
Typical compression clothing, in my experience, won't give you much direct performance benefit (running faster, lifting heavier etc).
For recovery I would say still eat plenty of protein that will help your muscles to repair/recover.
The biggest concern with any exercise program is finding something you want to stick to.
The important aspect is that your average daily intake is about where your recommended calories are.
You just started training so your weight will start increasing as you will be building muscle.
Any time you exert yourself using strength, your heart will respond by pushing blood with more force.
I try do 5-6 straight forward yoga "sun salutations" every morning.
This page has a number of good quality exercises for eye strain.
Additionally often people will think a downhill marathon is easier, but in fact, is often harder than an uphill marathon.
For powerlifting, record lifts are 3 or more times bodyweight, and the lifts don't really require lifting the body.
I think we need to distinguish between different goals here.
Assuming you are reasonably fit, the best way to improve your running technique is to run faster.
When in doubt, start light and work up to heavy.
Low reps with high weights don't add mass because the duration of the exercise is kept short.
No, that does not mean that you should only be eating 317 grams of food per day.
These maybe a little closer to barefoot than you are looking for, but Luna sandals are a good option.
I recently started a similar training regime... and I am very fond of alcohol.
While I'm no expert on this, there have been a couple very intriguing articles I read on this.
I made a soft moccasin and put them over my shoes.
Air squats, forward and side lunges, sprawl, wall chair, and lots and lots of jump rope.
I personally run with amphipod's runlite belt with or without the bottles [depends on the length of the run.
There are both physiological and neurological reasons to build in rest.
If you use relatively heavy props there will be some benefit, but IMO not really comparable to dedicated strength training.
Yeah, if you don't want to build muscles, then don't use them.
Getting proper nutrients is essential to maintaining a healthy immune system.
A treadmill won't prepare you for the impact of running for real.
I think there is just one advice that can be given in this case: See a doctor!
It is just as hard to gain and keep weight on, as it is to lose it.
As @Sarge says, this is for a doctor to diagnose properly.
You lose weight because you either eat less or exercise more.
I recently purchased a pair of Merrell True Glove minimalist shoes.
It sounds like they're warming up with 15, 20, and 30, doing one work set with 40, then doing what's called a "back-off" set with 10.
Movement is actually an essential part of maintenance and recovery.
Hard to answer outside the context of your whole program.
Given the additional information you've posted, it sounds like you are simply hitting a wall.
I've been into running and cycling for years now and have done races and different things to motivate myself.
In general, warming up your muscles only requires performing the movement with lower weights.
This summary article gives a good review of the mechanics of recovery and some plausible guidelines on training frequency.
A strong core is necessary for performing a push up with good form.
Doing slow pushups may help depending how much you weigh actually.
The answer depends on what your overall goals are, and what you are doing with your training.
Tracking your progress is one of the best ways to motivate change.
To get a fairly exact calculation follow these steps: Step 1: Calculate your Basal Metabolic Rate (BMR).
You might want to take a look at (and perhaps avoid) sumo wrestlers' eating/sleeping patterns.
If she is "terrified" that she will tear up her knees with the squat, she very likely will.
Losing weight is about expending more calories than you take in.
There are actually quite a few studies that address this question.
In addition to my earlier answer I think one key is consistency.
I always find it more satisfying to gain, since I like to eat.
I have shoes that I've worn for many years without problems.
Your symptoms lead me to believe you have a very stressful day job or even life.
A whey protein shake would be an easy way to get protein.
Every food we eat are digested by specific enzymes that are highly sensitive to temperature.
I've found Pavel Tsatsouline's book The Naked Warrior to be a good source of bodyweight exercises.
You can mix those, but in my experience, it will be very difficult at first.
A free e-book gave me an answer to this a while ago.
The information you are asking about is not well known.
What you're looking to do is increase your Anaerobic threshold Here's how it works.
As many others have either said directly or indirectly, adding some kind of interval work will definitely help.
Pulling your stomach muscles in will help keep them active.
I would say high impact workouts like running might make them worse.
There are many factors that contribute lack of energy, but nutrition-wise, one of the reasons is "fast" carbohydrates (especially sugar).
I've seen guys that are still very flexable while lifting weights.
Video lessons contains poses and and can fast-forward video lessons directly to poses and concentrate on the exercise perfromance.
As to your reference to power sports, core strength should dominate all other priorities.
Cramping, especially at night, can be a response to low calcium.
You have several options available to you, but it does seem like you want to really slow down your deadlift.
What I really would recommend is to change your routine, if you have followed the same for 2 years.
First of all, sipping protein shake does not increase muscle growth by itself.
As a former gymnast, I recommend that you try a gymnastics gym.
You cannot "target" an area of the body for fat loss.
If it's a light amount of soreness, it's a good sign.
I see others recommended getting outside, I'll stay with your specifics of indoor stress and depression focus exercises.
Eat like a horse if you're focusing on strength gains First, how do you know how much is enough?
There are (at least) two different ways to look at this.
It's fine to skip arm specific exercises if you are already happy with how they are progressing without direct exercises.
Because I'm pretty busy, I usually do weights both before and after cardio.
Let me start by saying that no amount of water will keep the doctor away.
If you have concerns about your heart rate then I would see a doctor.
There's a nice article on developing mental toughness on Ralph Jean-Paul's blog.
I haven't tried storing tomato seeds myself, but I have tried to store pepper seeds (and they are closely related).
It is possible to buy citrus trees with more than one variety grafted to it.
I'm assuming you want to keep using these tools, and not just clean them up for display.
If you are living anywhere around New England it is because the temperature drops at night.
Adding soap to water allows the water to dissolve oils.
Yes, legumes do provide nitrogen to associated plants, through multiple mechanisms.
Absolutely ok; we have incorporated coffee grounds into our plant food and many of those grounds included the paper filter.
When the peppers come to fruit, they're going to start out green.
I brought an Ace product that kla crab grass and you can use it below 90 degrees.
You're better off buying seeds from the rack in the front of the store.
Plants that are thinned to 4" can fit 9 in a square foot.
I live in Delaware and have already harvested my jalapeno and chili peppers.
I've chipped the main roots and stump with an axe to speed the natural decay.
Looking at the video, it looks like a pretty typical whitefly.
On the off-chance that you're serious... No, we are not in danger of running out of rocks.
If the plant really does have Foot and Root rot, best remove it as soon as possible.
As they've been causing so much havoc, I've been doing more research and found out that they're not bean beetles.
Being in Australia, I started out with exactly the same question, xiahouzi.
If your grass looks like the below picture in summer, then you have bermuda grass.
If exposure to cucumber beetles is a possibility, then it may be bacterial wilt, for which there is no treatment.
The first question is whether the tree is worth saving.
I've got the same problem, where there are fields of dandelions just beyond the borders of my gardens.
If not good for compost, could it be useful anywhere else in the garden?
We struggled with groundhogs at our local community garden for several years.
I had it few times, bought in a nursery, and they were exactament so.
Some support won't hurt, especially if it is a large fruited variety.
First, let me say I've no experience doing battle with Bermuda grass.
We have quite a few people here who have grown peppers and small tomatoes indoors and in pots.
I use liquid regent aquarium test kits to track my sail parameters.
The longer you can leave the seed-heads on the plant the better (IMHO).
Since you've already accepted a nicely sourced answer, I'll contribute some unsubstatiated tradition (i.e.
Additional to the other answers, basil famously doesn't like to be damp overnight.
You determine how many you want to put based on the germination rate.
The least possible slope shall be used for any ramp.
I just talked to the guy that handles my lawn and he said that this is common with new mulch.
Lettuce is finicky and prone to bolt due to the heat.
A single leaf may be lethal to a child (Shaw & Pearn, 1979).
It doesn't matter so much how often you mow, as much as how long the grass is.
I wouldn't use the sawdust if the wood has been treated with any chemicals.
If water goes down in sometime then you don't need to do anything.
Every trees (though dwarf) have to be replanted during winter, when sleeping.
It is meant to stimulate root growth - in particular to stimulate the creation of roots.
It should be safe when there is new growth from the cutting you planted.
Application is 1/2" gallon per 1000 sq ft. 0.3 acre is 13,000 square feet For 6 1/2" gallons of solution.
I reccomend "Monkey Grass" because it is like a slow growing weed that reproduces slowly and looks nice!
It appears as though it has likely started to bolt.
Mulch is just a general term meaning materials applied to the top of the soil around plants, usually.
Some mosses from outside will establish indoors in good indirect light.
Use coco peat - It's an organic soil derived from coconut husks for garden vegetables and plants which is Eco-friendly.
This tree is large, of significant caliper and in a tight spot.
I bought the mantis tiller cultivator but to go along with it I bought the aerator and dethatcher combo.
It is entirely possible that the experts are correct and that removal is the only option.
Well, one good way to kill your lawn is to mow it extraordinarily low.
It looks more Bradford Pear like than cherry or crabapple.
This plant is called the Mass Cane or Dracaena Massangea also known as Dracaena fragrans .
Why not start seeds and grow them in a container this year?
Alternatively you might try throwing buckwheat seeds into the dirt areas between the rocks.
It's Peruvian daisy (Galinsoga quadriradiata), which is native to Central and South America.
What possible harm could the presence of ants bring to your dirt?
The NPK numbers on the fertilizer represents the percent, by weight, of Nitrogen, P2O5 and K2O, respectively.
As @bstpierre mentioned, the pile you are working with is huge and suggested making it into smaller piles.
Your pile will compost without turning it, but it goes faster if you turn it.
Well I wouldn't risk it, not in a cold compost system.
Late last year (September or so) I started getting about 2 gallons a week of grounds.
Fruit trees in poor health often are full of carpenter ants, which can do major damage to the house.
This sounds like it could be Blackspot fungus which is brought on by overly damp or humid conditions.
I used popsicle sticks and a sharpie for plant labels this year.
If you want to grow kitchen herbs look for varieties that are hearty in warm climates.
Lettuce often runs to seed prematurely when it is stressed.
With some additional information, it appears that the salesman gave me good advice.
We don't have enough information to provide a definitive diagnosis.
Any organic gardener will tell you Round Up damages the ground.
You did the right thing in hiring a professional with local expertise.
If you can put together a sufficiently large collection of vegetarians, they will take care of it.
If you had more mint, I'd go with what Yoda said.
Peonies are often shipped by nurseries as root stock, and they can be propagated from toot cuttings (which you've found!
I don't think there is a solution to "helping the lawn recover" because in this case it is completely dead.
In the west water rights were acquired by the states to encourage expansion westward.
I'd say it depends a bit on what will be grown later.
Although some doubt was cast on it in an earlier question, there is the concept of "scorching".
It appears as though it has likely started to bolt.
After just reading the title, I was going to suggest get a dog.
If you have open fires in your home you're likely to have a supply of kindling/starters.
Save the beer and make your own traps is my suggestion.
It will "work" -- after all, the city compost takes meat.
The links in the other answers are great starting points, but experience will be your best teacher.
add garden lime or even gypsum, mixing it in a bit.
Watering could cool temperatures - because the water is cool, and (more importantly) through evaporation.
Below are a few quotes from this answer I posted here on SE.
I have two and they are mounted just below my hip.
Add sand, leaves, and compost and mix it around with a pitchfork.
Are your apples particularly soft/mushy at all or are they pretty firm?
A preventive solution after you have weeded is to apply a polymeric sand onto the pavers.
Local newspapers and master gardener groups are a place to look - they may have websites of pamphlets/booklets.
For many indoor tropical plants life in the office is slow death.
You should Google "Back to Eden" film and see the results from the gardener in that documentary.
Only water high in minerals (especially sodium) can do some "burn" damage when watering in the heat.
Some of the guys at my office have potted aloe plants.
You could kill it by suffocating it from light and heating it naturally.
They sell artificial turf at Lowes, Home Depot, and online.
I concur with @T.E.D; the question is a "no True Scotsman" bar bet.
There is direct evidence of truly intercontinental trade dating back to approximately 1700 BC.
Many towns and villages took their name from the ruling family, the owners of the village.
The Elks Theatre in Middletown, Pennsylvania has been open since October 1911.
The United States is one of the five largest countries in the world by area.
My guess is that World War II accelerated Indian independence.
In Hitler's mind, defeating the Soviet Union was the most important thing.
I know that in the British armed forces there has always been a difference in equipment/clothing/food/messes between officers and enlisted men/women.
The USSR growth rate during the 50's was not exceptionally high.
I have been travelling in Extremadura for the past 5 days.
The four nations each benefited from the Union, for the most part anyway.
Looking at China, we can see several "revolutions" (or attempts at them) by students.
There really aren't a lot of differences, and that's by design.
Arguably, the first genocide was attempted in Persia, and against the Jews, as related in the Biblical book of Esther.
From reading on Wikipedia, I found that Kaifeng was taken by the Mongols by Ogedei Khan.
Europe and East Asia didn't industrialize at the same time.
There is a very good reason not to refer to the Queen's spouse as "King" - because they aren't the King.
They had a treaty beginning in 1941, after a few skirmishes along the area in question.
The Roman armies of the early to mid-Republic were largely conscript based with the conscripts serving for a relatively short period.
The following is taken from my dog-eared copy of the New Penguin Atlas of Medieval History.
Las Vegas was not founded in a particularly random desert.
As you know, the Federal Art Project was a part of the WPA during the Great Depression.
Churchill was not Prime Minister when the MRP was announced or when it went into effect.
It was a slow process but it did begin with trade, most notably Southern cotton.
The Declaration of Independence of the USA is be a candidate.
Germany was not a DIRECT threat to the United States.
Saladin was an unusual man who tried to win the "hearts and minds" of people he conquered.
The original question relates most strongly to Weberian conceptions of class.
The Archimedes Heat Ray seems to be a good example.
Erwin Rommel - The Devil's General The SPIEGEL has released a good up to date point of view about NAZI Rommel (01.
This relates to the "discovery" of Asian, and other non-European cultures by Americans.
That is indeed Greek Looks like a Ticket to a museum or field.
I'm not sure there's going to be a definitive source for an answer to this.
The question makes no sense so I voted to close it.
A recent example of peaceful secession is in 1991 when Eritrea became independent from Ethiopia.
J. Robert Oppenheimer's biographer Ray Monk thinks that Heisenberg played no such role (perhaps he "did" in convenient-to-some retrospect).
I guess those are greek tickets (εισιτηριον) for excavation sites or museums.
suggests this kind of things is better understood from the inside.
I understand that writing "any historians" you mean "any non-German historians".
There was no influence from China to the culture of Greece.
My family came from Western Ukraine and my grandfather attended University in Chernotsy and Vienna.
Just to expand on the disease angle, at its height, Zambia's population was 3% European.
It is true that bombs in World War II would make a whistling sound as they fell.
I'm Cuban (1984- leave cuba in 2009), and I'll try to be the most unbiased possible.
It is a mistake to think of the Battle of the Wilderness as a Confederate Victory.
What I think happened here is a case of gradual exaggeration.
The middle of the 18th century was the height of the British nationalist movement.
The Han Dynasty came after the Qin Dyansty, after the government under Shi Huang Di collapsed.
I believe this question puts the cart before the horse.
Britain didn't use their navy because ships don't work on land.
Well, as stated by Monster Truck there are many theories about when the "weekly off" was introduced to India.
As per your original question: The Wikipedia section does not claim that Joseph P Kennedy bought John F Kennedy's victory.
In fact during the Age of Discovery, Africa had been the principle objective.
It is a shadow to show the vertical displacement of the Grand Gallery.
During the American Civil War, the Union attacked the Confederacy in this fashion.
To my impression this reflects systematic bias of the sources you use, possibly, sources circulating in your country and/or language.
As noted on the Wiki page, grass seed was imported to the new world to improve pasturage for livestock.
There is yet another reason why the male nude was common in Greece.
France and Britain didn't focus much on South America because it wasn't really valuable territory.
Note: this is an opinion question (especially the second part) and probably off-topic here.
The Cold War was the standoff between the Capitalistic USA and Communistic USSR.
The outcome of the Cold War would likely not have been different if the "Space Race" did not occur.
I can offer some points of the constitution that I remebember beeing implemented esp.
The Daily Express just took the caption from Getty Images without substantial modification.
Hitler was atheist, church was only an instrument for him.
They had a treaty beginning in 1941, after a few skirmishes along the area in question.
I'll separate my answer into two: ancient history and modern history.
I did some more research using the answers provided as a guide, particularly about the Daguerreotype.
Let's consider a well documented journey by Napoleon in 1809, a mere 40 years later.
You may consider emperor Justin II who resigned due to progressing insanity.
This is a simple question, it's because Hindusim is not a religion at all.
Personally, I don't think anything ever went particularly "wrong" with India.
German physicist tried to build an atomic bomb, at least there were experiments.
One reason appears to be the success of (Confederate) General Stonewall Jackson's Shenandoah Valley Campaign in late spring of 1862.
The main problem here is that the civilizations of India were almost completely illiterate before the Aryan movements.
I don't think it is possible to idenitify a single point in history as beginning the "slope toward the end".
It's still possible for an invaded people to lose if the odds are TOO overwhelming.
Sherman's "March to the Sea" hurt the CSA's economy and helped to end the war.
According to Cardinal Richelieu's Wikipedia page he was a cardinal priest until December 4, 1642, the day of his death.
In those days, most of the people of the "Ukraine" lived in the western part of the province (around Kiev).
Just to expand on the disease angle, at its height, Zambia's population was 3% European.
The question makes no sense so I voted to close it.
I am not exactly sure but I remember the media (in India) addressing Delhi as "HASTHINA".
This is not really an answer to your question, but the following numbers look much more realistic.
If the Commonwealth "surrendered prematurely at Crete," it was in the fighting around the Maleme airfield.
Apart from advocating scientific management, Gastev was a proletariat smithy(kuznitsa) poet.
Bruce Catton's history and Shelby Foote's history should have the details.
You might also ask why these people from the steppes also created so much havoc in CHINA.
The truth is that Germany ways de-facto the leader in the majority of sciences from the end of XIX century.
All depends on the aircraft, development went very quickly during WW1.
This is unfortunately the only source I could find which describes COMECON's imperialist tendencies in great detail.
A greek-speaking slave (δούλος, doulos) I think would call his master κύριος (translit: kurios; lord, master, sir; vocative form: κύριε).
I think the question totally glosses over the fact that "East Pakistan" was created out of the partition of Bengal.
To my impression this reflects systematic bias of the sources you use, possibly, sources circulating in your country and/or language.
I believe Alexander lost heart after his horse, Bucephelus, died from a wound received in the battle against Porus.
Even if somebody can rise to height, does not make a society classless.
Romance is hardly a western construct; it's universal among all humans.
I think everyone who has posted here (@ihtkwot, @mgb, @Russell) have all brought up important points.
Too many factors at work to really say 'a bow has a range of X'.
It was pitch/tar and oil that was ignited and sprayed if my memory serves me correctly.
Indefinite articles developed from numerals, and the definite articles developed from demonstratives.
Sanskrit has been a subject of revival efforts since the 1908s in various villages in India.
Romance languages have (generally speaking) three classes of verbs, inherited from Latin.
In fact, you can remove pretty much and preserve grammaticality if you don't care about preserving meaning.
Latin forms the future participle of most verbs (futurus, moriturus), Russian only form the verb to be (будущий).
Modern Englishes, and many other well-known languages, use base 10 (ie decimal) systems of numerals.
The source for this is in a book called The Coming Revolution by Zamir Cohen.
@Joe has covered words for "pineapple", so here's some info on words for "banana".
Bluntly, Slovak and Slovenian have nothing in common other than being both Slavic languages.
"Are modern languages in any non-arbitrary way superior to ancient languages, e.g.
Historically, signed phonemes were considered to fall into 4 (or 5 depending on who you ask) categories that are sometimes called parameters.
Modern Englishes, and many other well-known languages, use base 10 (ie decimal) systems of numerals.
There is also the Al-Sayyid Bedouin Sign Language, which developed under similar circumstances (isolated deaf community) in the south of Israel.
Broadly speaking, there is a linguistic continuum across Northern India.
I am a native turkish speaker living in İstanbul, 30 years old.
Would you count a language that has lost most of its (original) number system?
Thank you all for giving examples of word order in your mother language.
It depends on generally syntactic structure of two languages and -yes- some pragmatic issues.
I agree with Thomas that the situation in English and in German is not the same.
One possibility is because of its relative isolation from the other Latin-based languages.
I couldn't read the first and not the second much either.
This word can well be connected with its Chinese counterpart.
I'm not an expert, but in my experience this is common in Galician and Spanish.
For those unsure of terminology, "analytic" refers to how many morphemes group together to make a word.
TL;DR: Option D is the answer, and Option E may be an answer with minor corrections.
Here are some cases where an adjunct (always locative) comes before the "of" complement.
I am not sure if there is a word for no.
As Ivan writes, the example in the question is indeed an example of so-called right node raising (RNR).
weak context-freeness: can the language be analyzed by a CF grammar at all?
In traditional grammar, the word doing is a participle in all your examples.
I agree with the commentators that your question is a little confusing.
You may want to have a look at OpenNLP http://opennlp.apache.org/.
Although it is a strong tendency it is still only a tendency.
Although I am quite fluent in Russian, I wouldn't say English sound particularly 'cold' to me.
Sinhala, one of the languages spoken in Sri Lanka has a four way deixis system.
One idea that's been going around at least since the 80s is that you can distinguish between Holds and Moves.
Every language is permeated by the cultural values in which it is immersed.
Unfortunately, there is no straightforward syllabification method that is accepted by a majority of linguists.
The more languages you know, the easier it generally is to learn new ones.
Languages can often be distinguished based on prosodic information alone.
Try looking in a mirror into your mouth while producing some words like "fill feel hello ladle larry bottle etc".
As in Russian, Polish marks animate masculine nouns by having a genitive-accusative vs. the nominative-accusative of inanimate masculines.
This is an example I always find is helpful for first year.
No, It doesn't make sense for exactly the reasons you posited.
Free software, 'Audacity', can apply and preserve, as well as infinitely undo, many useful transformations in any selections of the audio.
The biggest problem with signing is that you can't talk to a person without first getting their attention.
To some extent, there are rules you can apply to pronounce, say, teaching based on the known pronunciation of teach.
When writing my dissertation about Language and Identity I found these two references: Bugarski, R. (1997).
The Balkan sprachbund is a group of languages which have interspersed grammatical features among each other.
I think that the basic observation about agglutinative languages generally not having complex tonal systems is pretty well upheld.
I doubt the explanations given elsewhere in this thread very much.
Language can "improve" over time as well as "just changing".
There is a paper by Pavel Caha on Lingbuzz that addresses this exact question.
As with all natural laws, Zipf's law is an approximation.
The same goes for [g] : [ǵ] and [l] : [ĺ], and no other consonant.
I do not know that I have a proper answer, but I would like to summarize my findings.
I wouldn't hundred percent subscribe to Tamil (refering here to classical Tamil Sangam poetry) being mora-timed.
I have probably turned myself into a machine, but the sentences I was driving against the traffic towards London.
There are formalized dependency-based grammars, such as Meaning-Text Theory or Functional Generative Description.
The answer is that we do not know (and possibly never will).
Although I am quite fluent in Russian, I wouldn't say English sound particularly 'cold' to me.
A sort of squabble played out a few years ago on the pages of Language.
Latin has a pretty large class of nouns like these, which are actually called abundantia in the grammatical tradition.
First of all, this goal is seen as somewhat utopic today.
First, I am going to address Tangurena's answer (I don't have enough reputation to add a comment).
I would really give not an answer but somewhat refusal for the question (despite the question is really good).
As you can probably guess, there are several ways to determine the etymology of words.
As others have pointed out, it seems that you probably meant to discuss homo*phones*, and I'll proceed on that assumption.
The most interesting research is experimental work on grammatical gender and functional words (like prepositions).
With due regard to @mollyocr's answer, I shall answer my own question.
"Phoneme" is a theoretical construct which probably can't go away.
In the Old Ethiopic language Ge'ez a double dot (:) was used to separate words.
This is what they recommend at Oxford as introductory textbooks to students starting a Masters' in Linguistics.
One problem is, as you've identified, how to define "language".
According to a statistical estimation I know roughly 7000 words in English.
In fact, it seems to be the case that you do get /r/ in those contexts and specific words (also, 'squash', etc.).
What roots cannot denote is the actual and specific performance of an action.
I am not convinced that either one of these answers in correct.
'Orthographically similar' might be another term you can use, meaning 'spelled similarly'.
Different languages produce their vowels at different positions in the mouth.
You may want to start with an excellent review by Leonid Kulikov.
The Western Desert Language in Australia does not have a word directly equivalent to English 'love'.
These are two different representations that depend on your assumption.
Avestan yātu-, Middle Persian jādūg, New Persian jādū all mean “sorcerer”, though the NP word is also used for “sorcery” (MP.
This kind of phonological ambiguity is frequent enough, also because sound may be distorted.
Hebrew šɛmɛn שמן “oil, fat” is a Semitic cognate of Arabic samn سمن “fat, butter” (with Semitic s1).
Normally, English "k", "t" and "p" are always aspirated, so they have a very slight "h" sound right after them.
I think the academic phonological analysis is true only to a small extent.
@Alenanno's answer is great, but there is yet another factor: conspiracy.
Interesting response from Ron Maimon, although I am not sure I understand it fully.
This is not a scientific account, it may not be accurate, nor am i an expert on the subject.
I think the word you are looking for is plesionym.
RE: "some of Mongour are Taoist and Bonan are Muslim" The Bao'an/Bonan who are officially classified as such live in Gansu.
This kind of phonological ambiguity is frequent enough, also because sound may be distorted.
I just read about a study on this which used a fascinating methodology.
Here is a funny clip from a dramatization of a Japanese class: Nihonjin no Shiranai Nihongo episode 1 clips.
The OP seems to be bilingual in English in Chinese.
At present, the recent findings of Lusitanian inscriptions confirm the bilingual character (indigenous - Latin) of the so called Lusitanian language.
I don't see why a definite article suffix and "definiteness" as a noun property contradict each other.
The English word "right" comes from Proto-Indo-European word o̯reĝtos which meant "correct" and had cognates o̯reĝr "directive, order", o̯reĝs "king, ruler", o̯reĝti "guides, directs", o̯reĝi̯om "kingdom".
I have gone through three pairs, two without the toe strap, and one with.
No, a tent will not give you any protection from bears that want what's inside.
Down is the lightest and most compressible delivering the best warmth.
In general they are not considered dangerous because they rarely attack humans.
I use Solarcaine, which contains a local anesthetic, on both mosquito bites and sunburn.
I always ascend the other way around (foot-prusik above the chest prusik).
I have gone through three pairs, two without the toe strap, and one with.
You can shoot a human in self defense, so don't worry about shooting a bear if you have to.
I've been using a LowePro TLZ bag clipped to the front of my pack, just above the sternum straps.
There are all kinds of people who put up the fly first, then crouch under it putting up the inside.
I carry 6L in the Mojave dunes but find that I only drink 3 to 4L.
Generally in England and Wales it is illegal to wild camp anywhere without prior permission from the land owner.
Fecal contamination should not really be an issue unless someone is already sick.
Nylon, among other synthetics, is an ideal material for clothing for most outdoor pursuits for several reasons.
The simplest ones are like this, and even the more complex ones are typically broadly similar.
GPS systems can, and do, work everywhere you can get satellites.
There is a product called naked surf that you can apply as a liquid rash guard.
If there is another person person onboard, have them do nothing but watch the person in the water.
Actually it's looking like Bio-charing the waste is going to be the best option.
The key factors are going to vary from person to person.
American black bears They are somewhat common in some wilderness areas of California, mostly in the mountains.
Skiing is a sport where taking lessons pays off very quickly.
I'm going to say that fit is one of the most important elements.
First, sorry to hear the diagnosis, but you are not alone.
If you are being asked to boil water it has a biological contamination.
Whilst walking about, clench your fist, then stretch your hand open again.
I think Kate Gregory's answer has covered the most important issues.
I use a "Camelbak Stoaway" bladder - it has a bit of insulation and neoprene on the tube.
Duct tape wraps around items fairly and can be stored by wrapping on your gear.
One method is to build a brake out of carabiners.
As stated by Graham in his comment, I would recommend using ice traction device like this one or this one.
When hiking in the cold you need to be able to sweat but not get cold.
Alright, there are several different issues here that we must be sure to address.
I've had a very large number of finger and tendon injuries over 20 years of climbing.
Apart from what has been said, your need of water also depends on what you eat.
Pea vs. Pealess -- In very cold temperatures, pea whistles don't work Volumn -- Louder is better... to a point.
If you can settle on purple Nunatak and Feather Friends have good sleeping bags in those colors.
Keeping some outward tension on the belay device really helps.
In the UK we have, comparative to other countries, very few venomous creatures.
Tie the end of the yarn to the bottom-most thread of the warp.
Perhaps manufacturers advise on how much strain their ropes could take before retirement?
I'm a sailboat skipper with 25 years experience, so perhaps my tips could help a bit.
Here is an interesting article on wikipedia to give overview of pressure related injuries.
As mentioned in other answers, it will depend on the type of your backpack.
We've been using flexible Platypus reservoirs and have had no trouble thus far.
To me, hiking is totally different from the rest of the activities on the list.
I would since a tampon has more than one use example this link shows 10 different ways to use one (http://artofmanliness.com/2012/06/05/survival-tampon/).
We have tested many sleds over the years and this one is as dangerously fast as it is classically beautiful.
Climbing is the best exercise for finger and hand strength improvement, just make sure to warm up and stretch.
I've heard good things about Badger Balm protecting from biting bugs.
The first solution that comes to mind is a "zeer", or pot-in-pot refrigerator.
DEET can be harmful to the skin if you suffer from any skin disorders such as Eczema (as I do).
Since it has been a year and some of this has not been mentioned I felt compelled to do so.
The most common for rock climbing are with fingerboards or campus boards.
You can use any piece of lint, string, or leaves, to make a makeshift lure.
My experience tell me this: sleep naked always if there's no sign of a possible avalanche.
I lived in Yosemite for over a year and saw TONS of tree belay stations.
By far the simplest and most hygienic solution is to buy two sets.
This isn't something a real fisherman would do, so if you really want to learn to fish don't do it.
Infants & Toddlers most of the time will not know about safety.
I enjoy being alone, but I'll bring a book and some music for when I'm in my tent.
Outdoors you can dig a hole and build SOLAR STILL.
I'm no herpetologist, but in my experience, snakes are in the "you don't bug me, I won't bug you" category.
I realize you already made your trip, but I will answer your question anyhow.
Unlike others, I think the route is pretty well described.
As your body gets used to the altitude, the symptoms go away.
Have you tried fitting them both into a single pillowcase?
From my comment - Some people keep a jar in the tent to pee in.
In dry climates you can take advantage of evaporative cooling - especially on a bike.
Acclimatization isn't purely psychological; it is actually a physiologically different response based upon recent exposure and experience.
Can you do some local training hikes on similar terrain before heading out there?
I would recommend checking out something like Hobie's Mirage pedal driven kayaks.
I am not entirely sure, but I think you are referring to boots like the La Sportiva Nepal.
Boiling eliminates only a certain class of contaminants that can make you ill.
DEET is really evil, it is a dissolvent that is able to etch the plastic cap!
I have several gluten-intolerant people in my life, and though I haven't taken them camping, here's how I would feed them.
For pure calorific content, you cant beat Kendall Mint Cake.
Holding on to crimpers is what causes pain in my finger-joints.
Hartley (and Phil) pretty much have it covered, but I'd add a couple of things.
You can get a rough estimate from using an online calorie estimation website.
Clip together any unclipped compression straps even if you aren't tightening them, just to reduce the length that flaps around.
I don't want, however, to inform anyone around about that cache - I want to keep it secret only for 'chosen'.
If your fingers are to the cold point where you cant feel them, then not much is going to help.
My favorite fireside activity is my family's version of 20 questions.
In my opinion you should also take the hybrid helmets into account.
I've not camped in subzero weather before but I have spent several hours working on glaciers.
Again, tie a secure loop in the rope near the second sack.
General fitness is the only technique you can employ without going to higher altitudes.
The above advice is quite good, just wanted to add on thing to consider regarding food in bear country.
Here is a few videos on how you can clean your hydration pack.
The first two images on this site (pictured below) show how you can pack your rope without producing tangles.
Yes, it is accepted practice to wash new Semi-Static rope (or Single Rope Technique/SRT Rope as it is known by cavers).
Stuff is first put into plastic bags according to type.
Tent: A 2 person tent divides up really well between Tent/rainfly, and poles/groundcloth, a 4 person tent breaks down each component even more.
From experience with small sections I have used hand sanitizer and it works.
I have bought the Copper Spur 3 and slept in it now on a cottage lawn and on a backcountry campsite.
I first bought a MSR Fuel Bottle (325 ml, aluminum) for packing denatured alcohol for my Trangia stove.
According to my father (a self-identified mountaineer), the difference is as follows: A rock climber encounters a cliff on a mountainside.
Here's my attempt to make a truly thorough answer to the question of cold-weather clothing.
Are you sure this is a good idea at all?
My opinion is to wait until the child itself expresses a desire for this.
I would say it's completely safe so long as the bottles have been adequately rinsed to remove any detergent residue.
You can try putting the diaper on backwards which may only work for a little while.
I DO NOT recommend night driving--especially if your drive is in excess of ten hours.
I agree that you need to take care of this prior to your child being born.
When you are talking about babies and toddlers, bullying is a lot simpler than it can be with older children.
If you omit eggs and dairy, it becomes very difficult to get adequate nutrients.
Would you be concerned with the mind changing if he wasn't shouting and/or misbehaving?
I would simply like to recommend a book that is fabulous for your situation.
Here's what I saw with my fraternal twins: While learning to speak, all children develop some of their own dialect.
We always lightly bopped our kids on the mouth, therefore showing him that his mouth is what hurt you.
Any breed of dog can be perfectly safe or extremely dangerous.
The longer it has been since the last feeding, the easier it should be to pump.
I really wanted my ears pierced, but my parents said I had to wait until I was 10 years old.
There are those who feel that rewards are just as counter-productive as punishments.
Baby talk, when used correctly is beneficial to speech development.
I have never worked out how to get a child to listen first time.
Many children, instead of being motivated by reward are motivated by being in control.
As @tomjedrz said, they do go from being baby carriers to stuff carriers and are always useful in that regard.
I think there's too many factors at play to determine the proper age to use cry it out.
Here are two sites with the results of research on nipple confusion.
I've found with my baby that it's more accurate to go by his behavior than by "rules".
I suggest looking to offer up as many resources regarding his interests as you can.
My sister put her son in a martial arts class and was nervous because he is really shy.
Another strange thing that I wish I had the foresight to buy earlier are "Pool noodles".
Being from India, our criteria was: How will it sound to international English speakers?
Instead of the bacon we use slices of ham or turkey depending on which brand has less sodium in it.
Young children often are overwhelmed with options, especially when tired.
In general, I would do the same thing to an 18 year old as any of my kids.
It is always difficult when parents refuse to see what seems obvious to a teacher.
She's probably into the first growth spurt already and as such is hungry all the time.
The topics you mention are very broad and not closely related in the scientific world.
As was mentioned, the problem with cheese is the potential for Listeria.
I think it's important that you make time for the older child so they don't feel neglected.
We have allowed our boys to use afghans at night since about 9 months old.
My daughter used to have a reaction when we used normal detergents.
I've actually heard the opposite, at least for younger kids.
Pick her up if she doesn't relax after a few calm "sleep now, dear".
There are two most likely scenarios here: Your child may have oral-sensory issues.
My 8yo is a budding opera geek... has been for at least a year and a half.
Baby pimples actually have little to nothing to do with cleanliness.
A friend told me it's when they are silent that there is a problem.
The fact that she played with her toys for 3 hours indicates that there is NOT anything physically wrong.
Same here, except we are dealing with milk protein which means not even lactose free milk.
Aside from asking people with children for recommendations, try asking an OB/GYN.
As HedgeMage said, a routine is very very important, especially the story telling part.
According to my personal experience there's no better way to be the best exapmle to your kids.
I was not allowed to watch Soap Operas while I was growing up.
Yours looks like the one we used for my kids (same brand and everything).
Nouns are great, but it's also important to include other parts of speech (adverbs, adjectives, etc.).
a) As soon as he can count, add and subtract; b) When he spends significant time outside home without parents.
We used a clean cloth or baby sock wrapped around an ice cube with our kids and grandkids.
A rather standard answer is "What to expect when you're expecting" book.
The potential that you will learn something makes it absolutely worth it.
I was at the University of Alberta while they were doing a 2-week clinic for people (adults) who stutter.
Actually, it looks like there are multiple options for organic formula.
Our daughter has always loved her bath, but coming out... not so much.
Similar to those mentioned earlier, we too have a routine to leave.
Relaxation exercises before bed can help as well as holding a cork in the front teeth for 1 minute before bed.
An alternative would be to expose her solely or additionally to Hindi in daycare.
Though I always start with non-electronic activities, I make sure to keep a few tucked into my bag as a backup.
Here are some things that worked with my son who started toilet training around 2.5 years.
We really tried avoiding 1,2,3 with our son, preferring time outs, but time outs just weren't that effective.
I have the same problem with my 7 year old son.
I don't think you should be afraid of this conversation at all.
I don't think there a games the specifically do this, however most games will lend themselves to this skill.
Quite simply: stop doing it, stop letting the siblings and grandparents do it.
A good question might be some things not to buy.
I can't scientifically debunk the myth you mention, but I've never heard of it and I don't think it's true.
If you are asking the question, then that's all that matters.
As the comments have said, don't be afraid to ask your pediatrician about it, since it worries you.
I had a bedtime routine and followed a 3 hour cycle for my infant (at the time newborn).
The fact that she played with her toys for 3 hours indicates that there is NOT anything physically wrong.
After visiting 2 urgent cares and our pediatrician the recommendation is unanimous.
We abandoned swaddling at 4 weeks because our son would scream and thrash when being swaddled.
Personally, I feel the volume of words is more important, than the diversity, at least early on.
You can put her toys near her or give he toys to her.
Tell him: Father is not only a title, its a job.
We're soon to be moving our son from his toddler bed to a full sized bed.
Some things to try: Remove all chocolate and mint from her diet.
Some of the other answers seem to address older children.
My wife and I originally had the same problem with our newborn twins fussing when bath time was over.
In addition to the other suggestions, I'd say make sure he can type relatively accurately.
I have always heard its a bad idea until they're two.
I've tried to work on this with emotional intelligence: helping my kids understand what they and other people are feeling.
I have been in a simular situation with my daughter and a female friend when they were 5 and 4.
There's probably a study to support whatever theory there is you want to believe in.
Nothing really special for camping that you don't already do when you go out.
The usual guidance given sounds odd: in early years leadership is learned by example.
A newborn will start issues (as we've had) with jealousy, and a whole new set of attention seeking behaviour.
Eating off a spoon has to be an unusual experience for them.
Its not just profanity but other words that are derisive of other people etc.
I have 5 kids (20, 18, 10, 8, 6) and none of them ever threw a tantrum.
In my experience, babies tend to wake up by themselves when they get hungry.
I think that it is greatly dependent on the culture of the school and they way it is done.
Our son started doing something similar but not quite as bad.
The main feedback I can provide here is to model the behavior you want to see in your child.
I understand that the first 3 days are the most important, so much so it is vital you do it then.
I had a similar problem with my daughter (I called her the carb junkie).
The simplistic answer is to buy two from different manufacturers.
We tried putting a male betta in a community tank once.
You can't expect your pet to keep mum if you are not with him.
First, the turtles are eating the fish because fish are food, not friends.
To reduce the amount of fur a cat malts over your furniture and clothes you could try a deshedder brush.
It really all depends on what you feed the dog.
Breed Zebra Danios are extremely hardy fish, they are almost difficult to kill.
If you're looking for a pet, I would probably suggest guinea fowl.
I had a dog with Cushing's Disease, and he gobbled food.
I am not an expert, just happen to have lived the same thing a couple of months ago.
In general I'd say one should feed cats wet food instead of dry.
I think Keltari has some good ideas.... A cat can change its "taste" in litter material.
Don't use regular shampoo -- cats have very sensitive skin and regular shampoo will dry it out and irritate it.
Cover the entrance to the doorway with a old carpet and use a staple guns to secure it.
I had a dog with Cushing's Disease, and he gobbled food.
They don't intend to leave those items around the house or untidy the house.
Something is bothering your cat and he does not like it.
Cats may or may not lick a person based on all kinds of things.
In my 200 L fresh water tank, which is an aggressive tank, fish occasionally get harassed to death.
I would definitely ask his vet how much he thinks is too much for the dog's age and physical state.
There's an answer to this on Cesar Millan's website from a vet.
I do not believe there is a specific diet which will ensure that no feces remains on a dog's backside.
Home Depot has a great product called "Odoban" which is an all natural enzymatic cleanser that eliminates urine stains/odors.
I have had really good results using carPET Scratch Stoppers in doorways and under doors.
Unfortunately, have no external sources, but my father is a veterinarian and my mother is a pet dietary consultant.
I've made sure to have more cardboard boxes around for my youngest cat to shred and bite.
I feed my cats a roughly 50/50 diet of wet and dry.
First, you should realize that this is not you or your dog's problem.
Although I'm 100% in favour of clicker training, in this case it might not be the best approach to start with.
The info you've been given in the previous answers is good.
Some researchers believe domestic cats never really mentally grow up completely and they always look at you like their mom.
Try to wash the food bowl and the water bowl.
Covers are also there to prevent things from getting in.
From my experience, attempts to stop cats from scratching things generally fail.
In my experience the benefits of chewing raw or smoked bones far outweigh the draw backs.
I started to dig into this because you caught my curiosity itch with the question...
Covers are also there to prevent things from getting in.
The answer on backward chaining was very good and I would like to suggest an augmentation to that approach.
Since cats in nature hunt at dawn and dusk, a two meals a day strategy fits best with their nature.
Most "diet" cat foods load up on carbs, which cats don't need (they're carnivores!).
Going by your pictures, no, you can't combine these fish.
I have used human tuna fish cans when I have forgotten cat food for a day or so.
I've seen on the "Dog Whisperer" that dogs can sense the anxiety that an owner has.
You could try installing a privacy film on your windows.
They don't intend to leave those items around the house or untidy the house.
You might consider adding a few Assassin Snails to the tank.
As mentioned in previous answers, rats and gerbils can be offered instead of mice or in a rotation with mice.
As covered in the other answers, your only option is to see a vet in order to have surgery done.
Allergies to animals, particularly furry ones, can be across the board rather than species specific.
Drinking more water, urine smelling strongly, defecating outside the litter box - all of those signs sound like she's sick.
I would say, unless you know it is safe for cats assume it to be poisonous.
One thing to keep in mind is to not try to comfort your pet.
The Humane Society of the United States has a few suggestions to prepare your pet.
All but one current answers talk about "forcefully" putting the animal into the carrier.
From what i know, It's an extra way of being territorial.
John Cavan has some reasonable and appropriate methods for increasing a rabbits weight in his answer.
You'll always want to add fish into a tank slowly.
Try to wash the food bowl and the water bowl.
To be honest, I think you're asking the wrong question.
You could always close or add curtains to the windows.
Cats are hard to train, but not impossible, and a lot of is really tied to their natural interests.
In short, iceberg lettuce is mostly water with little to no nutrient value.
So the vet assumed it was some kind of infection, though she seemed a bit clueless.
I would suggest finding a compounding pharmacy and talking to someone there.
Another option: If this cat tends to be rather vocal, she may just want to have a "conversation" with you.
He is probably doing this to show his disapproval of you leaving for work everyday.
We have a Norwegian Forest Cat who often gets mats and into plenty of messes.
I had similar problems with Pounce de Leon when she was young.
Other than avoidance, there may be a few things you can do.
I believe that there isn't an association between strings on toys and shoelaces.
I believe the current worlds record is something like 36-37 years old.
I have lots of plants and keep them all behind closed doors so none of my cats can eat them.
The first, and possibly most important, thing to look at is your tank size.
You can have Giant Gowra with any fish like Oscar, Koi carp, Angel, Giant Gowra, etc.
Science Hills now do a dry and wet food diet that is iodine-free, it's called y/d.
A trick I did was to grab and hold my cats close if they disturbed me during the night.
Okay, so you've got a dog running around without a leash and one that won't let you catch him?
Bettas are highly territorial and no matter what sexes you keep together they will fight.
I think what you're encountering is called Feline Hyperesthesia Syndrome but the common name is rolling skin disease.
Regardless of floor choice, remember that they need a burrow-like "safe" area to cope with stress.
We had a cat that required daily medication, and it was a struggle to give the cat a pill.
I think Esa answered the question well and thus have awarded him the answer.
Some cats (actually many, in my experience) find it difficult to sit or stand still when they are being petted.
As a reminder: There are many cats who have lived long and happy lives on dry food.
Cats don't usually like to have their paws held, touched, or anything like that.
You can't expect your pet to keep mum if you are not with him.
At only a few inches deep, it's still easily detected by coyotes and foxes.
Personally, I'd be wary of leaving a dog outside alone without a physical fenced boundary.
Supposedly Danios need to school which mean you need at least 5-8 Danios in your tank.
So called "natural" remedies are not necessarily: more effective; or with less side effects.
This table from Cornell University lists the specific gravity of urine for dogs, cats, and large animals.
I have a cat who does this, and have heard about the behavior in other cats.
Unfortunately I'd say no, not if you still have that much ammonia showing up.
Diet management of iodine intake for your cat is going to be very difficult with food intended for human consumption.
It is often said that "An ounce of prevention is worth a pound of cure".
As far as I'm aware of, it's instinctual, to avoid contamination.
Concern about lung development If you are concerned about your cat's health, you should take your cat to the veternarian.
All but one current answers talk about "forcefully" putting the animal into the carrier.
I found that "acts of God" can discourage and even teach cats from doing certain things (e.g.
Others have made some good suggestions about how to neutralize the odors in the area.
Since we can't know what moves inside a cat's head, it will all be a theory only.
Why did Aristotle place the earth at the centre of an infinite universe?
I am not convinced that positivism is routinely asociated to a leftist ideology.
It's fairly clear in this case that the problem is simply a false premise.
There is something rather than nothing because the state of "nothing" is UNSTABLE.
I'm not certain the preface paradox, as stated, holds water.
Broadly speaking, knowledge is objective truth while belief is subjective truth.
No given dictionary for a language completely describes that language.
The meaning of "cause" is very vague, it is a human term, not a scientific term.
As the t isn't mentioned in the part of Fever(x), we can push it inside.
The difference is huge, as not all non-physical things exist in minds.
Occasionalism is the position that God is the true and "efficient" cause of all that occurs.
This is a great question which calls into discussion the nature of groups at all.
This is a huge question actually and one of considerable current research.
My motivation is that I like to look at things from their roots and go up.
Thanks for your help after much searching I could not find anything.
To evaluate a rational explanation, I think it's important to distinguish correct from rational.
First of all: this is an excellent question, and deserves a better response than I can give it.
sufficient is an upper bound, necessary is a lower bound.
If limited life span was the result of generational evolution, unlimited lifespan would have been tried and rejected.
It's a tautology, but the mapping between logic and the English-language description is wrong.
You can prove it indirectly as follows (if steps (5) and (8) are acceptable to you, of course).
This is more on the lines of commentary on your question, rather than an answer.
The Turing test enables the examiners to see if the judges are unable to distinguish the people from the robots.
Accessibility is determined by the axioms of the modal logic you're working within.
I don't think it's either an appeal to logos or pathos, but rather an appeal to ethos.
(philosophy)The system of thought holding that all phenomena can be explained in terms of natural causes and laws.
Let me question your question briefly, then reassure you, then try to answer it.
Interesting theoretical answers aside, there is no such thing as "rights" or "entitlements" -- not really.
This is not a mathematical argument, so no mathematical response is necessary.
The proof is not valid and it isn't even true.
Although I believe Searle is mistaken, I don't think you have found the problem.
I minored in philosophy in college and trying to get back into it after 8 years.
The experiments done by those other than Mengele on prisoners by the Germans saved more lives than they cost.
Yes, appeal to lack of evidence to the contrary has a name -> proof of burden.
I have long pondered this question specifically in reference to mathematics.
We're paradox free because of the differing registers of both rational & irrational thinking we're capable of.
This does not appear to be a kōan at all, but merely a story.
"Burden" is an artificial construct: a notion of a social responsibility.
Should arrival at this point be the focus for examination of any system?
The question heading is understandable but I found the question body confusing.
I take the Google quote to be a jab at Russia in terms of homosexuality.
I think the problem lies with the term "some concept".
Godel's theorem I would like to pause here to first precisely state and prove the Godel theorem properly.
The least that can be said is that we must be born with the ability and 'knowledge' to learn.
We do not yet know whether the brain is "understandable" in the sense that we accept now.
Yes, there does exist such a philosophical idea that radically changed the world in the twentieth century.
The question you're asking is the main reason Kant wrote the Critique of Pure Reason.
Point #1 - I only know a little about the Judeo-Christian-Islamic traditions that assume a moment of divine revelation.
A good argument I have seen against the existence of a God is based on Occam's Razor.
In today's mathematics, we have many variants of logic (propositional, first order, higher order, fuzzy logic, etc.).
The answer is yes, no and maybe - the answer being dependent on whether one takes an empirical or philosophical perspective.
If you like reading you must check out Copleston's A History of Philosophy.
I'd argue that matter and energy are substances in the category of empirical scientific knowledge.
Wittgenstein is alluding to how Russell himself solved the Paradox - the theory of ramified types.
No, I don't think it is wise to see emotions and intelligence as algorithms.
As others have already mentioned, numbers are of course abstractions.
wikipedia, as much as it is a supposedly self correcting medium, is not necessarily a definitive account of anything.
In "ideal" conditions, for example (warm temperature, moist environment, bacterial presence, etc), mold will grow on bread.
Do we expect musicians to have contributed to the state of the art of quantity surveying in the last 20 years?
It depends on how you describe a mathematical object, and what you call "a single" mathematical object.
I don't think the burden of proof is on positive or negative versions.
Predestination: Religious arguments over predestination are useful here, along with more recent points about quantum mechanics and chaos theory.
Cicero's Hortensius, though effectively lost to us, appears to have been an answer to this very question.
If everyone can create "meaning" based on personal preference not some philosophical idea it will amount to contradiction.
From a survival prospective, it is clearly not necessary to be happy to survive.
There is "Philosophy in the Twentieth Century" by Alfred Ayer which is quite good.
The answer is for at least this domain of problem is that prices are quantised and not continuous.
I don't think we can say anything about this case.
Two components of just war theory come in to play when considering restrictions on liberty.
Our interactions are merely depends on where we put our perception.
Suppose I flip a coin and don't look at it.
One way to think of mathematics is "the study of patterns"1.
A syntactic proposition can be evaluated to be correct or not semantically via truth tables.
The closest thing to the "study of naming objects" today, it seems, would be semiotics or semiology.
It is the same idea as what Aristotle called the unmoved mover.
The question seems to presuppose contemporary sources are the best way in to philosophy.
You've actually (perhaps unintentionally) asked a controversial question in the philosophy of logic.
Anything we do based on our thinking and our emotions.
You overlook that human color experience is an overlay of the input of three color receptors.
We use zero to represent a piece of information: that is, that there is zero of some collection.
Philosophy is one of many human endeavours to find a meaning in life, and universe, and so on.
The principle of sufficient reason states that nothing is without reason, but why are there any contingent truths?
Wikipedia does a good job of summarizing the four stages of enlightenment, which are stream-enterer, once-returner, non-returner, and arahant.
Yes, there is at least one philosophical idea that addresses the uniqueness of Existence, infinity coming out from one (see e.g.
There is not a single "philosophical angle" on this topic.
Is it an acceptable idea that each individual carries their own model of reality in their mind?
Modal logic is an extension of classic propositional and predicate logic that allows the use of modal operators.
My whole use of the word "dream" -- probably yours too!
I've begun seeing Ockham's razor as being a statement about cognition and learning, and not about the construction of reality.
The way you stated your question, I'm not entirely clear what you are asking.
There is no reason that Human can't create machines as powerful as themselves.
I'd suggest that post-cold war Communism and Marxism no longer poses a threat, the Big Other is now Political Islam and/or terrorism.
For simultaneous events in different spatial locations see other replies.
This line of reasoning does contain the naturalistic fallacy: Monkeys are wild animals, and they live in the jungle.
One fixed static universal language would probably run into issues illustrated by Berry paradox and similar paradoxes.
The Gödel–Cohen result establishes the independence of CH from ZF (with or without AC), not from any set theory whatsoever.
So in the Sanskrit language the time is synonym of death.
Principle of Non-Contradiction: "A proposition p and its negation ~p cannot be true together.
Rational explanations follow from a specific set of axioms plus rules to go from step to step.
Fear is not quite a lack of control, but more a lack of knowledge.
An alternative tripod that may serve your needs is the TrekPod.
I am pretty new to the astrophotography scene but I have learned fairly quickly.
In answer to another question of mine, Matt Grum left a couple links that describe focus shift.
Fast Picture Viewer is $9.99 and works just fine on 64-bit Windows 7 (I'm using it myself).
There are waterproof compacts that go to 10 meters, such as some of the Olympus Tough models.
The wider your aperture, the smaller your focal depth will be.
One of the easiest choices is to buy brand name batteries.
It refers to the maximum f-stop (which is defined as the ratio of focal length to effective aperture diameter).
I have a horrific naming scheme that renames based on EXIF taken date and the MD5 hash of the photo.
I found that when I switched to a DSLR from a point-and-shoot digital, the quality of my photos improved dramatically.
Adobe in their wisdom decided to force you to upgrade Photoshop if you splash out on a new camera model.
I am very happy with the Phottix Plato it is a wireless solution that is cost effective.
I'm not quite sure what you're asking, but I'll try and cover all the bases.
Depth of field formulas are indeed complex and nonlinear, but they still afford useful rules of thumb.
The old way of solving this problem, I mean before digital post-processing, was to apply foundation cosmetics on the model face.
From what I've read and seen, I don't think there is any real significant difference between 1.5 and 1.6.
If the photo is blurred due to camera shake, you really don't have many options.
I may be wrong, but I don't think that what you are looking for is feasible.
Lenses are generally the most expensive part of photography equipment and likely to be kept longer than bodies.
There's no "right" way to do this, it's what works best for you.
In my experience, when the final production will be in sRGB, use that color profile from start to finish.
The only construction-agnostic term would be long lens to compliment the other lens classes: wideangle and normal.
If your interest is primarily the optics, you need to look at individual lenses, not brands as a whole.
+1 for the Black Rapid series - I have one of those myself.
There are a very wide variety of solutions for resizing and sharpening images for use on the web.
The greatest zoom range of any camera is the Canon Powershot SX30 IS.
Apart from aperture and focal length, depth of field also decreases with camera-subject distance.
You can't remove the reflections, but you can change what gets reflected.
It will really depend on how mature your kid is.
The areas which are out of focus are blurred in a shape matching that of the lens opening.
I can't speak directly to aquariums, however I've done shots at zoo's before.
Emprical Study: Extreme digital upscaling For all of the theory above, thats all it currently is...theory.
If the histogram shows everything bunched up at one end, then have either a very dark or very light image.
I have my camera on P by default and switch to aperture priority when I care about depth of field.
In Linux I use Bibble, which is has some warts but which is the only serious option AFAICT.
Well, to use Wikipedia as well, it would appear that the options are telephoto and long focus lenses.
I'll second dpreview, they have very comprehensive reviews and as mentioned, the side-by-side comparisons are excellent.
Some cards are too slow to accept an HD stream, so you need one that is fast enough.
Apart from aperture and focal length, depth of field also decreases with camera-subject distance.
There is something particularly conceptually wrong with throwing away the stuff that comes out of your camera.
Its not linear, its a square, so if you double the distance, you need 4 times the light.
The 10-22mm lens is the perfect complimentary to the 18-55mm when it comes to nature and small room photography.
There is UFRaw, which is based on dcraw and can be integrated with GIMP.
It's a 1:1 lens, so that means that the size of the subject will be the same size on the sensor.
In general it is difficult to satisfy those 3 important properties at the same time: light weight, sturdiness, and cheap.
The most obvious, and most distinct, difference will be cost.
Canon's official method is to use a gps unit with their Wireless File Transfer accessories.
The short answer is no it's not possible to create an HDR image from a single raw file.
How about using an Apple iPad with the Camera Connection Kit accessory.
Unfortunately, there is nothing you can do that is practical.
I have the 18-55, 50/1.8 and 50/1.4 as well as the 20D - superseded by a 50D.
Or just go with the ultra-cheap YongNuo RF-602, which give you a lot of bang for the buck.
You can use fill light and reduced contrast to lift the shadows.
Speaking from my own experience, I would rather carry different ND filters that combine two polarisers.
A lot of the recommended sizes for different image types (2:3, 4:5) are based on the availability/cost of printing in those sizes.
There is some discussion on Flickr here APS: Advanced Photo System.
I like the way a burning vignette produces a more realistic result as opposed to a simple "fade to black".
It's very hard to buy a bad point-and-shoot at the moment.
The wider your aperture, the smaller your focal depth will be.
Stabilization is primarily intended to help when your shutter speed is less than the reciprocal of your focal length.
I got my young daughter a cheap Olympus Stylus Tough 6000.
Another advantage is that the manufacturer's raw files are better supported by post-processing software.
A Nikon EM, sort of a point-and-shoot beginner's SLR, that I got in high school (way back when ... mid 80s?).
Chase Jarvis is an excellent resource for pro behind-the-scenes stuff, lots of excellent material available as a podcast.
I believe that the 70-200 accepts a few specific 1.4x TCs quite well.
Lossless / nondestructive edits are reversible and would entail transforming and/or appending the data in a way that could be reversed.
Another suggestion: wait until you have money to throw at the problem.
Why not stop using JPEG images and use RAW exclusively?
Often a faster lens will be sharper even at the same aperture as a cheaper lens.
Polarizers and neutral density filters will go a long way to help this, but they are not a panacea.
For the exposure, you can try an analog light-meter, like the Gossen Lunasix.
It has to do with the sensor size - large sensors require correspondingly larger lenses.
Completely agree with Reid... in this situation a fast prime is the way to go.
That all depends on the viewing distance, and, to a lesser degree the brand, age and speed of the film.
"Background compression" is part of how we perceive perspective in a photograph.
I'm trying to write down a more photographer oriented answer.
Manual mode can give you more consistent metering when you're taking several photos in a scene.
I format my card every time I stick it in my camera and start a shoot.
Only when we consider all these factors do we come up with a 'normal' focal length value of about 50mm.
Regular dish washing fluid is great for removing grease, as it not only dissolves it but also binds it.
Aside from focal length, the most important thing to consider is the maximum aperture of the lens.
They aren't better per se; They just tend to allow greater artistic control over the result.
They're not the cheapest, but the quality is superb, so I'm a fan of WHCC.
I highly recommend building into your gestalt a certain bat sense about when to use bracketing.
Well part of sunset photography IS luck with the elements.
Pisca provides basic photo editing tools (crop and colour and level adjustments) as well as good EXIF tagging.
If I had to pick, Linhof would be my choice.
The best way to learn is to start photographing more — both for the basics and for more advanced photography.
I shoot in raw on auto-wb, and then adjust to taste in the raw processor.
There are quite a few alternatives, depending somewhat on what you're after.
Most important: put your camera down for a while and make a snowman!
Mirror lockup is used to reduce vibrations with longer exposures.
I'd recommend reading an article from Philip Bloom, a professional filmmaker who uses DSLRs on a daily basis.
Well as nobody has posted anything yet I thought I'd cheekily point you in the direction of my own blog.
If you want to learn photography, almost any camera will do to start with.
Hold your camera close to your body... stand with your elbows bent and your arms against your sides.
There is an easy trick: "measure" for yourself: take your camera.
If you own Adobe Photoshop, you should get "The Photoshop Book for Digital Photographers", also by Kelby.
In addition to @Pearsonartphoto's answer, you can use flash (either the built-in or better yet, an extarnal) to freeze the motion.
Pogue on the Canon s95: http://pogue.blogs.nytimes.com/2010/10/28/a-love-letter-to-a-camera/ I think he likes it.
There's no such thing as misuse of the veto right in the Security Council.
DOMA as a congressional statute could not violate the Full Faith and Credit Clause of the Constitution.
The legal reasons why public employees can unionize have been elsewhere described.
The largest barrier to online voting is ensuring that fraud does not occur.
There are three main factors that drive the low shadow economy in the US.
Analysing the number of representatives in various countries, that number is in no direct proportion to the countries' population.
Healthcare They would probably reject your implied claim that Obama's healthcare law will save lives.
Even the largest corporations (e.g., Walmart) are subject to competition, which is a key component of the libertarian philosophy.
As they contribute to the federal budget they do also receive help from it.
The function of the german president is almost just representative.
Congress tends to pass bills with language explicitly giving the president discretion over certain matters.
First, I think you do mean the Republican Party and not conservatism.
While the 'first-past-the-post system favours two parties, it certainly doesn't guarantee the marginalization of third parties.
People use Great Britain, at least in my encounters, to talk about England proper (i.e.
No, there are some that have none, but they are pretty rare.
Public sector employees can currently unionize because President John F. Kennedy signed Executive Order 10988.
The checks and balances of the UK parliamentary system are very different from the US, but they do exist.
They are called "terrorists" because they engage in what is commongly understood to be acts of terrorism.
They are called "terrorists" because they engage in what is commongly understood to be acts of terrorism.
Side note first: I don't think that physicists always agree on their theories and predictions.
This is a VICE news clip of a Ukrainian military AN-26 transport shot down a few days before MH-17.
"Teabagger" is yet another shining example of "civil discourse" by left wingers in America.
The problem with the lobbying is that people choose their representatives to represent the interests of the voters.
The crisis is one of the biggest fact that have increased the nationalisms in the politic field.
The democratic election of Communist Salvador Allende in Chile in 1970 represented an "experiment" in democratic Communism.
This answer is based on the response in the comment clarifying the question.
I am sure this is more phylosophical and ethical question than it seems.
The 14th Amendment extends equal protection to all citizens, natural born or naturalized, so that no state can abridge their rights.
To start, the main drivers of economic growth are resources, technology, and institutions.
In an Anarchy, quarreling parties would be unrestricted to come to a lawful agreement.
In addition to all the OTHER answers, another reason is the sheer difficulty.
The original conception of the US presidency was very different than it is today.
What money are the using to pay down the debt?
There are 2 problems with the viewpoint you presented in the question, which explain the seeming contradiction.
It's a mixed / hybrid goverment, integrating elements from almost every one of the basic forms of government.
In the originally-envisioned system, Presidential electors are appointed by the states; the states decide how those electors are chosen.
There is always "transitional authority" by virtue of the writing of regulations.
Congress does not have to currently justify the laws it passes.
The democratic election of Communist Salvador Allende in Chile in 1970 represented an "experiment" in democratic Communism.
The term Far East usually refers to East Asia, including Mongolia, China, Korea, Japan, and Southeast Asia.
Christians and muslims in Lebanon both are separated internally in their political point of view toward Syria.
During the French revolution the most radical politics were sitting on left site, the most conservative on the right.
Wikipedia has a good breakdown of the different flavors of this argument in this article.
Biology In the modern Western world, males have a lower life expectancy for two important biological reasons.
Congress tends to pass bills with language explicitly giving the president discretion over certain matters.
You are correct that the Israeli-Arab conflict has not resulted in nearly so much death as ongoing conflicts in Africa.
Many times we judge the plausibility of a theory based on it's outcomes.
There have been several studies, most of which have found no movement in class mobility over the past several decades.
"To put it succinctly, Hamas is using its own citizens in the Gaza strip as shields.
First of all, as usual in politics, you got definition confusions galore.
This touches on a foundational question of political philosophy and international relations: peace & trade versus war & plunder.
As he's a member of the Republican party, that'd make him a Republican.
I think the best way address your question(s) is by using a legal analysis.
The U.S. Congress didn't actually start out bicameral; the original Articles of Confederation (the pre-Constitution) had a single house.
An important factor is the posture of German versus Japanese leaders.
I would like to share a link to League of Nations as an example.
The last round of presidential elections in Russia was held on March 4th, 2012 and December 4th, 2011 for the Duma.
I often like to point to the workers councils of Hungary in October–December 1956 as a "pre-figurative" form of life without a state.
Let us first ask what are the implications of tactical voting?
Minimum wage laws hurt the least skilled, least productive the most.
As with the definition of Palestine, the definition of Israel varies depending on whom you ask.
The justification is likely personal and wide ranging across the political spectrum.
Basic Income is often held up as the method to deal with widespread unemployment as a result of mass automation.
At least in the case of H1-B visas, the annual quota is typically exhausted within a week.
I wish to provide an answer with a concrete example of why funding pure mathematics is a fruitful endeavor.
All translations mistakes are mine, so don't judge the sources based on possibly poor use of English.
Can the Fed choose not to claim securities that they are holding, that are due?
It's essentially a remnant from a time when the U.S. political system worked differently.
It's not possible to be politically neutral, though one should always strive to be objective.
Total Expense 8000 After limit company has 100 workers making 10/hour for 6 hours producing 700 units.
Ultimately, the answer is that the Archivist of the United States gets to decide what "ratified" means.
There were absolutely no articles, blogs, or studies that I could find that suggested causation at all.
Legal drinking age of 21 is quite extreme of USA, compared with legal age for having sex as little as 15 AFAIK.
The two party system is reflective of our system of voting.
(I'll try and post a less overtly biased and editorialized answer.
One of the provisions that the US made under the Articles of Confederation was the Land Ordinance of 1785.
As much as I'm for honesty, such a system would probably be untenable.
Simply put, this is exactly the question that Elaine Photography is going to decide.
Liberal: using existing laws and government to do good for everyone.
Many times we judge the plausibility of a theory based on it's outcomes.
I see only benefits of such a system without any major drawbacks in the long run.
A good example of what you are looking for is from the City & County of San Francisco.
Police aren't omnipresent, and you can't just instantly summon them upon demand.
They do not veto laws because nobody will ever adopt a law which is contrary to the expressed queen's will.
In countries like India, when you have 2/3 of the seats of all parliament, you have absolute majority.
The first statement is largely true, and the second one is largely false.
I'm not quite sure what the question here is, but I'll give it a shot.
The standard terms of left and right politics originate from the seating arrangement of the French National Assembly of 1789.
Minimum wage laws hurt the least skilled, least productive the most.
I think this question illustrates that a simple division of politics in left and right is an oversimplification.
The democracy is based on the principle of the freedom of expressing one's thoughts, both individually and in groups.
How do states without Voter ID laws ensure that people are who they say they are?
What your friend told you likely stems from comments made by our current Attorney Genrral, Eric Holder.
It's not possible to be politically neutral, though one should always strive to be objective.
This is still a representational form of gov't, but with a unique twist.
These terms seem to be used interchangably - by whom and where?
Trying to look at 'all of humanity' or 'what's best for Germany' aren't useful questions.
The rights / protected classes you are talking about are equal protection issues, which fall under the 14th Amendment.
Basically Electoral institutes are responsible for conducting the polls as per the present rule and regulations.
The problem is that there's no free dinner and someone pays for those benefits (see http://www.expatica.com/de/finance_business/tax/-Tax-saving-possibilities-for-employees-in-Germany_17099.html for example).
As Eugene suggests, try to figure out what you want to achieve.
It means nothing in the inbox is on your mind.
I'd suggest using Gmail's integrated task manager (Google Tasks) rather than labels.
Try to look at existing time management systems rather than starting from scratch and trying to reinvent the wheel.
To train yourself to use keyboard shortcuts, unplug your mouse for a few days.
I've been happy with the iRobot Roomba for floor cleaning.
Mostly it's about getting over your fear of answering incorrectly.
I have been reading on this topic since I have asked this question.
I purchased a timer at Bed Bath & Beyond that has three separate timers and an overall timer/clock.
Under GTD, you need to think whether that's actually an action or a (mini-)project.
Buy a knee chair or one of these large balls to sit on.
Stephen Covey, although also considered a management guru, is definitely one of the most well-known and sold personal productivity authors.
With any activity that you would like to make routine, there are three things you need to know.
I get started by telling myself that I do not intend to finish whatever I'm sitting down to work on.
I have not noticed my other family members having the same degree of sensitivity.
I have a Nook Color and I think it is GREAT!!!!!!
I think it's better to forget you're an introvert or the word introvert.
One general key to not feeling dejected is to avoid comparing yourself to others.
Someday/Maybe items are things that you can't or don't need to do right now.
Just your inbox and one other folder for holding emails until they are to be acted upon.
Note that there are many medical reasons that could be the cause of excessive sleeping and extreme fatigue.
The issue is that it never becomes useful in its true meaning.
Your mention of the weather changes brings two thoughts to mind.
I agree with others that tracking your time is fundamental to the solution.
Try Wunderlist - it's got all of the features you're asking.
As mentioned by other responders, it turns out that using a standing desk isn't necessarily a perfect solution.
You should break you comfort zone, if you wanna try something new.
I don't know if I should say this, but if your job is making you anxious.
Actually, David Allen defines a tasks as to long/complex when your can't motivate yourself for that task.
This has to do with having discipline to do something everyday.
A nice article on flow in the workplace: http://www.fastcompany.com/53713/art-work It's not easy, though.
If you're reading books on programming, of course you'll get bored!
You want the closest thing to Bento, running on Windows (or Linux) ... FileMaker Pro?
Google keep is only Android and web, as far as I know.
One of the great ways when working on large tasks is to break it in manageable bits.
This may be kind of out of point but I felt you might need this advice.
Massive ulterior motive alert but this sounds perfect for Beeminder.
The Pomodoro Technique consists basically in working continuously in blocks of time, which are usually predetermined in 25 minutes.
I use one called Weave, and I found it very helpful.
I'm writing here a few tips that can help you with motivation.
I recently found an app called Memonote that is definitely worth looking at.
Don't pressurize yourself to stop the emotions immediately, be easy with them.
It takes me a while to get somethings that others get quickly.
3 years that is quite some time, but throw away everything that reminds you of her.
The language you are using appears to me to be limiting your choices.
There is actually functionality in most browsers already in place to do just this.
I may have found some weak evidence that they are negatively correlated.
I'd recommend looking into "The First 20 Hours" by Josh Kaufman.
I'm asking for some resources (books, websites, etc) or personal advice that would help me overcome this situation.
You are incorrect when you say these aren't "important" when in reality it is important since it annoys you.
A quick research (1, 2) showed me that the concentration of caffeine seems to peak about 30-60mins after ingestion.
From my experience the noise-cancelling headphones will not work for longer periods.
I'm assuming you finish your share of work before starting any entertaining activity.
Definitely plan a month ahead - it's totally OK for your plans to change - just amend them as they do.
Just do a lot of programming and you'll pick it up over time.
I would suggest using Zotero, I created a Zotero folder "to-read" to pile up the pending papers.
This will be your cue to start the difficult part.
Sometimes you do just need to switch off and do something else.
Assistant Professor Matt Might recommends using separate devices for those activities that do not directly contribute to work.
Instead of trying to force specific answers or method's on them.
Another alternative is to take notes on what you are reading.
I also like GTD, but the name can be a bit misleading.
Name: Santa Claus Job position: CEO of a secret NGO belived to be somewhere near North Pole.
Give yourself a time limit during which it is forbidden to do anything else.
I have to agree with pretty much all the above, but it mostly comes down to what your limits are.
Buy a 3 panel screen and use it to separate the work area from the sleeping area.
I'm considering spending the $48 per month on the GTD (Getting things done) system advertised by David Allen.
The action that your employer is asking you to take is completely within the normal duties in your sector.
What works for me is to switch the subjects and take frequent breaks.
Research does indicate that sleeping after studying is a pretty good rule-of-thumb.
My GTD system is effectively 100 percent electronic--as described in detail here.
As a software developer myself, I am doing this right now.
I suggest looking into the book "The Now Habit" by Neil Fiore.
You might enjoy the book Pragmatic Thinking and Learning: Refactoring Your Wetware by Andy Hunt.
13 Tips To Face Your Fear and Enjoy the Ride seems interesting.
I use two methods, depending on whether the thing I'm being tickled about is part of a project or stand-alone.
I used a Kensington Pro Mouse ($120 at the time) for about 8 years until it croaked a few months ago.
I am adding another answer as I stumbled today across a quite contrasting opinion.
I think your issue is calling out for some type of breathing exercise or meditation.
You could consider exploring what are the ways things tend to stick for you.
Make her a deal where you throw away the TV but she gets something else in return.
You've got to find what you love - I'm borrowing this opinion by someone who was very successful, Steve Jobs.
This reminds me the Penn&Teller episode on 12 step programs.
http://www.varidesk.com/ There is also the hand-made/DIY version for which you could obtain design templates for.
A long term solution is to increase the interest in the subject you want to flow with.
I think it was Fiore in "The Now Habit" that talked about so-called "positive" effects that end up reinforcing procrastination.
http://www.topcoder.com - This is a good site to understand where we stand as developers.
Wunderlist has local programs and a web only version that also has apps available (iOS and Android).
It sounds like you're running a startup business together, although you don't explicitly state this.
I'm sure others will post fancier responses here, but I really think this one is pretty simple.
The Calibre eBook management application can do exactly this and more.
There's also FreakyAlarm for iOS, which makes you solve simple logic/math problems before the alarm will turn off.
I clean as I go using this flowchart: Is it actionable?
There are lots of specific, measurable and achievable things in life--lots of them aren't worth doing.
I would like to hear perspectives from others on this since I've not yet gotten around to trying it myself.
Why not just pick a regular schedule of where you'll work, and when?
This varies from person to person, or even through different corporate cultures/job enjoyment.
There's an iPhone app called Groups which might be helpful.
I think a learning attitude is the founding skill of a self-taught person.
Work in the smallest of steps that allow you to make progress.
The capital severely punishes people who head out to the restricted areas (e.g.
The most extensive Vulcan language was made by fans in the 60's, especially by linguist Dorothy Jones Heydt.
I've always figured she was the same thing that Head Six and Head Baltar were.
Humans in the Star Trek universe are expansionistic, not self-destructive, and breed easier than similar species.
Voldemort probably thought he was very clever, stumbling upon the Room of Requirement.
Never read the Hollows, but can answer the parts about the Dresden universe.
There was definitely a money system in the Star Trek Universe.
Mark Roger's answer of Chronicles, Legends, and Tales is a good answer.
How close to the Ringworld was the Fleet of Worlds?
The way I understand the history, the concept of a “gripping hand” did originate in The Mote in God's Eye (published in 1974).
It's all part of the consciousness being shared by the dreamers.
I'd say the closest we have to that now would be a using a flywheel.
The blood is used to extend life or heal wounds.
I don't know what level of Canon the old Rogue Squadron games were, but I remember playing the Hoth level.
It has not been revealed in the story yet, so everything is speculation.
The black dog is a portent of death in many English folk tales.
Mathematics is a very logical langage and the Vulcans speak it all the time.
With regards whole ship replication, there are notes in the Next Generation Technical Manual.
He was shot with Avada Kedavra, but he never died.
I thought, too, that she was an Angel in keeping in line with the original series.
I think the concept is that the insects trapped in amber are essentially unchanged as they are completely sealed off.
There's no reason why the first thing that the facehugger does has to be to extend the ovipositor.
In Episode IV, Carrie Fisher pronounces Han Solo's first name as if he were the leader of the Han Dynasty.
There was an official explanation, at the beginning of the year, that there was no Quidditch house cup.
The directional thrusters wouldn't have to be in the rear of the ship but really that point doesn't matter.
It is not hollow, it is round just as our world.
The Adamantium didn't replace his bones, they just covered them.
Time Turners were explicitly mentioned for use in going back in time.
It's obviously possible for it to leave the field without harm - it occurred.
I read a fantastic short story that sounds similar and I've wanted to rediscover it for years.
I always thought that Harry seemed to learn from the Half-Blood Prince better than he did from other sources.
The Patronus Charm, according to the Harry Potter series, is a powerful spell.
Going by the Rule of Two, Vader can only become a Sith master if he strikes down the Emperor himself.
I don't see how you can say it's an allegory based on just those points.
Without delving into an in-depth analysis of Atlantis and Universe, I'll try and be as succinct as possible.
For the same reason every programmer in our world is not rich.
Allen Steele's book Hex describes a Dyson sphere, but made of hexagons, 1000 miles (K?
Melisandre herself admits that she makes mistakes reading the fires, interpreting the images she sees wrongly.
At 80% of the speed of light, the time dilation is only 5:3 - one second on the ship is equal to 1.67 outside.
No, there is no mention of them being designed to cling on to a saucer section.
Quantum Teleportation and Molecular Replication The transporter and replicator technologies appear similar to the outside viewer.
There's also the possibility that lower-priority messages are sent in a way more analagous to e-mail than a phone call.
Count of seven was 7 pieces of soul - this included his own chunk.
The exact timeline hasn't been listed yet, but there are a few assumptions we can make.
In practice binary star systems can have the stars very widely spaced.
Our intrepid heroes also didn't pursue the child who was in the spacesuit.
Portions of this book hit really close to home in our present society.
I am pretty sure it was the 1952 Omnibus of Science Fiction.
Humans in the Grid seem to age at the same rate they do outside the Grid.
It could be Pratchett, he has written stories other than those in Discworld; one of them is Strata.
There were actually several ships of the Constitution class with numbers lower than 1700 and which were built after the Constitution.
I agree with @apoorv020's post, but think it could be expanded upon.
No, I don't think there is any good reason why not.
According to the World War Z novel, the zombie digestive tract doesn't work.
Hayao Miyazaki is known for his fairy tale styled movies.
I once did some research on this and compiled two reading order lists.
While the other answer is quite well thought out, there's another possibility I've been thinking about for years.
I dont know if it's a cannon answer, but A Chemical depilatory like Nair would do the job.
I don't recall very clearly, but I think this issue was raised in the first movie.
It's hard to tell exactly how much time has passed from the outbreak to the start of the show.
Snow Crash was published in 1992, but it was written well before that.
In order for Muggles to use weapons, a number of things would have to happen.
In order for Muggles to use weapons, a number of things would have to happen.
Those are a kind of symbiotic protozoa or bacteria, aren't they?
Most of Philip K Dick's works aren't hard Sci-Fi in the least.
The Empire doesn't regard a one-man fighter as a threat, or they'd have a tighter defense!
"Fins" on real spacecraft are usually for one of two purposes: solar panels or thermal radiators.
In real-world combat, most fire is used to suppress the enemy, not kill them.
I have seen all of these other than Confessions d'un Barjo as it is French and really hard to find.
Star Wars (at least the extended universe) has a fairly robust set of profanity.
Whatever you do, start with Eisenhorn (or maybe even Inquisition War) or Gaunts Ghosts, or something else.
The short answer is that evolution couldn't create gills in humans.
The unbalance in the force caused him to become agile and sick.
"If he could manage to stay hidden alone, he could stay hidden with his kids as well" doesn't hold water.
To be a bit graphic, the human stomach only holds so much meat.
Wikipedia's compilation of Time Travel Rules is a good resource to check about this subject.
I'd add The Book of the Long Sun tetralogy by Gene Wolf.
It's a Philip K. Dick short story called The Eyes Have It.
One theory is: Caesar was born with genetic variations with more human like genes resulting in more human-like vocal cords.
For a younger reader---especially but not exclusively a young lady---consider Wee Free Men, the first of the Tiffany Achings novels.
The quality of the science is not really the question here.
Actually, Total Recall was based on book by Philip K. Dick called "We Can Remember It for You Wholesale".
I believe Starship Troopers had FTL, but I am unclear as to how it works.
The matter-antimatter reaction is just the energy source for the work it has to do.
Brandon's latest post about this said it will not be out before Summer 2012, and should definitely be out by November.
The Hindmosts, I recall, were Nike, then Baedeker, then Achilles (based on the XXX of Worlds series).
It was before the season began because Amy saw the woman before the Silence took her.
Fantasy stories need to go into details that real-world-based fiction doesn't: cultures, politics, religions, biology, magic, science, technology, you name it.
It is safe to say that body posture plays a big role in all languages.
Well, it really depends on how long he was there, and the exact speed of the Fleet.
I think the shield technology is a little different than the later ellipsoid ones.
I was under the impression that, on some scenes, it was done properly.
The novel I, Jedi touches on lightsabers, their construction, and their power.
If you look closely either with eyes or sensors you can observe a disruption where the ship is.
I guess you are talking about the first movie, Alien.
I can think of one notable reboot in print fiction.
The science behind superheroes might shed some light on this topic.
Update - this has been bugging me for a while, I finally had to write it out.
There is no good physical hypothetical model of a lightsaber.
In the original New Hope when Luke scans the desert with his binoculars the numbers are Arabic numbers.
Yes, it's possible for a match to get tie after applying the D/L method.
There's no rule that decides which players can be picked for bowling/batting in the Super Over.
Bowling strike rate is defined for a bowler as the average number of balls bowled per wicket taken.
They have not awarded a man of the series award.
Even in the modern era you could find teams playing with a sweeper.
Yes, the receiver needs to wait until the ball touches his playing area, otherwise it counts as being obstructed.
The premier league finishes on the 11th of May and the World Cup kicks off on the 12th of June.
This was at least in place when I was a child and first watching baseball games in the mid 1980's.
You need to sprint rather than run for endurance if you're trying to build muscle mass.
Rickie Lambert converted all of his 32 penalties for Southampton FC.
Yes, it is legal - and as someone already claimed, even required if all other players have taken theirs.
I don't think you can get run out after the umpire signals over.
Yes, it's possible to share the Man of the Match award between two players of the same team.
Mile for mile, running uphill requires a greater amount of physical work to be performed.
Fartlek is not more effective than any proper interval training - just more fun!
This is the rule if the runs scored by two teams in Super Over is equal...
We used to call "The neighborhood play" "The Phatom double".
A right handed off spinner bowls exactly the same ball as a chinaman (i.e.
Wide ball will earn 1 run for batting side and they will win.
Technically the play cannot end with two runners on the same base.
In 1900, the second modern Olympic games, 22 women competed in 5 events: tennis, sailing, croquet, equestrian, and golf.
The answer is no, the Triple Lindy has never been (successfully) performed in real life.
ICC announced the free-hit rules on 2007 October along with some other changes in rules for limited overs cricket.
Sometimes the best team is not reflected in the win/loss ratio.
There have been quite a few studies in football/soccer discussing home field advantage.
have had a breakthrough with this trick and have landed a fair few.
In 1992, FIFA introduced the Back-Pass rule in an attempt to speed up the game and reduce time wasting.
There is NO good reason for the failure to implement video plays in professional soccer.
In the game between Albania and Switzerland in 2011, X. Shaqiri scored the opening goal.
More likely what happened is that the shot had little to no spin on it at all.
Drafting has changed dramatically with the new collective bargaining agreement.
There is an another cricket team named Vidarbha cricket team which is also from the state of Maharashtra.
Having fairly recently taken up the sport myself, I feel your discomfort.
Another disadvantage of the dew factor is that it makes hitting boundaries difficult.
I have found record of one sport that had an instant win move.
It all goes back to the beginning of the game.
Lebron haters need to forget about your biased hatred for a minute here.
As most probably you're doing this for fun, then choose the marathons that you like.
As an umpire for cricket you are responsible for the calling of many intricate rules of the game.
I'd say you need to distract yourself from the bigger picture.
My answer to this question (from years of observing the effects of playing both sports) is both yes and no.
There is another problem with applying instant replays beyond just interrupting the flow of the game.
Tying up the glove by itself, even with a ball inside doesn't really aid in breaking it in.
I highly doubt it is referring to a score of a game for one reason.
This YouTube video does an excellent job covering all aspects of overhand throws.
It is fairly simple to understand, somewhat harder to referee.
I have run 8 marathons and the first 4 I did using traditional programs that involved 5 or 6 days a week of running.
Learn a golf swing that is based on sound science and mechanics.
There are several anecdotal issues we've observed thus far, most notably the 4th timeout given to the Seattle Seahawks.
Goal.com had a table on how much refs get paid in the top leagues in Europe from around 2011.
When I used to swim there was also a place judge and ties were decided by him.
Tackles, and in particular left tackles, tend to be the elite positions on the offensive line.
A good bet is that this is probably caused by being nervous, and you might be hyperventilating.
The majority of the time it is a better plan to draw the penalty then immediately get the 5 on three.
It is certainly 4-4-2 as almost all teams in England were using that formation back then.
Ten of the teams in the ICC Twenty20 Cricket World Cup are "seeded" teams.
For right-arm bowlers, off spinners spin from off to leg and leg spinners spin from leg to off.
Fencing is really very safe as long as you go to a real club and follow directions.
I would suspect the primary benefit is time saved in transition.
There are an awful lot of contributing reasons that the wishbone is not used more often.
This is done to show that they are a "Dead Eye" shooter from 3 point range.
From personal experience I found that a pace setter to be incredibly helpful.
There have been quite a few studies in football/soccer discussing home field advantage.
If a player is sent off by an direct red card, he misses the next tow or more matches.
http://www.rungap.com/ supports a whole bunch of apps including Runkeeper, Garmin and Nike+.
Have you tried using a professionally made orthotic (not the one you buy in the store)?
As Tom Au stated, from a backer's perspective, the ”strong side” can simply be considered the side with the most receivers.
Artificial turf is now a permanent feature in the hockey world.
Don't stress about being the best or worst player on the course.
To add to Hennish's list, don't bunt when you have a large lead.
Differing suits might provide a benefit, but I think that would be offset by your overall skill level.
Doosra and teesra, both these bowling techniques were invented to deceive the batsman.
This basic play was very confusing in our game yesterday: Bases loaded one out.
Both of these styles of bowling are performed by bowlers who are medium pace or fast bowlers.
That is also the recommended strategy for marathons, if you are going for time.
I am too a hobby swimmer but as part of my triathlon training.
its way easier in the gym to go bare foot.
The pitcher has the final decision, since he is the one throwing the pitch.
As I understand it; the costs of technology isn't the big issue.
According the official LAWS OF BADMINTON, set by the Badminton World Federation, chapter 14 is affected: LETS.
It depends what you mean by "losing control" and by "ideal sailing boat".
As per the rules, MoM award is decide by the commentry pannel.
D/L or any other method is necessarily an approximation, so there will always be some strange edge cases.
The Laws of Cricket say that you can declare any innings, no matter what the agreed length is.
Well for one, you have the advantage of not being over run in midfield.
Although headgear is allowed to be worn, it is not advised for anyone other than the goalkeeper.
From what I recall the most penalties in one international game I saw was 5 penalties on the 4th of July, 1999.
The official rules (as you cite in your question) prohibit screening.
A general rule of thumb is every 5-6 hours of skating.
One additional reason would be to avoid a second yellow card turning to red and then a ban.
The shape of both is mostly to do with aerodynamics.
This might seem a stupid question, but are you breathing out when your head is underwater?
I would definitely go for a slightly slower first half.
I'm not familiar enough with Cricket to offer a specific, concrete solution.
In that particular situation, the Patriots were allowing the Giants to score because of 2 important reasons.
There is no appeal, and a pitch is made to Abel.
“PRACTICING THE CORRECT ONES MAKES PERFECT.” My 100 shots in a row last July 27, 2014.
2014 introduced a new rule that fundamentally changes much of the strategy behind a Formula 1 race.
This was too long for a comment, so I am posting it as a CW-answer.
A hattrick is just a fancy informal term to describe 3 wickets taken in 3 consecutive deliveries by a bowler.
There are literally hundreds of ski resorts in North America.
Generally you're supposed to apply at the US consulate at your place of residence.
Any of the major car rental companies will allow a "One-way" rentals.
There are a few airlines which operate flights at lower fares.
This varies very much depending on your country of origin and your destination.
Wild camping is not allowed in Germany; you have to go to a campsite.
Certainly there are cargo ships with berths available in the Caribbean: http://www.cargoshipvoyages.com/ViewAllVoyages/?regiontoshow=2 As an example.
I am not sure if you can open a bank account in France if you are not a resident.
I think you're referring to APIS - Advance Passenger Information System.
I actually asked this question a few months ago to a representative of a Cuban consulate.
Some airport only use buses for specific types of flights, often involving smaller planes.
This page list all the big Christmas markets in Switzerland.
You can see this in the Wikipedia list or on any map with the International Date Line.
If you want the American point of view of each country then the State Department is the place to go.
I recommend you to go with a local guide instead of an international one.
I spent the month of August in a little town in northern Portugal on the coast - Praia de Mira.
The gift that to me would be most expressive of Sweden is the delahast, the little horse figurine.
Some great answers here, but sometimes the best deterrent is a little bit of clever social engineering.
When using a regular taxi make sure it's with a reputable company or you agree upon the rate upfront.
Well since you ruled out my favourite winter city in Europe (Paris) I will have to recommend another.
I think it's relatively easy to find en English-speaker in France or in Spain.
The reason you see resemblance is because its an "old" airport.
I landed in terminal 3 and flew out of terminal 1 last year.
For Travelling to Nepal, This will provides you in detail about Money exchanging.
If you didn't study Russian for some time, you shouldn't read the Cyrillic.
I'm actually about to do the same thing when transferring at London Heathrow.
You may want to consider some kind of online note-taking software, like Evernote.
The nearest Cambodian town is Stung Treng, and the border is a 90-minute speedboat or bus ride away.
Usually it's a refuelling stop, and you just sit on the plane.
Whether or not you get a Japanese number, calling Japanese numbers from skype was totally fine, and super-cheap.
Second AC (2AC class), I won't recommend above and below this class.
My friends used a similar system to Mark's while travelling around Africa.
In India, a lot of plug sockets look like this they seem to accept plug types from most countries.
If you are planning on visiting/climbing Masada, it is in a convenient location close to the Dead Sea.
Well firstly, some find the whole 'toilet' discussion mildly gross, rude or offensive - even if some don't think so.
Coin lockers are a feature of most stations in Japan.
This has been reduced to an art form by Paul TerHorst and his wife Vicki.
It's pretty ridiculous that I've seen airlines ask for these to be turned off at times.
I have had ear difficulties since I was a baby, and was inflicted with many earaches as a youngster.
As shown at Great Circle Mapper, Toronto to Sydney is 44% longer via London and Singapore versus via Vancouver.
Quite some time ago I have been on a couple of such trips.
Expedia and lastminute flight searches will show you flights with stops.
Cusco: High: 70F Low: 40F This is just before the rainy season (Dec-Mar) and crowds are general less.
Travellers from many countries don't face this experience due to visa-free / visa-on-arrival arrangements.
Credit Cards are a fairly safe method, when they are accepted.
I found it hard enough finding an ATM in Vancouver that would even ACCEPT my card (or my friend's).
Cabo de Gata in Almeria is a good place to get in touch with nature.
You can also book your train tickets in the Netherlands (nshispeed), Belgium (b-rail) and France (SNCF) online.
I just came back from a visit to Armenia and Nagorno Karabagh.
This page collects lots of information about the total solar eclipse of 2012.
There are plenty of ATMs and Exchanges all around the city, especially in city center.
This map shows the tropical rain forest in the whole world.
If your license is in a language other than English then you should get an IDP BEFORE entering the US.
On Trip Advisor I think the highest rated in is Twizel, largest location in NZ and is Gondor.
I've obtained several distinct work visas in Germany, all were post arrival visas.
In Europe you still need a separate SIM for every country (unfortunately).
In at least western Canada the thing to do is tree planting.
Look at this: http://www.capewrathtrail.co.uk/ You could do it in stages.
2 years ago, I got a Vodafone SIM card with a prepaid 1GB / 1 month plan and a SIM-locked 3G USB stick for 100 AUD.
Millions of smartphones and 10's (if not 100's) of thousands of Kindles/E-book readers go through airport scanners every day.
As someone who has always travelled with a lot of prescription medication, I always declare it.
adrenalin.com.au has some offers for Australia, and you have the choice between a L-39 fighter jet and a A37B ex-military jet.
I solved this problem recently by using miles to get an award ticket.
My friends, boyfriend and I are talking about going to Yellowknife, Canada.
There are 3 main alternatives that are as close to Stockholm as Romme.
Are there any current major Finnish cities where the architecture is medieval, or at least "pre modern" (before the late 1600s)?
Always ask before taking a photo - unless they won't know if you take it.
The car rental cost only for the compact was quoted as $789.
You can find a list of possible pay as you go plans here : http://paygsimwithdata.wikia.com/wiki/Spain .
Depending on the airline, quite often members of Priority Clubs can invite a guest into the lounge with them.
I have been to LA several times and have used different kinds of transportation: car, public transport, bicycle and walking.
I've just been to a meetup group on Saturday with Sapporo.rb.
Food Make sure to buy some food before you go.
UNESCO World Heritage Center provides a list with a map.
Naturally it depends how strict a budget you're on as a backpacker, or flashpacker or however you define yourself.
There's a fairly new YHA/HI on Granville which is one of the main drags right downtown.
I work in other country and annually travel to my home country.
In general, don't be paranoid as it spoils the fun!
Roflcopter already covered a lot, I can add: Giverny which has Claude Monet's house and gardens.
According to the CDC, they recommend MMR, DPT, polio, Hep A/B, Typhoid and Japanese encephalitis Also Malaria meds are recommended.
The answers above are not only generic, but inaccurate for Thailand.
If you like science I'd recommend the Technorama (Swiss Science Center).
I climbed Kilimanjaro a couple of weeks ago, and booked it with Gap Adventures.
Wasn't aware of any discrimination what so ever when I traveled in Japan.
I think you're limited to renting a car or traveling on Greyhound.
As others have said if you want to get to Split the best public transport offering is by bus.
For safety reasons, to protect your bag from scratches and liquid that could come out of other bags.
One site that lets you explore places through photography is http://fotons.com/.
It should go without saying that buying in the open market is a bad idea, but don't forget Craigslist.
In France, there are no such road signs, but there are ways to organize hitchhiking.
Ozbus offer a 29 week tour of South America, starting and finishing in Quito.
Actually, Hostelbookers has a page dedicated just to the Top 15 Quirky and Unusual Hotels Across the Globe.
The most simple answer to this is "because they can"!
I live in a tropical country with a lot of mosquitoes in some beaches I regularly visit.
I don't think Åre or Funäsfjällen are really so far away as to be impossible.
Just an addition to Mark Mayo's answer, Roomorama is also a website that similar to AirBnb.
When you're making rules like this, simplicity and objectivity are vital.
Would getting a nominative card enable me to recharge it through the website without a Dutch banking card?
I know someone who tried to do this with a one-way ticket from Europe to the USA.
I traveled around Maharashtra (including Mumbai) and Andhra Pradesh and I had no problem getting by with just English.
I think it's going to depend on what the reasons are.
The minimal change needed to avoid disconcerting alliteration is to just call it a "simple example service".
I've tried many of the things mentioned above, but they never really worked for me.
I believe this is perfectly acceptable and does a good job of emphasising your point.
Generally, the acceptability of fan fiction depends on the original story.
With a story in first person, you are intending the reader to become much more attached to the main character.
Distinguish between losing interest in the project and merely losing interest in its current state.
Yes, it feels like natural English to me (native English speaker).
To answer your question, yes, I think blogging your fiction will hurt your attempts to be traditionally published later.
While you are checking out courses and deciding, start a swipe file.
What has worked for me in the past is to simply concentrate on telling the story.
Like others have said, if writing is truly something you want to do, you can find time to do it.
I try to write primarily at the computer, for the sake of revision control.
The first step is to hold back your urge to write.
I think of things happening in sections of books, not at (which implies a location) sections of books.
Goodreads.com does that -- even better, you can get attention from as many individuals as you give out copies.
One thing that should be used as a seasoning in Odyssey tales is the idea of the false destination.
Whenever I start reading the same lines over and over again, I start skimming.
There are myriad questions on this site that already address this issue, and the consensus is always the same.
"Purple prose" is overwrought metaphors, melodramatic and clichéd phrasing, and cartoonish actions.
I guess it depends on how the blank page is overwhelming you.
I own a 64 GB Transformer Prime and I love it!
I don't believe not knowing a character's name would be confusing unless you make it so.
"the world is quite rich with events"-->Are these events related to one another?
As FoxCutter has said elsewhere, for many of us Moleskine is hard to beat.
There's a number of movies that feature criminals that are either the protagonist or a likeable character in some way.
One of the difficulties you face is that of passing off.
I have done quite a bit of technical writing for healthcare information systems.
I noticed you said "movie critics" enjoy mythological references in a film, but do audiences?
Using third person offers the benefit, that the profile can be used by other persons referring to you.
I highly recommend reading related articles / forums in one of the many Role-Playing Games Communities.
guillemets, as suggested by Lauren Ipsum, is a good option.
I'll admit outright that it's late and so I won't read all of the rigorous Q&A presented here.
When I express my thoughts online (and I have to make parenthetical statements) I love parentheses.
Depending on your entire scenario, you have, I think, three options.
I tend to find technical books through recommendations on Hacker News.
In the last several months since this question was posted, e-books have surpassed hardback books in total sales volume.
You could go for a small Mac laptop and try finding one with AppleCare.
There's plenty of things you can do to make a character important to the plot.
I haven't read your story so I have no idea if it's boring or not.
For longer pieces, especially those with figures, tables, contents, or internal references, or citations.
Reading up on the effects of various Pyschoactive drugs might help.
I have no problem with omniscient narrator viewpoint but the second example looks a little bit jerky.
Actually, this is the only situation where run-on sentences should be used (and work better than short sentences).
A villain you want to take down is, at his/her core, someone who does not care about the suffering of others.
I would suggest asking someone else to read it and see if there any parts you have not made clear.
My experience has been lack of context and mystery most quickly grab my attention.
Markdown is almost certainly the way to go for simple formatting.
As mentioned above, I ended up developing my own tools and markup language to suit my needs.
Sequence a only in writing (sometimes you have to go back and revise) option the not writer has is.
Are some people naturally gifted in writing, which means everyone else is doomed to mediocrity?
I know many people who started out writing fanfiction and then turned this into the basis of a professional career.
Robusto has already discussed the way that the parentheses perform specific jobs.
First Get some close friends, preferably a variety of types of people, to read it and give you feedback.
I agree with Lauren's answer: You need highs and lows in any story.
I think this is one of those areas where the 'show don't tell' rule really shines.
I post a copyright notice on things I publish/blog on the Internet.
I really like the idea of a small notebook, and I'd recommend that.
The intention of the reviewer seems to be to avoid words that may reflect personal opinion.
The recent Pulitzer winner A Visit from the Goon Squad is another example of a book like that.
The most reductionist view of a plot is: Equilibrium > Disturbance > Equilibrium.
If you want to use a subsidy publisher, I would just use common sense.
The iPad is pretty good, but I would suggest getting a USB keyboard as well.
I think the best way to remind someone is "I think my e-mail missed your attention".
First, limit the number of people you solicit for feedback.
Take a look at the work of Robert J. Sawyer and Terry Goodkind.
I've been using Scrivener, which is available as a free beta for NaNoWriMo participants.
At first, I thought this is a bit of a tricky question.
First thing you want to do is find a neutral beta reader.
My experience has been lack of context and mystery most quickly grab my attention.
I noticed you said "movie critics" enjoy mythological references in a film, but do audiences?
You've got the seeds of your answer in your edit.
You can self-publish your book as an e-book using Amazon's Kindle Direct Publishing, and it doesn't cost a penny.
The best way to write any novel (or story)is to write it as if it is a standalone.
It's pretty readable as is (aside from a few grammatical errors in the dialogues that may be intentional) - not boring.
The standard initial market for a short story is a literary magazine.
http://www.rhymezone.com/ You just type in a word, then select one of the following.
In short, this is a disagreement based on technological generations.
Eudora Welty's One Wrtier's Beginnings weaves together in an absolutely lovely way the story of her journey as a writer.
Austerlitz by W. G. Sebald consists of a handful of paragraphs, each of 50 or so pages.
I used to work on a project where we wrote a graphical UI to subversion for a group of artists.
If I'm writing something in a plaintext format, like LaTeX or HTML, I'll generally use version control.
David Weber's The War God's Own has some lengthy travel scenes in it which he does quite well.
Describe first whatever will pull the reader into the scene.
I think Stephen King's comments are helpful in this regard.
Not enough points to add to Lauren Ipsum's answer, but I really do like Scrivener.
While an answer has already been selected, I wanted to add some further points.
When I'm writing well, I don't think deliberately about MRUs.
Just because a setting is made up doesn't mean it's fantasy.
Edit: Wikipedia knows how to explain it better than I do.
It depends on what your blog is trying to achieve.
I agree with Kate Sherwood, you should be able to attribute most quotes these days by simple fact checking.
Here's a technique that can help: Identify each instance of he saw or he heard or he thought.
Am I allowed to beat the drum for Scrivener again?
1) Does the story have to be from the POV of the necromancer?
You can try a Business Writing textbook, looking through the most promising sections.
I would suggest some of the pickup artist material that has been written over the past five years.
Call me boring, but, at least for now, I only disobey the chronological order for historical-based interludes.
Rather than "deployed": helped to launch I've no idea what an "enterprise application" is, so perhaps that could be rephrased.
Christopher Vogler's summary of Joseph Campbell's Monomyth, "A Practical Guide to The Hero With a Thousand Faces".
a dog shews on a big stick.
Two boys splashing in the surf.
A snowboarder is throwing up snow as he rides his board.
Two dogs play with purple football.
a boat floats in the water.
A group of young women stand together.
A group of men are playing ball together.
The three children are standing on and by a fence.
a black dog walking out of the water with a white ball in his mouth.
Two brown dogs play in the water.
A boat in the water.
A young girl wearing a hat and blue jeans is on a swing.
brown and white dog with a baseball in its mouth.
A group of people walking on the side of a railroad track.
Brown and white dog running through a grassy field.
A brown and white dog swims in a backyard swimming pool.
Two grey dogs running in green grass.
A multicolour dog in a red collar crouching on the grass.
A dog running through water with a ball in its mouth
The dog runs through the snow.
A dog lying on its back in the sand.
Two dogs running through the grass.
Two dogs playing in the snow.
A dog running through the woods.
Black and white dog leaping for Frisbee.
Two dogs are playing in the grass.
Two dogs running through a grassy field.
The boy hops from one picnic table to the other in the park.
A man wearing a red football uniform and gray gloves looks to the left.
Three people sit at an outdoor table in front of a building painted like the Union Jack.
a group of people standing on a small balcony of a large building
White fluffy dog kissing sheep through a fence.
A little girl holds onto a pole on a city street.
Man sitting by himself on a pier with a bottle of water.
The crouching man is holding a large camera.
Two dogs run through the snow.
A man riding a unicycle down a paved road
A man and woman dressedin old fashion clothing sit outside at a table.
A dog wearing a cape is running through the snow.
A brown and white dog running fast in a fenced yard.
A dog jumps through a hoop.
A young girl is in mid-air doing gymnastics.
A black dog jumps in the air to catch a toy.
A baby girl and little boy are standing next to a guitar and a drum.
A boy with a blue Mohawk plays the violin.
A person is diving into clear blue water.
The two people have their heads covered with scarves.
Four dogs play in the snow with the city skyline behind them.
A dog is jumping over a red and white bar.
A woman in a coat reclines next to a payphone.
A woman addressing a diverse group of people standing in the street.
A little boy in a helmet is doing tricks on a skateboard.
Two dogs are playing on the grass.
People walking down a sidewalk on a beach.
A wet dog runs through the yellow grass holding a tennis ball.
A woman with glowing shoes at an outdoor event.
Men standing in front of a statue of a lion.
A large brown dog and small black dog walk on the snow.
A black and white dog is jumping in the snow at a park.
Three dogs run in the snow.
Three dogs running through a field.
A man and two boys jump on a trampoline.
A man sits in a public place eating an apple.
A boy with a broken arm is sleeping.
A born dog carries some fruit in his mouth while two other dogs follow him.
Two kids and a dog play in the snow.
A boy does a trick on a skateboard.
Four boys are sitting in a muddy stream.
two young girls holding each other on the grassy ground
Two white dogs walk through a huge bank of mountain snow.
Four women in bikinis are playing volleyball on the beach.
A bird flies above the water.
Two dogs run in a field of tall grass.
A pale dog is running along a dirt path.
Three dogs playing in the snow.
The big brown and black dog is on top of a small white dog.
A little boy jumping off of a dock into a lake.
Three dogs are playing in the water.
A little girl in a purple shirt and helmet is riding on a scooter.
A brown dog running.
A young boy wearing glasses has his hair set to stand up.
A group of people paddle their blue inflatable raft down the rapids.
A person skis down a snowy hill.
A man in a maroon bathing suit swings on a rope on a lake.
A man jumps off a rock into the water
A young girl swinging off a tire swing
A gray dog runs along the green grass.
A boy swings on a jungle gym.
Two girls dressed like waitresses dance along with a man dressed as a chef.
A man riding on a three-wheeled wheelchair.
A white dog is running on sand.
The young girl blows a huge bubble.
Two men pose on a rocky area in front of a snowy mountain.
A group of people ride in a race
A man takes a picture of his friend with performers.
A man and a woman pose for the camera with pursed lips.
A brown dog in a Superman shirt is laying on a blue blanket.
a brown and white dog is running on the grass.
A man in a beret rides a bicycle down the street.
A dog is pulling a red sled across the snow.
A black dog flies through the air while holding an object in its mouth.
A brown and white dog runs across the grass.
A baby trying to catch water from a fountain in his mouth
two spotted dogs are running through a field
Two girls are sitting on an ATV on the sand in front of a bridge.
Black dog chasing an orange Frisbee.
A girl in a dress holds a tennis racket.
A baby is taking a bath in a bowl full of water.
A dog sits with its paws on a laptop computer.
A girl in glasses is looking over two American flags near a wooded area.
a brown and white dog jumping over a red and yellow pole
A young boy is leaping from one chair to another.
Two little orange and white dogs are in the snow.
A black dog and a brown and white dog running and playing.
The child is on a wooden rocking horse.
The white dog is running through a white posts on an obstacle course.
A dog jumps of a surfboard
Two dogs playing on carpet.
Two dogs running through a grassy field.
Two dogs playing by the shore.
A man with a cast films some video while another man smiles.
A female toddler in pigtails is trying to climb out of a green and white playpen.
A big white dog and a small black dog sit in the snow.
A man in warm clothes swinging on monkey bars at night.
A man is using a large pole to remove letters from a sign.
Two Asian men and a woman are relaxing in massage chairs.
A black and white dog is jumping over a hurdle.
An older, balding man falling asleep on a chair in front of bookshelves.
Several hikers rest with their gear in front of a mountain.
A little girl plays in a pit of colorful balls.
a blond girl doing a handstand on a beach
A gold dog jumping off a wooden porch.
A man and a woman dressed as a prisoner and sexy police officer.
A woman dressed in green is roller skating outside at an event.
Two blond girls are playing together.
A gentleman smiling and showing his reflective sunglasses.
Five people on a sidewalk.
A boy splashes into a pool, ejected from a water slide.
The hiker is following a trail uphill.
Two people wearing hoodies huddle on a doorstep in the rain.
A woman, a little boy, and a tiny baby are standing in front of a cow statue.
A child in orange is on a boogie board in the waves.
A white bear walks along snow-covered ground and casts a shadow on the snow.
Football players are on the field.
A group of people are laying in the grass under an umbrella.
Two brown dogs are running on the sand.
Two dogs are playing in the snow.
Two dogs are running in the field.
A hiker with a backpack is walking near a waterfall.
Young boy on bicycle jumping off a ramp.
A man is giving a presentation in front of a lot of people.
A woman picking up a large rock.
A brown and white dog is running across the grass.
People in animal costumes entertain a crowd.
A dog runs through a field.
a white dog runs across the water.
Two dogs playing in the snow near a chair.
A woman is riding a blue bicycle in a park.
A man wearing a shirt that says "Gigolo" is standing at a front desk area with his back to the camera.
A white dog on a beach is carrying a stick in its mouth.
Two brindle dogs running in the grass.
A dog running with a stick in it's mouth.
A group of people hike through a snowy wooded area.
A dog playing in the snow.
A dig is trekking through snow.
A man who is resting his head on his hand.
The boy is jumping into a lake.
A young boy looks at a display of rubber ducks.
A man and a skateboard on top of a barrel.
The surfer is in the wave.
Two boys play with two dogs at the shore.
A brown dog chases a blond one in the grass.
A group of people are looking and taking photos of something off camera.
A woman plays with a brown dog.
A large dog walks along a gravel path in the woods.
Two people playing on a snowy hill.
A dog is running through a creek with a stick in its mouth.
A man wades in the water and watches a water fall.
A dog is running along the beach beside the ocean.
A surfer is riding a wave.
A man and woman sit on a park bench.
A dog is playing in the deep snow.
A little girl in pajamas takes a picture with a camera
A dog jumps over a chain.
A red dog jumps an catches a tennis ball in its mouth.
A little boy in blue shorts, glasses, and a coat stands in the surf.
The man is up in the air.
A black and white dog is jumping in the grass.
a woman wearing black stands in front of a pickup truck.
A dog jumping into a swimming pool.
Two dogs playing with a blue and green ball.
A child goes skiing.
Two dogs are running together outside.
A young boy jumping from one chair to another in his house
A person riding a dirt bike.
Two dogs playing in the snow.
A man going over a jump on his bike with a river in the background
A black and white dog frolics in the snow.
A brown dog and two black dogs in an overgrown grassy field.
A tan dog watching a brown dog swimming in a pond.
A light brown dog jumping over a hurdle that has fire on each end.
A girl sits on a bench holding an inflatable tiger next to another girl in a colorful outfit.
Three dogs, one white and two brown, are running together on a field of grass.
Dog swimming in the water with a stick in its mouth.
a long snowboarder jumping over a barricade outside in the snow.
A black poodle frolics in the snow.
Men with hats on stand outside of a white tent.
A black dog jumps to catch a ball in his mouth near a rock wall.
Two girls holding sacks are standing in a field.
a dog runs through the woods.
Two young boys and one young man run on a beach with water behind them.
Two dogs are running in the water while a man watches from the dock.
The four kids are riding a raft on the water.
A group of girls stands wearing jean skirts and superman shirts.
A large white bird flying over water.
A bald man is taking shots of a body of water from a camera.
Two dogs standing in the snow.
A man and two boys are bouncing on a trampoline.
A girl slides down a purple slide.
A boy wearing a blue life jacket is holding onto the side of a green boat.
A brown and black dog jumps for a red ball.
A brown dog walks through snow.
The white dog runs through the ocean.
A woman in a black apron is standing in front of a mirror.
The black and white dog has a stick in his paws.
A deer jumping over a fence.
A black dog carries a white toy in his mouth and walks on the snowy field.
A man is posing dressed in a Batman costume.
A little girl swimming in a pool.
A dog walks through the snow.
A group of people are standing around a red fire truck.
A man in a bicycle helmet is talking on a cell phone with other people behind him.
The young boy is jumping into the pool on his belly.
A little blonde girl is sitting on a green chair.
Three children playing on the floor.
A man sits on a rock next to a folding deck chair and a fishing pole.
A close-up of a man shooting a handgun into the woods.
A man carries a sign while standing in the rain.
Two dogs play in a sandy field.
a man wearing an orange U. Miami tee shirt playing tennis
A man wearing a blue hat and shirt is riding a white horse.
A brown and white dog exiting a yellow and blue ramp in a grassy area.
The man in a blue jacket is standing in a crowd.
The little girl jumps up into the air with the sand beneath her.
A black dog is running through some water.
A man is sledding on an orange slide.
A brown dog is running in a field.
A child swinging on a playground play set.
A man practices boxing
A young woman in a bikini looking at something in a glass case.
A girl wearing a helmet rides a scooter.
A young boy is completing a jump on a skateboard.
A dog runs through the snow.
The girl in the ski jacket is walking near the buildings.
A brown dog carrying a Frisbee runs through the snow.
Two people are on a golf course playing golf.
A dog playing in the waves with a ball.
A tan dog is running through the grass with a yellow toy in its mouth.
A woman in a knit cap and green coat its on a stone block, looking out.
The toddler is ready to climb the red piece of equipment.
Two dogs are playing in the grass.
Two black, wet dogs running on grass.
A group of people are standing on the beach in front of some boats.
A dog leaps over a fence.
A young boy in a blue soccer uniform chasing a ball.
A young boy runs towards a blue soccer ball in front of a goal.
A girl wearing pink flip flops and tights is swinging a tennis racket at a tennis ball.
A baseball player hitting the ball
Black dog chasing brown dog through snow
Two BMX bikers jumping dirt ramps in front of a body of water.
A dog with fangs revealed is about to bite a ball with paw prints on it.
A man is sky surfing on the water.
Two blond women are sitting by a fountain.
A boy standing in the foreground looking out over other people in a court.
Silver and blue car marked 104 raises dust on road as two background people watch.
The skinny brown dog is running through the tall green grass.
a bald man in grey is holding out a stick whilst a black and brown dog jumps up to catch it.
A small boy wearing a blue shirt stacks wooden blocks.
A boy running through green grass.
A young boy and a young girl walking towards each other
Two people sitting on a dock.
A white dog runs on the grass.
A lean dog runs through a wooded area.
Two dogs in a stream.
Four people wait outside in a line for ticket.
A black dog with a red collar runs through grass.
A man follows his black and white dog as it takes on an obstacle course.
A man and a dog are playing tug of war.
St. Bernard dog running in the snowy field.
A black dog, running on grass.
a dog runs across the path.
A small white dog running
A wet dog is splashing through shallow water.
A dog chases another by a tree.
The big white dog is running in the grass.
a young girl wearing a black and red swimsuit swinging on a swing
Four children keeping warm under a blanket.
Two children with a yellow and blue umbrella play in the bathtub.
A young woman in a helmet attaches a pulley to a cable.
A man in woman dressed warmly pose for a picture.
A black, brown and white dog running through a field.
A man, woman and dog walk down a paved road.
A white and brown dog playing with a black toy.
a wet dog chasing a white ball
Three boys playing soccer.
A young boy with a visor on plays ball with his bat in the street.
A grey dog walks in the green grass, tongue hanging out.
Five men in tuxedos are walking down steps.
Two dogs running in the dirt.
A black dog and a spotted dog are fighting
The brown dog is running on the grass.
A girl is playing on a swing.
A boy plays with a foam noodle toy by a pool.
A bike rider makes a jump on a halfpipe ramp.
A brown dog running through the grass.
A dog jumps into a backyard pool.
Two dogs in a house playing with toys.
A dog and a cat are swimming in a swimming pool.
A skateboarder doing a jump.
A child holds a yellow balloon.
A brown dog in a Superman shirt is laying on a blue blanket.
Two snowboarders are in the air over the snow.
Two white dogs running in the snow.
The black dog is running through the grass.
A black and white dog runs with its mouth open.
A young boy rollerblading in a cement skate park.
A young girl with roller blades and green foliage in the background.
The white dog is running in the shallow water.
A child runs through the grass.
two dogs running on the beach
A dog jumps over a chain.
A hiker discovers a feature in an otherwise barren landscape.
Two blonde girls are sitting next to a statue
Two children jump on a trampoline.
A small yellow dog runs on a beach
A young boy wearing a red coat eats a chocolate bar.
A girl in an orange shirt lights candles.
A dog with a red collar runs in a forest in the middle of winter.
A brown and white dog runs across the grass.
A boy who seems ill is being touched in the face by a toddler.
A red haired girl is jumping towards a swan.
a tan and white dog jumping after a red Frisbee.
A dog shaking water off.
A dog is wading in the water.
A black dog running along the edge of the ocean.
A little boy in denim overalls slides down an orange slide.
Black and white dog in living room standing on hind legs.
The white dog runs through the ocean.
A child going down an inflatable slide.
Three people on skis are standing behind a no skiing sign.
A man in a white suit walks outside carrying a newspaper.
A man sits on the stairs next to his bike.
A small black and white dog is swimming in water.
The man is going into the water.
A bird soars with wings spread.
A white dog is running across a grassy field.
A boy jumps into a pool while lifeguards watch.
A black dog wearing a blue collar is running through the snow.
A dog catching a Frisbee.
A black and white dog is running through grass.
A person sitting on a rock beside a waterfall.
A black and white dog stands on the grass with a baseball in his mouth
A brown and white dog running on grass.
The yellow dog is running on the dirt road.
The girl is on a swing.
A woman at a stove jumps back from the high flames of a pan.
A man and a woman are walking across a rope bridge.
Many children are playing and swimming in the water.
A topless woman with her face painted is covered in mud.
A dog laying in the snow.
A pack of sled dogs pulling a sled through a town.
A brown dog waits for the Frisbee to come down before catching it.
A skateboarder in the air at a big, outdoor ramp.
Four children sit on tall bar stools at a yellow and grey bar.
A boy and a dog running on grass
Two black dogs are playing on the grass.
A dog running on the grass.
A dog leaps over a log in the woods.
A black dog runs fast into shallow water.
Two white dogs are running together.
Two boys are playing flag football.
A black dog is running quickly along the ground.
A man in a black outfit is taking a photograph of a man in a red jacket.
An adult male wearing a backpack walks and looks to the left.
A black man is walking next to a building in a big city.
A dog with something pink in it's mouth is looking forward.
Two dogs are shaking water off.
A black and white dog jumps in the snow.
A small dog jumping over an obstacle.
A dog shakes off after getting out of the water.
A girl dances like a man in costume
a tan dog swimming in some water
A brown dog runs through the grass.
A group of people stand and wait to see something.
Young man in a black shirt smokes on a sofa in a colorful room
A dog jumping over an obstacle course fence.
Three ice skaters round a corner.
A brown dog walks on the rocks near a river.
Two young boys, one white and one black, are standing with their arms around each other.
Two women walk there dogs at a dog show.
A young boy falls off his bike.
A man is lying the grass with long hair and beard.
the brown and white dog is carrying a stick in his mouth.
A brown dog runs through the grass.
A boy in a headband plays drums.
Two dogs holding a single black Frisbee in their mouths
Two dogs are running quickly through a park.
A black dog with a red collar wading through the water.
A black and white dog swimming in clear water.
Two children are riding horses over sand near a white fence.
A small child in a yellow shirt is holding their arms out to the sides.
Two dogs running on grass.
Two people wearing winter clothes stand near a pole in a winter scene.
A girl wearing a black top is smiling with a silver truck in the background.
Two dogs are in a grassy area.
A child is playing with two white and black geese.
Two men in fleeces and hats looking at the camera.
A man in a red shirt is watching a football game.
A brown dog jumps over a wire fence.
Two ladies jogging on a path near the waterfront.
A black dog running through water.
A white dog with tan ears is running through the snow
Two dolphins jumping into the water.
A guy is going up for a lay-up on a basketball court.
The child is looking at his reflection in glass.
There is a skyscraper in the distance with a man walking in front of the camera.
Two women climb on top of rocks in front of the ocean.
A brown dog running through grass.
Two dogs bound across the grass.
A dog runs through shallow water.
A woman and three kids play at a park.
A dog runs toward the camera with a stick in its mouth.
One dog makes a playful bite on another dog.
Three dark dogs swimming and one of them has a ball.
The boy is playing in the sand.
A man and a woman are posing for a photograph in front of a yellow flower-bed.
Five children jump on a large trampoline while the snow outside melts.
A small boy is carrying a soccer ball.
Two people walking along the beach at sunset towarn a group of people.
A dog running in the surf.
A women dangles from a blue fabric connected to a tree.
A white dog running in the snow.
Three children sitting in floor playing with several toys.
A dog comes out of the water with a ball in his mouth.
A fluffy dog carries a black leash in its mouth.
Children play in a pile of snow.
A dog with a ring in its mouth is standing in water.
A man is tying a red arm band around another mans arm in the street.
The black and brown dog is running through the snow.
A woman in a white shirt and black skirt on a tennis court.
A skier is falling face first into the snow.
A brown dog is carrying a stick in its mouth.
Two hockey players in a struggle on the ice.
A girl stands high on an obstacle course platform.
Two puppies play with a red chew toy in a field.
A kid is doing a hand-stand on the beach.
A crowd of people at an outdoor event
Two dogs play in a field.
A man and a woman standing on a city street.
Two dogs are playing on the grass.
Two dogs jumping on each other.
A surfer in a black wet suit surfs on a medium wave.
Two boys playing in water.
A kid is jumping his bike over a fence.
A bird flying in the air
A skateboarder is jumping over an obstacle in front of a white house.
A white dog is running through the water onto the shore.
A man in a black leather jacket falls asleep on public transportation.
A dog jumps high in the snow.
A dog leaps over the hurdle.
Two dogs are wrestling on the ground in the snow.
A boy holds a net with a snake in it close to the ground.
A man and a woman in glasses blow bubbles.
A grey dog and a tan dog playing on a grassy field.
Two black dogs in the snow.
A dog runs through sand.
A black and white dog playing in the sand.
A skateboarder attempts to do a trick over a homemade ramp.
Two women sitting on a bench by the water.
A brown dog chasing a yellow toy.
A small brown dog jumping up to catch a tennis ball.
The black dog leaps off the dock and into the water.
A couple walking down the street.
three black dogs swimming in dirty water
Three dogs play in the shallows next to a rocky shore.
A white dog, a brown dog, and a black dog frolicking in a grassy field.
A snowboarder is jumping over a snowy hill
A black and white dog is running in the grass.
a man in a black shirt is roller blading past a bench in the city.
An elderly woman walking uphill crossing the street.
A girl in a red and white costume standing on the street.
A dog is jumping through the water.
A small dog jumps over a yellow beam.
A little girl is running.
A person in a red shirt is standing, with arms raised, at the top of a mountain.
A man wearing a hoodie and jacket is sitting on a bench in a park.
A group of young ladies in bikinis.
A surfer rides out the green and white waves.
A woman is getting her hair done at a salon.
A collie running through the snow.
A man and a woman resting after exercise.
two girls walking in the street
A young boy jumping into a lake.
a muzzled greyhound dog is running around a track
A man dances on a colorful wall.
A wet child is shivering in a towel in front of a pool.
A brown and white dog is paddling through deep water in a blue container.
The white dog is running along the beach.
Six dogs walking beside the beach.
A man is holding onto handles in the air.
Four kids are jumping on a trampoline.
A black and tan dog walking through the snow.
Two men step off the bus together.
Three dogs are running on the grass.
A black dog fetches a dead bird.
Several large dogs are running through a large grassy area.
A boy in red slides down an inflatable ride.
Two dogs stand in a puddle, and one has a yellow tennis ball.
Three dogs run in the snow.
Two kids playing with a dog.
Two dogs play in the snow
A group of cars parked on a hill
A girl doing a back bend at the beach.
A dog jumps in the air, catching a Frisbee in its mouth.
A man is kayaking in rough waters.
A little girl on a red jungle gym.
Two dogs are playing together in the grass.
A white dog is standing by a river shaking himself dry.
Two surfers perform tricks in the waves.
A bird flying over the water.
Two people walking along the shore at sunset.
A dog runs in the snow.
Two dogs are playing in the grass.
Small girl in an apron placing confetti in a woman's hair.
A dog runs through the grass.
A man with the Monster logo shirt is surfing.
Three boys playing soccer.
Two dogs are wrestling in the grass.
A little girl is sitting on Santa's lap
Two people kneel on the snow and raise their arms with mountains behind them.
Two teenage girls are texting in the park.
A black and white dog swims in blue water.
A black dog running through water.
A boy jumping in the air on the beach.
Woman and dog in rowboat on the water.
A group of six children sit at a wooden table.
A large white dog is bounding through a snowy field.
Five men in tuxedos walk down a set of steps
Two men in hats pose together.
A black dog stands in the surf holding a red rubber ball.
Two girls lean around a tree, laughing.
People stand outside watching something.
Man and dog standing on rocks next to water
Four dogs splashing in the water
A young boy in a blue jacket swings a bat at a ball.
A young woman with a knit cap stands against the wall of a Domino's Pizza.
A girl in a cowboy hat with a sheep on a leash.
A woman who is ski-ing poses for the camera.
Diners sit at tables in a crowded restaurant lit in blue.
A white dog with brown markings chases an orange ball in a grassy field.
Two dogs play on the grass.
A puppy with big ears chewing on a stick.
The girl wearing a blue shirt is running through a science center.
Two dogs playing in the snow.
A snowboarder going over a ramp.
There is a brown dog swimming outside with a tennis ball in its mouth.
There are two white dogs and one brown dog chasing a ball.
A swimmer swimming butterfly in a pool
A black dog is running through the snow.
A bunch of bikes racing on a track.
Three dogs playing in the green water.
Two dogs playing or fighting in the snow.
The dog carrying a long stick in its mouth.
A man and woman sitting on a motorcycle.
A man and woman kissing in front of a crowd of people.
A person sticks their head out of a tent at the top of a mountain.
Two children lying in the snow making snow angels
A young girl standing in front of a fountain
A yellow dog and a black and white dog are running in the dirt.
A man helps tie a red ribbon around another man's right arm during a street parade.
a man in a black hat standing in front of a brick wall and a sign
a man playing a white guitar and singing as well
A brown dog is playing with a ball in the water.
A black and white dog is playing in a pond or creek.
Two dogs either fighting or playing together.
Lots of people play in the water at the beach.
Two young children wearing sunglasses
Two black dogs run into the white waves on a beach.
A closeup of a hummingbird flying.
Two tan dogs play in the snow.
A man in a black jacket is has a white headphone in his ear.
A woman watches a dog jump down the stairs.
Three children playing on the floor.
A dog swimming in a pond
Three dogs playing on grass.
A black dog is playing in the snow.
A girl jumping in the grass.
A man and a woman laughing.
A dog is jumping into the water.
The large brown dog is running outside in the dirt.
A white dog with a collar is running.
The dogs are pulling a man on a type of bike, through the snow.
A young boy riding in a swing.
A man in a batman costume is running a race.
A dog is digging a hole in the dirt
A brown dog is running on grass.
two girls with pink streaked hair and two boys with black hair standing next to a concrete building.
A black dog runs through the water.
An Asian child is blowing bubbles from an orange bubble hoop.
a brown and white dog swimming in water
A man in a gray shirt sitting in a field of flowers.
Two dogs running in the woods.
A man standing in the mountains watching a sunset.
Three young children play in the hay, throwing some at the camera.
A black dog is walking along the side of a pool.
Two dogs playing on grass.
A black dog is running across a field.
A dog running in the grass.
A black dog is running through the snow.
A white dogs treads the water with sticks in its mouth.
Three puppies are lying on a couch beside a baby bottle.
A dog swimming with a stick in it's mouth.
A black and white dog is catching a Frisbee.
The black and brown dog is running through the snow.
The children are running in the snow with fences in the background.
Dog trotting with a rubber duck in its mouth
A dog running on the sand by the beach while his owner looks at the other dogs on the beach.
A man is lifting a little girl above his head.
The black dog wearing a red collar shakes water off.
The wet, brown dog has a stick in his mouth and is running in the sand next to the water.
Three dogs playing in the snow.
A boy standing on a beach.
A man and woman are riding bicycles across a junction in the city.
The skateboarder is jumping over a ramp.
A man and dog on a rocky seashore.
A black-and-white dog running in the water.
A girl with extended arms goes down a slide.
A dancer posing for the camera in a red and white dress.
a woman in a brown coat places a baby on a skateboard that is on a wooden runway on the beach.
A group of people are ice skating in a big city.
The large beige dog is running through the grass.
a boy with a bruised nose and writing on his hands is standing in a video rental store.
a dog runs across the grass.
A child rides a bike high in the air.
Black dog running very fast.
A man is walking on rocks with water flowing around them.
a man doing a trick on skateboard
Three dogs round a bend at a racetrack.
A man standing in front of a brick building.
A black and white dog runs through pole obstacles.
Two children are shown upside down.
The three children are standing on and by a fence.
A dog running fast in the sand.
An older man stands outside a old boarded up building.
A woman in a yellow shirt running on a track.
Two beige dogs play in the grass.
A dog jumping into a swimming pool.
Two dogs are playing in a field of tall grass.
The German shepherd dog is running through the snow.
Two dogs playing in the snow.
Two people are standing next to a waterway canal.
A dog running through a lot of twigs.
Three people in a glass structure.
Two young women are walking along a rural path bordered by trees.
A boy is doing tricks with his bike on the ramp.
Three girls holding umbrellas with their backs to the camera.
A puppy running along a street.
Two dogs play in the grass.
A man in a gray shirt climbs a large rock wall.
A tan dog with a black collar barking in the snow.
A dog running through water with a ball in its mouth
A man wearing suspenders and sunglasses leaps up in the air with his arms and legs spread out to the side.
Two dogs run through the brush.
Three dogs run in the snow.
A dog running through the water.
A man travels with two donkeys in the mountains
The black and white muzzled dog is leaping above the grass.
A man wearing a helmet, floating in the water.
A dog plays in the snow.
People walk along on the street.
A man and woman sitting back to back outside in the sun.
A black man and his dog on the beach.
A smiling boy with hat playing in the snow.
A man is standing on top of rocks overlooking the ocean.
A woman wearing a black and blue striped suit is surfing on a wave.
A brown dog and a black dog are playing with a red Frisbee.
A black dog on a beach carrying a ball in its mouth.
Woman leading her small dog through an obstacle course.
A group of people sit around a blazing fire at night.
A young child holds a spoon to it's mouth while sitting in a chair.
A women with brown hair is wearing a purple shirt and a white purse.
Two dogs running in a field.
A man with a jacket wears headphones standing in front of a directory.
Two boxers are in the ring.
A dog walks on the beach.
A young boy is practicing his karate in a gym.
A small dog leaps in the water.
A dog is walking in a tire track in the snow.
Two dogs play in the snow.
A person stands in a vast field of glacial ice.
A group of people ride in a race
The dog is running with a yellow ball in his mouth.
A brown and black dog walks in the snow with it's tongue hanging out.
A boy with face paint is running on a track.
two dogs running on the beach
A black and white dog running with something in his mouth.
Two dogs running down a path in the woods.
A pet playfully investigates the contents of a gift bag.
A man in a yellow shirt wears a gold, sun-shaped mask.
A little girl walks on a boardwalk with blue domes in the background.
Two small children walking in a field.
A photo of a ride at an amusement park on an overcast day.
A boy jumps into a not-so-crowded public pool.
A young man is doing a ski jump with a purple board.
A little boy stands with his hands on top of his head
Two dogs standing in snow.
A man in an orange jacket raising his hands to the sky in the sand.
a man and a woman posing for a picture
Kids play in the water
A squirrel stands in the grass looking around.
A pale dog runs down a path.
A tan dog runs in the fall leaves.
The baby is wearing a red shirt and walking in a plaza.
A person jumps off the sidewalk on their skateboard.
A child in the snow.
A woman in a white shirt standing in front of a brick wall.
A boy and his bike leaps into the air.
Dog sniffing another dog lying under furniture.
The man helps the boy ride a bike.
The beautiful reddish dog lopes around the flat snowy street with a snowball in its mouth.
A man in a black shirt is holding a child wearing sunglasses.
A man climbs a sheer cliff face.
The man waeribng a helmet is riding a dirt bike over rocks.
The dogs play in the snow.
A black dog with a blue collar is sitting on beige carpet.
A black and white dog is swimming in some water
Two girls with baseball caps are eating a snack outside.
Two dogs running on the beach.
A white and brown dog is playing tug-o-war.
A brown dog and a black dog playing with a yellow soccer ball.
Two black dogs are playing in a grass.
A man is playing baseball.
A dog is about to get a ball that is on orange carpet.
A white dog running over a bridge.
A sports fan is wearing face paint in the stands.
A dog runs in the woods.
A person waving is hanging off a zip line.
A skateboarder jumping in the street.
Roller blades sliding on a railing.
A smiling man holds a small child wearing pink and red.
Lady in a pink Tinkerbell jacket stands next to the railing and looks out at the water.
A dog sniffs a tree stump.
A dog is jumping in the snow.
A group of five men in uniform are posing for the camera.
Two dogs running along dirt path.
a boy in a green shirt is jumping with his arms in the air at the end of a bowling alley.
The dog with the red collar is bearing it's teeth at the dog with the blue collar.
Two brown dogs running through water.
a woman enjoying her reading at a coffee shop
The black and white dog is running on the grass.
Skiiers on a snowy mountain.
Two brown dogs biting each other on sand.
Two small dogs run through the grass.
A brown dog sniffing at the fence of a brown bull.
A boy does skateboard tricks on a railing.
A small boy in waterwings and a bathing suit slides down a water slide.
A woman who is sitting in a field listening to music throws a frisbree for her brown dog.
a young girl wearing purple running through water
A boy is grinding a skateboard down a concrete wall.
Five greyhounds are racing on a sand track.
A black dog is shaking off water.
A dog is jumping in the air to catch an item.
Two brown dogs running through water.
A young woman with a knit cap stands against the wall of a Domino's Pizza.
A boy in a robe sits in a chair.
A dog shakes his head.
Four happy people sitting on a red couch
A black pit bull dog is running through the dirt.
A group of people in dark colored clothing are line dancing on a wooden floor.
A man is sitting on a couch under an expressway ledge.
A little white dog running through the sand.
A man stands in a crowd holding a white object.
A young girl laying on a blue inflatable toy
A black dog running on a beach.
Two dogs drink water in a lake.
Two dogs playing on snow covered ground
A white dog is running through the snow.
A little boy is petting a tiger that is laying down.
Person snowboarding at a ski slope.
Two brown and white dogs running across grass.
A man is climbing a rock wall.
a young child running along the shore at a beach
A woman is playing volley ball.
A small dog jumping over hurdles.
Two birds interacting in the grass
The kid in the orange shirt is sliding down a teal slide.
A busy beach has people scattered on it watching the sky.
A girl playing on a parachute.
A man in a black jacket holds a microphone up to a girl's face.
A blond child is laying on a branch of a tree in a green field.
A man in black on a surfboard riding a wave.
a group of surfers catching a wave
A man is climbing the side of a mountain.
A tan and white dog runs through water.
A little girl in a dress playing with a soccer ball.
Two black and white dogs run across a green field.
A black and white dog is looking at a pink Frisbee on a court.
A white motorcycle is being ridden around a race track.
Three men playing baseball.
Two dogs playing with a stick in the water.
A grey dog with short hair running toward the camera.
A woman plays with her rottweiler dog outside.
Three women in brightly colored dresses.
a black dog digging through the snow.
A brown dog running in field of long green grass.
two tan dogs play in the grass
Two dogs are running through a green yard
A dog is running along a beach with a red object in its mouth.
A man and a woman laughing.
A man standing in the mountains watching a sunset.
A dog runs through the water while holding a stick in its mouth.
Two little boys are playing on a playground.
A black and white dog jumping to catch a ball.
Two dogs nussle one another in the grass near a lake.
A woman with a black bag is smoking a cigarette
A young boy covered in ink stands in front of a white door.
A brown dog is running in the grass.
A woman stands against a wall near a video camera.
A dog digs a hole in a yard.
A black dog running through the snow.
A person hanging from a rocky cliff.
The dog is running on grass.
a dog trots through the grass.
A man is riding an elephant while another person is touching the elephant's head.
A man is walking behind a dog that is standing on it's hind legs.
A man wearing a blue shirt makes a grouchy face.
A man helps another man do a back flip in a yard.
A skateboarder riding up to a slope.
A brown and black down with a blue collar near a soccer ball on a grassy field.
A man kite surfing creates a wave.
A puppy with big ears chewing on a stick.
A dog is running in a field.
Two young girls wearing skirts are playing in a garden.
A woman in jeans plays a video game in front of a large screen.
A man in blue walks down a snowy street next to a brick building.
A trainer runs next to his dog as it jumps through multiple hoops.
A man is surfing a large wave in the ocean.
A man in a white print shirt and a woman in a black dress dancing.
A man dressed in a Santa suit is climbing up a large concrete building.
A girl in a red shirt takes a picture on a phone.
A dog swimming with a stick in it's mouth.
Man sleeping on the street.
A black poodle is playing with the snow.
A white dog with brown spots is running in a yard, chasing a ball.
Three dogs swim in the water.
A white dog runs on the sand.
A kid runs in the opposite direction of others who were playing a game.
A lady wearing a red dress is playing a bag pipe.
A group of people are in the water.
A person is riding a dirt bike in a race on a dirt track.
A large black and white dog runs in the ocean water
A white dog holds a stick in its mouth while it runs through snow.
A man lies on a street with his headand shoulders under a parked car that is jacked up.
Man in red jacket standing in front of lighthouse.
Three dogs playing in the green water.
Three dogs swim in the water.
a group of people white water rafting in a blue raft.
A white curly haired dog runs with a stick in it's mouth.
A man in a white print shirt and a woman in a black dress dancing.
A woman in red with a beer followed by a man in white.
Two brown dogs are biting on a black Frisbee.
A red-haired woman is wearing a black beret adorned with the American flag.
A black woman and two black children are sitting in a thatched tent.
A young woman in a pink hoodie takes a picture.
Two dogs play in the water.
A tan dog is walking through snow.
A woman wearing a blue coat walks and talks on her cellphone.
A man walks two dogs in the city.
a dog with a Frisbee in its mouth, jumps over a man.
A man wearing a backpack looking to the side.
Two dogs running in the dirt
The brown and white dog is playing in the snow.
Two dogs run through the grass.
A soaked dog is playing in the water.
Two people diving into a body of water.
A brown and white dog is leaping over a log in a field while another dog follows behind it.
People are sitting at square tables in a red room.
Two grey dogs are carrying a stick in the water.
A white boat on glassy water with mountains in the background.
A dog shaking water off.
A smiling young woman in a tourquoise shirt and bandanna poses at table outdoors.
A naked little girl being thrown into the air.
A dog runs through the deep snow.
Three children playing in sand at beach
Two dogs play together in the yard.
A man in a blue shirt smoking a cigarette.
A group of people are running a race.
The dogs are running in the snow.
A dog lays down in the long green grass.
A race car driver is driving his car through the mud.
A small dog wearing a green sweater and a backpack walks through snow.
A group of girls on a beach.
a tan dog running through the grass with a toy in his mouth.
Two dogs are running in a grassy field
The man with a white beard and blue cap is standing in the doorway of a workshop.
A black dog and a white dog are standing on snow.
The black and white dog runs through the grass.
a lone dog running in a dirty road
A man kayaks in rough water.
A dog enjoys a romp in the water with mountains and sand in the background.
A man has a chainsaw and is carving a block of ice.
A small boy in blue crawls along a window sill.
A small dog is carrying a stick in his mouth.
A group of people are standing beside a fire truck.
A black and white dog is jumping over a hurdle.
A black and white dog is playing with a tan dog.
Three brown dogs are in the water.
Four children sit on tall bar stools at a yellow and grey bar.
A man on a bike does a very high jump.
The two dogs are running toward the camera.
Brown dog catches a pink ball in the park.
Two men stand juggling colored boxes while other men stand on a balcony.
A brown dog running after a young cow.
Two dogs are running on the grass.
Two brown dogs runs through the water.
A black dog is leaping into a swimming pool.
A boy holds a light saber in front of a Christmas tree.
A brown dog is laying in the snow.
Two dogs running in the dirt
Two dogs are playing tug of war with a green toy.
A guy is sitting on his bike with one wheel in the air.
Three dogs playing in the snow, with a city in the background.
A dog rolls on the ground.
A group of people stand together and pose in front of a house.
A woman wearing a white shirt stands on the street.
A lady fastens someone's ice skates in the snow.
Three dogs playing in the snow.
A man wearing black shorts is standing in front of a snow covered mountain.
A girl is bouncing on her head on a trampoline.
A surfer does a flip on a wave.
A man holds a long leash with a large gray dog attached to it.
people go up the escalator.
A brown dog in a field.
Two children are playing flag football together.
a girl holding a picture of Michael Jackson smiling
A man with jersey 23 is dunking the ball at a basket ball game.
A man is walking by trees in front of the city skyline.
A dog playing in the snow.
a man sits on a rock.
A dog is running through reeds towards the ocean.
A black and white dog jumps after a yellow toy.
A black dog jumping over tire tracks in the snow.
A boy wearing red and blue swim trunks jumping head first into a swimming pool.
Three children standing by a pool are covered in foam bubbles.
the boy is diving into the pool as the couple watch.
Two dogs fighting in the snow.
A bunch of people standing next to a car with it's trunk open.
Small boy lying on his stomach on the grass.
A man walks over a small sign carrying his bicycle.
A white dog is standing on it's hind legs with a ball in it's mouth.
A black dog with a red collar plays in the snow.
A woman is getting her dog to jump in the air.
A boy wearing a yellow shirt and blue pants is climbing on a tree branch in a grassy field.
A dog chases another by a tree.
A bird sits in a leafless tree.
A dog has an orange ball in its mouth.
A hiker climbing a rocky hill with fog surrounding him.
A man and woman sitting on a parked car.
A man is climbing a rocky mountain.
Young boys wading in blue swim caps.
A dog jumps over a hurdle.
Three happy boys wearing blue bathing suits hold hands as they jump into an outdoors swimming pool.
three young woman jumping into the air to catch a ball.
A man doing a trick on a skateboard.
A brown and white dog is running around a pole.
The brown and white dog is playing in the snow.
The boy hops from one picnic table to the other in the park.
A woman wearing a white shirt stands on the street.
A group of people are standing and sitting around on the ground at night.
Two dogs in snow.
A man with sunglasses looking straight ahead.
A Dalmation runs along a beach.
A hiker moves up a snowy mountain.
A black and white dog jumping in a yard.
A man and woman are looking at artwork that is on easels and clipped to a fencing wall.
A black and brown dog is running with a tennis ball in its mouth.
A dog runs in the snow.
The girl is sitting on top of a saddle.
A goalie in a red uniform kicks at the soccer ball to protect the goal.
A dog runs across the grassy field.
A man in a red striped soccer shirt heads a ball.
A dog chases another by a tree.
Two dog play in the snow.
A boy is rock climbing.
A dirty dogs runs through the woods.
A dog runs through an obstacle course.
A blond-haired boy wearing a yellow shirt and blue pants is climbing a large, fallen tree limb outdoors in grassy meadow.
Two young boys playing with ducks near the water.
Two brown dogs chase each other in the snow.
a woman holds a small baby on a skateboard at the beach
A black and white dog jumping into a swimming pool.
A black dog playfully bits another dog in a living room setting
A beagle walks along the calm shore.
A brown dog is walking on the grass beside a fence.
A cyclist on a neon yellow bike is airborne.
A little girl sliding down a slide at a playground.
A boy crawls through a rock tunnel with his brother and father behind him.
A black and white dog is running through grass.
two dogs running in grass
A girl does a handstand on a trampoline.
The boy is doing a stunt, through the air, on his bicycle.
Two grey dogs running through the shallow water of a lake.
The black dog is running on the grass with a toy in it's mouth.
Young boys play touch football.
Three children playing in hay
A policeman stands in a crosswalk in a city.
A young boy holds his head to a baseball bat on the green grass.
Two people riding their bikes on a hill.
The black and tan dog is chasing something he has spotted.
A black dog is holding a black bird in his mouth.
A black dog and a white dog play in the street together.
A man swimming beside a girl on a pink body board.
A young boy wearing a blue visor swings a bat.
A black and white dog with a stick is in muddy water.
A boy with a metal colander on his head.
a brown dog with his tongue wagging as he runs through a field
A person skiing down a very large snow covered mountain.
a dog sprints across the grass.
A boy in blue is blowing bubbles.
Three pole wait for a bus outside a building.
A little boy swimming underwater with a toy in his hand.
Two boys with wearing baseball caps are sticking out green stained tongues.
A person is scuba diving in very clear blue water.
Black and white dog running outside.
A man stands on a cliff overlooking the ocean.
Two dogs running through the water on a beach.
Children smiling and making faces to the camera.
The man is putting on his shirt near an elevator.
A man and a woman kiss.
A child rolls around in a large tire.
A white and brown dog runs in a field.
A dog running on the grass.
Children play in a pool while adults look on.
Football players are stretching together.
A tan dog is standing in front of some plants.
Four ladies in swimsuits play sand volleyball on the beach.
Two children are on a giant inflatable slide.
Two dogs play together on the bed.
Black and white dog holding a baseball in mouth.
A white dog is running through the snow.
A blonde haired child is swinging on a tire swing.
A white and brown dog appears to be walking on the water.
A man who has fallen asleep on public transportation.
Two brownish dogs are fighting.
A dog is running in a large body of water causing it to splash.
A person does tricks on a bike on a ramp surrounded by trees.
A black and brown dog with a red ball overhead plays in the grass.
A man in jeans resting on a striped bench with his feet on a luggage cart
This large black and white dog is running on the sand.
Two men with white gloves box in a dimly lit boxing rink.
A skateboarder in mid-air above an indoor ramp.
The black and white dog is running through the bushes.
The white dog is running in the green grass.
a boy in a blue T shirt is airborne on a skateboard in a skate park.
A woman poses for pictures with a statue of a troll.
A brown and white dog is running down a ramp.
A brown dog digs in the sand.
A brown dog running
A girl jumping rope on a sidewalk with a parking garage to the left.
Brown dog running on the beach.
A person above their surfboard on the water.
A skateboarder on a ramp.
The brown dog jumps for a pink Frisbee.
A girl wearing green twists something in her hands.
The dogs are running through the yard.
Three dogs race in the snow together.
Three people sit at an outdoor cafe.
A man in a blue shirt is standing outside smoking a cigarette.
Two girls jump out of swings.
A man in a jersey stands in front of a large crowd.
A person wearing pink pants and a white jacket is snowboarding.
A white dog running on the beach.
Two dogs run down a dirt path in the forest.
The black and white dog has a ball in its mouth.
A man in red is climbing a waterfall with a red rope.
A brown dog runs through the water as a wave comes.
A woman in a green jacket is waiting to cross the street at a light.
A shirtless man catches a football
A young boy wearing only green shorts poses awkwardly with a brick background.
A girl poses with her head upside down.
Two ladies in skimpy clothes pose next to an old fashioned car.
A dog stands on a beach at sunset.
A woman in a red jacket is video taping a natural landscape.
A man jumps while on a snowboard.
A young boy plays in the water fountain.
Two boys play with large sticks in the yard.
A child in orange is on a boogie board in the waves.
A black dog walks through a rocky, grassy landscape under a blue, cloudy sky.
Four dogs playing in the snow.
two brown and black dogs growling at each other.
A black dog runs very fast in a field in a park.
A child in water.
A yellow car drives quickly in the snow.
The German shepherd dog is running through the snow.
A child squats behind a wagon with two pumpkins in it.
Two little orange and white dogs are in the snow.
A person floats in water near rocks and a waterfall.
Two football players bang into each other during a football game.
People running away from seagulls on the beach.
a dog stands in the white snow.
A dog runs through a grassy field of yellow flowers.
The black dog is running through the grass.
Two dogs playing in grass.
A boy is pushing another boy on the swings.
A boy in the middle of a pitch at a baseball game.
The little girl is playing at the playground.
A black dog digs in the snow.
A medium sized brown and white streaked dog is running through tall grass.
A black and white dog jumps in the snow.
Two dogs play in the water.
A girl in a pink jacket is walking through a large puddle.
A dog leaping over a chain.
A man skiing down a snow covered mountain.
The little girl in the blue dress is walking with a man along a railway track.
A black dog with a red collar walks through the grass with his mouth open and tongue hanging out.
A young woman with a black purse sits on a wooden bench.
a dog pounces on the grass.
The boy in the red shirt is next to a blue wall.
The boy is sliding down a metal slide.
A black dog and a brown-and-white dog play in a field.
Several children playing in a ball pit.
A white and black dog is running out of a yellow and orange tube.
A black and white dog is swimming in a lake.
a person doing the back stroke in a swimming pool
The brown dog is running on the grass.
A woman is wearing a white headband, purple tank top and black gloves.
A brown dog is running though a river.
A man on a motorcycle pops a wheelie in the dirt.
A boy in shorts kicks while standing in shallow water.
A small light tan dog is running past a large brown dog standing in the grass.
A young boy wearing a denim jacket sticks his tongue out.
A lady holding one dog while another dog is playing in the yard.
A brown and white dog running into the water
A little girl is playing on a toy outdoors.
A boy runs in a race while onlookers watch.
A girl in a pink jacket is walking through a large puddle.
Two black dogs walking through the snow.
a tan dog jumping through the water towards the shore.
A black dog is swimming with a ball in it's mouth.
A tan dog licks a girls hand while laying down.
Two homeless young men holding a cardboard sign.
The woman is skating in the park.
A dog splashes in the murky water.
a little girl in a flowered bathingsuit runs through the sand at the beach
The man wearing a blue helmet is riding a Polaris.
A hockey player during a game.
A boy is riding a red sledge down a snowy hill.
A dog gets its legs tangled with a stick.
A black and white dog prepares to catch a Frisbee.
A person standing on a stage in front of a seated crowd
Two brown dogs are playing with each other in the snow.
A black and white dog jumps in the air near a red Frisbee.
A surfer is riding a large wave.
A person on a snowmobile in mid jump.
Two dogs run through a field.
Several children and jumping on a trampoline in the snow.
Two teenage girls are standing on beside the beach listening to ipods.
A big black dog bares its teeth while running through the snow.
A person with swim cap and goggles taking a breath.
A woman in a short skirt and boots.
A boy plays with a foam noodle toy by a pool.
Two brown dogs are running on the sand.
A young blonde boy holding a toy airplane.
Two dogs playing together on the grass.
Two large black dogs run through the snow.
A black poodle is running in the snow.
A blond gear with a pink shirt is blowing on a dandelion.
A young girl is on a ride at an amusement park.
A brown dog digs in the sand.
People riding something in the snow.
Dog swimming through water carrying stick in its mouth
A dog running through snow.
a white dog jumping in the air to catch a red Frisbee.
a boy in a blue shirt and blue jeans runs across a playground
A tan dog leaps into the water.
A woman in a bathing suit walks a dog on the beach.
A black and white spotted dog is jumping over the small stream of water.
A person in a green feathered costume is bending down in front of a woman with painted breasts.
A basketball player is scoring a basket.
Two children are walking along a street wearing yellow backpacks.
A man on a bike in mid-air
Two dogs are running through a grassy area.
A black and white dog returns a stick in the snow.
A black and white dog jumping over an obstacle.
Four young women wearing bikinis are playing beach volley ball
A large group of people have formed a line outside.
A four wheel drive car is driving through the mud.
A group of children do stretches on colored mats.
Two black dogs are playing in a grassy plain.
A group of young people jump up in the air while on the beach.
A black and white dog playing in the sand.
The dogs are running in the snow.
A young boy is twisting a sparkler around in the air.
A girl is jumping into a pile of leaves.
A woman wearing a pink Tinkerbell sweatshirt leans on a railing overlooking water.
Two dogs play in the grass.
Two dogs run and play with a brown stick.
A group of people are standing and sitting around on the ground at night.
Two boys are in midair jumping into an inground pool.
Two dogs playing in the sand at the beach.
A man is playing a guitar for a little girl in a hospital.
A man and two women dressed in costumes.
Two dogs stand in water and bite each other's mouths.
A greyish dog running in the snow.
Boy in tan hat laughs while sitting near playground equipment.
A woman runs beside a concrete wall.
Three football players from red team tackling one player from white team.
A brown dog is running through the field.
Two dogs play in the snow.
Bicyclists waiting at an intersection.
A woman stands with her arms out in a store while another woman holds a camera.
A fluffy, white dog running in the snow.
A man rollerblading on a metal bar.
A group of guys play instruments outside.
Two males, one in red and one in white playing a basketball game.
A snowboarder flies through the air.
a wet black dog with a red collar is in the river
A little girl in a paisley dress runs across a sandy playground.
Three boys playing soccer in a field
A group of men play a college football game.
A boy runs in a race while onlookers watch.
A dog running through the water.
A young man jumps from one balcony to another.
A man sitting up taking a nap on a park bench with an open umbrella protecting him from the sun.
A young boy pulls another boy wearing a silly hat in a radio flyer wagon.
A black dog lays in the grass and looks towards the camera.
A brown dog laying on a green cushion.
three black and white dogs running through a watery field.
a brown dog plays with the hose.
A brown dog is by a fence where a brown cow is.
Two black dogs and one white dog interact.
The skateboarder gets to the top of the ramp.
A girl wading through water in a lake.
A boy running through surf on a beach.
Two dogs playing in a yard.
The bird has its wings spread as it flies.
A dog standing on a beach with a ball nearby.
A girl in a colorful hat has a strange creature resting on her hand.
A woman sings into a microphone with a guitar player in the background.
a small group of goats in the grass with a black and white dog in the backgroud.
A man jumps his bicycle in the air between two rocks.
A spotted dog stands on his hind legs to catch a ball on the beach.
A surfer wearing a black wet suit is riding a a white wave in the ocean.
A young girl in a pink dress with something in her hand.
A girl in a red dress rides her bike in front of a white fence.
A dog pants while standing in the woods.
A boy wearing a red sweater runs along a colorful beach.
Many people have arms lifted in a crowd.
a brown and white dog running crazily through the grass.
A man in a rowboat is rowing across blue water.
A dog jumps down a flight of stairs.
The brown and white dogs run through the field.
Two poodles are running through the snow.
Two mountain climbers stand on the ridge of a tall, snowy mountain.
the skateboarder jumps into the air.
A brown dog runs toward the camera down a rocky trail through the brush with mountains in the background.
A golden retriever is jumping off a wooden porch
A young girl sliding down a black pole.
A girls is jumping in the sand.
Three dogs play with a Frisbee in a snowy field.
The dog leaps over the fence in the park.
Women pointing at a geyser.
A black dog is running through the snow.
A little girl on a kid swing.
Two girls arm wrestle while a third girl in a pink shirt and glasses watches.
A little girl in a pink coat is walking down a dirt road
A dog running through a creek.
A skateboarder uses a ramp.
Two dogs play with each other outdoors.
A small baby wearing sunglasses sits on an adult's lap.
Four dogs playing in the snow.
A black and tan dog sleeps in the car.
A blurred image of a black and white dog running through the grass.
A black dog fighting with a brown dog in the snow.
Two mountain climbers stand on the top of a mountain looking around.
A man in a plaid shirt uses a tool by a tree.
Two brown dogs run through the grass.
Two soccer players rush to kick the ball.
a man running track
A yellow dog catches a red Frisbee.
Two kids are playing in a field of red flowers.
A young man in red swimming trunks jumped off a large rock into the water.
A black dog is running in the grass.
Two girls dressed in black are sitting in a room making suggestive poses at the camera.
The brown and white dog is running though the brush-land.
A large group of people riding brown and white horses.
A dog is running on the beach.
A black dog splashes through greenish water.
Two blonde girls are taking a picture of themselves.
A dog running along a fence on a dirt track.
A child and parent pet a horse.
A dog is running through the ocean.
The man is skiing down a snowy hill.
Cars racing on a dirt track
A young girl wearing a bikini in an inner tube.
A dog runs through a snowy field.
A man walking two dogs down a street.
Two blonde young women hang out in the grass with a brown dog.
Two men walking past a mural of a car.
Person on skis upside down caught between two trees
A black dog running through water.
A brown dog squating on grass.
a dog plays in the snow.
A dog with a red leash still attached chases over the grass toward a tennis ball.
The person is in the snowy mountains.
Young girl in blue dress stepping over a soccer ball.
A woman in red overalls stands on sidewalk.
Three dogs run through a field.
An older man is standing next to a display of wooden trays.
Two puppies play in the grass
An Oklahoma football player attempts to kick the ball.
A dog runs through the grass.
Two children and a black dog are playing out in the snow.
A black dog running through water.
Brown dog jumping over a hurdle.
A woman is walking with a red bag.
A black and white rally car takes the turn.
A child wearing red shoes climbing a tree.
A woman is sitting near a flower bed overlooking a tunnel.
A sports team poses on the field.
four children are playing on a trampoline.
A dog swimming with a stick in its mouth.
A young woman, topless except for paint or mud.
Two dogs playing on the shore.
A dog is being squirted with a hose as it jumps into a paddling pool.
A person climbs a snowy hill while a black dog follows.
A dog running on the beach
A woman resting her face on her hand.
A black and tan dog sleeps in the car.
A white dog is running on sand.
The scuba diver is underwater.
A trick bicyclist grinds down a handrail.
Four dogs playing in the snow.
A man walking his cow down the side of the road.
A brown dog is running on the grass in front of some trees.
A dog is biting a mop.
A big tan dog runs on grass with a big stick in his mouth.
A child in pink holds an object that appears to be on fire.
A child in front of his own reflection turning towards the camera and smiling.
A lean dog playing in tall grass.
A white dog is standing by a river shaking himself dry.
Five greyhounds are racing on a sand track.
A man walks toward a policeman standing in a crosswalk on a city street.
Brown and white dog running through a grassy field.
A girl jumping in a puddle.
A boy and a dog running on grass
The black and brown dog is running through the snow.
Little boy coming at camera down blue slide, smiling woman in background.
A man wearing a red coat with glass looks at another man.
A group of people are riding in the back of a truck.
A person skiing down a snowy hill.
A woman eating a large fish in a restaurant.
A child in red and blue floaties looking down at the water.
A skateboarder riding up to a slope.
A baby girl in a brown snowsuit plays in the snow.
People ride up an escalator.
A woman looking upward with her hand above her head.
Three little children are sitting in the grass.
A white and brown dog appears to be walking on the water.
Trainer runs her dog through training course with green pipe
The brown dog is running across the sand.
People with numbers on their chests are running in a pack.
A dog jumps off the stairs.
Two people stand looking at a light scupture at night.
A young girl standing in front of a fountain
Two dogs are playing in a pool.
Three children are playing soccer in the sand.
A skateboarder doing a jump on train tracks.
Two dogs wrestle in the snow.
a little girl ends up at the bottom of the slide.
A man walking a large black horse.
A brown dog wearing a chain around its neck is shaking it head.
Two people sit on the end of a dock in the middle of still water.
Two young women sitting at an outdoor resaurant looking at menus about to place their order with the waiter standing at their table.
a black and white dog walking through the grass with a long stick in his mouth.
A black and white dog swims in blue water.
A hockey player is laying on the ice in front of the goal.
a black and white dog is running though water whilst bearing it's teeth.
A skier stands on his hands in the snow in front of a movie camera.
The black and white dog is running in the damp sand.
A brown dog is running along a grassy stretch divided by strings.
a man wearing a black and white shirt jumping on a dogs back
A woman in a black and white coat and earmuffs.
Boy and girl running along the beach.
A black and white dog is biting onto a stick in the water.
A girl is by a tree hanging upside-down from a swing.
The man and woman sitting on a bench are kissing.
A grey dog jumps to bite a green leash.
Two Orthodox priests stand on the steps outside a church.
A black and a brown dog running in the grass.
Two dogs bound over a flower-covered hill.
Group of people sitting in lounge chairs on patio looking at mountains.
A wooly dog on a beach looks toward another dog in the water.
Two soccer teams are playing, one is in white the other in red.
Two black dogs are playing tug-of-war with an orange toy.
The brown dog is wearing a black collar.
A woman is riding her bicycle.
Some kids play in a field.
a small dog steps onto a log.
A laughing boy lies on a pit of blue balls.
A brown dog and two black dogs in an overgrown grassy field.
Young boys enjoying a spray of water.
A surfer is riding a wave.
Three dogs running through the snow.
A black dog is running across a field.
Two dogs play in the snow.
Girl and large stuffed animal riding an amuseument ride over a fair.
Two dogs are fighting over a red Frisbee that is bent in half.
Three dogs play in the grass.
Two boys and two dogs are playing in the sand and water at the seashore.
A brown and white dog is jumping over an obstacle
Three well-dressed children are sitting on a bench and smiling.
The skateboarder rides the pipe wall at a skater park.
a group of children playing with a dog
A brown dog is running along a beach.
Three women wearing plenty of green and shamrocks.
A young boy is splashing through a puddle of water.
Dogs in a race.
A dog swims while carrying a stick in its mouth.
A skateboarder slides down a handrail on his feet.
A skier about to go down the mountain.
Two dogs are running towards each other on a beach.
Teen grinding a bench on a skateboard
Black and brown dog runs through field.
Two children walking down a path in the woods.
A man riding a brown horse poses in front of a mountain scene.
A Golden Retreiver jumps over an obstacle.
The tan and black dog is running across the grass.
a dog runs across the land.
A girl dances on a sidewalk.
Two dogs running on grass.
A boy is pushing another boy on the swings.
Two dogs are urinating on the red fire hydrant.
A swan is flying through a body of water.
Two children go sledding.
A person standing on a ridge in the desert.
A dog nips at the leg of a horse.
A man rock climbing.
A group of dogs racing.
A brown dog splashes in the water while carrying a ball in it's mouth.
A black dog running along the sandy shoreline of a body of water while two ducks swim nearby.
Two dogs bound across the grass.
A black dog is running through the grass carrying something red in its mouth.
A boy catcher in a helmet, stretching out his gloved hand for a catch.
A boy, wearing a baseball cap, jumps in the air near some steps.
Three dogs are in the snow.
Two girls are walking by a tree in front of a brick building.
A little girl swimming in a pool.
A young girl is talking on a cell phone.
A brown dog runs through the grass.
four skiers climbing snow drapped mountain.
A brown dog laying on a blue cover.
A black and white dog is playing with a tan dog.
A tan dog standing on the snow looking into the woods.
A dog splashes in the murky water.
A black and white dog carries a white Frisbee over the grass.
A little girl is riding a horse in the woods.
a man driving a blue boat passes by some colorful houses.
A group of people are riding in the back of a truck.
A dog runs through the forest with something in its mouth.
A brown dog lies on its back in the grass, holding a ball in its mouth.
The dog is laying on a bed with a blue sheet.
Woman in a black dress walking on the street.
A dog plays on the beach.
A man in a football uniform is running with a football during a game.
A girl stands in a dimly lit area.
Two dogs face off of each other on the grass.
The man is playing with the shaggy little dog.
The tan dog is carrying a green squeak toy in its mouth.
A white dog with patches of brown and black on his eye is running through green grass.
A man in swim trunks is juggling on the beach
A classroom of students watching a presentation.
A biker is riding along a track element located with a wooded area.
The boy is pushing a girl on a swing outside.
A brown dog runs on the sand, holding a stick.
a crowd of people are gathered in the street waving Irish flags.
A medium sized brown dog is running through an open white wooded area.
The man is doing a trick on his green bike.
The black and white dog swims with a brown object in its mouth.
A little girl running at on the shore of a beach.
The basketball player holds the ball.
A white dog jumps into a pool.
Two dogs are chasing each other in a yard.
A man in a maroon bathing suit swings on a rope on a lake.
A fat woman wearing faint blue top is blowing soap bubble.
A man in mid air on a skateboard.
A girl does the backstroke in the pool.
A deer is jumping over a fence.
a man wearing a white suit holding a newspaper walking through the streets.
A dog jumps through water.
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
There is no gap between terminal 6 and the positive terminal
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
each bulb is in its own path
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
terminal 6 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
A, B and C are in different paths
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
the terminals are not connected
Bulb B is in a separate path
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch Z.
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
There is no gap between terminal 6 and the positive terminal
Bulb C was not in a closed path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
the open switch creates a gap
A and C are in the same closed path
the terminals are separated by a gap
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
The battery is contained in a closed path which does not contain any other components
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
there is an incomplete circuit
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
there is a complete circuit
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
there is an incomplete circuit
the battery is in an open path
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
the battery is in an open path
the terminals are not connected
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
There is no gap between terminal 5 and the positive terminal
the path is not closed
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
A and C are in the same closed path
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
The battery is contained in a closed path which does not contain any other components
If bulb A burns out, bulbs B and C are still in a closed path
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
A and C are in the same closed path
there is an incomplete circuit
bulbs A and B are in a closed path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
A and C are in different paths with the battery
Measuring voltage indicates whether two terminals are separated by a gap.
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
there is no gap between the terminals
there is no gap between the terminals
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
there is an open path
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths with the battery
the battery is contained in a closed path in which there is no bulb
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
terminal 4 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
There is no gap between terminal 6 and the positive terminal
there is a path containing both Z and C
bulbs A and B are in a closed path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
terminal 2 is not separated from the negative battery terminal
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
there is no gap between the terminals
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
there is no closed path containing the battery
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
The switch and the bulb have to be in the same path
The bulb is not in the closed path containing the battery
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
The switch and the bulb have to be in the same path
A and C are in different paths with the battery
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
Bulb C was no longer in a closed path with the battery
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
there is no closed path containing the battery
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
The switch and the bulb have to be in the same path
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths with the battery
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
the battery is in an open path
There is a gap between terminals 1 and 6
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
A and C are not in the same path
there is an incomplete circuit
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a damaged bulb.
no path containing both the switch X and either bulb B or bulb C
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a damaged bulb.
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch X.
A and C are in the same path
terminal 6 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are not connected to the negative battery terminal
there is no gap between the terminals
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
there is a complete circuit
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are connected
each bulb is in its own path
there is an open path
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
A and C are in different paths
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected
a damaged bulb creates a gap
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
There is a path containing A
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is an open path
there is a gap in the circuit
There was no longer a closed path containing Bulb C and the battery
the battery is in an open path
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
A and C are in different paths with the battery
B and C are in the same path with the battery
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
There is no gap between terminal 6 and the positive terminal
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected and in the same electrical state
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
the open switch creates a gap
terminal 6 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
there is no gap between the terminals
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
each bulb is in its own path
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
there is a short circuit
the terminals are not connected
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
A and C are not in the same path with the battery
each bulb is in its own path
There is no gap between terminal 6 and the positive terminal
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
A and C are in the same closed path
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
there is no gap between the terminals
If bulb A burns out, there is no longer a closed path containing B, C and the battery
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
there is no closed path containing the battery
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
there is a gap in the circuit
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
A and B have their own path
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
bulbs A and B are in a closed path
there is an incomplete circuit
A and C are in the same path
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
there is a path containing both Z and C
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
A and C are in the same closed path
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path.
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected
A and C are in different paths
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths with the battery
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
a damaged bulb creates a gap
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are connected
each bulb is in its own path
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
There was no longer a closed path containing Bulb C and the battery
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are not connected to the positive battery terminal
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
the battery is in an open path
there is a gap in a circuit
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected and in the same electrical state
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
there is a path containing A and a different path containing B and C
There is no path containing both switch Y and bulb A
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
there is a complete circuit
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
the open switch creates a gap
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Bulbs A and C are in a closed path
Bulbs A and C are in a closed path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Bulb C is in a separate path
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
the battery is in an open path
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
a damaged bulb creates a gap
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch X.
there is no gap between the terminals
the battery is contained in a path in which there is no bulb
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths with the battery
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are not connected
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
the battery is contained in a path in which there is no bulb
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
the battery is contained in a closed path in which there is no bulb
the path is not closed
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
terminal 4 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
B and C are in the same path with the battery
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
terminal 4 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
the path is not closed
there is no gap between the terminals
A and C are in different paths with the battery
the terminals are not connected
A non-zero voltage means that there is a gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Circuit 4 has no closed paths
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
Bulb C was no longer in a closed path with the battery
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
bulb B creates a gap
A and C are in different paths
bulbs A and B are in a closed path
the path is not closed
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected and in the same electrical state
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
there is a path containing both Z and C
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are not connected
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is no gap between the terminals
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
terminal 6 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
the path is not closed
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminals 1 and 6 are separated by the gap
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
A and C are in the same closed path
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
there is no closed path containing the battery
there is no gap between the terminals
there is no closed path
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
a damaged bulb creates a gap
there is a path containing both Z and C
the open switch creates a gap
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
there is a gap in a circuit
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths with the battery
A and C are in the same closed path
there is an incomplete circuit
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
there is a short circuit
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are not connected
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
terminal 6 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
there is no closed path containing the battery
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are not connected
There is a closed path with A and B that C is not in.
There is no gap between terminal 6 and the positive terminal
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
A and C are in different paths with the battery
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
A and C are in different paths with the battery
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
each bulb is in its own path
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a damaged bulb.
bulb B creates a gap
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are not connected
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
There is no path containing both switch Y and bulb A
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch Z.
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
the open switch creates a gap
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
there is no closed path containing the battery
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is a short circuit
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Bulb C was in no closed path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are separated from the negative battery terminal by a gap
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path.
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
A and C are not in the same path
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
B and C are in the same path with the battery
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
B and C are in the same path with the battery
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
there is no gap between the terminals
each bulb is in its own path
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
The bulb is not in the closed path containing the battery
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
Bulb B is in a separate path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
there is a gap in a circuit
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
A and C are in different paths with the battery
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
the open switch creates a gap
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are not connected
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
there is no closed path containing the battery
a damaged bulb creates a gap
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Bulb B is in a separate path
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
A and C are in different paths
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
the battery is in an open path
There is still a closed path
terminal 6 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are separated from the negative battery terminal by a gap
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
the battery is in an open path
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
If bulb A burns out, bulbs B and C are still in a closed path
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
there is an incomplete circuit
there is a complete circuit
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
there is no path containing both switch Y and bulb A
If C is damaged, A and B are still in a closed path
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
the battery is in an open path
there is no closed path containing the battery
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Bulb C was no longer in a closed path with the battery
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are connected
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
A and C are in the same closed path
A and C are in the same path
A and C are in different paths
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
the terminals are separated by a gap
a damaged bulb creates a gap
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch X.
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
there is no gap between the terminals
There is still a closed path
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
A and C are in the same path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
a damaged bulb creates a gap
there is a gap in a circuit
there is an incomplete circuit
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
there is no closed path containing the battery
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
the terminals are not connected
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
The battery is contained in a closed path which does not contain any other components
terminal 5 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
the path is not closed
there is an open path
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
there is a path containing A and a different path containing B and C
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
there is a short circuit
there is an incomplete circuit
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch X.
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
A and C are in different paths with the battery
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are not connected
there is no closed path containing the battery
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
A and C are in different paths with the battery
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
A and C are not in the same path with the battery
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
There is a closed path with A and B that C is not in.
The switch and the bulb have to be in the same path
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
the path is not closed
there is no gap between the terminals
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
there is an incomplete circuit
there is no closed path
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
B and C are in the same path with the battery
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path.
A non-zero voltage means that there is a gap
the terminals are not connected
there is no gap between the terminals
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
there is a gap in a circuit
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch Z.
There is no path containing both switch Y and bulb A
Circuit 4 has no closed paths
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are connected
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
there is an incomplete circuit
Circuit 4 has no closed paths
there is an open path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
Bulb C is in a separate path
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
the battery is contained in a closed path in which there is no bulb
a damaged bulb creates a gap
The switch and the bulb have to be in the same path
If bulb A burns out, bulbs B and C are still in a closed path
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
terminal 6 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are not connected
there is no closed path containing the battery
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected and in the same electrical state
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
If bulb A burns out, bulbs B and C are still in a closed path
there is no closed path containing the battery
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch Z.
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
there is an incomplete circuit
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path.
there is a path containing A and a different path containing B and C
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
B and C are in the same path with the battery
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
there is a gap in a circuit
Measuring voltage indicates whether two terminals are separated by a gap.
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths with the battery
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected
the battery is contained in a closed path in which there is no bulb
Bulb C was not in a closed path
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
A and B have their own path
Bulb B is in a separate path
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
There is no gap between terminal 6 and the positive terminal
If C is damaged, A and B are still in a closed path
B and C are in the same path with the battery
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
A and C are in the same path
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
A and C are in different paths
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
there is no path containing both switch Y and bulb A
If bulb A burns out, bulbs B and C are still in a closed path
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are not connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
the open switch creates a gap
there is no closed path containing the battery
A and C are in the same closed path
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
A and C are in different paths
there is an open path
each bulb is in its own path
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
a damaged bulb creates a gap
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
a damaged bulb creates a gap
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path.
A and C are in different paths
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
the battery is contained in a path in which there is no bulb
each bulb is in its own path
the path is not closed
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
terminal 5 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
the terminals are separated by a gap
the battery is contained in a path in which there is no bulb
the open switch creates a gap
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
A and C are in different paths with the battery
The switch and the bulb have to be in the same path
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
There is still a closed path
A and C are in different paths with the battery
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
A and C are in the same path
There is a path containing A
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
Bulb C was no longer in a closed path with the battery
The terminals are in the same state.
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
there is a short circuit
there is no gap between the terminals
The bulb is not in the closed path containing the battery
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is no closed path
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are connected
there is an incomplete circuit
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
There is no closed path
there is a path containing both Z and C
there is no closed path containing the battery
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are connected
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch X.
each bulb is in its own path
A and C are in different paths with the battery
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected and in the same electrical state
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
there is a gap in a circuit
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
the path is not closed
The terminals are in the same state.
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are not connected
there is no gap between the terminals
A and C are not in the same path with the battery
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
there is no gap between the terminals
The battery is contained in a closed path which does not contain any other components
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
There is no path containing both switch Y and bulb A
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path.
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
the terminals are separated by a gap
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected and in the same electrical state
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
The battery is contained in a closed path which does not contain any other components
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected and in the same electrical state
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are separated from the negative battery terminal by a gap
bulbs A and B are still in closed paths with the battery
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are not separated from the negative battery terminal by a gap
The terminals are in the same state.
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
terminal 2 is not separated from the negative battery terminal
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
bulbs A and B are still in closed paths with the battery
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are separated from the negative battery terminal by a gap
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
there is a gap in a circuit
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
A and C are not in the same path
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
B and C are in the same path
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
there is a path containing both Z and C
B and C are in the same path with the battery
A, B and C are in different paths
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
the battery is contained in a closed path in which there is no bulb
Bulb C is in a separate path
there is a complete circuit
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
There is no gap between them
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
the terminals are not separated by a gap
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
A and B have their own path
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
a damaged bulb creates a gap
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
terminal 2 is not separated from the negative battery terminal
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are separated from the negative battery terminal by a gap
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
the battery is contained in a path in which there is no bulb
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are not connected
the terminals are not connected
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are not connected
A and C are in the same closed path
the terminals are separated by a gap
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is a gap in a circuit
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
The switch and the bulb have to be in the same path
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
the path is not closed
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
a damaged bulb creates a gap
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a damaged bulb.
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
there is an incomplete circuit
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
the battery is contained in a closed path in which there is no bulb
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Measuring voltage indicates whether two terminals are separated by a gap.
A and C are in the same closed path
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
A and C are in different paths
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
the battery is in an open path
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
B and C are in the same path with the battery
the path is not closed
the battery is contained in a closed path in which there is no bulb
the battery is in an open path
Circuit 4 has no closed paths
There is a path with B and C that does not include X
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
there is an incomplete circuit
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
each bulb is in its own path
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
Bulb C was no longer in a closed path with the battery
the battery is in an open path
there is a short circuit
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are not connected
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
there is no path containing both switch Y and bulb A
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
If C is damaged, A and B are still in a closed path
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
there is no gap between the terminals
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
the battery is contained in a closed path in which there is no bulb
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
A and C are not in the same path with the battery
there is an open path
there is an incomplete circuit
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
the battery is contained in a path in which there is no bulb
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
Measuring voltage indicates whether two terminals are separated by a gap.
the battery is contained in a path in which there is no bulb
there is an incomplete circuit
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path.
Terminals 1 and 6 are separated by the gap
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
A and C are in different paths with the battery
The battery is contained in a closed path which does not contain any other components
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
A and C are in different paths with the battery
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are not connected
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is no closed path containing the battery
there is a path containing A, C, Z and the battery
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths
A and C are in different paths with the battery
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
there is an incomplete circuit
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
Measuring voltage indicates whether two terminals are separated by a gap.
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
the path is not closed
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
A and C are in the same path
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
There is a gap between terminals 1 and 6
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
there is an incomplete circuit
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path.
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
If bulb A burns out, bulbs B and C are still in a closed path
There is no path containing both switch Y and bulb A
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
the terminals are not connected
the open switch creates a gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
the terminals are not connected
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are not connected to the negative battery terminal
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths
A and C are in different paths with the battery
There is no closed path
B and C are in the same path with the battery
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
A and C are not in the same path
Measuring voltage indicates whether two terminals are separated by a gap.
bulb B creates a gap
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch X.
the battery is in an open path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Bulb C was no longer in a closed path with the battery
There are no closed paths
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected
A and C are in the same path
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
the battery is in an open path
there is no path containing both switch Y and bulb A
A and C are not in the same path
there is no gap between the terminals
there is no gap between the terminals
a damaged bulb creates a gap
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminals 1 and 6 are separated by the gap
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a damaged bulb.
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected and in the same electrical state
There is no gap between terminal 4 and the positive terminal
there is a path containing A, C, Z and the battery
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Bulb C was no longer in a closed path with the battery
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are not connected
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
bulb B creates a gap
terminal 4 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
there is no closed path containing the battery
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths
Circuit 4 has no closed paths
terminal 4 is separated by a gap from the negative battery terminal
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
Terminals 1 and 6 are separated by the gap
the path is not closed
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
there is an incomplete circuit
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
A and C are in the same closed path
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
A and C are in the same path
If bulb A burns out, there is no longer a closed path containing B, C and the battery
A and C are in different paths
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
the terminals are separated by a gap
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
The bulb is not in the closed path containing the battery
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch X.
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are connected
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
there is a gap in a circuit
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
If C is damaged, A and B are still in a closed path
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
The switch and the bulb have to be in the same path
there is no closed path containing the battery
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
the battery is in an open path
Bulbs A and C are in a closed path
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
bulbs A and B are still in closed paths with the battery
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Bulb B is in a separate path
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected and in the same electrical state
Bulbs A and C are in a closed path
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
Bulb C was no longer in a closed path with the battery
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch X.
If bulb A burns out, bulbs B and C are still in a closed path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
there is an incomplete circuit
B and C are in the same path with the battery
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
B and C are in the same path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
the battery is in an open path
The bulb is not in the closed path containing the battery
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
Terminals 1 and 6 are separated by the gap
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are connected
each bulb is in its own path
there is a gap in the circuit
If bulb A burns out, bulbs B and C are still in a closed path
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch X.
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
A and C are in the same closed path
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are separated by a gap.
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
the path is not closed
bulb B creates a gap
B and C are in the same path with the battery
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
B and C are in the same path with the battery
each bulb is in its own path
the battery is in an open path
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
A and C are in different paths
bulbs A and B are still in closed paths with the battery
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
there is a complete circuit
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
a damaged bulb creates a gap
Bulb B is in a separate path
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
A and C are in the same closed path
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
there is an open path
bulb B creates a gap
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
Bulb C was not in a closed path
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
Terminal 2 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
each bulb is in its own path
there is a gap in a circuit
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path.
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
there is a closed path containing both the bulb and a battery
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
If bulb A burns out, bulbs B and C are still in a closed path
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are not connected
there is a path containing A and a different path containing B and C
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
terminal 1 is not separated from the negative battery terminal
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
there is an open path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Bulb C was not in a closed path
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
The terminals are in the same state.
there is no gap between the terminals
there is a short circuit
there is a path containing A and a different path containing B and C
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
The bulb is not in the closed path containing the battery
A and C are in the same closed path
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
the battery is in an open path
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
A, B and C are in different paths
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
A and C are in the same closed path
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
there is no gap between the terminals
Measuring voltage indicates whether two terminals are separated by a gap.
a damaged bulb creates a gap
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are connected
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
Bulb C is in a separate path
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
the battery is in an open path
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
A and C are in the same path
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Bulbs A and C are in a closed path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
there is a path containing A and a different path containing B and C
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path.
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
there is an open path
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
There is no gap between terminal 5 and the positive terminal
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Bulb C was not in a closed path
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
The terminals are in the same state.
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
there is a path containing A and a different path containing B and C
there is no gap between the terminals
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
there is a short circuit
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
bulbs A and B are still in closed paths with the battery
Bulb B is in a separate path
each bulb is in its own path
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
bulb B creates a gap
there is a short circuit
the path is not closed
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
bulbs A and B are in a closed path
each bulb is in its own path
there is an incomplete circuit
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected and in the same electrical state
there is a short circuit
bulbs A and B are still in closed paths with the battery
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
bulb B creates a gap
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are not connected to the negative battery terminal
the open switch creates a gap
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
A and C are in the same closed path
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
there is a path containing A and a different path containing B and C
each bulb is in its own path
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
A and C are in different paths
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
There is no gap between terminals 1 and 4
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
the path is not closed
there is an incomplete circuit
a damaged bulb creates a gap
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
there is a complete circuit
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
the path is not closed
the path is not closed
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are not connected
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths
the battery is in an open path
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are connected
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected and in the same electrical state
B and C are in the same path with the battery
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are not connected
There is a path containing A
there is no gap between the terminals
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is an open path
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminals 1 and 6 are separated by the gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
The switch and the bulb have to be in the same path
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a damaged bulb.
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Bulb C is in a separate path
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is an open path
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are connected
A and C are in the same closed path
the open switch creates a gap
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a damaged bulb.
the terminals are not connected
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
Measuring voltage indicates whether two terminals are separated by a gap.
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
bulb B creates a gap
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
A and C are not in the same path with the battery
there is a short circuit
Measuring voltage indicates whether two terminals are separated by a gap.
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
Measuring voltage indicates the place where the electrical state changes due to a gap.
there is a path containing A, C, Z and the battery
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
Bulbs A and C are still in closed paths with the battery
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
The battery is contained in a closed path which does not contain any other components
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
Bulb B is in a separate path
the battery is in an open path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
there is no gap between the terminals
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
There is no gap between terminal 6 and the positive terminal
There was no longer a closed path containing Bulb C and the battery
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is no gap between the terminals
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
the battery is in an open path
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are not connected
there is no closed path containing the battery
there is an incomplete circuit
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
There is still a closed path
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are connected
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
If C burns out then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery
the battery is contained in a path in which there is no bulb
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
If C is damaged, A and B are still in a closed path
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
Terminal 6 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Circuit 4 has no closed paths
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
there is a path containing A and a different path containing B and C
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
If bulb A burns out, B and C are no longer in a closed path with the battery
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
B and C are in the same path
A and C are in different paths with the battery
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery and switch Z.
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path.
If bulb A burns out, bulbs B and C are still in a closed path
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected
Switch Y and bulb A are not in the same closed path
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
there is a gap in a circuit
there is no closed path
Bulb C is in a separate path
Terminal 4 and the positive battery terminal are in the same electrical state
The switch and the bulb have to be in the same path
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
there is no gap between the terminals
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
there is no gap between the terminals
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
Bulb C was not in a closed path
Bulb A is still in a closed path with the battery
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 5 and the positive terminal are connected
there is a path containing A, C, Z and X
The switch and the bulb have to be in the same path
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
Bulbs A and C are in a closed path
If bulb A burns out, neither B nor C is in a closed path
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
Terminals 4, 5 and 6 are connected to the positive battery terminal
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
each bulb is in its own path
The battery in 4 is not in a closed path
bulbs B and C are still in closed paths with the battery
Bulbs A and C are still contained in closed paths with the battery
Terminal 4 and the positive terminal are not separated by the gap
Terminals 1 and 6 are separated by the gap
If C burns out, then A and B are still in a closed path with the battery.
A and C are in different paths
there is a short circuit
there is a short circuit
A non-zero voltage means that the terminals are not connected.
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected and in the same electrical state
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
each bulb is in its own path
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
The battery in 2 is not in a closed path
Terminals 1 and 2 are in the same electrical state
the battery is contained in a path in which there is no bulb
Bulb A was still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
there is no closed path containing the battery
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
When the switch and the bulb are contained in the same path
A battery uses a chemical reaction to maintain different electrical states at the terminals
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminals 1 and 2 are connected
Terminals 1 and 4 are connected and in the same electrical state
A and C are not in the same path with the battery
there is still a closed path containing Switch Z, Switch X, Bulbs A and C and the battery
The terminals are in the same state.
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminals 1, 2 and 3 are separated from the positive battery terminal by a gap
Bulb A is still contained in a closed path with the battery.
Terminals 1 and 6 are not connected
If a bulb and a switch are in the same path the switch affects the bulb
the circuit has a closed path
The damaged bulb and the other bulb must be contained in the same path
The battery is contained in a path which does not contain any other components
there is no gap between the terminals
Bulb C is in a separate path
Terminal 1 and the positive terminal are not connected
the bulb and the battery are in a closed path
Bulb B and Bulb C were still contained in the same closed path with the battery.
terminal 1 is connected to the negative battery terminal
Terminal 3 and the positive terminal are separated by the gap
there is a short circuit
Donilon out, Rice in as Obama's national security adviser
Australian politicians lament over Nelson Mandela's death
Turkish riot police enter Taksim Square
Chicago shooting shows gap in stepped-up policing
Guatemala overturns former dictator's genocide conviction
Bonus-point Super Rugby win for Crusaders
Ukraine Refuses to Act Against Russian 'Provocation'
North Korea shoots 2 rockets
Italy's Renzi sworn in as prime minister
Prince Charles 'compares Vladimir Putin to Adolf Hitler'
Iran decries extensive massacre in Egypt
Fugitive Snowden short-listed for European rights prize
Hunt still on for 40 missing in Canada train blaze
Explosion near Damascus military airport
Israel escalates Gaza offensive, casualties mount
Nigeria Islamists kill 9 students in school attack
Greek PM accuses coalition of hypocrisy
New Zealand, West Indies ODI rained out
Six confirmed dead after Philadelphia building collapse
Germany offers help in destroying Syria weapons
Egypt: Police clash with pro-Morsi protesters
Top Diplomats Discuss Iran's Nuclear Program
Algeria's President Bouteflika in hospital
AP Source: US Forces Take Al-Qaida Leader in Libya
ElBaradei not confirmed as Egypt PM
Ronaldo hat-trick fires Portugal to World Cup
Snowden poised to fly out of Moscow
Pakistan marks World Press Freedom Day
US drone kills 18 in NW Pakistan
Israel bolsters forces along volatile Gaza border
EU foreign ministers seek solution on Syria arms
Strong Iran quake kills child, causes damage
Abbas accepts resignation of Palestinian peace negotiator Shtayyeh
Death toll from Philippines quake rises to 144
Stocks to watch on Monday
U.S. drone kills 4 militants in Pakistan
Italian premier to be sworn in today
Is Ukraine really on brink of civil war?
Israel agrees to extend Gaza truce by four hours
Egypt's turmoil deepens as Sinai attack kills 25 policemen
Police fire tear gas at protesters in Cairo
Liberal ElBaradei named Egypt PM, Islamists cry foul
EDL leaders arrested on way to Woolwich
HC advises actors Mohan Babu, Brahmanandam to return Padma Shri
Man who set himself on fire on National Mall in DC dies
Philippines recovering after powerful typhoon
Hollywood star Paul Walker dies in car crash
Blast in northern Syria kills 6
Iran 'cautiously optimistic' about future nuclear talks
Spanish flamenco guitarist Paco de Lucia dies at 66
Syrian opposition sets Assad's departure precondition for Geneva talks
Chinese search plane finds 'suspicious objects'
Pakistan frees FBI agent on bail
Snowden's hits hurdles in search for asylum
Trending news across China, Sept 15
Today in History, April 4
Surviving Boston Marathon bombing suspect awaits charges
4 killed in building collapse in southern India
Pakistan Dismisses Case against FBI Agent
Chris Froome's 'Monumental' Tour De France Win
Pakistani prisoner assaulted in Jammu jail
5 hurt in Gaza City car accident
Signal detected in MH370 search ‚Äėconsistent‚Äô with black box
UK bids farewell to 'Iron Lady' Margaret Thatcher
Angelina Jolie undergoes double mastectomy
Matt Smith quits BBC's Doctor Who
Thai junta security forces stay in barracks as protests dwindle
Official announcement: Rowhani wins Iran presidential election, says Minister
Spanish PM refuses to resign over corruption scandal
Shehla Raza takes oath as Sindh Assembly deputy speaker
2 explosions rock city in northern Lebanon
US drone strike kills 11 in Pakistan
Pakistan wants arms supply to Syrian sides stopped
Lawyer killed in boating accident
Egypt‚Äôs Sisi sworn in as president
China's economic growth rebounds to 7.8% in latest quarter
Bananas thrown at Italy's first black minister Cecile Kyenge
Gunmen 'Kill 15' In Second Kenya Attack
Homes denies Mantel literary treble
American football player Aaron Hernandez charged with murder
Owner arrested as Bangladesh building toll reaches 372
US Coast Guard suspends search for missing British sailors
Select images from Bangladesh building collapse
Iraqi Car Bomb Near Church Kills At Least 14
The Note's Must-Reads for Tuesday September 10, 2013
Boston bomb suspect buried in Virginia cemetery
Egyptian forces move to clear pro-Morsi protest camps
Eurozone unemployment hits record 12.1% in March
Nobel laureate Doris Lessing dies at 94
Zimbabwe‚Äôs opposition MDC party challenges Robert Mugabe‚Äôs election win
Noise Is No. 1 Quality-of-Life Complaint in NYC
Boston police say 3 taken into custody in Marathon bombing
Malaysian plane shot down over Ukraine
Israeli leader to keep hard-line in peace talks
Turkish Court Orders Halt to Twitter Ban
Ukraine protesters topple Lenin statue
South Africa's rugby fraternity mourns Mandela
Defence in ferry trial warns of scapegoating
Tech sell-off sends Asian stock markets lower
Churchill's youngest child Lady Soames dies aged 91
Israel allows Palestinian prisoner release
Afghanistan prepares for second round of presidential elections
World Briefing | Asia: Myanmar: Deadly Anti-Muslim Violence Flares Up
U.S. drone strike kills 5 in Pakistan
The Note's Must-Reads for Tuesday October 29, 2013
4 dead, 30 injured in train collision near Moscow
2 killed, dozens injured by blast in southwest Pakistan
NYPD's twitter campaign backfires
Police: 19 hurt in NOLA Mother's Day shooting
Another migrant boat capsizes off Italy, 27 dead
Nadal's Injury Jinx Continues in Australian Open
Jonathan to attend Mandela‚Äôs memorial service
Turkish Search Ends as Last Missing Miners Found
Margaret Thatcher helped prevent 'devastating race war' in South Africa, former president says
France and US shun Iran on Syria peace talks
Tentative Deal Reached to Resume Israeli-Palestinian Talks - US
Pakistani teen girl survives attempted 'honour killing'
Baftas 2013: Olivia Colman picks up two awards
Titanic violin sells for $1.7 million
Latest Storm to Bring More Snow to East Coast
Ankeet Chavan granted bail to get married
Mubarak retrial adjourned to June
Japan Airlines orders 31 Airbus A350s valued at $9.5 bn
Two dead in twin explosions at Boston Marathon
EU leaders give thumbs up to Juncker, Britain isolated
Sienna Miller attacks press for ‚Äėtitillating‚Äô reports at hacking trial
Settlers Beat up Palestinian in Jerusalem
India Ink: Image of the Day: January 27
Bangladesh executes opposition leader
Daughter and son-in-law accused of murdering elderly couple found buried in back garden after vanishing 15 years ago are remanded in custody
Nigeria drops arms trafficking charges against Russian sailors
House set to vote on plan to reopen government
Cory Monteith found dead: Canadian ‚ÄėGlee‚Äô star was 31
Al-Qaida gunmen take over military base in Yemen
British comedian Felix Dexter dies of cancer
BEIRUT: Lebanon's prime minister formed a cabinet more than 10 months after taking office yesterday, including a wide range of political groups after bridging serious divisions among them mostly over
Iran has 18,000 centrifuges, 10,000 already active
Iran presidential candidate says western sanctions should be broken
London Marathon observes silence for Boston victims
Three killed, five wounded in Myrtle Beach shootings
Turkey's PM Warns Against Protests
US, China set the stage for Obama-Xi meet
US issues global travel alert, cites al-Qaida threat
Veterans health probe confirms cover-up of care delays
Iranian media praises heated presidential debate
Egypt declares Muslim Brotherhood a "terrorist group"
Michelle Obama to appear on 'Parks and Recreation'
Israel Releases 26 Palestinian Prisoners
Kenya forces battle to end mall siege
Pakistan condemns terrorist attack in China
White House says DPRK has no nuclear missile capability
Singapore stocks end down 0.45%
World's oldest ever man dies aged 116
mobile world congress future smartphone
Seven killed in Karachi twin blasts
Statement by the President on Ukraine
1 suspect arrested after Lebanon car bombings kill 45
Greek Far-Right Leader Imprisoned Pending Trial
Bangladesh factory owners arrested
3 bombs explode in southern Thailand; 27 hurt
Israel eases curbs on building materials for Gaza
Ariel Castro pleads not guilty to rape and kidnap
Afghans line up to vote in presidential runoff
3 Egyptian soldiers killed in Sinai car bombing
BlackBerry loses $965M in 2nd quarter
China sends carrier to South China Sea
Egypt court temporarily releases Mubarak over illicit gains
Bartoli routs Lisicki to win Wimbledon tennis title
Merkel: Russian actions could lead to a catastrophe
Nelson Mandela Dies at Age 95
One dead, 77 hurt in riot at Papua New Guinea immigration centre
Belgium King Albert II 'to abdicate'
Nazi chief buried in Jewish cemetary
Roadside bomb 'kills eight Afghan soldiers'
11 killed as bus falls into ravine in northern Pakistan
Egypt army moves against Brotherhood
Swiss cast ballots on world's highest minimum wage
Rudd sworn in as Australia's new Prime Minister
Come and get me, says Thai protest leader as anti-government riots grow
Cameron hails first same-sex marriages in Britain
British tourist trampled to death by elephant
Israeli forces detain 5 Palestinians in West Bank
National elections set for 7 May 2014
Easy Rider Actress Karen Black Dies Of Cancer
What the Papers Say, July 19, 2013
Coronation Street stars hail 'amazing' new set
Tokyo wins race to host 2020 Olympic Games
Rebels down Ukraine helicopters
Oscar Pistorius 'asked friend to take blame for restaurant shooting' ‚Äď video
Wife: Mandela is responding to treatment.
Two arrested in India for gang rape of Danish tourist
Singapore stocks close 0.25 pct lower
Red Sox beat Tigers 5-2 to advance to World Series
Israeli air strike on sourthern Gaza town kills seven
At least 89 dead in China earthquakes
Gunmen kill nine tourists in Pakistan
French-Made Warship Destined for Russia Sets Sail
China yuan strengthens to 6.1767 against USD
Six U.S. soldiers killed in helicopter crash in Afghanistan
Suicide car bomb kills 12 in northern Iraq
A New iPad Is Coming
Hernandez double gives Mexico victory over Japan
China Rights Lawyers Harassed by About 200 Thugs
New Syrian Airstrikes Kill at Least 15 in Aleppo
FORMULA 1: Rosberg stays modest despite Monaco win
Earthquake death toll rises to 260
Netanyahu's bureau chief steps down
Huge explosion as freight train derails near Baltimore
David Beckham Retires From Football
Roadside bomb 'kills eight Afghan soldiers'
China FM hosts senior ASEAN officials
Bombings and a shooting kill 8 in Iraq
North Korea's Kim seen behind sacking of powerful uncle
Live Blog: George Zimmerman Not Guilty
China no longer top investment destination: poll
Tehelka editor steps down after allegations of sexual misconduct
Former British PM Margaret Thatcher dies at 87
Thousands of Morsi supporters gather in Egypt
UN Condemns Ethnic Killings in South Sudan
Israeli killed in West Bank attack
US to allow morning-after pill for girls of any age
Police fire tear gas at protesters
Thai protesters disrupt advance voting
China stock index futures close higher -- Dec. 4
North Korea warns foreigners in South Korea to evacuate
Canadian government approves controversial oil pipeline to Pacific
Hollande says schoolgirl may return to France after expulsion
Syrian soldiers killed in bomb attack
Forum urges stable relations for China, Japan
Israeli gunboats fire at Palestinian fishermen
'Never, ever give up': Diana Nyad completes historic Cuba-to-Florida swim
Bernie's Sports Focus 2nd January 2014
Ukraine protesters topple Lenin statue in Kiev
Two bombs strike Boston marathon
South Sudan (Republic of): South Sudan‚Äôs Kiir declares a state of emergency in Jonglei and Unity states
Foreign ministers to meet over Ukraine crisis
Dave Lee Travis pleads not guilty to all charges
Oil prices extend falls amid US shutdown
35 killed, 138 wounded in wave of attacks in Iraq
Broadcaster David Frost dies
Iran says detects sabotage at nuclear facility
US Stocks Slip Early Ahead of Earnings Reports
Chinese court agrees to Bo Xilai appeal
Japan Election: Shinzo Abe Hails Landslide Win
Turkey: Police Fire Tear Gas At Protesters
China Yuan Strengthens to 6.168 against USD Monday
Thirteen dead after Nari slams into Philippines
Netanyahu Meets Pope, Talks Tough on Iran
Sabrina Moss: Man, 22, charged with murdering nursery teacher gunned down while celebrating birthday
Weapons experts leave Syria, U.S. prepares attack
Protests continue in Ukraine despite concessions
Crane collapse kills 4 in NE China
FTSE Bursa Malaysia update: 9 a.m.
France to shut far-right group after student death
New Tornado Emergency in Oklahoma City
Queen Elizabeth II visits barracks of UK soldier slain last week
17 Hurt at New Orleans Parade Shooting
India says China agrees retreat to de facto border in faceoff deal
Police confirm how suspect was captured
Syrian army retakes historic Crusader castle
Court to hear Bo Xilai appeal
Iran says it test-fires new land-to-sea missile in Gulf
Saudi Arabia to grant Lebanese army $3 billion
Rabbi Ovadia Yosef, kingmaker of Israeli politics, dies at 93
US existing-home sales dip in February
Red Cross members kidnapped in Syria
Mandela's condition 'still critical'
Syria: Cameron and Obama move west closer to intervention
Queen names giant aircraft carrier
Bangladesh prison van ambushed
Wreckage from AirAlgerie flight AH5017 found in Mali
Hamas agrees to 24-hour holiday truce in Gaza war after Israel resumes fighting
G20 Summit ends divided over Syria
Arab League Backs Palestinian Stance in Peace Talks
Ten killed in Alaska plane crash
Southwest Jet's Nose Gear Landed First
70 retailers agree to new Bangladesh factory safety pact
Government Shutdown Begins Over Health Care Feud
Woman Loses Arm in Shark Attack off Maui
occupied Palestinian territory: Protection of Civilians Weekly Report
Hollande condemns Ukraine referendums as 'null and void'
Obama to name Susan Rice as national security adviser
Indian stocks open lower
Former Israeli prime minister Ariel Sharon dies, aged 85
India Ink: Image of the Day: April 21
Suicide blast kills 1 in Afghan capital
China launches first moon rover mission
EU finance ministers‚Äô talks b...
Australia cuts interest rate to record low 2.75%
Ten Chinese vessels on standby for jet search
Neymar out of World Cup
Classic crossword - Saturday 20th April
N. Korea fires short-range missiles
Syria opposition agrees to Geneva peace talks
'15 killed' as Egyptian forces clear pro-Morsi camps in Cairo
Palestinian diplomat killed in explosion in Prague
Protesters Clash with Police in Brazil
US Evacuates Embassy in Libya Amid Unrest
South Korea ferry captain arrested
North Korea Postpones Family Reunions with South
Chinese president meets U.S. state secretary
Singapore stocks close 0.5 pct higher
Gunmen kill nine in southwest Pakistan: Police
Hackney shooting: Teenager Shereka Marsh 'bled to death after being shot in neck'
Death toll from Egypt violence rises to 638
Taiwan stocks close 0.34 pct lower
Fighting continues despite Ukraine ceasefire
Tropical Storm Fernand hits Mexico, dumps rain
China sends aid team to Philippines
Turkish police clash with protesters for 2nd day
Manila to increase counter-terror team
France loses influence in Europe
Nelson Mandela dies aged 95
Australia supports revision of Japanese constitution
Britain's debt timebomb: Nine million are in 'serious debt'
Egypt braces for more violence as Muslim Brotherhood calls 'march of anger'
Report of two explosions at finish line of Boston Marathon
Five killed by bomb blast in East India
Ariel Sharon dies aged 85
A new Cold War?
Soldier and civilian killed in clashes in Lebanon's Tripoli
Brazil hires 4,000 Cuban doctors
Official says Kenyan forces caused mall collapse
6.6-mag quake strikes off eastern Indonesia
Spanish train driver held on suspicion of negligent homicide
Is Fed ready to begin the great taper? Markets say yes
North Korea Postpones Family Reunions with South
Scientists grow mini 'human brain' in the lab
France ex-president Sarkozy charged with corruption
Cuba's 'Ladies' to Pick Up EU Prize 8 Years Later
Boeing 787 Dreamliner catches fire at London Heathrow airport
Two killed in Arizona skydiving accident
Afghan Official Says 2,000 Missing After Landslide
Snowden's latest offer of asylum comes from Bolivia
Israel approves release of 104 Palestinian prisoners
Assad agrees to hand over chemical weapons
At least 200 killed in Bangladesh building collapse
Assault on Iraq funeral, other attacks kill 96
Syria and Iran Step Up Involvement in Iraq Conflict
Oklahoma City Airport Evacuated During Tornado...
Israel finds bodies of three missing teens in West Bank
World mourns passing of Mandela
Israel to free 104 Palestinians in peace talks: PM
Palestinian envoy killed in Prague blast
Rogers names Vodafone UK chief as new CEO
EU put Hezbollah military wing on terrorism blacklist
Death toll in Turkish bombings rises to 46
Blast near Iran embassy in Beirut
Israel widens settlement subsidies
Suicide bomber kills eight Kurdish security forces personnel in Iraq
North, South Korea agree to talks
Singapore shares open lower on Monday
Scores killed in Iraq attacks
Suicide bomber kills 13 Iraqi army recruits in Baghdad
Muslim Brotherhood supporters, opponents clash nationwide
Hunting for clues in Boston bombing
Mandela in ‚Äėcritical but stable‚Äô condition
US intelligence still indecisive whether chemical weapons were used in Damascus suburbs
What the Papers Say Sept. 26, 2013
Wall Street rises at open on data, Washington eyed
Deaf NY Starbucks patrons sue, say they're mocked
Thousands evacuated after fire breaks out in Moscow Metro
Snowden 'quits Hong Kong for Moscow'
Air strike kills one civilian in Syria's Deraa
Three killed in Brazil stadium collapse
At least 5 killed in sectarian conflict in north Yemen
Lebanon hopes Geneva II conference initiate political solution on Syria
Djokovic, Nadal to vie for French Open semi berth
Many killed in Syrian air strike
T.B Joshua reveals fate of missing Malaysian plane
Images of Boston Marathon bomb suspects released
Kerry Calls On UN Security Council to Act on Syria
German police foil far-right 'model plane bomb plot'
California wildfires strengthened by winds as hundreds are evacuated
Brazil's Congress approves internet legislation
China treasury bond futures close mixed Wednesday
Berlusconi accused of bribing witnesses in prostitution trial
US condemns Afghan prisoner release
Most powerful typhoon of 2013 hits the Philippines
The Note's Must-Reads for Tuesday, October 8, 2013
France arrests man in soldier's stabbing
Canadians released in Egypt, not yet heading home
1,900 killed in Syria while Geneva talks remain deadlocked
Crimean Parliament Votes to Join Russia
Muslims in hiding as sectarian ...
North Korea Blocks South Koreans from Factory Zone
Indian minister killed in head-on collision
Obama lashes North Korea as weak ‚Äėpariah state‚Äô
Abbas accepts resignation of Rami Hamdallah
BlackBerry loses $965M in 2nd quarter
Colombia too slick for Greece
Pakistan Says Air Strikes Kill At Least 60 Militants
Tornadoes hit Kan., Okla.; no injuries reported
Reactions to the prospect of military action against Syria
Tony Abbott Sworn In As Australia PM
9 shot dead in Xinjiang police station attack
Russia Preparing Counterproposals Over Ukraine
No agreement at Iran nuclear talks
Nigeria reviewing 'all options' over kidnapped girls
GM recalls about 60,000 Saturn Aura cars
Children Die In Neighbour's New York Pool
US believes Syrian government used chemical weapons
Black Voters Are Key to a Colbert Busch Win in South Carolina
Obama Makes Surprise Visit To Afghanistan
Japanese PM escapes injury in 5-car collision
Pakistan's opposition party boycotts presidential elections
Syria regime releases hundreds of prisoners
Israel says it carried out joint missile test with US in Mediterranean
Barack Obama drops meeting with Vladimir Putin over Ed Snowden affair
Volcanic eruption closes 3 airports
Egypt's military takes control over Muslim Brotherhood, supporters
2 killed, 11 wounded in attacks in Iraq
Ukraine opposition demands Yanukovich resign
Bomb wounds 16 in eastern Afghanistan
Investigators Probe Motives of Los Angeles Airport Shooter
Margaret Thatcher dies at 87
Outrage After Indian Girl, 6, Raped at Her School
Egypt's Brotherhood holds Day of Rage rallies
Building collapses claim lives in India
US Senate confirms Janet Yellen as US Federal Reserve chief
Several killed and scores injured in Germany bus crash
Two killed as fierce overnight storms batter Britain
World powers seek rare progress in Iran nuclear talks
Ukraine crisis: This is the de-facto annexation of Crimea
Germany Summons U.S. Envoy over Merkel Phone Spy Claims
Military holds upper hand in Egypt
Uneasy calm returns to Turkey's protest square
Five dead in Canada train crash
Flesh-eating bacteria amputee Aimee Copeland uses new bionic hands
Mainland's Taiwan affairs chief concludes epochmaking island visit
Bin Laden's continuing sway shown in Kenya mall attack
All sailors on board Indian submarine 'feared dead'
Obama takes 'selfie' at Mandela's funeral service
Death toll from Egypt clashes rises to 57
Two Canadians released from prison in Egypt
Two dead, as Egyptians clash ahead of rallies
Children and adults injured in car crash outside primary school new Nine injured after car overturns near school in Wales.
Obama meets Israeli, Palestinian negotiators
Leading Egyptian Activist Turns Himself in Cairo
Russian court releases Greenpeace ship doctor on bail
Russia evacuates embassy in Libya after attack
U.S. drone mistakenly kills 14 in Yemen wedding convoy
China manufacturing expands in September
Wave of bombings kills 50 in Iraq
Syrian PM survives bomb attack in capital
Facebook to test mobile payments service
Today in History, April 23
Oscar Pistorius sent for mental evaluation: what will it mean?
Three women missing for decade found alive in US
Botulism scare triggers recall
Second attack at Karachi airport
UN Adopts Syrian Chemical Weapons Resolution
Death toll rises to 12 in Indonesia mine collapse
Inside Iran's Presidential Election and Beyond
Air strike kills eight civilians in Syria's Homs
Greek militant group claims responsibility for Golden Dawn killings
California gay marriage fight may continue
Eurozone unemployment hit record 12.2% in September
Former Pakistan army chief charged in Bhutto death
World Briefing | The Americas: Brazil: Arrests Begin in Vote-Fraud Case
Crimean forces storm Ukrainian navy headquarters
Sewol ferry disaster: Body of South Korean shipping tycoon found
Boko Haram video said to show kidnapped Nigerian girls
US actor Philip Seymour Hoffman found dead in New York
Egypt court sentences 529 Morsi supporters to death
Nelson Mandela's condition improves
Six killed in US building collapse
Ukraine pressured over Kiev clashes
In Kenya, attackers used 'less is more' strategy
Islamists lead protests against US drone strikes in Pakistan
US surveillance aircraft join hunt for kidnapped Nigerian girls
6.9-magnitude quake strikes off Russia's Kuril Islands
Deputy Speaker Nigel Evans Re-Arrested
SUV crash near Tiananmen Square kills 5
Button hits back at Dennis criticisms
Nevada: 2 dead, 2 hurt in middle school shooting
Death toll in Goa building collapse rises to 17
CIA chief in Israel to discuss situation in Syria
Prince George christened in London
Monty Python to reunite on stage
Belgian Prime Minister sends condolences to victims
EU foreign ministers to discuss Egypt on Wednesday
The Lede: Video: Gunman Takes Firefighters Hostage in Georgia
Manning WikiLeaks case turns to sentencing phase
Helicopter crashes into roof of Glasgow club
Egypt holding key vote on constitution
Iran, world powers agree nuclear deal
Obama shakes hands with Cuba's Castro at Mandela memorial
China culling birds as flu toll rises to 6
China, Singapore vow to further deepen cooperation
Bangladesh opposition set for mass rally
Obama Makes Surprise Visit To Afghanistan
Israel classifies Jerusalem natives as noncitizens
Zimbabwe: 'Grave Concerns' Over Election
Indian stocks open higher
Stars pay tribute to James Garner
5 things you need to know on Friday
Southwest flights delayed, canceled after computer glitch
Vatican embassy in Syria hit by mortar; no injuries
Egypt Brotherhood deputy leader Shater arrested
Chinese shares close higher Monday
North Korea Blocks Access to Key Industrial Zone
Gunmen kill four in Kenya church attack
Gunmen Kill 11 Foreign Tourists in Pakistan
Arizona wildfire that killed 19 Hotshots now contained
Iranian president ready for nuclear negotiations
Western powers scramble to befriend Modi
Philippines Detains 11 Chinese Fishermen
Hong Kong set for huge democracy rally
Israel Accuses Syria of Using Chemical Weapons
Suicide bomber attacks primary school in Iraq, kills 15
Fire breaks out near secretariat in Srinagar
Eleven dead in Belgian plane crash
Pakistan's Musharraf on the run after arrest order
Nine children die in attack in Afghanistan attack
Five dead in Indonesian eruption
At Least 66 Killed in Bomb Blasts in Iraq
Prince George christened in London
Egypt issues long-waited presidential election law
Son of popular US evangelist Warren kills himself
Update 2: 78 killed in Spanish train disaster
French Soldier Stabbed In Neck In Paris
Venezuela offers "humanitarian asylum" to Snowden
Full text: China-EU 2020 Strategic Agenda for Cooperation
Train Derailment Kills 4 in New York
Russia says ballistic 'objects' fired in Mediterranean
Twitter blocks content in Pakistan
Ukraine Claims Rebels Flushed from Main Stronghold
Pro-Russia rally held in Simferopol, capital of Ukraine
Super typhoon Haiyan closes in on the Philippines
Thai bonds best in region
Two blasts near Iranian embassy in Beirut
Christie investigation heats up
Chinese shares close lower on Wednesday
Bangladesh factory collapse death toll hits 1,021
Nelson Mandela hospitalized with lung infection
Hospital: Ariel Sharon's health worsens
Berlusconi ministers resign; Italy gov't in crisis
Obama and O'Brien Cast Their Versions of D.C. White House Correspondents' Dinner
Iran: Nuclear deal to be implemented on January 20
A million protest in Brazil's cities
Boston bombing suspect charged in hospital bed
White House condemns violence in Egypt
Asian markets slump on central bank stimulus fears
Jiroemon Kimura: World's oldest person dies aged 116
Foreign exchange rates in Singapore
Colorado wildfire may be biggest property destroyer in state history
Cyprus finance minister resigns
South Korea ferry: Transcript reveals evacuation panic
Death toll in Madhya Pradesh temple stampede climbs to 115
Man Sets Himself on Fire on National Mall, Flown to Hospital
4 killed in Pakistan blasts
Putin signs a treaty for Crimea to join Russia
Iran diplomat: progress being made in expert-level talks
Earthquake of 6 magnitude strikes Thailand
President mourns death of Mandela
Pakistan holds direct talks with Taliban
Man arrested over attack on French soldier
Mainland's Taiwan affairs chief concludes epochmaking island visit
US 'deeply disturbed' by Chinese dissident's death
News of Terrorism and the Israeli-Palestinian Conflict (July 31 ‚Äď August 6, 2013)
38 bodies of victims identified
Tokyo stocks close 0.49pc lower
Ark. high court again suspends gay marriage
UN Chief: Inspectors need 4 days to conclude probe in Syria
Israel press bemoans price of talks resumption
Chinese stocks open lower Thursday
Bo Xilai indicted for corruption
Iran's nuclear quest 'has cost Tehran over $100 billion'
German factory orders rebound in January
Foreigners among dead in Kabul hotel attack
Kerry warns Indonesia of climate change
Iran, world powers pledge new nuclear talks
Russia warns of "catastrophe" if N Korea restarts reactor
Gunmen surround Libyan foreign ministry to push demands
Police helicopter crashes into Scottish pub
Egyptian death toll rises to 638
Uganda's president signs harsh anti-gay law
Russia has no intention to incorporate southeastern Ukraine: FM
Wikileaks soldier Bradley Manning acquitted of aiding the enemy
10 killed as Insurgent violence returns to Pakistan
Russia Doubts Mid-November Date for Syria Peace Talks
Ukraine Fears Russian Invasion
US drone strike kills 8 in NW Pakistan
Rock Bands' Plane Makes Emergency Landing in Ill.
Malaysia set for landmark general election
Egypt's Brotherhood calls for 'day of anger'
Russia warns against setting preconditions for Syria
Australian ship trawls for signals from missing Malaysia plane
Algeria: Belaid says he will continue presidential campaign
U.S. judge approves force-feeding Californian inmates on hunger strik
Sixteen killed in Venezuela prison
7.7-magnitude earthquake hits SW Pakistan
At least 64 killed across country in Egypt clashes
US Says Chemical Weapons Used in Syria
Firefighters battling scrub fire in Hokianga
3 Palestinians released from Israeli prisons
U.S. Military Deaths in Afghanistan
Palestinians: We Don't Want Kerry Mission to Fail
Syria FM: We will stop producing chemical weapons
Tropical Storm Karen poised to make landfall
Blasts kill 27 outside two mosques in Lebanon's Tripoli
Dog Mauls Baby Girl To Death In Blackburn
Roma couple charged with abducting 'blonde angel'
China vows to continue fight against terrorism
Pakistan: Dozens killed in strikes on militants
Seamus Heaney, Irish poet and Nobel winner, dies at 74
Mosque stormed as Egypt's generals plan to outlaw Muslim Brotherhood
KL shares continue uptrend mid-afternoon
Bangladeshi Islamists rally to demand action against atheist bloggers
Malaysia Airlines plane crashes on Ukraine-Russia border
Suicide bomber kills at least 4 in Kabul
Weiner falls to fourth in new NYC mayoral poll
Two Japanese ministers visit Yasukuni shrine
Iraqi forces, militants battle for Iraq refinery
Thousands protest against austerity in Italy, Portugal
World Cup live: France 0-0 Germany
Israel pounds Gaza as Hamas flexes rocket reach
World's first state-licensed marijuana retailers open doors in Colorado
Channel tragedy 'one mile from end' A British woman who died while attempting to swim the English Channel for charity collapsed just one mile from the French coast.
Three dead as Cambodian police open fire on protesters
Senate, House on collision course on border money
Sudan frees Christian woman sentenced to death for apostasy
US Secretary of State John Kerry‚Äôs wife rushed to hospital
Conservative opposition wins Australian election
Maduro wins Venezuelan presidential vote
India oil minister slammed for plan to shut petrol stations at night
Kerry meets Israeli leaders to push Mideast peace
Two bombs strike Boston marathon
Mother held over daughter's death A mother has been remanded in custody charged with murder after her eight-year-old daughter was found dead in a block of flats.
North Korea Offers Talks: Complex May Re-Open
Stocks edge higher as US service sector improves
Egypt court orders Mubarak release
Suicide bomb kills 4 in Syrian capital's Old City
Israeli authorities raze Palestinian home in Arraba
US-Russia reach agreement on Syria weapons
Israel boosts settlements, fuelling Palestinian fears
One week later: Boston honors bombing victims; suspect unable to speak
US tourist gang-raped in northern India: Police
Winter weather blasts U.S. northeast
UN Security Council slams deadly terrorist attack in Kenyan capital
San Francisco plane crash: Survivor could see runway through hole in tail
Cyprus probes Ukraine assets
European Central bank keeps interest rate at 0.5%
Oil rig spat: Beijing not to send army
NKorea executes Kim Jong Un' uncle
Merkel to attend World Cup final
Russia detains suspected Islamist militants in Moscow raid
Pakistan Denounces Latest Drone Attack
NATO: 3 troops killed in Afghanistan attack
Chinese shares close lower on Wednesday
Mandela remains in 'intensive care'
Sewol ferry crew faces trial
Ally of Georgia's billionaire PM to be president -exit polls
Egyptians Voting on New Constitution
World news briefs ‚ÄĒ compiled May 1
U.S. drone kills 4 militants in Pakistan
China expands search area for missing plane
61 people missing after boat sinks off Western Malaysia
Car bombs kill 26 in Iraqi capital
Syria opposition voices frustration with international backers
Cricket-England 155-4 v Australia, fourth test - tea
Curiosity Rover Celebrates 1 Year on Mars
Powerful 6.9 quake strikes off California coast
India Ink: Image of the Day: January 16
Storm Chasers Among Those Killed in Oklahoma
EU states to decide on arming Syrian rebels
Eurozone cuts growth forecast for 2014
Australian PM Gillard ousted in leadership vote
Pakistan condemns violence in Egypt
Death toll in India building collapse hits 42
Russia says ballistic missiles fired in Mediterranean
Darren Lehmann replaces Mickey Arthur as Australia's Ashes coach
MH17 crash: Black boxes arrive in the UK from Ukraine for analysis
At Least One Student Killed in Clashes With Police in Cairo
Parents demands common forms for nursery admissions
Baghdad cafe bombing kills at least 38
When is Prince George's christening? Baptism plan, royal baby's godparents and all the details
What the Papers Say, Nov. 19, 2013
China yuan strengthens to 6.1767 against USD
Australia rejects Qantas loan request
Malaysia Airlines: Investigators conclude Flight MH 370 hijacked
Google redesigns search results on PCs
Egypt court acquits 155 arrested after Cairo protests
Explosion Hits Hezbollah Area South of Beirut
John Kerry Says Saudi King Abdullah Backs Israeli-Palestinian Push
Protest leader Navalny goes on trial in Russia
Egyptian Amb: Muslim Brotherhood Should 'Join the Process'
The Note's Must-Reads for Tuesday, October 8, 2013
EU Slaps New Sanctions on Russia Over Ukraine
Car bombs kill at least 47 in Baghdad area
US issues global alert, citing Qaeda threats
North and South Korea break their silence with talks
All gunmen in attack on Afghan presidential palace killed
Hezbollah urges to elect new Lebanese president
Saudi Arabia rejects seat on UN Security Council
Death toll rises to 39 in Italy coach crash
Algerian president in France for medical tests after minor stroke
Gunmen kill two in attack on Kenyan church
Death toll rises as Kenya mall siege continues
Manchester City win English Premier League title
US drone kills 16 in Pakistan
MH17 dead flown back to Netherlands
Egyptian soldiers killed in Sinai attack
Oil slips below $108 ahead of Iran nuclear talks
38 feared dead in Russian psychiatric hospital fire
5 Snowboarders Killed in Colorado Avalanche
Egypt arrests Muslim Brotherhood leader Badie
UN closes in on landmark arms treaty
Obama's day: Prime time on Syria
Google launches internet-beaming balloons
North Korea cuts last ties with South by barring joint industrial park
China stocks close lower on Thursday
Obama postpones Asia trip over govt shutdown
Court orders political ban on Italy‚Äôs Berlusconi
Jewels worth ‚ā¨40m stolen in Cannes
Ukraine opposition urges more stand-offs
Pro-Russian Protesters Storm Police Station in Ukraine as Kiev Urges U.N. over unrest
WHO: New virus can probably pass person to person
Chinese shares close higher Monday
Nelson Mandela returns to hospital in ‚Äėserious but stable‚Äô condition
At least 18 killed in Iraq mosque bombing
Mexico storm death toll continues to rise
Search Resumes for Missing Malaysian Jet
British Prime Minister condemns murder of teens
Taliban bombs US base in Afghanistan
Sky News cameraman killed in Egypt clashes
Tottenham v Manchester City ‚Äď live!
Indonesia Confronts Australian Ambassador on Reports of Spying
Business news and markets: as it happened, June 20, 2013
Indian-origin teacher dies after attack in New Zealand
Ariel Sharon dies aged 85: Former Israeli Prime Minister passes away after organ failure following eight-year coma
China seeking foreign counterterror experts
Israel Approves Release of Palestinian Prisoners, Peace Talks
Worker: San Diego Mayor Made Suggestive Comments
Germany backs G20 statement on Syria a day late
Iran, world powers pledge new nuclear talks
35 militants killed in Afghan raids: official
10 Things to Know for Tuesday
Oscar Pistorius' psychiatric evaluation to start Monday
Ukraine faces more violence as ultimatum nears end
Israel to free Palestinian prisoners over Kerry talks
Roadside bomb wounds provincial governor in northern Afghanistan
Tropical Storm Karen weakens as it nears U.S. Gulf Coast
Protesters clash with riot police in Kiev
Coronation St star Le Vell cleared Coronation Street actor Michael Le Vell has been found not guilty by a jury of child sex offences.
76 killed in Bangladesh building collapse
12 killed in bus accident in Pakistan
10 die in attacks in Afghanistan
8 soldiers killed in bomb attack in NW Pakistan
N. Korea fires short-range missiles
FTSE Bursa Malaysia update: 5.00pm
At least 78 killed in Pakistan church bombing
Bomb kills three in northwest Pakistan
Malaysia Airlines plane vanishes on flight to Beijing
Microsoft to cut 18,000 jobs in overhaul
Libyan Prime Minister Reported Kidnapped By Armed Men
Malaysia elections: Malaysians vote with power at stake for first time
China yuan retreats to 6.1729 against USD Wednesday
Google begins launching Internet-beaming balloons
Fire destroys Tibetan town in China
Yahoo to Buy Tumblr for $1.1 Billion
India voters kick off world‚Äôs biggest election
Syrian airstrikes kill at least 18 in Aleppo
Death toll in Philippines quake jumps to 85
Bangladesh police arrest 3 atheist bloggers
Shenzhen stock indices close lower -- Oct. 31
Philippines and rebels reach 'wealth deal'
Texas senator filibusters against abortion bill
Margaret Thatcher Dies at 87
Turkish FM slams military intervention in Egypt
Search narrowed for missing man
Pro-Russians protesters storm Donetsk prosecutor's office in eastern Ukraine
Uganda's President Museveni agrees to sign anti-gays Bill
At least 150 dead as strong quake hits southwest Balochistan
Champions Trophy: India v South AfricaLive
Pope Francis announces first visit to Holy Land
Supreme Court to hear Michigan affirmative action case
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on Nov 21
Suicide blast in central Somalia kills 15
Cyclone Phailin evacuation kept Indian villagers alive
US drone kills two in eastern Afghanistan
Thousands gather to support Islamist government in Tunisia
US presidents pay tribute to Mandela
Afghan politician defects to Taliban
Nelson Mandela taken to hospital
Two explosions at Boston Marathon finish line
Wallenda to cross gorge near Grand Canyon on wire
At least 18 killed in North Caucasus train station blast
3 killed, 24 injured in NW China coach blast
Cameron 'seriously concerned' over Gibraltar events
Winter Storm Janus: State-by-State...
Voting ends in Afghanistan‚Äôs presidential and municipal elections
Car bombs kill 54 in Shi'ite districts of Baghdad
China yuan strengthens to 6.1542 against USD
Iraqi officials: 50 bodies found south of Baghdad
Soldiers killed by Lebanon car bomb
Rebels likely downed jet 'by mistake'
Boxing : Pacquiao spends night with Philippine typhoon victims
Bombs Kill 35 in Baghdad Christian Area
China Bo Xilai trial in fourth day
UK sends warship to aid Philippines
Muslims pray for end to divisions
Mile-wide tornado heads toward Oklahoma City
Separatists down Ukraine military plane, several dead
Thousands of white-clad Amsterdammers march for MH17
Obama's tarnished health care law at a crossroads
Iran tries to prevent military strike on Syria
Suspected US drone targets Islamic seminary in Pakistan
Obama visits tornado hit Oklahoma
46 dead in Iraq attack blitz
Ukraine threatens to seize Russian assets
Long-delayed Syria peace talks to open in Montreux
GE posts 9% profit drop for third quarter
Pressure mounts to free kidnapped girls
10 Things to Know for Today
China yuan strengthens to new high against USD
Israeli forces issue 4 demolition orders in Jerusalem
Speech: The internet and pornography: Prime Minister calls for action
Putin opens Winter Paralympics
Fierce clashes in east Syria as US pushes peace talks
Russia convicts dead lawyer Magnitsky in posthumous trial
US soldier freed in Afghanistan, 5 Taliban prisoners leave Guantanamo
Trayvon Martin could have been ...
Ban Warns Syria Strikes Could Worsen Sectarian Violence
U.S. war hero Louis Zamperini, inspiration for 'Unbroken,' dead at 97
China ships enter waters off disputed islands
Bank of England keeps low interest rates to support economy new
US and Russia agree Syria arms deal in Geneva
N. Korea hails test of 'breakthrough' guided missile
Kerry plan to include prisoner release, settlement freeze
Explosion in Kabul a suicide attack in diplomatic area
Microsoft And Office In A Multi-Platform World
Turkish police fire tear gas as Kurds protest against Syria wall
Police 'fire teargas at protesters' in Tunisia
Turkey's Erdogan in Iran to mend ties after split over Syria
Egypt's Mubarak to be released, put under house arrest
Manmohan hopes to clinch nuclear deal with Japan
Embassies staying put in N. Korea despite tension
Obama to meet with Mandela family
At least 20 dead in Somalia attacks
Margaret Thatcher's funeral procession underway
Royal visit: Prince William and Catherine visit Parliament in Canberra tour
Two hurt in US school shooting
Five killed in Philippines volcano eruption
At least 40 killed by 11 Baghdad car bombs
Israel shoots down drone from Lebanon
Two killed in San Francisco plane crash 'were Chinese'
Stock futures slide on Syria tension, J.C. Penney shares fall
Iranian negotiator upbeat about latest nuclear talks
Everest avalanche kills 12 guides
Syrian opposition confirms participation in peace talks
Violent clashes mark anniversary of Egypt uprising
News Corp.'s Rupert Murdoch files for divorce from wife Wendi
Australia cuts interest rates to record low
Roadside bomb kills 3 policemen in southern Afghanistan
Violence forces Libya Prime Minister to step down
IMF rep among 14 killed in Kabul blast
CCTV: York conmen dress as women to trick pensioners
El-Sissi Inaugurated as Egypt's President
Cleveland kidnapper Ariel Castro found hanging in his cell
Russia to file piracy charges against Greenpeace
Syria divided opposition struggles within wider Syrian struggle
Google Unveils Concept Self-Driving Car
Bangladesh garment factory collapse kills 149
Clashes rage in Syria as US pushes peace talks
Syria offers concessions ahead of Geneva peace talks
Hagel seeks to reassure jittery Gulf allies after Iran deal
Security video shows Kenyan soldiers looting mall
Pope hits out at ‚Äėwar to sell arms‚Äô in Syria
Death toll hits 72 in Mumbai building collapse
Canada promises $5-million in typhoon relief
China's head of state assets regulator under probe for "discipline violation"
Pakistan power crisis looms large over election
Manufacturing hits seven-month low in China
Lebanon clashes rage near mosque; 16 soldiers dead
Mother-of-two, 25, found dead in her home by relatives as police name hunt for ex-boyfriend after launching murder inquiry
Greece to close state broadcaster to save money
Pakistan's Musharraf arrives at court for first time
10 Things to Know for Wednesday
Syria's Muslim Brotherhood faces uphill battle
Fresh corruption claims on Qatar World Cup
Guatemala's former leader found guilty of genocide
India‚Äôs march to Mars
Israel's West Bank control 'costing Palestinian economy billions'
Chinese shares rally Wednesday
Syrian mortars land in Israeli-occupied Golan Heights, Israel retaliates
Toyota, 3 other Japan carmakers to recall 3.4m vehicles over airbag
Six dead, dozens trapped in Indian building collapse
Washington pot shops prepare for historic sales
Somalia gang rape victim accuses AU force
Rio de Janeiro airport workers strike on eve of World Cup
Arrested Briton 'not significant' to Kenya attack probe
Egypt arrests Muslim Brotherhood leader Badie
5.2-magnitude quake hits Papua, Indonesia
US says Syria may have used sarin gas in chemical weapons
Iran, six world powers clinch breakthrough nuclear deal
Additional aid approved for Texas fertilizer plant blast
Hot Air Balloon 'Catches Fire And Crashes'
Mourinho to take Round 1
World unites for Mandela memorial
Indonesians vote for president in tight race
China stock index futures open mixed Friday
KL shares continue uptrend mid-afternoon
Anger in Dhaka as death toll climbs
What the Papers Say, Oct. 10, 2013
Three killed, six injured in Afghan blasts
2 Turkish airline pilots kidnapped by gunmen in Lebanon
Amazon unveils new Fire TV streaming video box
Palestinian arrested for sexually harassing young girls
Strong earthquake felt in Los Angeles
Former Israeli Prime Minister Sharon dies
China urges Japan to maintain regional peace
Obama To Meet Embattled Veterans Secretary
China yuan strengthens to 6.1070 against USD Friday
Huge tornado strikes near Oklahoma City
6 injured in clashes with Israeli forces near Bethlehem
US praises Ukraine deal; calls for concrete action
Obama urges no new sanctions on Iran
Syrian rebels skeptical of chemical weapons deal
Palestinian teen dies of wounds sustained in Israeli shooting
Cambodian rivals edge closer to deal over disputed poll
five men sentenced for costa concordia shipwreck disaster
S. Korea demands talks with N. Korea on closed factory
Deal curbing Iran nuclear drive to take effect Jan 20
Telstra applies to list China site in NY
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on August 18
Belgian king to address nation amid abdication speculation
38 feared dead in Russian psychiatric hospital fire
Hijacked aircraft lands in Geneva
Waqar Younis back as Pakistan coach
Saudi Urges U.N. Action against Israel Strikes on Syria
Malaysia: France has images of possible jet debris
Nine killed in Baghdad car bomb attacks
Peru protesters clash with police
Alibaba files for New York IPO
North Korea urges foreigners to leave South Korea
15 killed, 90 wounded in fresh attacks in Iraq
Iraq holds first polls since US pullout as attacks rise
Iran upbeat on 'useful' expert-level nuke talks
Indian guru arrested on suspicion of rape
Ukraine's top court dismisses Crimea's independence as "unconstitutional"
UN urges support for Syria opposition
Bangladesh collapse deaths top 620
Gunmen abduct Iranian embassy worker in Yemen
Chinese president arrives in Argentina for state visit
Bernanke stimulus boost to markets
Blast in popular Baghdad coffee shop kills at least 15
Cabinet at war over arming Syrian rebels
Afghan president to press for delay in US deal
Hong Kong stocks close 2.33% higher
Iran nuclear impasse to dominat...
43 killed, 86 wounded in attacks in Iraq
Indian rape accused found guilty
Syrian opposition confirms participation in peace talks
Nigella Lawson 'took cocaine every day for a decade'
Car bomb kills at least 10 in central Syria
Iran Nuclear Deal Sealed After Decades-Long Dispute
Labor ministry announcement due on Monday
Snowden sees "no chance" to get fair trial in U.S.
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on July 6
Indian minister killed in head-on collision
Brothers arrested in Mother's Day parade shooting
State: No funds for yeshiva that incites violence
Hong Kong stocks close 0.72% higher
Queen meets Britain's new baby prince
Egypt‚Äôs Sisi paves way for presidential bid
Microsoft sees end to Nokia losses, shares rise after hours
Biden: Time for Russia to 'stop talking and start acting' to reduce tension in Ukraine
Jordan: US Deploying Patriots, F-16s
Ukraine President Calls Talks To End Protests
Chinese vice president meets U.S. delegation
N.C. State Fair ride operator arrested after accident
EU foreign ministers to discuss Egypt on Wednesday
Cameron pushes U.N. resolution on Syrian chemical arms
Tunisia suspended from Davis Cup for refusing to play Israeli
Egypt Brotherhood deputy leader Shater arrested
Transcript Reveals Confusion Over Ferry Evacuation
Wall Street ends slightly lower
Egypt court sentences 100 Brotherhood backers
Russia: Syria Agrees to Participate in Conference
Aung San Suu Kyi for president in 2015?
Britain rejects Syria military action
New Zealand votes to legalise same-sex marriage
South Africa prepares to bury Mandela
Singapore stocks close 0.41 pct higher
South Korea Says Talks With North Scrapped
Senegalese president to visit China
Five staff jailed over Costa Concordia shipwreck
In Cairo Camps, Protesters Dig in and Live On
Missing Malaysia Airlines plane 'crashes off Vietnam'
Five soldiers killed in Yemen attack
Man admits threatening to kill Prince Harry
Malaysia Airlines investigating co-pilot on missing flight
Stars pay tribute to James Garner
China Investigates Head of Supervisory Commission
Manchester United owner Malcolm Glazer dies at 85
Los Angeles airport worker charged over 9/11 threats
Pakistani army, government at loggerheads over Taliban talks
Egypt Arrests Muslim Brotherhood Supporters Under Terror Law
The Note's Must-Reads for Friday, August 23, 2013
Solar-powered plane lands near Washington
Ukraine Rebels shoot down plane carrying 49
King Felipe VI to be sworn in as Spain‚Äôs royals look to a new era
Ronaldo hat-trick fires Portugal to World Cup
Israel Agrees to Free 104 Palestinian Prisoners as Part of Possible Deal to Restart Peace Talks
US soldier freed after 5 years in captivity in Afghanistan
China news agency says Malaysia Airlines plane lost contact over Vietnam
Neymar powers Brazil into World Cup last 16
Ukraine offers unilateral ceasefire
UK's Prince Philip hospitalized
Japan starts hearings on proposed tax hike
Malaysia PM set for general election
School bomb attack kills two in southern Thailand
Five Libyan soldiers killed in Benghazi clashes
Rolling Stones add second Hyde Park date
Passengers dead in Italy bus plunge
North Korea urges US to take ‚Äėreal actions‚Äô
Australian PM-elect Tony Abbott gets to grips with his new job
What the Papers Say, Dec. 30, 2013
Malaysia Airlines plane vanishes on flight to Beijing
Consumer spending up 0.2 percent in May
Scorpions drummer jailed in Dubai for ‚Äėinsulting Islam‚Äô
Putin's marriage at an end
Powerful new earthquake hits shattered Pakistan region
Syrian opposition offers Assad's forces truce for duration of Ramadan
US believes Syria used chemical weapons but says facts needed
Pakistani Army Starts Offensive Against Militants
At least 60 die in Iraq prison attack
Westgate attackers spent four months planning in Nairobi, says official
U.N. Security Council Calls for Unconditional Cease-Fire in Gaza
Toronto Mayor Rob Ford denies crack cocaine allegations
6.7-magnitude earthquake jolts Taiwan: CENC
Chinese shares close lower on Wednesday
Car bombings kill 13 civilians in Iraqi capital
More carriers likely in China
Ukraine protesters topple Lenin statue in Kiev
4 Taliban members arrested in night raid operation: Afghan police
Canadian government 'monitoring' train blast situation
Diana Nyad completes historic Cuba-Florida swim
US deploys military advisers to Somalia
Fast-food workers strike for higher pay
N. Korea test-fires 16 rockets into sea
'No plans' to resettle Syrian refugees in the UK
Syrian opposition: won't attend peace talks unless goal is Assad's exit
Gonsalves keeps up pressure on Dom Rep
Australia PM Abbott warns of lengthy search for MH370
Cameron loses parliamentary vote on Syria military action
China yuan strengthens to 6.1696 against USD Thursday
Flood alerts in France as river levels rise
China yuan weakens to 6.1510 against USD
Police vow to solve shootings of 19 in New Orleans
Thai protest leader shot dead outside polling station
Israeli forces shoot, injure Bethlehem teenager
US: Israel to delay Palestinian prisoner release
Morsi supporters march in Egypt
Algerians Vote in Presidential Election
Turkish PM tells supporters to prepare for rallies
Bodies of missing Israeli teens found in West Bank
Fresh clashes erupt in Turkey
Egyptian court sentences Muslim Brotherhood leader to life in prison
Syrian troops confront fierce attacks by rebels in military airport
Australia spied on Indonesia president: reports
Toronto Mayor Rob Ford: Claim he tried to buy crack video 'an outright lie'
China quake kills at least 179
Woman arrested for intrusion into Kinetic Rain sculpture at Changi Airport T1
Putin speaks on Ukraine, protesters rebuild barricades
Kerry Returns to Vietnam, Now as Top US Diplomat
Griff Rhys Jones: Mel Smith was 'a force for life'
Two dead, nine hurt in French building collapse
Chinese stocks close lower Thursday
Syrian Opposition Splintered Ahead of Peace Talks
Gunmen kill 10 foreign tourists in northern Pakistan
India Ink: Image of the Day: March 4
Plane crash lands at San Francisco airport
NSA whistleblower Edward Snowden offered asylum by Venezuela, Nicaragua and now Bolivia
Nigerian military says no foreign operation by allies
U.N. to regulate global arms trade
Israeli airstrike wounds two Palestinian activists in Gaza
Asian Muslims celebrate Eid as 52 die in Pakistan, Afghanistan
Suicide Bomber Kills 15 in Northern Iraq
Pakistan condemns US drone strike in Shawal Area
SC's ex-Gov. Sanford clears hurdle in comeback bid
Car Bomb Hits Swedish Consulate in Benghazi, None Hurt
SA President: Mandela 'remains in a critical condition'
6 killed in Iraq's violence
Florida appeals court overturns murder conviction of former FBI agent
35 killed, 138 wounded in wave of attacks in Iraq
Russian foreign minister to meet UN chief
Aust shares close higher
Wall Street rises on proposal to avert Syria strikes
Sudanese protesters demand the regime's ouster
Iraq army claims victory in Tikrit
Democrats Face Divide Over a Strike on Syria
Israel, Hamas reportedly agree to 12-hour truce
Death toll hits 63 in Mumbai building collapse
Austria's 'bearded lady' wins Eurovision Song Contest
S Korea bus station fire kills seven
Israel to release Palestinian prisoners
Obama calls for calm after Zimmerman acquittal; protests held
North Korea to restart Yongbyon nuclear reactor
Firefighters make ‚Äėexcellent‚Äô progress in battling massive California wildfire
Bombing Outside Restaurant in Pakistan Wounds 15
In Brazil, thousands turn out to greet Pope Francis
Three NATO soldiers killed in Afghanistan
Pressure rises on White House over Benghazi talking points
Three killed, 21 injured in two road mishaps
Israeli official confirms second air strike at Syria
China formalizes easing of one-child policy
Iran vote count gives Rowhani wide lead
Egypt: Protesters storm Muslim Brotherhood's HQ
Tokyo stocks open up 0.52%
Australia: Australia hands asylum-seekers back to Sri Lanka
Cryptic crossword - Saturday 20th April
Crocodile victim's body recovered
Afghan landslide death toll unlikely to rise above 500
Typhoon Haiyan: 195mph winds batter Philippines
Ten killed in new blast in Russia
British, Iranian foreign ministers to meet at UN
North Korea missile threat: latest
'Glee' star Cory Monteith found dead
Egypt declares month-long state of emergency
Nigeria official: Gunmen kill 30 in wedding convoy
Croatia countdowns to joining EU
Kenya Red Cross says death toll rises to 68
Tokyo stocks close 0.75pc down
Pyongyang prepares for next nuclear test - media
British Police Charge Two Men with Terror Offences
Palestinian ambassador injured in apartment blast
Five dead, 40 missing in Canad...
Iran's Khamenei renews support for nuclear talks
Turkish police fight protesters, clear square
HSE boss defends medical-card plan
Italy‚Äôs centre-left splinters in presidential vote
Fire at privately run immigration detention centre
Mufti : conspiracy aginst Syria targets its stances, particularly towards Palestine
Singapore stocks end up 0.16 pct
Israeli troops kill Palestinian in West Bank raid
Death toll from Egypt violence rises to 638
Hong Kong set for huge democracy rally
US Senate Confirms Janet Yellen as New Central Bank Chief
Tehran-London ties to improve
Syria opposition pressed to attend talks
Suicide attacks kill 24 people in Baghdad
Wild fire kills 19 firefighters in Arizona
GM to start taking recall compensation claims Aug 1
Syria rebels: We killed Hezbollah men in Lebanon
Ally of Georgia's billionaire PM to be president -exit polls
North Korea fires another missile
First case of MERS, a SARS-like respiratory illness, reported in North America
On war criminals and heroes: The whitewashing of Ariel Sharon
Obama to meet Ukrainian prime minister at White House
EU puts Hezbollah military wing on terror list
Rogers, Videotron reach network-sharing, spectrum deal
Suspected US Drone Kills 2 Militants in Pakistan
Scores 'killed' in Boko Haram raid in Nigeria
Syria welcomes Iran's nuclear deal
Top AIDS Researcher Killed in Malaysia Plane Crash
What the Papers Say, Aug. 19, 2013
Two killed in small plane crash at U.S. air show
Gunmen kill nine tourists in Pakistan
Ukraine says it will not bow to Russian "provocations" in Crimea
Two French journalists killed after Mali kidnapping
46 Indian nurses stranded in Iraq return home
Asian shares climb ahead of Fed decision
Reid: Letter with ricin or poison sent to senator
California governor declares drought emergency as wildfires continue to burn
3yo Palestinian girl killed in Israeli raid
11 children killed in Syria bombings
China yuan weakens to 6.1818 against USD Tuesday
Two are trapped as US building collapses
Ukraine will not give 'an inch' over Crimea
Israeli army kills 3 Palestinian militants in West Bank clashes
Man United hires Moyes to replace Ferguson
China returns 10 children abducted from Vietnam
Tropical Storm Barry weakens, dumps rain on Mexico
Japan mayor apologizes to U.S., denies wrong words on "comfort women"
43 killed, 86 wounded in attacks in Iraq
U.S. has not concluded Syria used chemical weapons -White House
US diplomat killed in Afghanistan worked with John Kerry
Egypt's arrest of Muslim Brotherhood supreme guide brings ban closer
Probe alleged use of chemical weapons in Syria
Kerry vows progress after latest intensive Mideast trip
Suicide attack at Iranian consulate in Peshawar kills two
Gunmen kill 3 Lebanese troops near Syria
Timelapse of Costa Concordia operation
Iran nuclear talks enter crucial third day
Texas won't switch execution drug
Twitter shares rocket as trading begins
Former Pakistani dictator Musharraf granted bail
Protests sweep Brazil despite concession
FTSE Bursa Malaysia update: 9 a.m.
Super Typhoon Whips Philippines and Taiwan then Heads for China
Dozens dead, 1,000 injured in China quake
E China reports 4 new H7N9 cases
Australian PM Rudd calls Sept. 7 poll
Suicide car bomb kills 12 in northern Iraq
Rudd sworn in as Australia's new Prime Minister
UK: Iran nuclear talks at a serious point
Yemen drone strike kills militants
Indian submarine explodes with 18 sailors on board
Susan Boyle tells British paper she has Asperger's
Bangladesh: Crackdown Escalates Ahead of Election
Breakthrough deal curbs Iran's nuclear activity
China stocks close lower on Thursday
Israeli army kills Palestinian militant in raid
Obama in ‚Äėdirect‚Äô confrontation with Putin on Ukraine
Death Toll Rises to 84 in Pakistan Floods
Ukraine's Poroshenko declares ceasefire
Berlusconi lashes out at tax fraud conviction
DC votes to decriminalize pot
Mandela spends third day in hospital
Obama: Korean War vets ‚Äėdeserve better‚Äô
3 Egyptian policemen killed by gunmen in Cairo attack
North Korean intrigue: The execution of power
Russia says Syria to remove chemical weapons this month
Margaret Thatcher dies at 87
Chinese president arrives in Venezuela for state visit
Four soldiers killed in Yemen
Israel to release Palestinian prisoners as part of deal to revive peace talks
Sky News Cameraman Killed In Egypt
Gunmen kill 9 foreign tourists, 1 Pakistani
Rudd to be sworn in as Australian prime minister
Protests Continue In Ukraine's Capital
Stocks inch higher in early trading
Jury selection begins in Zimmerman's trial
Brazil crowds greet Pope Francis
Iran nuclear talks extended to November 24
Egypt postpones dispersing pro-Morsi protest camps
Two French journalists abducted, killed in Northern Mali
Bangladesh building collapse death toll tops 1,000
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on July 29
Boston bombing suspect buried
Iranian Delegation Heads to Lebanon, Syria
Toll from India building collapse hits 25
Ammonia leak kills 15 in Shanghai
Ukraine's opposition chief wants more protests
At least 8 injured in large Boston blaze
US stocks retreat on manufacturing data
Five People Charged With Terror Offences
US Government Shutdown: Obama tells Republicans to lift threat to US economy if they want talks
No Sign of Russian Withdrawal From Ukraine Border, Official Says
Former Pakistan military ruler Pervez Musharraf granted bail
Teen survives five-hour flight to Hawaii 'in airplane wheel well'
Rahul Gandhi compares Narendra Modi to Hitler
Arsenal great Rice in hospital with cancer
FTSE Bursa Malaysia update: 3.00pm
One injured in Methodist Church building collapse
Bitterly fought India election campaign enters final day
46 Indian nurses stranded in Iraq return home
Egypt's draft constitution goes to interim president
Halfway through: Abdullah Abdullah leads Ashraf Ghani by 11 percent after partial count
Drone strike kills dozen in Pakistan
Glasgow Helicopter Crash: Woman PC Is Victim
Iran says Israel lying about rockets
Raid on Boston Marathon bombing suspect captured on film
Taiwan stocks end 0.68 pct lower
Israeli army hunts teens missing in West Bank
Six dead in Philippines bomb blast
Police helicopter crashes on top of bar in Glasgow
Gunmen kill Libyan deputy industry minister
Quotations of the day
Foreign exchange rates in India
US drone strike kills 10 in Pakistan
Mandela leaves hospital after 10 days
Remains in Winchester could be King Alfred the Great
Israel releases 26 Palestinian prisoners
Philippines government says peace talks with communists have failed
Ukraine to repeal anti-protest laws
Two skydivers dead after colliding during jump in Arizona
Quake hits Japan, no tsunami warning
Former British PM Margaret Thatcher dies
Eurozone crisis live: German parliament approves Cyprus bailout
'Iron Man' Jetpacks Spark Concerns
Israel releases 26 Palestinian prisoners
France urges EU to be united on Syria
Boston bombing suspect was under FBI surveillance, says mother
Hundreds die in massive Afghan landslide
Abdullah leading in Afghan presidential elections
China's anger at North Korea overcomes worry over U.S. stealth flights
Ukraine's acting president convenes Security Council over unrests in southeast
China stocks close lower on Thursday
London Marathon observes silence for Boston victims
China yuan weakens to 6.1705 against USD
Libya's foreign ministry cut off by armed men, official says
Man, 40, arrested after shooting
MH370 search yet to target most likely crash site, says British firm Inmarsat
China growth slows to 75 in AprilJune govt
Keita Wins Mali Presidential Election
Kerry Joins European Officials at Iran Nuclear Talks
Indian troops kill militant commander in Indian-controlled Kashmir
North Korea postpones war-torn family unions
Classic crossword - Friday 31st May
Neymar powers Brazil into World Cup last 16
Car bomb kills 40 in northwest Pakistan
WTO achieves historic trade deal in Bali
Colorado governor visits school shooting victim
Iran urges rapid release of diplomat
Texas house provisionally approves abortion law
N Korea 'fires 100 shells' into the sea
US Senate panel approves use of force against Syria
Woman dies in Co Cork house fire
Syria missile kills 26, including 8 kids
Polar bear study may boost fight against obesity
44 killed, 133 wounded in Iraq's violence
Junta Expects Next Thai Elections in October 2015
At least 350 dead as landslides swamp village
Nominations open for e.TV Ghana Most Influential Awards
India Ink: Image of the Day: May 2
Bachelet set for big win in Chile's 2-woman poll showdown
13 foreigners among 21 killed in Kabul restaurant attac...
Paul Walker dead: Fast and Furious star, 40, killed in car crash
US drone strike kills 4 in NW Pakistan
Chemical-weapons team attacked in Syria; all members safe
Hushen 300 Index ends higher Monday
France confirms two French journalists killed in Mali
US drone strike kills eleven in Pakistan
Mursi, Egypt army ready to die in 'Final Hours' showdown
Iran to build 2nd nuclear power plant
Pakistani Taliban 'elect new chief', vow 'unprecedented' revenge
Chinese stocks open lower Friday
Turkish president calls for calm amid nationwide protests
Gunmen Attack Hotel In Remote Pakistani Province
Israel And Hamas 'Accept Temporary Truce'
South Africans Embark on Day of ‚ÄėPrayer and Reflection‚Äô for Mandela
China Rushes Relief After Sichuan Quake Kills 188
UN Chemical Arms Experts To Visit Syria
Russia says Syria to remove chemical weapons this month
Wave of car bombs, other attacks kill 31 in Iraq
China's online population rises to 618 mln
5 die in Christian-Muslim clashes in Egypt
Iraq crisis: Tony Blair rejects 'bizarre' claims 2003 invasion caused current situation
Four dead in North Sea oil industry helicopter crash
Angry families demand answers after China plant fire kills 119
Iran rejects MKO claim on nuclear site
Minister's wife's death 'unnatural'
China set to overtake US as world's biggest goods trader
Erdogan slams top court for lifting Twitter ban
4 dead, 30 injured in train collision near Moscow
Egypt Postpones Dispersing Pro-Morsi Protest Camps
'Ready to go home:' Last Boston bombing victim leaves the hospital
02:41 156 killed in China earthquake
Afghan president delays signing US deal
Labour's 50p tax rate: what you need to know
Syrian civil war peace talks at risk from Iran invitation
New Iran nuclear talks probably in November: report
FM Spokeswoman: Iran against US military interference in Iraq
Doctors Without Borders Expelled From Myanmar
US Refueling Plane Crashes in Kyrgyzstan
Boeing 777 plane crash-lands at San Francisco airport
Israel allows Palestinian prisoner release
6.8 quake in shattered Pakistan region
China successfully launches manned spacecraft
US drone strike kills 8 in NW Pakistan
Jodi Arias jury deadlocks on penalty
Today in History, Feb. 19
Tutu says will attend Mandela funeral
Explosions heard near Afghan presidential palace
Pakistans Imran blames rival for killing party member
Venezuela Government, Opposition Head for Showdown
California Chrome wins Preakness, moves one win from Triple Crown
Retailers back Bangladesh factory safety pact
Man Sets Himself on Fire on National Mall, Flown to Hospital
Police fire teargas, water cannon at Istanbul protesters
Egypt Changes Venue for Trial of Ousted President
Cop killed near Boston, link to bombing unclear
Japan defends dolphin hunts after criticism from US
Bomb blasts before Indian opposition rally kill 4
Philippines typhoon death toll rises above 5,000
00:00 Syrian troops capture fabled Crusader castle
5th victim of Santa Monica shooting dies
Chavez heir Maduro wins Venezuela's presidency
Shanghai stock indices close higher -- July 23
Suicide attack kills at least 12 in northern Iraq
Strong quake strikes off eastern Indonesia
Japan: World's Oldest Man Ever Dies Aged 116
Saudi Arabia Turns Down UN Security Council Spot
11 killed in twin Iraq suicide bombings
Top Chinese political advisor meets Yemeni president
Palestinian ambassador injured in apartment blast
Ukraine Leader Pledges Crisis Talks
Moderate earthquake hits southern Pakistan
16 killed in series of attacks in Iraq
Europe floods continue to create havoc
NATO ups military presence amid Russian threat
Deaths rise in air strikes on Gaza
Turkish police fire teargas at protesters in Istanbul
Palestinian killed in Israeli raid
US suspects Syria used chemical weapons
Iran nuclear experts, world powers to resume talks next week
Egyptian court sentences Muslim Brotherhood leader to life in prison
At least 6 dead in Paris train crash
Spain Gambles on Costa in 23-Man World Cup Squad
Chinese president meets Indian vice president
AstraZeneca to buy Bristol out of diabetes venture for up to $4.1 billion
Australian icebreaker arrives in East Antarctica for new rescue bid
Boston bombing suspect charged in hospital bed
Indian stocks close lower
Egypt to hold more talks with IMF on loan next week
Magnitude-5.1 quake hits southern Iran -- USGS
FAA lifts ban on U.S. flights to Israel
Foreign exchange rates in Hong Kong
Israel Launches Ground Offensive In Gaza
Luxembourg votes after spying row
Ehud Olmert sentenced to six years in Israel
Amazon's Bezos rescued by Ecuador Navy due to kidney stone
Mediator apologizes to Syrians for lack of peace progress
occupied Palestinian territory: The EU, Denmark, Ireland, Italy, Luxembourg and The Netherlands make a ‚ā¨16.4 million contribution to the Palestinian Authority's payment of April salaries and pensions
Ukraine protesters battle police in new clashes
Syria peace talks delayed again
7 Things to Know About Ethanol
China yuan slightly advances to 6.1408 against USD Wednesday
China's stocks close lower on Monday
William Hague: US decision to halt missile test 'sensible'
Fire in Beijing kills ten
Nigeria offers 300000 reward for information on kidnapped girls
Maldives presidential candidate refuses to take part in key run-off
Japan: World's Oldest Man Ever Dies Aged 116
Classic crossword - Saturday 1st June
IAF jets strike Gaza after rocket fire
Vybz Kartel: Jamaican dancehall star found guilty of murder
India, China ink agreement on trans-border rivers
US drone strike in Pakistan kills five
Chemical weapons watchdog wins Nobel Peace prize
White House says Syria uses chemical weapons in conflict
One dead, 8 missing in Vietnam boat accident
Pakistan holds landmark election as 29 killed in attacks
Venezuela Expels 3 U.S. Diplomats
Boeing 777 crashes while landing at San Francisco airport
FINALLY: Microsoft touts Office for iPad ‚Äď but there's a catch
Heavy Smog Hits North China City, Flights Canceled
'Prince William more popular than Queen, Charles'
India on red alert as "super cyclone" nears east coast
Russia says ballistic 'objects' fired in Mediterranean
Egypt Islamists defiant after deadly clashes
Syria chemical arms production equipment destroyed
Seven kidnappers killed in southern Nigeria
Clash of Styles in Court Opens Trial in Young Man‚Äôs Death
China: Relief in focus as hope for missing fades
Islamic militants kill 9 foreign tourists, 1 Pakistani
Stolen skulls found in home museum
Bad Weather Arrives in Time for Thanksgiving Travel
Led Zeppelin to be sued over Stairway to Heaven
Egypt launches offensive against Sinai insurgents
At least 1 dead, 40 hospitalized in Southwest heat wave
President George W. Bush has stent procedure
Detroit eligible for bankruptcy protection
Bulgarian president tries to break election stalemate
Nobel Prize winning author Doris Lessing dies
Japanese PM Shinzo Abe's war shrine visit angers neighbours
Rugby fan dies after Scotland v England match
Global brands commit to Bangladesh safety after collapse
Israel Approves New Settlement Homes Ahead of Peace Talks
Shenzhen stock indices close higher -- July 23
World Cup live: Germany 0-0 Ghana
Egyptian security forces arrest Brotherhood leaders' son
Tokyo wins race to host 2020 Olympic Games
Firefighters perish in Arizona blaza
Funeral for Pakistan Taliban chief 'set to take place'
09:32 Putin signs off Crimea annexation
FAA lifts ban on U.S. flights to Tel Aviv
Indian media reports: 18 killed in Mumbai stampede
Mandela in ‚Äėcritical but stable‚Äô condition
France fears extremists will benefit from Egypt violence
Brazil leader breaks silence about protests
Two die in Mumbai building collapse
China demands explanation from US on Huawei spying report
China's Xi tells Vietnam wants peace in South China Sea
Thailand's opposition Democrat Party announces boycott of February general election
Police target illegal tobacco syndicate
12 killed in attack on Indian consulate in Afghan city
Janet Yellen: Five things you might not know
Obama voices willingness to talk with GOP on budget
US-Russia reach agreement on Syria weapons
Pakistan's Musharraf Charged In Bhutto Death
Probe alleged use of chemical weapons in Syria
Old TV alignments crack at the edges
UN: Iran Invited to Attend Syrian Peace Conference
Starbucks clears college degree path for workers
UN chief withdraws invitation for Iran to join Syria peace talks
Police: Utah soccer referee punched by player dies
Malawi's new president sworn in after disputed elections
British teenager killed in Magaluf hotel fall
Rouhani becomes new Iranian president
Israel criticizes Palestinian stance on settlers
Bomb kills 18 civilians in Afghanistan
Typhoon Haiyan: world sends relief to battered Philippines
Newspapers Review: Nakba Day Events Focus of Dailies
Syria agrees to surrender chemical weapons
Palestinian activist detained in Israeli raid
Massive hunt for gunmen after cop killed, another kidnapped during Sabah shootout
Death toll hits 72 in Mumbai building collapse
Crimean parliament formally applies to join Russia
Syria's Assad vows to comply with U.N. resolution
Crimea parliament votes to join Russia
Morsi supporters protest in Egypt
S. Korean president 'sorry' for ferry disaster
'Rapid inspection' of Britain's flood defences
American Chris Horner wins Tour of Spain
Obama mulls limited military action in Syria
he was the first speaker of the house in history to be fined.
and that's world wide.
hollywood will also be required to cast english actors to play english characters.
| decisions based on evidence so sueing companies like boeing because they want to build in a state his "friends" don't control is not hurting job growth?
then there's the fact of there being no footage and the body being buried at sea.
insignificant 20 bucks a week isn't?
agw has not been proven.
about the unemployment bill?
usconservatives.about.com.
according to the ships project manager, the entire american effort in 66 days has skimmed off 600,000 barrels of oil.
maher: america loves its troops 'the way michael vick loves dogs' | newsbusters.org
don't worry about him - he's a grown up.
for this reason they probably need to stay inside - unless they really change.
so, whom does the king stand for?
jackie battley and newt gingrich marriage profile -- marriage of newt gingrich and jackie battley newt gingrichs second wife dishes hard to esquire: his money woes, his philandering, his meltdown | tpmmuckraker newt gingrichs second wife dishes hard to esquire: his money woes, his philandering, his meltdown | tpmmuckraker newt gingrich - marital affairs in 1980, newt began a relationship with a woman he met at a political fundraiser, marianne.
not srs this "plot" smells a rat.
it just caused california criminals to go to other states less stringent.
i just don't know what to do for the best!
maher: america loves its troops 'the way michael vick loves dogs' | newsbusters.org
so ask yourself "do i deserve this for the rest of my life or do i deserve better?"...i
you "honored" the dead by pestering a group of people who were interested in not creating any more dead?
he is cutting spending.
and for people who have gone through that experience life is cheap and with a shell-shocked mind can be extremely dangerous to themselves and to others : often, none of that seems to matter once they've been used as means toward achieving an end desired by the machine.
the irony of wistful recollections of past protest adventures clothed as they were in a style and form so like their own caricatures of the "reactionary" forces they opposed, was just too much for me.
you call that an intelligent movement?
do you know who shareholders are?
5) that dlowan sees this as a personal attack is stretching far too thin-- "i think making excuses for racism is a dangerous form of racism.
it just doesn't make sense.
i don't know of anywhere in the us where there's actual abject poverty.
the last time they were below 16% was in 1950 and 1949 when they were 14.4% and 14.5%.
every single person who is assuming zimmerman should be in jail just because the kid he shot was black.
i can no longer support them.
do you have any family who can help you out?
claim: powell claimed that "unnamed sources" confirmed that saddam had authorized his field commanders to use biological weapons.
and they would try and put people together with volunteer opportunities.
what are you trying to say?
this is how the people on the right here treat truth.
3. im not sure if i can include objections and conerns i raised at the time about decisions.
maher: america loves its troops 'the way michael vick loves dogs' | newsbusters.org
i can no longer support them.
for them, the morality or lack of it was not the question.
thanks for the heads up.
that is how it works.
for your advice guys...my
but they did not ask for condoms.
about 80% of them have already.
that is a big claim, it would quite an amazing escalation if israel used nuclear bombs on iran.
a little over a year later i was surronded by bamboo, on my belly and scared.
that is what liberty is about, after all.
it just doesn't make sense.
and one thing that i do know is his having grown up in kenya - his view of the brits, for example, very different from the average american.
[quote=trajan;4550118] i am sorry for this news to you but this has been the case since...well,
but that is if one is being honest.
or are you truly just another libertarian lunkhead parroting your neocon/teabagger cousin's stupidity?
that's what laffer was saying and that's what you are choosing to ignore.
mushy has to be the odds on favorite.
she also told them to implement seal but they have not done this either.
you're talking about white house press releases.
opec aren't oil companies, braniac.
not srs this "plot" smells a rat.
who knows what has happened in the past, or what your dd has been told by others.
grief he's at the top of the list for the 4th year in a row.
i'm all good now i got a full time job with the feds.
if reid and pelosi had actually investigated gwb as you claim and i wished then he and many of his administration and other war criminals would now be in prison.
i know what you're trying to do, but you should aim it at someone who takes the bait.
know what im talking about.
president obama would continue that trend.
so now it is a fight for freedom of choice.
not to mention, the meds they give you tend to make the contractions stronger and more painful.
the gop is fighting for freedom of religion.
because gays are yucky and lobster tastes good drinking already?
and there will not be any stain on that money abetting abortions.
germany surrendered in april.
but i can also see the faces of the people i horrified..
the entitlement gravy train is off the tracks and out of gravy.
why didn't we ever hear about it during the bush admin when during his admin the national debt was more than doubled?
moving on..."what is limbaugh's or beck's "intent" when they take some innocuous comment uttered by someone in the obama administration,..."
i somewhat remember hearing on the news on the first (or second) day after his death that the compound was completed in the summer of 2010.
i'm not sure about any of those.
would't be shocked if they used nukes either tbh given the israeli mentality i would say we will see them strike iran.
this is absolutely sickening.
you're not talking about current events.
the left is fighting for freedom of choice.
the reality is it is not anyone's focus to actually improve the schools.
"i have asked the cabinet secretary to arrange for the civil service to provide support on request to parties engaged in discussions on the formation of government."
i have no problem with that.
you just completed another sweater and you don't know how to knit.
according to the ships project manager, the entire american effort in 66 days has skimmed off 600,000 barrels of oil.
- video shows usda official saying she didn't give 'full force' of help to white farmer try to read the entire thread before post, as it will make you appear less silly.
you really do need to read what other experts in the field are saying, my friend.
does anyone know if this is possible??
that is how it works.
any objective person can see that is what you all are doing.
i have called in sick when i wasn't cat...not
the entire caribbean poisoned?
sometime rights come into conflict and they need to be resolved.
imagine if rdean knew how to build an intelligent op only six percent of posters will read that entire article.
president obama would continue that trend.
you could kill an entire police force.
the bush administration put them back in.
they are merely retaliating to whatever our politicians throw at them!
the jury is charged on the law and in this case material fact was the free speech 1st amendment protection.
i'd say the precedent was set when the democrats gave clinton a pass for lying under oath.
why do you think that commandment is there?
that is how it works.
the official, who spoke on condition of anonymity, said he was receiving his information from an afghan officer in kabul.
he would drive and i would come along just in case they wanted to hire us to carry things for them.
doesn't have the vision to "sustain" apollo?
and the only reason they are there is because of insane student loan practices that are identical in everyway to the insane mortgage loan practices.
no need for lawyers because the strings are pulled so that they aren't ever charged in the first place.
but over the years we have sort of thrown a blanket over presidential private lives.
if not, stop talking about due process.
- ronald reagan thank you all for your input.
you've worn the finish off your coffee table.
i saved up for it because i knew i was going to need it.
my understanding of a "bubble" is a sector that is artificially propped up..despite
quite simply because they're pissing on the graves of those who died.
i'm having trouble with you analogy.
your chest does not touch the walls, you just lean into the place where the walls meet.
like i said earlier, if only 10% of the horseshit you rightwing bitches said were true then our wonderful country would have folded like a cheap suit in or about 1777.
all of this is just awful.
then they hear the defence - plus get an education about the principles of sentencing.
i believe that the iran issue is more of an israeli problem then it is of the usa or the western world.
further, you will stop playing baseball.
about 80% of them have already.
3. im not sure if i can include objections and conerns i raised at the time about decisions.
i was telephoned by a police officer who performed the indentification part of the process for the coroner then explained he would come round and take my statement.
thank you for your concern pelastration.
i'm not a huge fan, but i have to give credit where credit is due and he's wiping the floor with the republican field in these debates.
if that is not a self made man i have never heard of one.
it might not be even his fault.
for the first 1-2 years he hated me going out with my friends.
the last time i saw her i was 12 years old.
i am done with this thread.
the story that a soldier related to larry king about how he died is now known to be a false.
depression is when you lose yours.
any assistance would be much appreciated.
you don't get mad, you get steamed.
also, are you a member of a church or faith?
wtf is that all about?
and could have quite legitimate reasons for not wishing to have any further contact with you.
they are all a bunch of spoiled kids, or whiny adults that want other people to take care of them.
being an american is not a valid biological phenomenon either, yet, all of you consider yourselves americans.
that is how it works.
perhaps they are starting to realize that the president isn't a cure-all for a damaged economy.
president obama is doing a bang up job.
i never got a birthday or xmas card, let alone anything else.
where did i say it did?
people get dizzy just watching you.
man, you socialists/progressives really are lost.
perhaps you should just keep your eye on the situation and see how it goes.
thanks for the heads up.
it looks like it can be brought under control now that it's capped.
does anyone else find that astonishing?
so i'm not much help.
would't be shocked if they used nukes either tbh that is a big claim, it would quite an amazing escalation if israel used nuclear bombs on iran.
it's whether or not political rhetoric can cause people to do violence.
or are you truly just another libertarian lunkhead parroting your neocon/teabagger cousin's stupidity?
and i did get a check from my dad when he passed away.
but where were the public tea parties!!!!!!!!!??????
all of the reasons that we left madison are catching up with us, sadly.
the career conspiracy exploiters and the lunatics they exploit, we're already familiar with.
i've yet to hear anyone exonerate loughner of his crimes on the grounds that the media, not he, was solely to blame.
romney: well, i dont think he had as much as some people might have imagined.
take away their method of making money and they lose their power.
someone needs to go to jail for that one.
all you did is demonstrate your complete ignorance.
you're not talking about current events.
he still hasn't to this day.
those are just some of the issues.
this has never been a secular nation, ever.
maybe they don't like race baiting?
add into it the disruption of their financial connections.
vor: you don't think of them as horrible, fascist brutes?
the court must take into consideration the technology of the times in their ruling.
it really is everything.
>>>> i don't think the government need to recognize anything as pertains to marriage.
but where were the public tea parties!!!!!!!!!??????
the jihadists have little hope of being able to hijack any more planes so easily.
government - historical debt outstanding - annual 2000 - 2009 the 2009 debt number is from the bush administration's fiscal year.
we don't have sugar cane climate here in the u.s..
you need to take action and you need to take it now!
do you know what a forecast is?
grief he's at the top of the list for the 4th year in a row.
"republicans deregulated osha and the epa" osha and epa are regulatory agencies.
being a university student.
at the same time, an asian summit is being held in a tourist resort.
in syria, 90% of the people are levantine arabs; the rest are kurds, armenians, turkmens, etc. you say that as if "levantine arab" was some sort of cohesive ethnic group in syria.
that was a stupid question and didn't deserve and answer..
wtf are you babbling about?
if she were here with you now do you think she would want you to be so very unhappy?
what happened to america being a nation of laws and not men?
is a bank going to invest in a community that has been wiped out?
but where were the public tea parties!!!!!!!!!??????
if you doubt it, just look at the ideologues they put on the thing.
every winter driving on icy roads affects thousands of people.
your husband sounds lovely, lean on him.
grief he's at the top of the list for the 4th year in a row.
the people have a right to know!"
there was no surplus.
explain to me, in detail, and using the small words you can understand, how that is not an example of a self made man.
a bubble is a market that is artificially propped up for any reason.
the problem is us, through and through.
i don't mean to be dense, but why do you have to find out what his long term intentions are?
what about javier solana?
that is the entire case.
friends often say i'm lazy, and i can't disagree a lot of the time.
sue them and try to get some money out of them.
the net result would be devastating to the poorest of the poor.
i just remember tumbling down.
i'm not talking about this year, maggie.
ishallriseagain fucked around with this message at jan 04, 2012 around 06:06 every single person who is assuming zimmerman should be in jail just because the kid he shot was black.
you want to come back as a coffee mug in your next life.
sent him a text asking him to let me know he was ok, no reply.
what makes you think they are our equal now or anytime in the forseeable future?
actually social security does have something to do with marriage in the way it (ss) is administered.
he was made redundant just before he moved to the states so he would have received a lump sum from them (plus extra money for having two children).
he's not ranting against the troops.
1984 founds the national rainbow coalition.
government - historical debt outstanding - annual 2000 - 2009 the 2009 debt number is from the bush administration's fiscal year.
how they can claim the father of the soldier is a public figure is absurd.
the gravy train really is all out of gravy.
point me in the direction of all those tea baggers who were out there screaming about the bush deficit spending.
wish i could stop thinking this way.
sadly, by then we had already lost the political war on the streets and campuses of the united states.
and the hunter said, "shoot up here amongst us.
still trying to believe that the world is a zero sum game?
why would walker's cronies reject an offer to order the "sleeping protesters" out of the capitol?
however, an article i read in the most recent edition of reason magazine seems to paint a more realistic picture.
every winter driving on icy roads affects thousands of people.
your comparison of the bush years with the clinton years is a joke.
sue them and try to get some money out of them.
that is the entire case.
a bubble is a market that is artificially propped up for any reason.
the jury is charged on the law and in this case material fact was the free speech 1st amendment protection.
in the past he has said that the party that wins should have first right to try to form a government.
he lauded the improvements achieved [in the past] nine years [..],
there's not even an investigation.
and thats about it - dont know more than that.
wtf is that all about?
don't want to read and run but i don't know what to say.
man, you socialists/progressives really are lost.
at our center, the director is the last one out the door.
the gravy train really is all out of gravy.
i am no bleeding heart - well, i am - but it bleeds for both sides, actually.
how old is that program?
this is what we all feared was going on anyway.
i do see what you are saying tho.there
the japanese had several negotiated settlements on the table.
in that case paypal refused to unfreeze the account and also refused to transfer the money to the red cross because of a business deal it had made with united way.
and you have a problem with this?
insurance with one that offers it or take insurance with one thayt doesnt.
the old man was a strange enigma.
and yes the two bombs ended the pacific war, with out them we would have been forced to invade them.
we once got home just as it got too dark to see without a flashlight.
are the "sheep" really buying into this?
you are a dishonest and mindless hack...
mass media are a good mirror to show how much a life is worth or worthless for them in different parts of the world.
they should just amend the house rules...stop
do you have to go back to roosevelt?
i asked if they could tell me when the money would be in my account they said that was not possible.
how is that possible?
wtf are you talking about?
one would think they would run with the story, but they haven't.
i saved up for it because i knew i was going to need it.
they might be hiding him or something, in which case what is the problem?
you must have seen zona's post on the other thread.
i think it's a real shame on the part of our government for treating them like this.
are you just being a stupid crank with this neocon/teabagger bs?
in the 60s i went to the east coast because that is where the power center is located.
friend has the nerve to tell him to "man up".
doesn't matter, that will just be obama's fault as well.
sorry for your loss, this could be handy.
here is yet another reason why we should also get out of afghanistan and cut our losses.
i also remember the carpeting in that house, as light blue, though my mother says it was light green.
florsheim's women shoe stores were called thayer mcneil.
i wanted to be free to tell someone to go to hell.
any help would be much appreciated.
i haven't found the nerve to ask my aunt about it.
you haven't answered that yet.
what happened to america being a nation of laws and not men?
something rather strange happened last night.
the rioters are pretty focused on the police and the president.
misrepresented stelow's position so i'm replacing it with: you answer the door before people knock.
there are some things you don't need to be told since they are so bleeding obvious?
there has to be a present risk of harm, editec.
that would be me for 40+ years (except for the feet first part).
i went out & found new friends.
to the bitter end, the official position of the clinton administration was that it couldn't say for sure who was responsible for the cole attack.
actually, the whole "contraception" drum is being pounded by the liberals in an attempt at gotcha politics.
i've never seen any other child kept after school.
this is the wrong thread for this.
it's not the catastrophe that was reported and fishing boats are heading back out.
i tried to call and there was no answer.
you say you like the plan to abolish czars.
i've seen some debates where krugman's opponent had him practically in tears.
the rioters are pretty focused on the police and the president.
when i got to our bedroom i noticed oh's safe which is screwed to the wall at the bottom of our wardrobe was missing.
7 comments weigh in corrections?
in fact, it is about as possible as affording cobra.
i'm so sorry to hear of your losses, mos and bogof.
this is what we all feared was going on anyway.
of course they are because without the "expansion" they have no argument.
but in the case of the park 51 mosque, he seems to do a complete backflip.
their point is that the embryo is a human being and is therefore subject to all the rights and protections of the constitution.
ya think he wanted to hire new people?
you really do need to read what other experts in the field are saying, my friend.
so that is the end of that.
how did you get in the camp?
other parts of the study's methodology is flawed.
i put the words they probably said...
in fact, watching fox will tell you the exact opposite of what you are claiming.
i don't think most brits want to start at the bottom and do tedious low paid jobs before they get the experience to climb up the career ladder.
seeing g go was a real eye opener.
if the death was a sham, then this wouldn't be the first time governmetns have used propaganda stories for their benefit..
but the death penalty bill was passed after the fact and so manson and his gang will have the luxury of living in prison till they die.
i know i don't want to be in this relationship.
but don't demand your fellow citizens pay for your own mistakes or problems with banks.
it does not matter what your sexual preference's are.
for the first time the government's agenda from outsourcing the writing up of patients notes to south africa to asking district nurses to make a "business case" for helping patients has angered everybody in the profession.
when they post the 2010 numbers, that will be obama's.
perhaps they are starting to realize that the president isn't a cure-all for a damaged economy.
that is what the founders of the movement intended.
i have other priorities.
i don't think a "national" minimum wage makes any sense, since the purchasing power varies wildly from state to state.
at our center, the director is the last one out the door.
and he spent his money on things he cared about.
he's brought dignity back to the office.
also mentioned that the bush administration is not in favor of raising minimum wage.
basically it's a kind of incitment to riot and it ought to be illegal.
kind of like america, i guess.
she does excellent work in the middel east.
but our parents said "oh no, it was an accident".
i think you're missing the entire point.
you name your cats "cream" and "sugar."
however, i went to see them to review his iep and they said he has huge concentration issues (amongst other things) and they cannot get him to sit and write more than 3 lines.
we are the home of tesla motors that only the "sean penns" of the world can afford.
it has now been lifted.
the lie that japan was ready to surrender is revisionist history.
the dialogue from the movie in your head.
you are not married to him - you are still living at home.
i am not a fan of autobiographies because they contain so much information i don't care about.
like the "housing" bubble at the beginning of the bush administration.
i think you're missing the entire point.
how about when the bush administration broke the law and engaged in warrantless wiretaps.
it is all about the entitlements.
others have the right to their opinions as always, we don't have to agree, and there's little chance we ever will agree.
we have traffic laws that exist for no reason other than to fine motorists.
hopefully you have been declaring this income to the taxman?
me: i'm getting married!!!
governments exist for a reason.
hell, i didn't even mention the fact that rich people can afford better legal counsel.
am i missing something here?
the tories have picked up 92 seats but the swing is not enough to give them an overall majority.
he is 5 and in year 1.
and that's the truth.
i mean, being a history student..
so we wanted to be alike.
i suppose that is one of the reasons i see this whole stem cell thing as so weird.
you just have to think what you want, it may seem tough on others.
i tried on several occasions to get written replies but they were never forthcoming.
2) so you are saying that it wasn't worth it if it went over a certain cost.
not the same as the estate tax at all.
they never get presidential attendence do they?
debt slavery here's a hint.
i would still say that evolution is for a species or population as individuals can't and don't evolve.
he was sentenced to life at age 14 but it has been overturned.
it was a long summer.
i have also just realised my wife is now in the exact same situation.
no one really wants to talk about anythiing else.
i come back home to my family.
but over the years we have sort of thrown a blanket over presidential private lives.
this is starting to sound like a mantra.
isnt the point of treatment to make the patient feel better?
but when i went the first time.
it is all a criminal enterprise.
for your advice guys...my
but there is nothing that you are willing to do that will rectify the problem.
even though you cannot name a single murder carried out in their name?
does anyone know if this is possible??
the world's largest oil skimmer has sat immobile for weeks on end as the bp oil leak gushed.
most christians do not hate gay's, they hate the sin.
they're pretty inexpensive.
this is england, we are a 3rd world dumping ground for some reason..
if we could only learn from our mistakes!
mostly because i am not defending the democrats in congress.
i always thought the house had to be sold before you could divorce.
it would probably be at least as true to say that those who work the hardest are paid the least.
it is a great thing to do.
made good on his campaign promises which ones?
i'll be interested to read the particulars of the study when they become available.
ah...so the god with the most believers wins?
but what i'd have gone for in your situation would be a registry office wedding with two witnesses and a party in the evening.
the first baptist church in his hometown had to take up a collection to support the family gingrich had deserted.
the whole world was astonished and followed the beast.
things will get better.
get your head out of ron paul's ass, will ya please.
for them, and for the country.
that's nothing new in iraq.
and what happened to that lie you were going to cite in cristol's book?
a conventional strike on iran is going to raise massive geopolitical consequences too.
i think you're missing the entire point.
the usda and the naacp should have verified the story before they jumped the gun and threw ms sherrod under the bus.
some of us go with fact, you prefer fiction.
denial is not just a river in egypt.
the rest of your post is opinion.
if you don't agree, refute it.
but the nightmare scenario is having him alive and in detention, awaiting trial.
and if the population of the us had risen by the same percentage, that would also explain the increase in the number of people in prision.
didnt need it in the past and it does not need it now.
continued pt three times a week.
granted we never took baths together.
just when was that little bit of legislation signed into law?
many kids are born in sterile hospital rooms and then everyone just leaves them alone and lets them die.
we had been "bombing them into submission for four years under johnson, the problem was we were bombing the wrong things.
i was in my prime throughout the fight.
she stated that they could not take complaint over the phone but they had to be in writing or by email.
fundamentally, i think it squicked everyone out to the point they wanted the story over.
inherited that when his father died.
start overpaying as an option also.
so haven't bothered for a while.
and yes the two bombs ended the pacific war, with out them we would have been forced to invade them.
i don't even know if they will know if he has passed away or not..
there are a few other early memories, but i can't date them.
now everyone knows that nsa stands for no such agency.
and i can't say the gop would be any different if they get in.
i stopped going out with friends who i had been friends with all the way through school.
the attorney for the church is the daughter of the nut case pastor.
you can read about the case below.
i don't know about that.
thanks for thinking of me, but i don't have the desire to appear on his show.
the lawmakers choice to bail out the banks is an entirely separate issue of accountability.
your comparison of the bush years with the clinton years is a joke.
then you birds got nuttin to worry about..
i have no remembrance of the speeches made before jfk's grave that day.
i don't know what is wrong with repubs anymore.
and come to think of it, in recent times too.
is what bp should tell them?
to the op and those that seem to be in agreement with it's bogus implication...
hth nicky why are you wasting your life on this viscious, useless waste of space ?
then they are talking money out of something else.
my family has been told by state department (today) that there is no evacuation order in place, and that there is nothing we can do but wait.
but one week after thai prime minister abhisit vejajjiva declared a state of emergency to put down violent protests here by red-shirted opponents, who sought his resignation, the shock waves are still rippling through a polarized, shaken nation.
why do you hate america so much?
i have other priorities.
the bill was passed in the lower house of the french parliament in december, but it needs to be approved by the senate to go into effect.
don't you follow, and want our laws to follow all of leviticus?
i need to set these things correct so that the record will be clear testimonyat rex's sanity hearing.
i looked him in the eyes and said that these young me did what they had to do, they should have no regrets or feel bad and it should have been done sooner.
quote: the existence of 2 (presumably) youngish children would suggest that the marriage is not the cold and unrewarding one the husband would have you believe.
and they are the problem, simply because they cause a demand on other people's resources.
and what do you know, receipts stayed about the same.
i thought they were very pretty and elegant.
every true monopoly that has ever existed has been government enforced.
tilman was an athiest and a patriot.
why do you hate people that work in their own home?
you really do need to read what other experts in the field are saying, my friend.
it's so stupid because i will still have to have it done and she won't be there.
what about javier solana?
i am talking about the iraq before and during the gulf war.
or, they (male and female) are nuts.
in the absence of proof using links with facts, your post is opinion.
if that is the case then i understand and agree, it's just the way the article is written it sounds as if the police officer is doing a lot of the work, and it's in america so different laws to here.
but i can understand how some might have found it insensitive.
the conventional view is that the us and ussr fought it out in the body of vietnam.
the courts will have a difficult time deciding this one.
to my dismay, i am having to change my car to suit the roads.
for me ups on large dish orders works good.
has nothing to do with wealth...just
unfortunately, i can't bury my head in the sand.
if that ain't enigmatic, what is?
just stating my mind.
he was my first serious boyfriend, he'd been with somebody for 2 years before me.
the reason we do the sidewalk test is so that you can feel the difference from carpet to cement.
as part of the process, fine.
however, i might try to find someone with the means and skills to investigate the position because i do think it has merit.
it is time to sweep newt into the dustbin.
i thought they were very pretty and elegant.
but, since you are taking it seriously, the least you could do is be honest with yourself.
you're hearing only what you want to hear and imagining the rest.
but, i don't know the outcomes or if it really had any effect.
or does anyone know any way i could help it?
two atomic bombs and the soviet invasion ended the war with very little casualties to americans.
seems there isn't a whole lot of disagreement with this decision after all.
i think it's a real shame on the part of our government for treating them like this.
cops above the law and criminals glorified over law abiding citizens.
april/may/june 1963 becomes a leader of civil rights demonstrations in greensboro, north carolina.
but i think it would take a pretty damn big nuke to change the straight.
and for them to make a meal?
this september i left home, and started at university.
i was really surprised at how much it actually helped to alleviate the discomfort and pain.
do you think the russians can be trusted to let us hitch a ride to the space station or allow us to fix our communications satellites.
do not pay attention to the evidence!
the teacher was a bit surprised.
eisenhower and summersby is ignored again because it is pointless and squicky.
why are even here on an environment form?
i don't believe most progressives even understand the difference between the state and federal government.
i really just dont know what to do or think anymore.
my sister is two years younger than i am, and i remember the day she came home from the hospital.
they are just doing another day at work.
they told me they are not regulated by the fsa (although i have emailed the fsa to check this).
beyond the immediate shock, i was made to feel like a complete a$$hole, but that's besides the point.
came home, and the basement door had been kicked in.
when my dad died, i got five copies, and could have done with a couple more.
hun - you dont like this person.
those idiots can only think of one answer to the question because anything else would spoinl their attempt to make this a race issue.
anyone thinking our government is not run by money, is a fool.
i simply don't get why iran is such a huge threat.
unions are for those that have no other skill other than a 5th grade educated worker has with a hammer in their hand.
the only thing that is important is the child.
if not get the hell out of there.
fdny is city government and they were on site since the planes hit.
william hill have cut the odds on the prime minister leaving this year from 5/1 to 9/4.
i can't see his death reducing the scale of the 'war on terror'..
ds said they were played a tune on the piano and had to him it back.
@edgarblythe, one of the most fiery (and dangerous) people i've known absolutely laid down when death was coming.
and the new government often pays attention to improving the lot of its citizens, at least for a while.
she then said she could not give me their number.
some institutions are self insured because they make enough profit to cover the liabilities.
nope, as i have said before we haven't been up to much of that.
they were reserved for adults.
i suppose it's against the rules for democrats to question these things...i
seeing g go was a real eye opener.
can you relate to me how that is, exactly?
in addition, they covered the lodge with materials that didn't allow for decent air flow.
if not forget what i said.
they didn't even have a train station...
two years on, she sorted out her problems and is now so happy.
i don't think that anyone has "killed it" in the debates.
she actually asked me if i had a can of pumpkin for back up.
i wouldn't say it's racist, just insular great thread.
it sounds like you are going to have a really busy weekend without going to work anyways...and
there has to be a present risk of harm, editec.
the problem is that this man was violent and abused me beating me and generally hurting me.
laws should be for everyone.
but the situation that led to the war was the result of western nations dividing and using that land to their own ends.
everyone in the real world thought she was lying through her teeth...
it worked in the snyder case.
if so i'd try and get the same sort of flowers hi, so sorry for your loss.
you will find you are treated with great respect with that typoe of approach.
i also adored to listen to my grandpa's wwii stories.
thus meaning, there would be no investigation, no folow up and of course, no crime ref no for the insurance company.
either way makes as much sense as the other.
they are also part of the british commonwealth - see what it did for them.
until i know the facts i won't make a decision.
so feeding these people now so ten times as many suffer in the future is more kind and humane?
my first blog post being directed towards the current rioting in the uk, as you may have guessed by now.
another uncle works at the janesville plant currently.
i can hear the desperation in your words.
but look at the other side.
we must perform superior customer service for all of them.
and the points of light foundation continues to help the nation find opportunities for people to serve one another.
but there is "outside the box", which is where you are.
it displaces more water than an aircraft carrier.
are you just in denial?
my marriage has finally ended after 20 years.
top of the food chain.
that is the real purpose behind so-called "free trade."
looks like pat robertson is now concerned about global warming, and taking it seriously.
i didn't realize the casualties were that high this year.
police are convinced that there are people who know something, but no one has come forward with any information.
i wanted to be free to tell someone to go to hell.
why did they lose their entire life?
*laughs* thankies for the link!
warning - some info might be tmi.
the courts will have a difficult time deciding this one.
and that's a tall order.
the bf put boxes in the crate to make it smaller.
i really do hope more americans turn to god in the future.
then i found others that countered what she said.
is there anything at all that might have caused this you think?
hey, they sell them at a store near me, osso...
and that was certainly a motivator for me to work my way up the career ladder of my profession.
i think watergate is a prefect example of what i am asking about.
blaming politicians, pundits and internet speech is not the answer here.
then i found others that countered what she said.
i appreciate the chance to read the reasoning behind other viewpoints.
if the death was a sham, then this wouldn't be the first time governmetns have used propaganda stories for their benefit..
the loan was originally to combine other debt and buy a new car.
it is a national campaign that wants people to stop snitchin' on people who commit crimes.
she started out with shit pay..long
i agree with there goes trouble.
if i may say...sounds
they lined up to insist that the government had to change direction if the party was to win a fourth term.
all done in the arrogant self belief that they know best."
got close to 19% of the popular vote, and finished in third place despite having withdrawn from the race.
we have never claimed on our contents insurance before and so i don't know what the correct protocol is.
replace them with your own.
partisans cheer the subversion of the law because "their team" got away with it, and they care only about their party, not justice.
what have they done to deserve this?
these people are not better than you, don't see them as scary.
where did i say it did?
turning american against american is just wrong.
her: your brother's in the hospital and he's not going to last the night.
evidently, the french made a big deal about getting rid of veils in algeria as part of their colonization efforts.
if i were you, i'd be embarassed to voice your ignorance in public.
i buy food in that we all like and she uses it or goes to the shop to buy with her own money what she does like.
but when it came to what i questioned?
the last time i saw her i was 12 years old.
i always enjoyed this right on the money tsm.
the protests are not going to end.
if that is not a self made man i have never heard of one.
you will cease playing american football.
unless you happen to think that freedom of religion = supporting terrorists.
even though the people who run camp take notice are aware of what went down, they decided to take no action on it.
this won't be the last rise in tuition fees.
you get a speeding ticket even when you're parked.
at least that's what studies show.
the arab league is not something that should be taken seriously.
the entire caribbean poisoned?
does she not have her annual state pension notification?
then, the bubble bursts and we have to assign accountability.
hun, i wouldnt have said 'nothing much just childish stuff' in relation to this.
i guess i was obscure in the idea, clear in my own mind, that some shoes could be a poor choice for people with certain kinds of foot pronation.
often but i have done it.
surely this is entrapment? he didn't actually do anything because they basically lead him into the situation?
so it is a society with a very male testosterone-rich style.
the fact is we were burgled and these items were stolen.
i wanted to speak to the head on the teachers recommendation but he was really busy.
i wouldnt be able to change to a buy to let mortgage.
i'll be interested to read the particulars of the study when they become available.
then they are talking money out of something else.
so we have to think for them.
do you know what a forecast is?
i didn't realize the casualties were that high this year.
the gop is fighting on the basis of religious institutions.
this is totally unacceptable!
his mother wouldn't allow it, she wanted to have it at her house, which was fine.
your chest does not touch the walls, you just lean into the place where the walls meet.
know what im talking about.
the entitlement gravy train is off the tracks and out of gravy.
and definitely didn't want to go into a nursing home.
she has said that the club has helped her with the grieving as she has so many friends there.
she also knew they were lying when they told her they would bring her home on her birthday.
then i found others that countered what she said.
if you did, you wouldn't be posting the past yuck of unregulation of mining.
i tried on several occasions to get written replies but they were never forthcoming.
let's hope the frogs do the right thing.
it certainly does present some ethical problems.
they are killing themselves as a politcal force.
as a bank manager, you would expect him to have made a will but people are strange and he may not have done.
he's been selected for the 2nd year running to go to a 'workshop' day at the local secondary school which specialises in science.
there are 364 other days a year to protest the war and the lack of respect shown does not reflect well on our local peaceniks.
she had to get her masters.
i suppose it's against the rules for democrats to question these things...i
it certainly does present some ethical problems.
they are just now in the middle of a trial and even though they do have some witnesses against the police officers there are a lot more that still are not talking.
but i can understand how some might have found it insensitive.
gypsies were not dragged in, but they were enslaved by the local lords anyway, for they were nomads and had no status.
if he had been like you those papers would have been dead by now and no one would have heard of murdoch.
waiting in an outer hall, i stood to the side as my boss conversed with someone.
he promised her the world, and on the basis of this, she had his baby.
and it didnt bother me.
i thought the arab league and un had just asked us to implement a no fly zone.
no point in shutting the door after the horse has bolted.
i haven't found the nerve to ask my aunt about it.
in the end we are all the same and we return to worm food!
i can't help thinking that she's a golddigger.
because i think what she suffered was a form of patriarchy.
that was a stupid question and didn't deserve and answer..
education demand is false.
i don't mean for president; i mean out of the country.
they didn't appear so noble to us then.
it is a great thing to do.
i just wanted to say that in my experience the fear of the unknown is the worst thing.
“i think palin handled it fine,” giuliani says.
i think this old guy is scared of dying without the recognition that he killed some ppl and trying to make history.
i am wary about doing this as i am unable to find the letter that agreed to me letting out my flat.
ladbrokes have cut the odds on john prescott becoming the next prime minister from 100/1 to 25/1 following a rush of bets.
she has said that the club has helped her with the grieving as she has so many friends there.
you think they're bluffing about that?
it would be good to hear the stories, you know - good to get to understand what the world is about.
and you have a problem with this?
in 1976 when carter signed the amnesty for those that went to canada my father tells me that he knows my stance in the past but now i should be mad as hell.
unfortunatly, florists really rack up the prices for funerals.
he told the the administration what they wanted to hear.
when i have more time (tomorrow), i will provide the sources for all of this information.
mostly because i am not defending the democrats in congress.
i asked if they could tell me when the money would be in my account they said that was not possible.
either he has the facts right or he doesn't.
my mum had a go at me about curtains a few weeks back.this
based on the historical record, that recovery was imminent, within a couple of months or so.
and the hunter said, "shoot up here amongst us.
if you wanted a parade or a traditional memorial day ceremony there were plenty to go to.
the second option would greatly slow the legislative process.
i just read about this story.
which is fairly damning, since it's one of the longest running programs in the country.
i think you need to look at the valuation of your home year over year.
this is of course, upsetting.
i feel you are a good man, i truly like you.
sometime rights come into conflict and they need to be resolved.
you haven't answered that yet.
that lasted about six months until i found myself for the first time out of composure, calm, and ideas in the air.
then, that there was nothing economically that we could do about the greenhouse gases.
i hope it works out in the end...
i have some good news!
is there any property involved?
marriage is a creation of the state...
as part of the process, fine.
after camping and coming home we searched high and low and could not find them.
please stop treating your supposition and conjecture as fact.
i left the site determined to still love the man he once was to me and so i continue to listen to his records to this day.
also, assuming the whole thing is a sham..
that was also about a blow job, of course.
now, i've actually read the responses, and also agree with dlowan.
i think newt has been the most accurate and forthright.
i take it you did not hear the racist motherfuckers applauding during her story, all the while not knowing what she had to say at the end only six percent of posters will read that entire article.
who's got a better one?
many times i can see the faces of the people i helped.
no need for lawyers because the strings are pulled so that they aren't ever charged in the first place.
most americans are just to dumb to realize that their way of life is going to be changing for the worse and we are barely seeing the results of their apathy.
ah well, at least it proves that we don't agree with corporal punishment.
i didn't quite understand why my cousin wasn't like me and he didn't understand it either.
the problem is, that i don't really have a life plan but i am the sort of person who likes to have things fairly planned out.
and there will not be any stain on that money abetting abortions.
its not going to effect the world one bit.
i didn't quite understand why my cousin wasn't like me and he didn't understand it either.
any advice would be more than welcome.
what a bloody disgrace of a situation.
it would only jeopardize iran infrastructure more and land lock them..
the guy is easy to like and respect, except if you are not of an open mind.
the rest of the world knows the same.
we went camping and put them together in the car.
you'd have to be able to think on your own.
there were dropped to intimidate russia.
these sanctions in place will not harm the iranians intention to build nuclear weapons..
the police squad rode bicycles alongside the car.
it's whether or not political rhetoric can cause people to do violence.
neocons have been mistaking the elephant's shit for the elephant.
yet they kick the uk out the embassy...
as thomas correctly pointed out, a great many people could and would be replaced by technology if this were the case.
people need to keep campaigning, keep visibilty and portray a positive image of the lgbt community.
the airport seems safe.
he is the least pc of them all, thus far, and in my opinion.
mr. abhisit, who took power in december after a court disbanded three parties in the previous coalition government, has promised to hold elections, once political reforms are concluded.
president obama has already in*creased this spending by 20 percent.
i believe that the president has too much ego to allow himself to be a total puppet, though there is an element of that.
or is fox news your only source of information?
that's not the right way to go.
they all are/were on some level.
when she came to bahrain a year ago the demonstrations started, i was working, and she was stuck in the house almost the entire time.
and if we continue to be a nation that allows sex with anyone, any time with anyone.
and it got there without any of the vitriol of the ows.
further, the former director of nasa might disagree with that assertion as well.
there is hope in iraq.
prior to these events, she was healthy enough and not bedridden or in a wheelchair.
it might not seem like it right now but they really will.
often but i have done it.
the problem is that she sure reveled in riling up the crowd with her story of 'sticking it to this white farmer'...
that's the bread and butter of "entrepreneurialism"!
i closed it, noticed it was a bit stiff to close and started cleaning the house as i do every thurs night.
i feel much better now, had to stay in hospital 2 days longer due to infection and having a drain but a month later i could eat a lot more food and felt physically better.
she has said that the club has helped her with the grieving as she has so many friends there.
obviously i feel there is more to it than that.
q+a - where is political unrest in thailand heading?
among others, have unfortunately severely damaged the credibility of the true researchers.
that is not happening today and, frankly, i do not see it happening in the near future.
anyway some blacks were telling us we couldn't sit there, whites had to sit up front.
2.if he is not staying her overnight he tells me.
at our center, the director is the last one out the door.
well at least it would have made the newspapers look more interesting...
the jury verdict must stand.
how poor can they be?
can anyone shed some light for me on where i go from here.
dont get me wrong its not that i dont appreciate what he does do, i certainly do and always make him aware of it but again he never bothers for me just expects it!
some politicians are now just preying on human weakness.
i stopped going out with friends who i had been friends with all the way through school.
i saw this as just another fox flunkie pushing the "class warfare" line that's heard from the neocon/teabagger pundits in the media.
i have my own business but work as all but dried up...to
before christmas he tried to push her down a large flight of stone steps twice, he has punched her on more than one occassion.
can you relate to me how that is, exactly?
so what's our claim to fame now?
that's you lost in the last sentence!
i think californias might have shown that there is a lot of support for this research.
i believe this to be a case of apples and oranges.
all the sanctions is affecting ordinary iranians!
i know in my heart that its silly and im thinking like a child.
we could go tit for tat over and over.
what in god's name is going on with the federal government?
my sister is two years younger than i am, and i remember the day she came home from the hospital.
i still hurt the poor guy.
i could definitely support that as a non proliferation treaty.
that's an interesting side issue that may be addressed.
the words that made sense to you.
the whole country is a toxic cesspool of pollution.
his veto pen was the mightiest presidential kung fu in our history.
to reduce costs last year, the district closed almost half the schools in the city.
fox news was still the last one to catch on with coverage after the big 3 started coverage.
edit: in which case he wouldn't be lying.
determining the law and instructing the jury in that law is what the judge is for.
i hope it works out in the end...
the electoral commission has ordered an inquiry.
i think my earliest memory was somewhere between 3 and 4 years old.
eventually got him about 6am and he said he was in his mates house.
fleet air wing six and miramar imply very different backgrounds.
do not pay attention to the evidence!
i'm having trouble with you analogy.
i then took a picture of him eating it and emailed it round and said he has stole it as a joke.
president bush increased federal education spending 58 percent faster than inflation.
the nba is a classic example of a government enforced monopoly.
i know that bothers you socialists/progressives, but that's the way it is.
sorry if this sounds silly, but it's the first thing that sprung to my mind when i read how you wanted to ring her.
problem i see is not the color of people that live in here and not from where they come.
i went out & found new friends.
so go ahead and process that for a while.
in that speech he claimed the murder rate in flint michigan had more than doubled already.
2) so you are saying that it wasn't worth it if it went over a certain cost.
she used to go with my grandad but sadly he passed away in may this year.
neithe of those things is true.
it just encourages the loons.
the "bud" was just a stolen name and address.
newt has admitted to most of what you would deny.
fleet air wing six and miramar imply very different backgrounds.
and none of these people ever suspected that the girl was being abused?
there is strong demand for us education.
my boss and i fell in at the end.
or do i say something to him / her???
it is not selfish of me to think that is it?
why all the lying about this on your part?
why don't you do it for yourself?
either he was really being vague on purpose in his testimony, he's lying now, or he was lying on the stand.
and you are wrong about americans' attitudes towards tax hikes.
what got that young man killed was racist views and a demented man with a chip on his shoulder.
he added that nato sent a delegation to meet with local leaders and investigate the incident.
pirates of the seas know they can't 'eff around with americans or any of their properties.
that's not the right way to go.
i rang this evening and there were no records or her call on my account.
the verses above from leviticus are in a section of the bible that lists immoral acts and the penalties for them.
their gdp per capita is much lower and the vulnerable are ignored by the government.
what the police have to find out now is if zimmerman instigated the confrontation.
they didn't even have a train station...
it seems that no one ever really cared about what was happening in sudan.
one such benefit is a military member who has a spouse is eligible for either base housing or additional pay to help provide a place to live for that spouse.
obama wined and dined.
sure enough, brazile was instrumental in not letting a couple of white boys - named al and joe - win the election.
i say abolish them all.
i take my reputation seriously.
we have never claimed on our contents insurance before and so i don't know what the correct protocol is.
do you know what a forecast is?
here it's not unusual to only see a doctor at 12-14 weeks.
in south afghanistan, nato said two coalition service member were killed, one on friday and another on saturday.
"she's not sitting here" he said.
we are at war with al-qaida.
makes me feel all festive.
and you smell like a sock.
and yes the two bombs ended the pacific war, with out them we would have been forced to invade them.
but a large proportion remained loyal to ghaddafi and decided to fight for what they thought was right.
it makes more sense that islamic extremists are trying to kill two birds with one stone.
and encourage me to do so.)
that means that today, there are 12.5 times as many people in prison then just 40 years ago.
this is war and people die in wars.
you forget to unwrap candy bars before eating them.
there is a good future and you will recover.
the whole family are lawyers.
don't you know that this is just a piece of grandstanding nonsense?
iirc, the sign was erected early on, but was removed as being too obvious.
the conventional view is that the us and ussr fought it out in the body of vietnam.
so, i guess that's it.
what in god's name is going on with the federal government?
@dlowan, "for centuries the chinese used an ancient curse: 'may you live in interesting times!'
i'll toss this into the pot.
police name suspect in murder of nj police officer - foxnews.com
they report that there are no planes coming in or out, and that there are tens of thousands of people at the airport.
she told me of her son, then in vietnam, and her wish to bring him home.
that you have to deal with this crap after serving is absolutely disgusting.
hello i was wondering if anyone has been having problems with paying for childcare using evouchers with computershare.
their share of the vote has gone up just 1 point and they have lost seats.
don't think they went to tangier.
how do regulatory agencies become "deregulated?"
ok, thanks for the explanation.
they really only want to say they want to close the loop holes.
what hiptastic believes free trade to be is not free trade at all.
where do other people like to skate?
bill is the bread winner of our family aswell..
glad you started this one.
i remember in the fifties conservatives did not want flouride added to the water because flouride turned people into communists.
and that's world wide.
the court must take into consideration the technology of the times in their ruling.
they have been brainwashed by fox and/or rush.
i can't imagine that you would have any rights to the marital home.
i'm not a huge fan, but i have to give credit where credit is due and he's wiping the floor with the republican field in these debates.
look at how bad things were in 2008 and they basically voted for another 4 years of bush.
why don't you start thinking beyond the talking points that make you feel good?
all those countries that have signed the kyoto protocol must be convinced of something.
so i offered to make whatever she didn't want to, and at first she didn't want me to have to make anything.
i am angry at republicans who scream that obama team is incompetent for not being able to negotiate these terms.
you might get more answers there.
it sounds as if your health care coverage rations in the exact same way that private health care does.
they've been doing these protests for years.
according to it, yes, they can do it.
the appellate court ordered the case back to juvenile court.
it seems to me that dr.
but between welfare and living ok is quite a bit of a chasm for a lot of people.
the ows from the very beginning had a message of peaceful protesting.
did you really write that post?
black unemployment has been over 15% for 2 ½ years under obama.
do you have to go back to roosevelt?
i don't ever try to pass anything off as being other than it is.
how old is that program?
what surprises is that even in the 1970s, on the back of 3 decades of cooling, more papers (42 in total) predict global warming due to co2 than cooling.
what are the ecological issues?
the court must take into consideration the technology of the times in their ruling.
i cried a lot and could not really understand it.
in the meantime, i'll just keep you in my heart and mind and hope that will help in some small measure.
don't be jealous and bitter.
(bull shit call number 2. he and the demwhits negotiated a deal to increase the debt ceiling and before the ink on it had dried, reneged on the deal and attempted to tie it to his "stimulus ii" wish list which would add another 1.6 trillion dollars to the deficit now!)
don't think they went to tangier.
problem i see is not the color of people that live in here and not from where they come.
one is a loan, the other is an overdraft and one is a credit card.
that year, roosevelt signed the proclamation establishing oklahoma as the 46th state of the union.
or we could poke sharp sticks in our eyes.
the fact that nixon and carter were uxorious did not make them good presidents.
there was a lot of valuables in the safe as we had been saving in cash for the holiday and then returned what we hadn't spent to the safe.
the jury instruction given on this clearly put the question of first amendment protection in their laps.
remember iran contra?
those who lead us along this path to bankruptcy are not heroes.
which i think is a good idea.
this is so awful, that poor girl, and this has been happening for 10 years?
yeah, for toddlers, since the youngest teenagers are already smoking and drinking.
we need more presidents like him.
if it hadn't been for a phone call i initiated shortly before he died, i wouldn't have know until after he was dead.
if someone visited the us and went to la they might have a different perception of the us than someone who visited and went to new orleans.
any of you wager to guess why such little coverage for the biggest, most powerful media organization on the world?
don't want to read and run but i don't know what to say.
i suppose that is one of the reasons i see this whole stem cell thing as so weird.
in august 1902, roosevelt was the first president to be seen riding in an automobile in public.[52]
eventually got him at 8.30. he stayed with " a friend" am i asking to much to be told he is not coming home?
any real comment about the content?
why do you hate people that work in their own home?
there's a different sort of blood libel.
we returned to new york by train.
but those are elastic terms, and this request will not be the last.
whatever the amount was, i hope he sold his soul and his ethics for a high amount.
the entire bush cabinet is starting to look like an image awards telecast minus the fisticuffs and gunplay.
it's the individual citizens' responsibility to fund their own behavior.
at our center, the director is the last one out the door.
he was the first speaker of the house in history to be fined.
i change the diaper at the normal time in the evening and it is huge and totally full of pee.
and the only reason they are there is because of insane student loan practices that are identical in everyway to the insane mortgage loan practices.
that is the state of class warfare in our society.
this is how the people on the right here treat truth.
why do you hate people that work in their own home?
but no, he acts as if he got a memo from the mcqueary and forwarded it on to his superiors like he was supposed to.
no jobs at the hotel, no college education, nothing but being born a hilton.
just say, the topic is beyond your understanding and its all good.
good catch, i forgot alcohol and cigarettes.
i think it may be called the family.
i had moved to new york to be close to the power center of the country for my anti war activity.
human rights should always come before money.
if he had twelve months to do it and he was leasing he could have easily relocated.
i'm all for campaigning but i think that this was really a step too far.
it sounds as if your health care coverage rations in the exact same way that private health care does.
you're talking about white house press releases.
it took the parent of martin 3 days before they got the word from the local police dept.
i didn't want to read and run hun.
besides obama is continuing bush polices that he (ran against) in order to kill those terrorists.
thats at least racist.
i would get down to the police station sooner than just writing a letter.
i really dont know what to do...
their share of the vote has gone up just 1 point and they have lost seats.
but what do we know about syria?
my family has been told by state department (today) that there is no evacuation order in place, and that there is nothing we can do but wait.
what symptoms did you have that got you to the doctor in the first place?
where does it say that, exactly?
my body was looser after i gave birth but it wasn't bad.
in fact i bet upon the news alone that he loses the election we will start seeing firms hire and invest exponentially.
but many heirs did not actually do anything to deserve the $ other than being born.
had that been on the 5.30pm from victoria it would have been a goner.
where were these so-called ''freedom fighters'' forty years ago when ghaddafi came to power?
it was my stepdad that had said "so and so died of a broken heart" and i would laugh.
and they are the problem, simply because they cause a demand on other people's resources.
returned with great quality and a great representation of our firm.
i'm here to defend the fluevog!!
and the idea was to help people connect with volunteer opportunities.
stuff that are made in the hundreds or few thousand at the most.
why does it matter that he's black?
has anyone else got any practical joke related tales?
there's kurds in syria, too, i believe.
i don't need to create problems for myself, with customers feeling they were mislead.
time and again we see that there is one set of laws for the well connected, and a vastly different set for the commoners.
this is an area not tested in the courts.
but its a different matter all together to say that these people are not afforded the right to even live in the uk - the country of their nationality.
i would not even raise my voice to her or her boyfriend.
mean, i know that a car is a material posession, but i like to keep my stuff looking nice if i can help it.
what are government officals going to do to make sure that everyone does their part in this.
i left the site determined to still love the man he once was to me and so i continue to listen to his records to this day.
and he spent his money on things he cared about.
we once got home just as it got too dark to see without a flashlight.
just remember he loves you.
what's wrong, exactly, with what i'm doing?
they didn't get it, but they asked for it.
christy is a fat sack of shit.
glad your pie rocked though!!
they are the voice and interpreters of this tort and did their duty.
grrrr what the heck do i do?
we are all different we came from different backgrounds and we all saw things based on different perceptions some fact based and some clouded by personal experiences.
i change the diaper at the normal time in the evening and it is huge and totally full of pee.
i have heard really good things about them.
does this sound like the sensible option.
no one appears to have posted about this yet.
yet he doesn't seem to have anything better to offer.
my 19 yo dd stopped speaking to me for 2 years.
came the report that the woman reported involved was released after a few hours and the reason was that she had been the victim of identity theft.
i have heard really good things about them.
afaik, the va has programs to help them if they want it.
each has it's own role.
to say that it's all america's fault is not correct.
i don't know what my daddy saw or knew.
i think they let me slide because i already had my honorable discharge.
i've done it two or three times.
grief he's at the top of the list for the 4th year in a row.
and i can't say the gop would be any different if they get in.
there seems no hope in these areas.
we have traffic laws that exist for no reason other than to fine motorists.
is your health care rationed?
the arab league is not something that should be taken seriously.
i remember the anti-gypsy attitudes and actions in spain.
it worked in the snyder case.
bring back the kitten.
is no consideration to be given to the crim?
they've been doing these protests for years.
but you said your clients were loosening up and starting to hire again.
what have they done to deserve this?
i tried to call and there was no answer.
there would have been millions less dead if we had done so and the government would be but little different than it is now.
and in fact the research that backs up this health care bill out of the house spells it out clearly.
that is why i have said revere puts himself into a pretzel shape.
three of the seals being rescued were also killed and the fourth wounded.
ok that explains one more trillion of bush's addition to the national debt.
in those states, minority, student and poor voters are most likely to feel the pinch from the new rules.
the opening statement you quoted is a fact i'm afraid.
i dont think you are wrong at all.
granted we never took baths together.
on the other hand your side states that millions of private sector jobs have been created...so
i wanted to speak to the head on the teachers recommendation but he was really busy.
the point is that women/girls are constrained to carry it and bear its burden in more than one way.
whatever the amount was, i hope he sold his soul and his ethics for a high amount.
they paid him over $30 million.
there's only one early memory i can absolutely date.
i am suprised we all havent wiped each other out by now.
fallout will come over the nation that fires it iran,, iraq wouldnt be to happy about it either.
i'm terrified, and dh doesn't talk about it much but he's nervous too.
makes very good sense.
ah well, at least it proves that we don't agree with corporal punishment.
though i think a fresh apple is a better choice, given it is washed well.
mankind got 'organized'.
9. no "spouse" means no established a family relationship where a spouse can then sponsor their spouse for immigration purposes.
i was told that you always take the price given and cut it in half and go from there.
and come to think of it, in recent times too.
@bumblebeeboogie, where are leaders of any stripe when we need them?
the words that made sense to you.
it makes me think it may be a true memory - it is so unlike older memories - very accurate from a wee person's perspective.
just what are you reading?
didnt want to read and run..
it is a pretty sad statement of the times, imo, that things have gotten so bad.
and of course the poppy propaganda.
thinking esp of the korean war.
but morocco is a very diverse place and things that might be true in one region might not be true in another.
you're hearing only what you want to hear and imagining the rest.
whether you like it or not, we are on the left side of the laffer curve.
the fact is we were burgled and these items were stolen.
if that is not a self made man i have never heard of one.
i asked if they could tell me when the money would be in my account they said that was not possible.
i also feel some resentment towards friends of the same age who seem to be a little further along in their 'life plan' than i am.
i don't ever try to pass anything off as being other than it is.
i haven't been to see him as i'm so angry and hating him.
whatever the amount was, i hope he sold his soul and his ethics for a high amount.
spring 1966 becomes head of chicago chapter of sclc's operation breadbasket.
you are quite welcome...
was it even recorded as a crime?
is a bank going to help you when you don't even have a job anymore?
and that's the truth.
if you are fascinated by knives and guns, then go to a comprehensive.
cafcass is impartial, and work for the childs interests, not those of the parents.
quit listening to him because he's such a damned negative nancy.
he does not have the balls to put his own numbers on the table, and suggest how they pay for it.
at one point he was at a desk on his own, but now he sits beside my daughter.
if you have used the va loan, and then refinanced using the streamline program, i'd be thrilled to hear about it!
those who lead us along this path to bankruptcy are not heroes.
as a bank manager, you would expect him to have made a will but people are strange and he may not have done.
i can't believe that the truth is so new to you, cecille.
i really just dont know what to do or think anymore.
what is even more bothersome to me personally...
i was in iraq, everything is hot.
i don't write these things to judge anyone.
if he did, he should face charges.
that was kind of rude.
if you don't like the idea of being sent to a foreign land where people want to kill you, don't join the military.
the justice system is a farce and we all know it.
you got obama down pat.
i have not read what she said beyond this site nor do i care what she said.
our country is supposed to be a nation of laws and not men, right?
and ya know what, almost to the person the cnas were in nursing school and the nurses were in np school.
what point are you trying to relay?
my mother died suddenly 2.5 years ago after a short illness in hospital.
>>>> i don't think the government need to recognize anything as pertains to marriage.
that means that his money is our money and same goes for mine.
but when the temperature moves up to the 3c level, expected in the early part of the second half of the century, these effects will become critical.
continued pt three times a week.
insignificant to you maybe.
if a bj was the biggest concern of the nation with the president right now-the whole country would be a lot better.
dh leaves tonight for work travel.
i guess this is a last plea for help and guidance, before i do something silly.
i know this is going to be the start of a really long road.
in this case i think that is beyond ceasar's bounds.
they aren't the first news organization to do so.
of course not but the question is fast becoming not will israel strike but when and how.
you can read about the case below.
none of them conformed to the conditions set out and agreed to by the allies.
the parents of the youth would go on the web site to see all the kind remarks about their child and then see the negative crap also.
"you've ridden on our backs for too long...
but when i went the first time.
even you have to know there is a difference between a misdemeanor and a felony.
am i the only one who thinks this is messed up?
vor: sorry to interupt you, but i just want to get something straight here.
does this sound like the sensible option.
and it didnt bother me.
the prisons are filling up and they're building more.
i am not among the six percent.
as cruel as it sound, i would argue freedom of choice wins out on this fact and this alone.
the arab league is not something that should be taken seriously.
you chose only that one angle to focus on.
at one point they also walked up and down the student flats in the area approaching any students that came out the door.
i do see what you are saying tho.there
my understanding (imperfect, i'm sure) is that there is no active persecution of jews in the country.
in that case paypal refused to unfreeze the account and also refused to transfer the money to the red cross because of a business deal it had made with united way.
this is not rocket science.
no need to tell them at all.
hi jtr, no you're not alone!
harming innocent people isn't going to get your message across.
and thats where his inheritance ended up.
to say that it's all america's fault is not correct.
"you're going to see how they work all right."
i'll update you with the outcome.
edit: what is this i don't even...
i never put words in your mouth.
what about that claim about a communist plot?
anyone else feel like this?
are you just ignoring the cnn link i posted?
i suppose that is one of the reasons i see this whole stem cell thing as so weird.
(this is in primary by the way).
he insisted one of the workers at the dmv give him one and she turned him down and got fired because of that.
the atomic bombs were not ready until summer 1945.
best news many of us have heard in the last decade.
i didn't feel there was any bias in there.
however, they have misunderestimated the american people once again.
i suppose that is one of the reasons i see this whole stem cell thing as so weird.
sometimes during war you have to misdirect the enemy.
i also remember the last time the shale oil bollocks ran rampant here.
got in and out with relative ease the last time i went.
as thomas correctly pointed out, a great many people could and would be replaced by technology if this were the case.
this is war and people die in wars.
not a single word said about the idiocy of someone that poor thinking about mating.
in an instant the houses viewed have not received a coat of paint in years.
i agree with there goes trouble.
i got a us with marshall at 9-10 weeks for dating purposes and if i would of been more certain on this pregnancy, we wouldn't of had one.
their share of the vote has gone up just 1 point and they have lost seats.
you "honored" the dead by pestering a group of people who were interested in not creating any more dead?
he got bin laden from a place that bush didn't dare to go into.
but i can understand how some might have found it insensitive.
obama has been a massive and utter failure.
not a single word said about the idiocy of someone that poor thinking about mating.
it is a pretty sad statement of the times, imo, that things have gotten so bad.
they all have their issues.
don't cook for him - he's a grown up.
so i'm thinking of calling in sick.
we don't know her history as she was a stray when someone gave her to us.
my son is never ever selected to go.
however, is this any reason to allow crime to continue in your neighborhood?
i have to say im bad and have called in sick before when i wasnt really sick.
the bill was passed in the lower house of the french parliament in december, but it needs to be approved by the senate to go into effect.
thanks for proving my point about you being an ignorant shitstain too lazy to think and separate rumor from reality.
i'm sure your children are worried about you and i'm sure they'd appreciate you telling them how you're feeling, rather than them fretting because they're seeing their mum upset.
we don't have a college record?
it's scary to think that he could have stood next to me in line at the movies or the store.
so i have been looking around for somewhere else.
those idiots can only think of one answer to the question because anything else would spoinl their attempt to make this a race issue.
overt propaganda utilised as a means of empowering the state at the expense of the common man in the street!
still trying to believe that the world is a zero sum game?
seriously, it's true.
my son has adhd and autistic spectrum disorder.
i think everyone feels like you at sometime in their lives..
i wanted to speak to the head on the teachers recommendation but he was really busy.
"she's not sitting here" he said.
i refuse to argue jesse jackson on this or any other thread.
i fear that mum is beginning to deteriorate mentally due to lack of stimulation.
this is of course, upsetting.
i said fine can she give me their number and she said she would put me on hold.
most of those truthers are likely to just move on after the election and look for other things to be pissed off about.
but when i went the first time.
then i found others that countered what she said.
lol just in time to start another war!!
this is totally unacceptable!
the loan was originally to combine other debt and buy a new car.
1996 returns to operation push in chicago.
i want to eat so i need to have a car to drive me around.
however, the compromise meant that insurance companies can be told by government that they must offer something, even if it goes against their morals.
it sounds as if your health care coverage rations in the exact same way that private health care does.
we may get a call from a client saying that they need something and called another service as well..and the one who performs the quickest gets the order.
fdny is city government and they were on site since the planes hit.
another uncle works at the janesville plant currently.
the jihadists have little hope of being able to hijack any more planes so easily.
the reality is that they do exist and civil marriage brings with it large impacts on the transfer of property between spouses.
clearly the child had (has) a problem based on the fact that he committed murder.
i have also worked at vanderbuilt.
he's not too thrilled with our history either...
epic post seriously, doesn't this hurt?
that theory arose in the 1930s as the answer to the great depression, which, of course, never worked.
it said wreckage of the craft was strewn at the scene.
you may also lose your single person council tax status.
it was the same offer we accepted after we targeted civilians with the a-bombs and dropped them.
they havent raised any moral issues or issues of any kind with having to provide contraception at no additional cost.
i think, we look like a joke to the rest of the world, universe.
they are killing themselves as a politcal force.
i wish paul was a little bit more articulate and less frenetic in his responses.
most people feel unintelligent and awkward when they first get to uni- you're definitely not alone there.
low wages are hard to make it with in the us.
so we had to assume some one stole them.
and that's the truth.
great time to add another fee to those taking out mortgages then.
and of course the poppy propaganda.
i don't mean for president; i mean out of the country.
dh has not been asked to give a statement, and we assume nor has the cabby.
i do think they should pay to clean up the oil spill, and fix whatever went wrong.
little do they know they're far left utopia only works if the whole world is in it too.
you must tell us who killed jfk.
if millions have a disastrous medical issue, like cancer, or hundreds or thousands have a natural disaster issue, what's the difference?
in this instance, i chose the wrong words in my analogy of the situation.
then he sped away without stopping, without calling the police or calling for an ambulance.
that's nothing new in iraq.
it gives me just as good a reason never to use ebay.
no, you had second hand experience.
i think my earliest memory was somewhere between 3 and 4 years old.
well then-what is your opinion on us getting involved in libya?
the majority of this nation believes in god and believes that he will turn on us.
mushy has to be the odds on favorite.
just when was that little bit of legislation signed into law?
the ones with other symbols succeeded.
and while you're at it, find out why rupert is investing in the prince's middle eastern network.
for this reason they probably need to stay inside - unless they really change.
but who decides and how is that enforced?!
i just went on a little ride with some bad people.
this took place in hartford, ct.
he still hasn't to this day.
i really want this sorted and not sure what else i can do.
now here's a decent post worth reading.
the court must take into consideration the technology of the times in their ruling.
that's why the us has the largest prison population in the world, in both numbers, and as a percentage of the population.
boycott as you deem fit, but calling for the death of the ceo is over the top.
for them, the morality or lack of it was not the question.
but even that might not be enough.
as for lumping all islamic countries together as a no go area - what complete nonsense!
but he wanted to see his grandson be born.
that's how i would feel supported.
they would retain all of their chinese, korean and other possessions and we would return their home island captures.
bet you already know the answer.
meditation and exercise are really helpful, so definitely try to do those.
a generation of unfortunate vietnamese have paid the price for that madness.
i'm sure the cartoonists think they are all terribly ironic, and forget that some of them are not all that talented.
virtually every city in the country grants a monopoly to one cable company or another.
they have wisdom in their own way.
it gives me just as good a reason never to use ebay.
what does keeping england english even mean?
what thing has she done and what other thing has she done?
who in their right mind would chose not to help, if they could help in any way?
i most certainly did not treat the disaster as if it doesn't exist.
consider it a preventative measure and use it wisely.
he still hasn't to this day.
so much for decision day.
if that is not a self made man i have never heard of one.
this is just this week alone.
that is what the founders of the movement intended.
and the lady in the hallway with me was my grandmother, not my mother.
my opinion is that bush spent $1 t rillion to get saddam.
why do you think it matters to willow?
but our parents said "oh no, it was an accident".
she then said she could not give me their number.
being a university student.
it was our day, how we wanted and it was wonderful.
this is the wrong thread for this.
talking about the problem will help you deal with it.
that is the entire case.
how about a link to that information?
i never stated that the doctrine of what supremacy was at the root of cause of slavery.
i would suggest that a few more than "nobody" cared.
a conservative will reply as they have been instructed with something like "you poop on streets!"
it depends on the state as to whether unpasteurized milk is illegal, it's not the federal government or fda that decides that.
i was always fascinated by history and people's past experiences...
i have also just realised my wife is now in the exact same situation.
oh my i thought it was the end of the world but it wasn't.
i don't think there are too many people, just too many people to live in the way that we are living.
if you want to be with him you do have to lay your cards on the table,you have to mean it too and be prepared to walk away if he isn't commited to leaving his marriage in the near future.
not only do i not have the funds for this, but i am in the 3rd year of an iva.
unfortunately the teachers union's work to discredit them.
i am suprised we all havent wiped each other out by now.
i told him no because we really need to start saving, we have nothing.
and the only reason they are there is because of insane student loan practices that are identical in everyway to the insane mortgage loan practices.
so what does this have to do with newt?
rslw: because they are horrible, fascist skin head brutes.
ok, thanks for the explanation.
neither government nor people should impose their values on anyone.
i can tell some of them, if anyone wants to hear.
now they are set in their ways.
the true heroes will be ones that bear the burden of 40 years of political discourse.
it is also very easy to target and mock.
and you have a problem with this?
of course they are because without the "expansion" they have no argument.
if someone visited the us and went to la they might have a different perception of the us than someone who visited and went to new orleans.
it seems like if a candidate went to a state, and said, "i hate all of you.
you really do need to read what other experts in the field are saying, my friend.
you didn't request a beating and they gave you one anyway?
i have a history of giving due credit to president obama for the few things he has done right.
do you think she just told you not to bother because you just had a baby not to long ago?
returned with great quality and a great representation of our firm.
they say the hardest job in the military is being a military spouse and my wife was one for most of my military career.
the tea party didn't promote ending the intereference of religion in politics.
i agree that you need to see the gp and try some counselling.
we don't need to turn on each other.
this was a long and ongoing struggle that lasted almost 2 years.
they lined up to insist that the government had to change direction if the party was to win a fourth term.
the true heroes will be the people will have to endure the emanate mass austerity, sovereign default or currency devaluation.
he didn't look away and he did have empathy for the victim.
"our request is the same.
government or the guys that actually own the business?
we want a flat, fair and wide base and most importantly, for the government to live within it's means.
he doesn't just swear in conversation, he swears at me, and gets really aggressive.
look at the bigger picture.
how about all of new york state?
they are almost never encountered because people who know the truth will tell someone.
there's only one way to find out: get the damn thing in the gulf and we'll see."
it's not like he needs the money.
they keep talking about the huge deficit in the obama admin.
laws should be for everyone.
why don't you start dealing with the facts before you try lecturing others.
it does not matter what your sexual preference's are.
where it goes wrong in practice is when they create a central government to control the communes.
i don't know what to make of the whole thing to be honest..
that way the people in the know will be able to pick and choose what is needed from what you have provided.
and i can't say the gop would be any different if they get in.
we are at war with al-qaida.
hes a good family man and has been a below average president.
that is the state of class warfare in our society.
ask for the crime number and see.
so say those that ruined it.
they report that there are no planes coming in or out, and that there are tens of thousands of people at the airport.
as the only white in the hall, i understood why the question was being asked.
did anyone tell obama it's dangerous over there?
it should be a matter of fact not a goverment regulation.
what have they done to deserve this?
my son is 7 and i dread to think what i would do in this situation.
he got a letter in the post this morning, dated tuesday, saying the police were closing their investigation.
she then said she could not give me their number.
no it's just that people like you can't be honest.
beyond that, i am not convinced the scotus can find anything new to say about the first amendment on these facts.
are you prepared to admit therefore that islam is a murderous religion?
gotta love the people who insist on "helping" you when it could be easier to do it yourself...
that is what the founders of the movement intended.
no, it's not just you.
i was extremely green and not at all effective for the most part.
dodge, change the subject, project what they have been instructed to believe etc...
if i have to say it a million times….i
they didn't even have a train station...
she continues to get death threats.
i don't know if this goes for people generally, but that was how g went.
its not going to effect the world one bit.
there are procedures and medications the government does not cover.
we have never claimed on our contents insurance before and so i don't know what the correct protocol is.
there has to be a present risk of harm, editec.
as it's evident, the cops in that area didn't even do that!
they envisioned a little elastic string holding the hadrons together.
woman at the nursery also said that they're appalling in answering calls, i was on for over half an hour waiting for an answer in the morning.
i can't find anything to support her claim that foreign ships have been there since the rig exploded.
you do realize that there is a difference between an insurance company and a health care provider right?
it took the parent of martin 3 days before they got the word from the local police dept.
i told him, and he's angry and me, but he told me he didn't want me before i did it.
they are about a future where you come first.
i had to read the whole thread in one sitting.
it's whether or not political rhetoric can cause people to do violence.
thank you for your concern pelastration.
who's got a better one?
she went on so much that i said i would get a ew on in february.
i suppose that is one of the reasons i see this whole stem cell thing as so weird.
don't you follow, and want our laws to follow all of leviticus?
does this sound like the sensible option.
you can read about the case below.
thank you for demonstrating my point.
the emergency measures barely affected daily life in the city of over 10 million people.
but no, he acts as if he got a memo from the mcqueary and forwarded it on to his superiors like he was supposed to.
in any case, he was busting pretty hard on the administration and the (r) congress for spending like crazy.
and i can't say the gop would be any different if they get in.
now he has been charged everyone has got something to say about it, mainly untrue gossip that they have heard.
move to where the food is..
if they have made peace with their pay, then there is no reason you should not be at peace with their pay as well.
source: justin quinn.
then they hear the defence - plus get an education about the principles of sentencing.
in actual practise, the clinics tend to keep the embryos on ice because they fear law suits.
and question answers.
have been in a similar situation myself.
and all to few understand, therefore nothing will be done to avoid the slide.
just like you and me.
i actually think lougher acted the way he did out of some sort of form of psychosis.
he didn't see any either.
i told him to bring lots of pens and paper because i had lots i wanted to say and lots of questions.
why is that so hard to understand?
the debate is whether or not a new mosque should be built at that very location.
even if you do it by pretending it doesn't exist.
maybe america isn't the place for you?
not to mention the meddling we have been doing inside iran for the past 100 years or so...
some refused to go because they didn't want to be killed.
are you ready to meet me?)
you don't even wait for the water to boil anymore.
alternative hostelries within the near vicinity beckon, with an even sense of urgency.
do the math, and we dont have to worry about these fuckkers fubaring the future of our kids.
he served eleven years total behind bars for his antiwar activities.
there are only two kinds of proper football; one you call soccer, and rugby (dominated by the new zealanders).
hope that helps i've been with my boyfriend since i was 16 years old.
in no way was he better on the question of the war than johnson.
they used their puppet governments of the shah and saddam to control the countries to counter soviet influence in the region.
i don't mean to be dense, but why do you have to find out what his long term intentions are?
it seems like every time i make any decision with money he has a friend telling him to not be a little "bitch".
i havent access to anymore, and to be honest i dont want it.
i wasnt trying to make him feel bad.
using your definition - there was no housing bubble.
that is not happening today and, frankly, i do not see it happening in the near future.
it's almost like you're a closeted conservative...
there may be trouble there again.
he is an ex-ecb vice president.
murder is not always face to face, yanno.
it sounds like you are going to have a really busy weekend without going to work anyways...and
clearly we need the poor to have money in their pockets so they can buy our goods and services.
what kind of outlets did this veteran have?
it's only relevant if you apply for a new mortgage, as others have said.
after all the whites have occupied this land sicne the dawn of man.
can only see them wanting to convert to btl if/when they find out.
sorry, you just don't.
what medications was he on?...
three of the seals being rescued were also killed and the fourth wounded.
and if we continue to be a nation that allows sex with anyone, any time with anyone.
he married you, chose to have a child with you and loves you unconditionally.
i wound up getting an epidural during that one.
they broke into their families homes, as well.
you've worn out the handle on your favorite mug.
i got into town on saturday, we spent the day together, he slipped into a coma early sunday and was gone by monday morning.
however, i might try to find someone with the means and skills to investigate the position because i do think it has merit.
that's not just from the ex-wife.
if that is not a self made man i have never heard of one.
that is how it works.
the whole world was astonished and followed the beast.
they would retain all of their chinese, korean and other possessions and we would return their home island captures.
and the race card is coming up next.
"you're going to see how they work all right."
because he isn't a leader, he is a perpetual campaigner and chief.
if that is not a self made man i have never heard of one.
here is a good point by point q&a analysis of these unrests in thailand.
you help your dog chase its tail.
i often wonder if he might have lived longer had he stayed with a more physically demanding job.
he is the least pc of them all, thus far, and in my opinion.
are you prepared to admit therefore that islam is a murderous religion?
is there any way that can be avoided?
so that is bull shit!
it's one thing if you are just lazy and forget, but its another thing to lie about diaper changes all together.
but only the shoreline around the terrace itself was really my idea of skate-friendly.
and there will not be any stain on that money abetting abortions.
either government has to honor religioius doctrine or it doesn't - pick one.
haven't heard about that.
i didn't want to read and run hun.
that was also about a blow job, of course.
my purpose here is not to rabble rouse, but to have a meeting with like or similar minds to discuss what has been and is going on.
he just doesnt get it.
however, the way i see it is that by blaming the pundits i.e.
romney: well, he didnt have as much as i think some people anticipated.
it was left up to them to decide whether the first amendment applied.
and that i definitely think you have done the right thing for both yourself and your husband.
he has texted the house phone last night and all the kids.
then i'd wait for a second instance before bringing it up again.
i am just a big ball of hormones right now.
and the crowd would not be knowing that she would be adding more at the end, was sure applauding her story of what she did...
it's another world out here - when we bought our house in '98, it was assessed at $67k.
why don't you start dealing with the facts before you try lecturing others.
the problem is, that i don't really have a life plan but i am the sort of person who likes to have things fairly planned out.
i'm really not sure why.
the "effect" people are talking about isn't simple political rhetoric designed to sway votes.
my marriage has finally ended after 20 years.
you're not stupid, just young and vulnerable.
he was the first speaker of the house in history to be fined.
how long ago was this?
because they are the only ones that make sense.
i'm an adult, and a wife and a mum.
there's more to life than a couple of men.
so ask yourself "do i deserve this for the rest of my life or do i deserve better?"...i
i am wary about doing this as i am unable to find the letter that agreed to me letting out my flat.
the problem is, that i don't really have a life plan but i am the sort of person who likes to have things fairly planned out.
what does keeping england english even mean?
so that is the end of that.
i'm not very dogmatic about too many things, but i firmly believe young teens having sex is not a good thing.
i just wanted to say that in my experience the fear of the unknown is the worst thing.
also, assuming the whole thing is a sham..
i don't know of anywhere in the us where there's actual abject poverty.
thanks for thinking of me, but i don't have the desire to appear on his show.
they didn't even have a train station...
what i said was that he was working for someone else when his father died.
edgar, you may be right - at least in part.
i most certainly did not treat the disaster as if it doesn't exist.
depending on you sex.
it's a tough call, but today's minimum is too low.
if the people back home were clamoring to get me out of this pointless errands.
so the night before thanksgiving she asked me if i was still making the pie and i told her yes, i was going to make it from scratch with suger pumpkins i grew in my garden.
how old is that program?
i'd say the precedent was set when the democrats gave clinton a pass for lying under oath.
and i would appreciate armed strangers not trying to manage my own personal safety.
your claim that he has killed 3 times as many al qeada is completely false.
my sister is two years younger than i am, and i remember the day she came home from the hospital.
we are at war with al-qaida.
totally free of course.
once the disaster finally ends he may speak out.
i did not feel ready to be home.
the site this was posted on had other problems with an account being frozen.
quote: the existence of 2 (presumably) youngish children would suggest that the marriage is not the cold and unrewarding one the husband would have you believe.
if it continues to be a problem i'd start showing your daily sheet to the director before you leave - let her see that mrs. i hasn't changed a diaper in 3 hours.
that this message is deserved is not the point.
sometimes i like to think that if the current generation had fought in that war, we would have lost.
put him in a room with any halfway intelligent free market economist and he turns into a blubbering moron.
to suggest that social and economic gaps are internal to blacks is to suggest that there is a genetic propensity that makes blacks inferior.
this would be an interesting story to keep up with.
he's an adult. he should be courteous to your home and keep it clean, but outside of that he should be able to come and go as he pleases.
more often than not ows protestors are targeting their peers on the street rather than anyone who has committed any actual wrong doing.
this thing has gone just exactly as the democrats hoped.
there was nobody waiting for me to come home.
would that be legal in this country?
just say you would like help in working out access for your son.
i believe the pals and israelis are fast getting to that point.
sue them and try to get some money out of them.
they are sitting on over a trillion dollars in cash.
why is no one sanctioning the us??
but whatever happens, we need some national truth-telling, and we need to stop calling "them" the problem.
it may be a question of magnitude once again.
and now it appears that there was a second one, that is now being uncovered.
and if we continue to be a nation that allows sex with anyone, any time with anyone.
but i'm sorry to say i don't really take the ndp seriously.
hi, since bout a year after i started secondary school i've been getting this shoulder pain.
timing is everything and this is not a good thing in the long run omho.
not a single word said about the idiocy of someone that poor thinking about mating.
we know the date this happened, because we know when mom and sister came home from the hospital, so i was two years and two months old at the time.
the rioters are pretty focused on the police and the president.
i agree with you, quantum windbag, and so do most legal commentators i have read.
the foreign secretary, margaret beckett, is at 40/1, while the defence secretary, des browne, and the welsh and northern ireland secretary, peter hain are 50/1.
it sounds horrible but feeding these people is the worst thing you can do in the long run.
the father is not a public figure and is a private citizen.
i can't see his death reducing the scale of the 'war on terror'..
to want to know he is safe ?
(i have been in full time employment for 25 years).
she's on line here but hasn't answered as to whether or not she follows all of leviticus, and whether or not she want's our nation's laws to follow all of leviticus.
try dealing with the facts instead of your wishful thinking.
meets dr. king; asks him for a job.
if they have made peace with their pay, then there is no reason you should not be at peace with their pay as well.
they are with us for our lifetimes and beyond.
is your health care rationed?
i think it would have helped me draw a line between the traumatic events of her death and funeral and marked the start of my learning to deal with life without mum.
i dont have any dog in the fight.
it's whether or not political rhetoric can cause people to do violence.
now of course its everyones fault but their own.
hope your little one is coping ok with the stress (although in this situation i bet the kids are much better than the parents).
i would also not back down.
there's two entities that have zero interest in keeping obama in the white house.
now - they are dangerous - cos they would move to another bottle, and it would all begin again.
william hill have cut the odds on the prime minister leaving this year from 5/1 to 9/4.
i saw her all the time and we spoke about 6 times a day on the phone up until she was very ill in her last weeks and sleepy with morphine.
he invited me in the past (while simultaneously saying i should be tried and executed), and i told him that i believe he is mentally ill and needs help, not attention.
unfortunately they're going to end up at the same address six feet under - they be pals or israelis.
yes, the conventional media.
you spew here what you claim to be facts.
but as a christian, i believe what god's word tells me.
have a quiet registry marriage with just the important people there, followed by a party for everyone done cheaply.
why do you think that commandment is there?
true oil only comes from quart sized cans.
they report that there are no planes coming in or out, and that there are tens of thousands of people at the airport.
i wouldnt be able to change to a buy to let mortgage.
i wrote that it felt like someone smashed a champagne bottle on the back of my head like it was a departing ship.
for the first 1-2 years he hated me going out with my friends.
wtf are you talking about?
however my cash flow is better with them then without since the rental income more than covers the mortgages on them plus...
the idea of regular increments to minimum wage is a good one - for businesses to cope with them.
then i found others that countered what she said.
so now it is a fight for freedom of choice.
in this case it is the freedom of choice vs. the freedom of religion.
therefore, it was christians that did it!"
you wouldn't have an original thought if it hit you in the face.
but as a christian, i believe what god's word tells me.
if they dont want to.
this was an accident...
the deficit is a result of borrowing to save the collapse of the banking system, not because labour invested too much money into our services.
as we stand there is no will that we know of anywhere.
what the police have to find out now is if zimmerman instigated the confrontation.
the father is not a public figure and is a private citizen.
i'm shocked he was even elected...
also, penn state fans are being encouraged to wear white to the next game in order to protest the persecution of paterno and express their support.
oil is washing up north of miamui beach on the east side of florida.
wow that vor person is a idiot!
the poor don't need cobra to continue being insured, they never were insured by their employers, they have medicaid.
and i don't even engage in the practice of being "vague" about the description of my inventory.
but conserv won't address these issues.
just what are you reading?
all of that proves that zimmerman told the police the truth.
and that's a tall order.
they didn't even have a train station...
upon his release he sued the us for the above crimes and the case was dismissed for "national security reasons."
my dad met a lovely woman and also remarried.
and our population hasn't increased by over a factor of 10 in the last two generations.
you will learn to make real chips.
i think there are numerous instances where our justice system is simply too punitive.
perhaps we knew each other.
other than that, i'm afraid there's not much else you can do.
leviticus 18:24, 30 reads, "defile not ye yourselves in any of these things: for in all these the nations are defiled which i cast out before you.
denial is not just a river in egypt.
not sure if he truly meant it or was trying to make me feel better - but it did work.
such people aren't capable of rational thought and only understand violence.
i am sure the counsellors there have seen so many manipulators and the fallout that they may be able to suggest strategies to cope.
that is how it works.
i have family waiting in the cairo airport right now.
why do wingnuts hate intelligence?
i wouldn't say it's racist, just insular great thread.
some members of the president's staff were indited and sent to prison for perjury and other offenses.
it seems like the best option would have been something like "hey, i think this violin is fake and paypal is saying i have to destroy it to get my money back.
if the government provides health care, whether spelled out in this bill or not, it will ration the care.
do you think she just told you not to bother because you just had a baby not to long ago?
if you want to change society's morals you appeal to the hearts and minds of the people that are willing to listen and if they embrace it what you find to be immoral will eventually die out on it's own.
i don't mean to be dense, but why do you have to find out what his long term intentions are?
there are a few other early memories, but i can't date them.
both daughtes had to go to cafcass for inteviews.
i have 3 kids between 7 and 2, my sister has a daughter aged 10 months.
she acts like she had no idea who she was praising.
whenever we pick her up from all but one of the teachers, her sheet says she was changed at 4:30ish and when i change her again at 6:30 or 7 her diaper is fine.
i didnt do as well at stanford, by the way.
my brother is an alcoholic, with 2 daughters from 2 different marriages.
in their view, there is a difference between an embryo and a brain dead person.
she told me of her son, then in vietnam, and her wish to bring him home.
obviously you're totally ignorant as to the make up of the people participating in the protests.
i just read about this story.
he was the first speaker of the house in history to be fined.
the atomic bombs were not ready until summer 1945.
i cant stand to smell of cooking food.
it's just who we are as a society.
quite simply because they're pissing on the graves of those who died.
so i have been looking around for somewhere else.
however, i might try to find someone with the means and skills to investigate the position because i do think it has merit.
the jury is to be instructed as to the law to be applied to the facts they determine, not the other way around.
however, there is no drama that he was involved with anna chapman or any other honey pot involved with russian or us mafias.
the nurse needs a scientific calculator to take your pulse.
it was our day, how we wanted and it was wonderful.
main issue i see is identity.
he does have lots of really interesting ideas about the economy and the us's relations with the rest of the world that are worth listening to.
they said there was fighting amongst kids in the street and this seemed to be normal and tolerated.
president obama has proposed a $634 billion down payment on a new govern*ment health care fund.
it's their choice as to what services they will provide and what they won't.
the first baptist church in his hometown had to take up a collection to support the family gingrich had deserted.
i don't actually give two figs what minimum wage does for or against the economy.
hold, straighten and push forward again.
he's going the full marxist route of attacking creative destruction.
all the while i was bummed i didn't get to make anything else.
she then said she could not give me their number.
and it didnt bother me.
i don't believe most progressives even understand the difference between the state and federal government.
also, there are hints that these concerns are from scientists who only want to fund their own pet projects.
so you may want to consider my advice.
he was caught lying to congress.
and tell them if they cannot wait how to protect themselves.
i will do so with my daughter this year...
it was our day, how we wanted and it was wonderful.
he also advised that as there had been evidence they should have logged it as a crime.
it wasn't fun really, but if you need to be induced then you have to do what you need to do.
he and the democrats got damn near everything they wanted and they still reneged on it before the ink was dry.
people are facing choices about whether to ruin their lives - or potentially lose their lives.
has anyone heard about this?
we could go tit for tat over and over.
one thing they found particularly hard to deal with was other young men attaching themselves to their group and being undislodgeable (a nwe word and it's only 9 am!).
as for the forensics, do you think the world works like csi?
there is strong demand for us education.
the justice system is a farce and we all know it.
it was all very sophomoric and all quite futile.
he has texted the house phone last night and all the kids.
ows has already launched the class war into the consciousness of millions of americans.
i fully and totally agree.
the arab league did not understand that a no fly zone can have different meanings if worded appropriately.
i have suffered from anxiety and depression in the past and she was the one person who could calm me down and make everything alright.
do you know the great thing about numbers.
i agree that there has to be a reasonable amount of secrecy in a case like this.
as to the rest of that lunatic ranting and political positioning on whitehouse.gov,
he got bin laden from a place that bush didn't dare to go into.
that was the ultimate insult to him.
but there is nothing that you are willing to do that will rectify the problem.
i think there are a number of high-profile crimes where criminals are held long long after the point where they are a danger to anyone.
even our r&d is being jobbed-out to faraway india and other parts of the world.
just how good a basis is revenge for sentencing?
unions are for those that have no other skill other than a 5th grade educated worker has with a hammer in their hand.
i don't really know what is up but i'm super mad about it.
it is a national campaign that wants people to stop snitchin' on people who commit crimes.
actually, the whole "contraception" drum is being pounded by the liberals in an attempt at gotcha politics.
they didn't get it, but they asked for it.
i heard about this two weeks ago.
he does have lots of really interesting ideas about the economy and the us's relations with the rest of the world that are worth listening to.
the verses above from leviticus are in a section of the bible that lists immoral acts and the penalties for them.
we then gave our insurance company the crime ref number and the receipts of the items stolen.
it was my stepdad that had said "so and so died of a broken heart" and i would laugh.
why do you hate america so much?
source thomas do you have data on how the insurance industry is preparing for or speaking about gw?
i lost my mum and i felt the same way, for quite a long time, so i think i understand how it is for you.
i think they could at least specify the varity of apple used.
they are literally saying that going above one's superiors is worse than going to the police once one's superiors take action.
both sides could have used better attorneys on this, the arguments dance around the real issues and ignore the facts - on both sides.
problem is clinton did something no other president did, he violated the oval office by having sex thaere and then lying about it.
it's not like he needs the money.
they saved millions of lives.
we still have not got a decision from them.
people still care about what happened, i do.
i am sorry for this news to you but this has been the case since...well,
they had to be air lifted in somewhere around the first of june.
if not, stop talking about due process.
but the police have to do something, don't they?
the first baptist church in his hometown had to take up a collection to support the family gingrich had deserted.
of course, people who work with sick animals know that when the mean ones stop being mean, death is peeking around the corner.
sounds like we are falling foul of the eu standard practice in the way we treat our nationals.
obama agreed and compromised.
thanks i think it can be very easy to focus on what he doesn't do.
things are so big and strange.
chances are it will move more to the middle over time.
i am told that when lenders agree to this, its on a short term basis.
nope, as i have said before we haven't been up to much of that.
you just completed another sweater and you don't know how to knit.
and he got a whole lot of millage out of sexual harrassment bs at the time of the thomas hearings.
we should have monuments for him.
what is even more bothersome to me personally...
he told the the administration what they wanted to hear.
but the fact is, you idiots fired her before anyone knew about the story.
there's also a side issue of amicus waivers.
i don't mean for president; i mean out of the country.
i have seen the streams run as black slurries from strip mining.
you're better off without him in your life, and you'll have a life.
and what happened to that lie you were going to cite in cristol's book?
was worth just over £10k at the time with only 7,000 miles on the clock i think and i got it for £6,200.
i mean not even everyone in hk is a british national - only a proportion of the population are.
and this was of particular interest.
neither government nor people should impose their values on anyone.
i think this is what the original starter of the thread (joshw) is driving at.
here is a partial list: - the stimulus has created millions of jobs in the private sector.
i am positively surprised about this choice.
had that been on the 5.30pm from victoria it would have been a goner.
i said i complain the 3 or so times a month i ring with the same problem.
@edgarblythe, that is very sad.
but they never mentioned the doubling of the national debt under the bush admin.
i am wrong about the unemployment rate, but every other point i made about obama is true.
so we now heve to wait for a decision to be handed down from the mountaintop.
i assume that if pronation is "normal" the shoes may be just fine; if not, yes, i might see an orthopedist for an opinion.
you could kill an entire police force.
you lie through your teeth and still get votes.
this isn't just an american problem, this is the worlds problem.
charge him board and let him be independant.
walking the gauntlet up the steps of the police station in cambridge was a piece of cake compared to the beating we took in the back room.
what many fail to realize is that exiling arafat might not be an option.
show me where the health insurance companies are coming together to protest the contraception mandate.
what many fail to realize is that exiling arafat might not be an option.
they cheat in elections, they lie about nearly everything and hate everyone who varies even a little bit from what they already have cemented in their brain cases.
in no way was he better on the question of the war than johnson.
someone needs to go to jail for that one.
however, they were held accountable for it all the same.
to them it was good enough.
the net result would be devastating to the poorest of the poor.
as to the rest of that lunatic ranting and political positioning on whitehouse.gov,
why do you hate people that work in their own home?
what did you edit out?
try dealing with the facts instead of your wishful thinking.
such people aren't capable of rational thought and only understand violence.
the cat has your collective tongues.
this is why the right is destined to lose its ass.
you know what teenagers are like, they pick up on anything.
reality is, i was there before and returned again.
it was the same offer we accepted after we targeted civilians with the a-bombs and dropped them.
that doesn't make any sense.
i'm all good now i got a full time job with the feds.
show me where the health insurance companies are coming together to protest the contraception mandate.
so what do you think?
that is a human-driven consequence; it is not because of the ideology.
i had moved to new york to be close to the power center of the country for my anti war activity.
well them you, squire, have never heard of one.
why all the lying about this on your part?
the story that a soldier related to larry king about how he died is now known to be a false.
you say, "good to the last drop."
reality is, i was there before and returned again.
i suppose that is one of the reasons i see this whole stem cell thing as so weird.
i would hope that all of us learned something from them.
i can't even put it into words.
i had a dream i was surronded by bamboo, on my belly and scared.
all done in the arrogant self belief that they know best."
i could be imagining that, however.
with everything going on in the world.
and the assad regime is alawite.
in the past he has said that the party that wins should have first right to try to form a government.
yes, ships have been in the gulf before and during the crisis.
into the apple store on the way back and pick up an ipad (for a gift).
we are the home of tesla motors that only the "sean penns" of the world can afford.
we were supposed to stop qaddafi them using his aircraft to drop bombs in cities occupied by the rebels.
i used to love climbing trees...
why does it matter that he's black?
she's on line here but hasn't answered as to whether or not she follows all of leviticus, and whether or not she want's our nation's laws to follow all of leviticus.
so we now heve to wait for a decision to be handed down from the mountaintop.
the moral of this story, is that much like lending money to friends, never let paypal deal with more of your money than you are willing to lose.
edgarblythe i loved that story on abuzz and love it here.
here's a list of articles for you to peruse.
democrats are terrified that black people might start to notice.
india has expressed interest in in the t-50 and has made overtures to sukhoi to invest in it's development.
i wouldn't budget anywhere near 3-4k on it though!
i am also reading about that recently (e.g.
the rioters are pretty focused on the police and the president.
this seems to be an election without a result.
i really want this sorted and not sure what else i can do.
he still hasn't to this day.
blasted bp and the federal government for a lack of effort and coordination in their dual oil-spill response and made a plea to the government to allow the a whale to join the cleanup operation.
in no way was he better on the question of the war than johnson.
no, it's not just you.
do you even pay attention to current events?
corruption is the rule, not the exception.
she acts like she had no idea who she was praising.
this assumes that the government is telling us the whole story, which, of course, they are not.
you're so wired, you pick up am radio and people test their batteries in your ears.
i never had any luck with the temp agencies, one time i got a voice mail from one of them saying they had a job for me.
you moved the goal posts from fed to local.
>>>> well that is a different argument in a different place but "fair is fair".
they were never addressed with a letter.
one other thing, the reason why most like me think private enterprise is the only way to go now is because our govt.
in addition to these three, roosevelt appointed 19 judges to the united states courts of appeals, and 53 judges to the united states district courts.
grief he's at the top of the list for the 4th year in a row.
do you even understand what wry was conveying?
are you just ignoring the cnn link i posted?
that's morally right is it?!
my heart goes out to all of them.
its great news but it has nothing to do with obama being a great commander in chief.
so the big fish stays big and little guppies cant have shit.
that's about the limit of my understanding of this crazy, glowing box.)
the problem is that this man was violent and abused me beating me and generally hurting me.
or are you truly just another libertarian lunkhead parroting your neocon/teabagger cousin's stupidity?
it has helped my shoulder a lot.
do you know the great thing about numbers.
there was no surplus.
then i have had instances where 2 people have not received their items but that is because they had p.o.
there seems no hope in these areas.
i do not believe that blacks have a genetic propensity to be inferior to whites.
he can run with palin.
the net result would be devastating to the poorest of the poor.
the police are trying to fiddle the figures.
my sister is two years younger than i am, and i remember the day she came home from the hospital.
he left his job in disgrace.
if someone visited the us and went to la they might have a different perception of the us than someone who visited and went to new orleans.
grief he's at the top of the list for the 4th year in a row.
ah, so many amazing memories...
and yes, we stayed within that traditional 15-20 percent range.
that's why i'm talking about this.
fdny is city government and they were on site since the planes hit.
nor will they be the last.
he was very polite and very kind.
they controlled spain for quite awhile back then.
birkies have your heel lower than the ball of the foot.
things that you wanted to do but didn't.
didnt need it in the past and it does not need it now.
the net result would be devastating to the poorest of the poor.
then i would ask the manager to request that mrs. i checks her diaper again closer to the end of the day.
what happened to america being a nation of laws and not men?
so at least based on the available data, it appears that voucher programs are neither improving the performance of program participants nor improving the quality of the public school systems.
i finished the cereal but not the milk so she poured it into a red plastic cup and gave it to me to drink.
i wrote in my journal that it felt like i had a leather mask on my head.
the gop is fighting for freedom of religion.
they seriously think they can threaten us?
this is an area not tested in the courts.
i just don't know where the school should be on this, this is not the sort of situation that can be googled for answers.
i have something to say to these heteros.
it was what he did after he inherited them that make him a self made man, not the fact that he inherited them.
so i paid them off for her.
i've been here before, with someone much older, and it won't get any better.
she stated that they could not take complaint over the phone but they had to be in writing or by email.
there was a lot of valuables in the safe as we had been saving in cash for the holiday and then returned what we hadn't spent to the safe.
it is all about the entitlements.
i just don't know what to do for the best!
i do not recall anyone suggesting that those behind the ground zero mosque were to be held accountable for 9/11.
but as a christian, i believe what god's word tells me.
as to what happened to their missing kid.
i think you're missing the entire point.
so sad too how the prospect of a few material things when someone is ill can turn some people into total vulchers.
come to think of it, that would include you, which might explain why you don't see it.
the dont identify me as a real preson,..
i hope it works out in the end...
but what is this anger going to get you.
it could be argued that a better word is collectivist...i
not the people that want them to pay their share of the tax burden which they very much are responsible for.
it brought them to china and india and even mexico.
what medications was he on?...
i think you need to look at the valuation of your home year over year.
of course, it wasn't until years later, thinking back to that time that i understood what it was all about.
you really think he pioneered this kind of politics?
cafcass is impartial, and work for the childs interests, not those of the parents.
the people of libya and egypt rose up against the corruption and won, we could have a shot, couldn't we?
can anyone offer any words of wisdom/advice/experience of their own?
i think that would be a worse punishment than jail.
let's start with a statment of affairs.
i would suggest that a few more than "nobody" cared.
none of them conformed to the conditions set out and agreed to by the allies.
but for some reason this morning when i was asking if he had fun, and what they did etc. i asked if it was an all nude or just a topless and i should not have asked that. he told me all nude and i just broke down crying.
these sanctions in place will not harm the iranians intention to build nuclear weapons..
ask for the crime number and see.
yet he doesn't seem to have anything better to offer.
no it's just that people like you can't be honest.
you might also try posting on the benefits board here to see if anyone can suggest any routes for you.
i was recently thinking i should know more about the sudan, as well as syria.
i haven't had airconditioning my whole life until a couple of months ago, and now i have a "swamp cooler".
i have family waiting in the cairo airport right now.
again i would like to know where you are getting this bullcrap from, rat.
you've worn out the handle on your favorite mug.
what is going on there?
because it isn't about "life", it's about punishing the harlots and making women incubators.
the fact is we were burgled and these items were stolen.
i am just a big ball of hormones right now.
that's why i can no longer support them.
as you know, recently my mother died, and she named me and my sister as the executors of her will.
as the only white in the hall, i understood why the question was being asked.
i say the time to tackle the iran issue is now.
so does the us a lot more too, whats the difference??
all thsoe things are fine and dandy, but not what the thread is about.
they should just amend the house rules...stop
really has nothing to do with what i said, but let's look at that.
why has no one come forward to admit the truth?
you just have to think what you want, it may seem tough on others.
i'll check them out while i'm out and about tomorrow.
i saw the bits of cereal floating around in the milk and threw the glass across the kitchen.
i agree with the others, it is better to say everything, and let them edit it themselves, they will pick the relevant information out, that is their job.
it is still happening: it will not stop happening for 100 years.
thaksin "red shirts" gather again in bangkok bangkok, april 25 (reuters) - about 3,000 supporters of exiled former prime minister thaksin shinawatra gathered in bangkok on saturday for their first rally in the capital since violent street clashes two weeks ago.
you've worn out the handle on your favorite mug.
i think it's a real shame on the part of our government for treating them like this.
they found the bomb before they found the woman.
don't you think we deserve to know more about this man?
the whole country is a toxic cesspool of pollution.
one of the voices of protest i fondly listened to belonged to ed sanders - yeah, the gross poet wanna be who sang dirty songs as the leader of the fugs.
it was all the more startling because it was not perceived by people who'd always lived here.
the leaders of the world need to get together and begin constructing a massive plan to stop global warming.
i have not read what she said beyond this site nor do i care what she said.
murdoch inherited two fairly successful newspapers and turned them into a global media empire.
a man, walking his dog, tells the driver that was pulled over, that he saw him stop at the sign.
the problem is, you are going after people just like you.
i have tried to give a full picture of what happened during this time including conversations i had and telephone conversations.
could the protests turn violent?
japan under the army had no intention of surrender.
i refuse to argue jesse jackson on this or any other thread.
how original of you tm.
the french legislation has enraged turkey, which has threatened sanctions if french president nicolas sarkozy signs the bill.
the net result would be devastating to the poorest of the poor.
i can hear the desperation in your words.
i don't believe they have even started the bacs transfer, although the money is out of my account.
i have no idea what party/pres.
and tbh - once you do have kids - you will feel even more trapped.
i think newt has been the most accurate and forthright.
seeing mutated corpses don't bother me.
guess what dipshit - oil fumes are no laughing matter.
i don't need to create problems for myself, with customers feeling they were mislead.
i happened to cross this thread, however, and just wanted to clear up a couple of things.
it is more honest and accurate to say receipts average between 17%-19%, and in the 90's were in the high 19s and hit 20 by the end.
they report that there are no planes coming in or out, and that there are tens of thousands of people at the airport.
just when was that little bit of legislation signed into law?
does anyone have any advice?
is there any property involved?
that's why i'm talking about this.
and i care enough about each of you to share with you god's truth.
it may not be the case, but it's something to think about.
when we were young, before my husband got an easier job, he did manual labor.
most americans are just to dumb to realize that their way of life is going to be changing for the worse and we are barely seeing the results of their apathy.
that is what liberty is about, after all.
and then he gets his money back for it not being authentic?
we have shed thousands of lives in iraq and afghanistan and what have we accomplished?
i think that proably our biggest problem is that that is very rarely true.
we were a country of innovation!
mushy has to be the odds on favorite.
i can spot em a mile away.
i understand your thinking.
because it's fun, and there are no consequences.
either way, if you fancy a chat, feel free to pm if i were you id focus on an idol.
the resolution was opposed by the obama administration.
he served three years in lock up, now he is on one year house arrest and ten years probation.
the rest of the world knows the same.
but look at the other side.
i agree with there goes trouble.
this is totally unacceptable!
it's not healthy for our nation.
i thought this would be a good time for a meeting thread to exchange information and to remenisce.
what have they done to deserve this?
your life's goal is to amount to a hill of beans.
it may not have been common, but it doesn't have to be a long process.
are you just in denial?
this is why homosexuality is a great harm to our society.
coming from the west isn't usually too terrible.
and it got there without any of the vitriol of the ows.
it displaces more water than an aircraft carrier.
one other thing, the reason why most like me think private enterprise is the only way to go now is because our govt.
we decided that i would get my scissors and cut off his extra meat ( i think we played doctor too much).
this i am managing -just about.
That FEBRUARY PAMPLEMOUSSE- According to the experts, even the orange juice and apple contains substances that inhibit the medicines.
The fact that the OSCE, during the evaluation of the campaign, has highlighted the positive changes rather than on shortcomings, such as the ban to run for a third of the candidates for the opposition, referred to a prior appeasement.
In the Czech Republic, no chance, say the mobile operators
I already knew thanks to my mangas.
Before leaving for the US, Nicolas Sarkozy will take a detour going by Bretagne.
And even if we could prove that for Man: How could anyone the show in rats?
But there are also many politicians who resist pressure from the ndrangheta, heroes who are honest "
Analysts of the bank reduced their expectations for next year, given the fall in consumption of oil due to the slowdown in economic growth, and were therefore obliged to reduce forecasts of oil and gas prices for 2009 by 20pour cent.
The Impact will mee the Vancouver Whitecaps in the semi-finals.
Such thoughts geo-strategic does, however, that one of the sides.
"It would be a mistake to the underestimate.
In 2010, it will pay the interests of the whole year, which could also double.
Jeremiah Moss, who led a blog called Jeremiah' Vanishing if New York (subtitled "The Book of disputes: A look bitterly nostalgic on A City in the issue of extinction") described in the history of the City and extra Place, published in 1952 in The New Yorker.
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition.
He believes that this will lead to a reduction in the rate of accidents and the number of deaths on the roads of the Czech Republic.
Bastian Reinhard would also be more relaxed "wanted".
"We communicate extremely well, despite what people say."
The benefits and net profits coming from financial transactions were, compared to the same period last year, zero, while the profits from the allocation of debt securities and and the termination of provisions in the operations of credit had fallen by more than 70 percent to 5 million.
Mango has just presented the second edition of the Botón-Mango Fashion Awards, in order to strengthen international image of the new talents of the fashion industry.
Therefore find games which are calming and avoid programs or television series that contain violence.
"We believe that, in general, it is not enough to block the phenomenon of accidents and the contrast can be made through numerous actions."
The fact that Google is a genetic data can give a good raw material for the next generation of science-fiction. The novel Cory Doctorow of the famous, writing with half-tone orwelliens, described the future in which a man could be approached so outrageous only through data from Google.
I believe that yes, but in the end it joined and these activities have a lot in common.
Eric Smith made another happening and was intercepted.
But he said he do not feel well, and refused to go to London.
It is not only 1,000 but 1001 ways to forget the chaos and the frenzy of daily life.
In addition, the mayor of Rome is keen to stress that "the Commission is not an unnecessary bureaucratic body: it is absolutely free, and will not cost a euro to the Roman city dwellers, and will serve to study and get the best minds that express the Capital.
And perhaps we continue to call more expensive than in the rest of Europe.
But 1001, or a more or less.
Below and to the left is written 'Been Festival', in Gothic, and alongside it is the internet address of Marco's travel agency: "conoscersiviaggiando.it '".
Passengers who do not take the bus suburban and does not recall the date when expires the validity of their coupon, can join to new machines, originally used to record the voucher on the map.
We asked 1 500 people: What were the mistakes made by Bush during his mandate? 89% replied: Iraq.
The price in sectors of supply of electricity, gas, water and steam have increased by 18,7 percent since last year.
Congress gave way: The government of the United States can inject $700 billion into banks
For nearly 18 years, the space shuttle "Ulysses" has been flying in space.
Great admirer of literature of Galdós, José Luis Garci ensures to have done with this film "a dream of child 'through Esperanza Aguirre, who was in charge, three years ago to turn a commemorative film for the two hundred years of 2 May Madrid, something he has always accepted when the narrative stuck to the historical facts.
When times are tough and without reason to live, human beings are left with nothing but admiration, and there is no need to be Luis Cernuda to love Paul Newman.
The Committee said that, in the past, the participation of MSkyB had prevented competition and had allowed to influence unfairly ITV.
The foundation Esély Budapestért Alapítvány, at the request of the grouping of Fiatal Baloldal - Ifjú Szocialisták, made a bill on the order of the foundation Együtt a Harmadik Évezredért, for a total of four million HUF.
They named it as the anomaly of the gravitational effect.
I find that the woman is more mature, has more experience and relishes life with fewer problems.
With the collapse of the investment bank Lehman Brothers two weeks ago, the allocation of appropriations between banks has again been delayed significantly, the banks having accumulated their liquidity.
I believe that in the photograph the portrait is the kind of the most difficult.
And she adds: "It is almost impossible for a virtual operator to appear on the T-Mobile network by the end of the year.
And taking into account Smartphones and communicators, you have in your pocket a veritable small computer.
Demand will acquire ground for many market segments of travel by air.
The back of the vehicle was full of ballots of hashish. Then they transfered it to a police station for a thorough inspection and to weigh the drugs.
Llamazares has asked the Andalusian federation of the United Left to assume its responsibilities in the case Silva
It is true, I look forward to their release.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a job at risk, I supprimerai.
In Florence, a bed costs on average, 350 / 400 euros, a chamber around EUR 700.
The Committee met on the request of the Minister for Sport Miroslaw Drzewiecki.
And cast aspersions on this woman who has been a constant struggle for justice and deserves our admiration says as much about the vicinity of the Prime Minister Stephen Harper on himself.
That is how in the world, the virtual operators are emerging as operators at low cost - they propose calls and text messages cheap, which is often balanced by a limited supply of services.
An emotional campaign will attack drivers
No current device is as universal as the mobile phone.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
Whilst Favre and Coles were playing catch, the defense beat the Cardinal's quarter back, Kurt Warner.
"If we fail to do so, the mini self robot could not respond quickly enough to avoid the obstacle," explains Toshiyuki Andoh, the director of the laboratory and mobility of the project car robotisée.
The private bank Sal Oppenheim, has signed up for 23 million new shares.
State money and municipalities, approximately 65 million HUF in total, was a part in the coffers of the movement Fiatal Baloldal and on the other hand, in the pockets of some people.
But it seems quite clear that if there will be a virtual operator in the Czech Republic, it will not be Mobilking.
Two aspects of the structure of the brain make the transposition of our lived subjective to that of animals difficult.
But there is anyone who tries, and Paul Newman is an example.
Trerise wrote in a letter to confession: "I feel responsible for his death".
The girl next to me gave me big ironic smile, she found it an honour that the new girl should sit next to her.
All this without a blue screen.
Behind them, almost a lines of five litres of beer brand of the Kaiser, is a barbu well built which shows to approximately 200 guests of the party of beer what sounds profound his gosier can produce.
Most of my developments refer to the contents of conscious, but there is also another aspect of awareness that should be more easily accessible scientifically.
Accidents in the Napolitano workplace: "Crucial prevention"
Gebrselassie rested, beats his world record.
I must another match to feel comfortable. "
The US President George Bush himself is glad of progress in the negotiations.
For the Sunia, exceptional measures through the revision of taxation, are necessary to calm down prices.
Are ever to the child that you can ask for the night to know his secret.
At auctions, buyers tend to spend more, and to overestimate the commodity.
The Scientific EU pointed out that users of mobile music devices, who are listening to music at full volume (more than 89 decibels) for five hours per week, are currently in force on the level of noise maximum made in the workplace.
Italy "as a nation of immigrants has recently become a destination for immigrants" met with resistance.
There was not much in the changing room, half-time was over, and most were stale in their place.
"It is up to us, it is our future," he added, having made a dramatic break to the immense card behind him.
According to the study published in the journal Science, humans do not want to be beaten at this type of competition, such as an auction on eBay, and that is why they are even willing to pay too high a price.
English Paula Radcliffe holds the world record of 2: 15: 25.
And taking into account the Smartphones and communicators, you have in your pocket a small computer.
It has not failed to describe the economic ideas of McCain of outdated.
After all, such a relationship could be the decisive impetus to other concentrations in the Länder banks.
At the foot of the stairs, Ambassador Spanish and other authorities were present.
That is something that savers and householders will appreciate in these uncertain times. "
The index was already falling during the vote, but when it became apparent that the proposal was not adopted, it was in free fall.
We could examine the process of conscience of animals without taking account of their content, and that is exactly what happened at of studies on the short-term memory of primates, particularly with the example of view.
Kostitsyn, the first star of the meeting, marked a goal, Plekanec has amassed two aid, and Kovalev has reaped a happening in this gain, the fourth of the Tricolore in six preparatory matches.
And even the youngest as Alondra and Alexia Kenon of 11ans, twins of Winter Park, seem to have learned properly the description Eatonville.
In India, the main Sensex index has lost 506,43 points, or 3.9 percent, and closed to 12.595,75 points.
Ludwik Sobolewski, the chairman of the stock market values of Warsaw, confirmed this proposal that the Polish have made despite that, before, the Czechs have ruled out the stock exchange of Warsaw the circle of potential new owners of the stock market in Prague.
Another significant feature may lie in the linguistic nature of Man: A large part of his existence is related to language, which means that his consciousness often depends on it.
"Because it fascinates me,"
Values slightly lower (550 euro for a simple) for areas close to the other universities (Ostiense and Cinecittà).
With regard to journalists, this figure is 30%.
And this isn't noisy for the Italians, explains Marco Guarda.
The interview, Du blood become course
Nights of insomnia for shareholders of Hypo Real Estate
The first time this happens may surprise you, but in reality it does not matter.
The danger of the collapse of the US financial system is increasing every day, and subsequently, the world will pay a high price.
More than four hundred people profitèrent of service during the morning.
He must also inform the police, 7 days before his scheduled date of departure.
It's true.
Contrary to what is being done in several countries where works Barrick Gold, the debates in Canada are normally by the exchange of ideas and not with clubs.
Bilingual Debate: Immersion into the English Language
The fares of plane tickets and hotels is falling
Also, as it emerged during the investigation, they also ajoutèrent VAT on these documents, while the benefits on the activities of travel, which is outside the European Union, are paid for without VAT.
Mr Bush was happy with the progress in the negotiations
. Glitter returned to the UK last month, having served 27 months in a Vietnamese prison for abused two girls, respectively, of 10 and 11 years.
The law is ignoring them; walk in a long-distance is prohibited.
We must be constantly vigilant ", continuing the Dre Décary before stress that security of supply, Héma-Quebec must also provide an adequate supply.
I always responded:
But there are some who try, and Paul Newman is an example.
Dancer, actress and dessinatrice, you are a woman very versatile: Is it not?
The image provided by the director, Giuseppe Tornatore illustrates what is happening in major Italian cities, but also in the cities of the province,
This is not wrong but if they do you move that would be better if they give you any (including the electronic chip shop).
That said, the operation of a kind of virtual pseudo operators, several mobile networks in the Czech Republic, remains unnoticed.
The office is synonymous with tension and the computer of pain in the back.
Sarkozy at the meeting of angry fishermen
"Everything depends on the fact that the coach has in its approval permission to propose places standing.
Obama and McCain are, as more capable than the other, to lead the country out of the economic crisis.
Linebacker, David Bowens left escape the ball because of Warner.
The psychologist Miguel Farias, who himself took part in the experiment, believes that we can achieve the same effects with any other strong image; for atheists one would have to find the appropriate photo.
The profits of these sales were nonetheless paid to his Foundation for childhood in difficulty.
These improvements have been significantly reduce the risk of contracting HIV by a blood transfusion.
Italian Foreign Minister Franco Frattini confirmed the release after the news bulletin on the Italian television channel Sky TG 24: "Our citizens and the other hostages were released.
The Marcel 's differs from the other by his cotton excellent, by his thumb unisexe, with its distinctive logo and by the Belgian flag (barely recognisable) that the shirts of bodies have the most well-known in the neck.
The sum, however, must not be paid at once, but gradually.
Reaffirming that it would manage to cut taxes for 95% of Americans despite the unpredictability of Wall Street, Senator from Illinois has also pointed out that the achievement of a possible energy independence of the country by the promotion of renewable energy was his first priority, with the establishment of a system of health insurance.
They have not been according to the opposition.
And he adds that it is essential to make the public administration more efficient.
The cinema, you expect the individual films that you have turned last year.
According to the results, believers Catholics have been able to exclude a large part of the suffering.
In the background, is the dependant society Depfa which bears the losses.
They came to Verona all the way from Bologna.
In the wake of this tragedy and resentment of the public, the government of Canada has established in February 1994 a public inquiry, chaired by the judge Horace Krever, to shed light on the circumstances that led to such a tragedy and to make recommendations so that such a disaster never occurs again.
The Dow Jones Industrial Average (DJIA) plunged from 777,68 points to 1O.365,45 points.
Can be to walk on the walls as Spiderman? Maybe so, but researchers think of a use much less compelling as the connection between the electronic devices, given that the nano tubes of carbon drivers are heat and electricity.
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day in history.
Sylvana and the secrets of the Pandora to Bento
Recall, for the record, that UNICEF, International Amnesty and the Canadian Association of the Bar ask for the return of Omar Khadr so that he can benefit from a fair trial in Canada.
While the judge Krever tardait to submit his report, some provinces have set up a committee with the objective of planning a new system of management of blood in Canada.
All lies with it, "he says.
AIG is willing to study the sale of most of its activities beyond life insurance to the international market and its retirement plans in the US, the newspaper says and cites sources close to the matter.
Choose the best
Are rare the mobile who are able to read music for ten to twelve hours, in most cases, this figure is much lower.
A cockroach flees before danger, but does it feel fear?
A trend which was underlined by the Pope and by the President of the Republic, "Giorgio Napolitano at his meeting with Benedict XVI at Quirinal, asked for the state and the church to work together to defeat racism. "
To the question: what will we have in five years? Schmidt said he would like Google to be able to respond to questions such as, "What can I do tomorrow?" Or "What is the work that would suit me best?". However, software cannot only respond to these kinds of questions, simple at first sight, the day when it know enough about users.
Deflation has resulted in the sectors of petrol transformation (1.4 percent), the manufacture of machines and electrical equipment (0.9 percent), and a minimum increase in the processing sector of wood (0.1 percent).
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition, which would like to join the fight.
To gain the attention of the institutions, the social forces and means of information on this dramatic aspect, the Anmil is today celebrating, in all the Italian provinces, the 58th National Day of victims of accidents at work, institutionalised the second Sunday in October.
In addition, they are forced to admit that the SIM card in their phones is not recorded in their behalf, so they cannot have them fully, in the manner of ordinary customers' mobile operators.
Kovalev handed the victory with the only goal
CSU: a grace period of transition
Some expected that the US and Britain were going to get to the Sudeten a certain type of autonomy.
The German banking system is relatively stable, insisted the Federal Finance Minister only a few weeks ago.
When nobody is watching, it can walk
The tactics, in these fights unequal, is often ruining the defendants to impose an amicable solution which bâillonnera the opposition in addition to scare anyone who dares to look again at the issue.
Marek: A psychological help
New Yorkers in general have become very familiar to the world of finance in recent weeks.
But not thoe that take advantage of the taxpayers'.
The installation in all the institutions of the Presidency of the Council is complete with the Palais Chigi.
Quickly, everything becomes calm in the bus as the passengers sleep.
But be careful.
In the framework of the rescue plan, the resources must be mobilised to purchase what we call spoiled mortgage documents.
Domestic non-sale prices have risen to a lesser extent, 0.1 percent, compared with the previous month.
At the same time, in Europe, we had further proof of the global nature of the crisis.
The problem is that the commercial state of all Czech mobile operators prohibits such a resale.
The second half began after the Jets and the Arizona Cardinals played dirtily under the dark clouds.
The strategy of sugar and hard against drivers
Some believe that extra Place bears the name since 1802, when the legacy of the great firm of the many children of Philip Minthorne was divided, leaving aside this small tract of land, which has remained abandoned ever since.
Otherwise, we risk that other countries are suffering the effects.
In Mexico without peep-toes
The suspect was not willing to settle his debt and it is for this reason that he drew his creditor, last Wednesday, to a site of Ózd where he killed him, and his daughter aged 9 years.
With an adhesive that barely measured 2.5 square centimetres, researchers have managed to stick a body of 100 kilograms on a vertical wall.
Investors feared that the rescue plan high of $700 billion of the United States Government may not be sufficient to restart the financial markets.
The anthem has again been recorded by the orchestra of the national theatre under the direction of Jirˇí Beˇlohlávek.
I had rice the aromatic herbs, small sausages, a salad of cucumber and algae, fruit and a kind of meat surrounded by tofu.
Moreover, the bill also mentions meals, and our restaurant has been closed for a long time. "
The rest, "with climate change, we need to rethink our vision of the North," he said, referring to the passage of the north-west, which will open all year because of the melting of the ice.
The movement of water in the tides, turnes the blades in the turbines, creating a rotational movement that feeds a generator.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely competetive.
Those who are listening to music in such conditions for prolonged periods, risk a permanent hearing loss of capacity after five years.
They have too many charm.
During a campaign rally in Detroit, on Sunday, Obama has expressed his hope that Congress vote soon on the 700 billion rescue package.
In a "circuit," a survey of choice of Lados was a bistro.
Unlike several film legends, which left the job early enough, Newman remained a long time in the saddle, while denouncing Hollywood, its gold, its glamour, and its concessions.
Kamathis came in third at 2: 07: 48.
It has two hundred of them recruited.
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred to the gates of the community.
I already knew thanks to my mangas.
The magistrates have imposed a ban of six months on Glitter after he had spoken to the authorities who had him under control, of his intention to go to Spain via France.
From Kristoffer Klein. Enlarge. Hard landing for international player Marko Marin.
It should discourage drivers from driving fast and of drunk-driving.
In the first half of 2008, the reserve of liquidity of the bank had been reduced to 95 percent to 2.37 million, the rate of capital also had declined slightly to 1,45 of 1.6 percent.
Vargas Llosa, who won the price of the Hay Festival to the majority of the participants, was packed auditorium at the scene Juan Bravo.
Here in New York, all speak fluent finance.
"The revolving doors - according to Brunetta- are an instrument for working better, with more productivity, attendance and services" says the minister.
According Masi, "the choice of rotating doors is important even from a symbolic point of view."
But I do not know how to prove it.
And even more surprising is that if she had not committed this act, its history would certainly never have ended up in court.
"Everything depends on whether the coach has in its approval, permission to propose standing places.
For me, it was clear that I had to be travel a day.
The 'Plan North "is the fourth part of a" vision "that Prime Minister claims to have to the Quebec, that of a" new "economic area, which includes an agreement on the workforce with France, an agreement between Canada and Europe and agreements with the Ontario.
In 2010, it will be necessary to pay the interests of the whole year, which may double.
It was a young girl free dance and specialist of oriental dances.
New investigate the case of the US prosecutors.
Indeed, to publish the final version of the law and submit it to the vote, the Congressmen must concur on a number of details of the agreement.
With regard to the candidate, I don't worry.
From bus station near the station at Puorta Nueva, four bus start this evening at 11.45 p.m., and are expected to arrive at 6h30: 'destinazione Monaco, Festa della birra,'
The antistress book is entitled '1001 ways to relax' and will arrive at the booksellers directly from the publisher Pearson Alhambra and DK.
The New York Stock Exchange has suffered a record drop on Monday after the rejection by the House of Representatives of the Paulson plan to bail out banks: The Dow Jones has lost 6,98%, a never before seen loss approaching the 800 points, and the Nasdaq 9,14%.
This will be crucial to decide on the sharing of losses between the financial sector and the government," said Marek to the server iHNed.cz. this week.
But in most cases, you will be limited by the absence of exit for ordinary headphones.
Show the security guards that we are well behaved!
"We are about to agree on a plan that will work and be equally effective on the market.
Is believed to be out of this impasse since Democrats have accepted that some "toxic" assets of companies in difficulty are only insured by the government, rather than bought.
"Most people, who pass by this area, will think, 'Oh, this city has nothing compared to others" Alondra Kenon said after the mass Sunday.
She added: "Some people have not appreciated it".
Staying the night would involve unnecessary costs, explains Marco.
I believe that rats and other mammals, perhaps even the cafards (who knows?) of the sensations.
A statement would surprise and do not on the part of representatives of the operators.
Of these European roots will generate a glorious faces of the American dream.
The Hamburg SV of will on Monday its 121 years.
For me, it was clear that I had to be travel a day.
Moreover, it is also because of errors in format, like wrong fonts on the bills and false stamps, that the bills issued by order of Együtt a Harmadik Évezredért Alapítvány, of 21 Századi Kulturális Egyesület and Biztos Bridge have been proved to be false.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely competetive.
Another application could be its incorporation into the GPS satellite navigation system, so that it can guide the driver to its destination by avoiding obstacles on the way.
And because their sensations probably differ completely from all of us (as humans our consciousness is based on special circuits, and on the language), I prefer to explore the emotional behaviour rather than the emotional sensations rats.
What will appear in the spotlight?
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred the gates of the community.
Other operators also refer to the specific nature of the Czech market.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the provision of services. "
There is no beer, not anymore.
Compared to its more colourful neighbour, Bowery, Extra Place has left a slight historic footprint.
Locally, the executive group is at 65%.
The interpretation of the dominant market position is one of the many points of contention.
The symptoms of hepatitis A appear two to three weeks after the consumption of contaminated food, in general, accompanied by general bad health, weakness, upset stomach and nausea.
In a City in Part, Pride and the plight of the Black Life
Curiously, this approach also highlights the importance of the prefrontal cortex in the phenomenon of sight.
But that means and for the emotions?
Experts fear that the general theory of relativity is not entirely correct.
Two elite Kenyan runners, James Kwambai and Charles Kamathi, continued to defy Gebrselassie after the head of the queue had disappeared.
People pay less and less attention to the operating system but increasingly to their Internet browser.
The girl was at the moment, unfortunately, seated next to the driver, on the most dangerous seat in the vehicle, although she had the choice of sitting in any of two other seats.
This sentence is the actress Sally field, who has worked with him in 'absence of malice ", and illustrates the despair of American cinema, and America, faced with the idea striking that Newman is no longer in the world.
The late entry of CBGB, a punk rock monument closed in 2006, re-opened Extra Place; the street is certainly more famous thanks to the photo on coverage of the album of Ramones "Rocket to Russia"
The project of the motorway happened just when the most famous girl of Eatonville had recovered her appeal.
Net fall of oil following new concerns for the world of the economy
Newman, rather than sitting on a myth, has committed to the end.
According to her, the liberal government, in coming to power in 2003, has refused to implement it.
But it is said, keep our eyes wide open, it is not without reason.
It was a blow for everyone.
Has few exceptions, the street has always the same pace.
I have done all the things that I wanted to do for tiny and it gave me a lot of happiness.
Trerise wrote in a confession letter: "I feel responsible for her death".
The player rentra Gladbach do that late in the game and his firing lifted fail against the framework of the goal.
The intervention of governments of Belgium, the Netherlands and Luxembourg had been made necessary after the French bank BNP Paribas said she renounced acquire its competitor in trouble since she has lost 2 billion (2.9 billion US) in the mortgage crisis in the United States.
In addition, the deletions made in the newsroom, in the room where the authors are working for the assembly of newspapers, are a major problem.
They have even named this unaffordable baby
Hepatitis C may also have serious consequences: If it is not dealt with, it can lead to cirrhosis of the liver or cancer.
And in Spain it is estimated that it could save the lives of 115 people each year.
All lies with it, "he says.
The Austrian Socialists of SPÖ want to discuss with the Conservatives of the ÖVP.
It accusa Vice Minister of Interior at the time, Marco Minniti, accusing it of having engineered the very for a political issue, but given the request of incarceration signed this morning, the judges explain that the clan Piromalli was even manages to ask the variation of the draft the A3.
Austria thinks seriously about regaining its courage, following its oscillation to the right in the parliamentary elections yesterday.
I live on the outskirts of Tokyo towards Kawasaki and I take the train 40 minutes until the Highschool of Tachibana.
An automaton will monitor the coupon instead of the driver
Sheikh Hasina should return to the Bangladesh in a few weeks, but his party, the League Awani, has demanded that the military government temporarily give him the country's first full freedom.
The novel is taking place in places that nobody knows and addresses issues unknown, but once again, Mario Vargas Llosa is determined to move the new draft that it works, a novel that Roger Casemant main character, an Irish nationalist who lived 20 years in Congo, which happened in the Amazon.
It was detained last year after the military interim government has assumed power, but was released in June for care abroad.
This is what we think is the most contributions from the point of view of customers.
Nicolas Sarkozy is expected to be firm by fishermen.
A famous American politician who wants to be independent, wrote: "Barack Obama will be the second anti-American president.
"We have taken a major step forward," said Nancy Pelosi, the Democratic chairman of the US House of Representatives, according to which all that remains is to put the agreements on paper.
With this film Garci does not expect a price.
What good then to facilitate the advent of such a competitor?
The Hypo Real Estate, since the takeover of the Depfa, an investor of state and infrastructure highly important.
The 31 girls of the class have all done whispering, pouffé laugh and signs, and I have always heard the word 'Kawaii ".
Is it to cause of the crisis that they have decided to buy the shirts small with less fabric and suddenly cheaper?
Moreover, if right side of Naomi fascinates me.
Jancˇura denies that the two seats reserved for stewards had been sold.
He is bound to inform the authorities if it wants to go abroad for more than three days.
"Sangre de Mayo," the bet dared to Garci
In 2003 we thought for a moment that the Deta-Bank could merge with the bank of the Land of Rhineland Palatinate and Halbab.
"It has been a dirty victory", summed up Marin Jol.
The impact will be measured in Vancouver Whitecaps in the semi-finals.
Passers-by said they did not think often of Extra Place, and suggested its development.
This amount would be twice that produced by nuclear power plants.
"Our challenge for the next decade is to maintain the safety of our products.
The Federal Reserve and the Federal Institution for the Surveillance of the Financial Services (Bafin) assume that the ability of the Hypo Real on the market is now guaranteed.
Other believed that they would simply in Czechoslovakia.
The song was released in the UK, as a single in 1979, and reached the 15th place.
However, given the expansion of the festival Hurston, a certain level of local pride has emerged.
The chairman of the party, Erwin Hube and the head of the regional government, Günther Beckstein, can still retain their place. The question is how long will the grace period last?
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
The phrase "You do not think" is inscribed in capital letters on the registration plate.
The first new of the failure of the rescue plan have driven the Dow Jones temporarily 700 points.
Because WestLB, injured, is still strong pressure.
Never in the history of the Palais Chigi, have there been rotating doors for the entry and exit of employees.
The Bush administration and the leaders of Congress, both Republicans and Democrats, are finally reached an agreement yesterday on the greatest economic recovery plan since the Great Depression of the 1930s.
It may be that the person speaks with a small, quiet voice, with isolated words, murmurs or on the contrary with cries, tears, long speeches...
The neurophysicien Joseph LeDoux is convinced that many animals have also of the sensations.
It apparently emanates a force of attraction whose effect is tangible on other celestial bodies.
However, the leaders of the banks find themselves in an uncomfortable position and waiting for help from the state can expect that their redundancy payments, called simply Atlantic golden parachute, will be capped by the government.
They are a brief break with the photographers before moving in the room where the official all awaits them.
The bad boy from Australia, Russell Crowe, called Newman his greatest inspiration.
In short, such a relationship could be the decisive impetus to other concentrations in the Länder banks sector.
We don't need a capacity of gigabytes, or even of megabytes.
The opposite, Antonio Damasio for example believe that the sensations from primitive activities are born in the areas of the body feeling of the cortex and core of the brain, like Jaak Pankseep however, which focuses more on the brain syllabus.
As we have said before, they can also be associated with very high fever, to situations of stress or become agitated.
"Say what you want, we will see ourselves to the cross, on Obama or McCain.
That is, on the screen of the apparatus, that will show the information about the validity of their document.
The Bavarian real estate company's shares lost three-quarters of its value in spite of the rescue operation of the federal government and private banks, Commerzbank fell by more than 20 percent.
Its huge resemblance to his sister has not prevented to develop its own personality.
According to Rule, the kidnappers wanted to release the hostages women after paying the price.
Has Naples, for a bed it is 300-400 euros, for a simple, it spends 400 to 600 euros, with prices higher in the areas Policlinico, Vomero, and Colli Aminei.
The question, if it is really a chance, is naturally.
On the contrary, they are trying to do everything possible to avoid the appearance of a potential competitor.
A library single-issue (of course) ouvra Hurston in 2006, on a wonderful Kennedy Boulevard, repavé.
The Prime Minister does not exclude the possibility of triggering the elections before the end of the year
It is, however, question for some time now, also from Frankfurt - a relationship of any Deka between the bank, which is customers of the Sparkasse of their investment funds, and WestLB.
Haile Gebrselassie, Ethiopia, has once again proved to be worthy of his title of best athlete of substance of the century, having beaten his own world record in the marathon in Berlin on Sunday, becoming the first to run 26,2 miles in less than 2heures and 4minutes.
As a client important, it gets of price (and other special).
The Latin are always between the residential buildings, as 50 shirts mules, a glossy hung a yoke prepared on his shoulders.
Among the prescriptive planned, there are measures of tax facilities in favour of managers and benefits to the public in terms of mobility: Viewers will be able to enter the area to movement limited, and have special tariffs for the parking spaces and in some parks.
It he: "I stress in particular, as describe his father and his mother, the effects of your crime had made for years on Stéphanie.
Passers-by some said they did not think that rarely to extra Place, and suggested its development.
For me, it was clear that I had to be travel a day.
On trade terms, the stock exchange of Prague fell
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition, which would like to join the fight.
"In cases where the coach would have slowed down a steep, the laws of physics would obviously be valid.
Some states can still be a lifeline to their staggering financial institutions, and thanks to their own taxpayers' money, they can save them from bankruptcy.
However, it is generally believed that this way to buy music (either by GSM, Internet, even by wireless Internet) will dominate the music industry in the future.
For compensating the girl's family, the agency will not wait for the judgment of the Court, and as far as the financial compensation is concerned, it is also counting on the culprit to pay.
Then, in a puddle of blood, the phrase 'You "paieras.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the provision of services. "
This' territory twice great as France ',' home is in Quebec.
It will not at the beginning of 2009 but by late 2009 or see in 2010.
His message was made, it was out of his lips so persuasive.
The UN has conducted a vaccination campaign in the six provinces last week.
In his party, the choice of the opposition or entry into the coalition is temporarily an open question. These points should be debated in the ÖVP.
The first shop in London.
"Anyone who wants to maintain Israeli sovereignty on the whole city will be forced to integrate 270 000 Arabs.
Beˇlohlávek consider the Czech national anthem as one of the finest anthems.
This is a loss for the academic world, as in the public debate in Canada, and it is time that governments are in place arrangements restricting this kind of prosecution abusive.
At the conference on emerging technologies at MIT Microsoft has been presented a new system of recognition of image and human interaction, a kind of artificial Intelligence with little intelligence but able to do some basic tasks, such as call a taxi (or in the case of Microsoft, a shuttle for travel in the campus of the company) in response to what it was asked during a conversation.
After the market price hotels have risen for years, the nights hotels have already cut in many places.
Not at all.
This time, the decline is due to the fall of the Wall Street.
McCain, on his part wanted to build a fleet of 45 nuclear power plants by 2030.
But in this case, we can at least hope that all human brain have the same situation.
Democratic Senator Barack Obama is awarded the addition of certain provisions to understanding, including the proposal to allow homeowners to keep their homes and on executive pay companies rescapées by the state.
Today, one in 12 million runs the risk of blood be infected with HIV.
But of course this is the future.
In August 2008, domestic industrial prices rose by 0.1 percent compared with the previous month, and 12.9% with August 2007 - communicates the Central Office of Statistics of Hungary.
The course of action of the great German bank Hypo Real Estate collapses and the Dax into the abyss.
The investigation is based on the argument of the lawyers who hold that their dismissal was due to political causes.
In the timing of the construction or the destruction of stadiums, the streets, hotels and airports, the two guests running after the delays.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
I read it in my mangas.
When the Police patrol came it has found the actress sitting inside his vehicle, which is blocking partially the road.
"There is a real danger that the PZPN not be able to act within the rules," said Drzewiecki of the Polish news agency pap.
The number one trio of the Canadien is prepared to take the season.
The authorities responsible: In line with operators
But he said he do not feel well, and refused to go to London.
This person, at that time, called the emergency services because "she was concerned about the life of Locklear".
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred the gates of the community.
The dumping total in English focusing on the use almost constant of English in the investigation.
The new Czech anthem has four new versions.
Indeed, the Web 2.0 is not something else that cooperation, that the fact that we are intentionally traces behind us, and that we use of communication channels available to us, and while the size of these changes one by one, the essential remains the same: It is exposed.
We must ask for permission for most of the interviews, and some choses- as the walls of the old church of Eatonville, painted by the white man, illustrating of black men in the champs- should not be photographed.
But look at all in detail and from the start.
Here is an unmeasured source of energy which covers more than 70% of the surface area of the planet and now the major global energy companies are beginning to discover it.
According to the indictment, a large part of the bills were false.
Her lawyers have announced that she will now appeal to the Supreme Court against the order of the Supreme Court.
Anyone in health, aged 18 years and responding to the eligibility criteria can still give blood every 56 days, or six times a year.
As we know, the national reserves of blood transfusion Service managed by the Canadian Red Cross were infected with the acquired immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and the hepatitis C virus during the 1980s.
"Next week could be a turning point," said the influential Democratic Senator Charles Schumer yesterday.
The course of the obligations, however, are particularly well.
In the world of Vice-President, it seems that it is only lawyers highly paid and not all Canadians; this is a rather narrow view of the concept.
The photo in this article, was taken earlier this month in one of the rooms reserved for employees of Microsoft at Redmond.
I believe that yes, but in the end it joined and these activities have a lot in common.
"Matilde transforms Tórtola into a mature figure.
Even tougher means of action were decided in Poland.
A few days you debuted on the ramp with Naomi Campbell, is it not?
For a price of three or four thousand kronor, one can buy a very decent walkman.
In this respect, the economic crisis seems to produce two convergent phenomena.
I had not felt the crisis despite the stories completely pessimistic until this afternoon when I décidai to open a new savings bank.
Of votes have continued to rise yesterday against this project, both in the Republican side that democrat.
They agreed upon a ransom, " said the official.
You had not long ago 30 years: Has this been hard for you?
German Günther Bauer mixes in "Flamenco - people" the theatric aspect of a few scenes with singers, dancers and guitarists with this less-known side of artists.
Its aim is the reintegration of the driver in road re-education courses.
As in the case of the society Ravenna Bt. or the sport training facility of Kunfehértó, which both deny being the authors of invoices in their names.
Beyond his career to legend, to be replaced as a major civil rights campaigner, ecology, independent cinema, a excesses of Hollywood.
The Bentos are not only lunches in Japanese schools.
Here, too, there are factors to consider on the basis of price and quality.
In Hong Kong, the Hang Seng index has gone awry by 2.1 percent to 18.286,90 points.
"And we did not know whether the disease could be transmitted by the blood.
The Basque police have finally arrested one of the two occupants and seized the 2.178 kilograms of hashish that they were carrying and they have found after inspected the van, a Iveco Daily.
But also pool them into groups of conversation
Nights of sleep for shareholders of Hypo Real Estate
The level of higher prices of raw materials plastic and chemical has led to a considerable monthly rise in the price of manufacture products and chemical materials (1.6 percent).
The proposal was made while Eatonville was just a difficult time in its history.
The price the most prestigious fashion
However, some right wing experts propose a different view of things: for the creation of a virtual operator to be possible, we must obtain, each time, the consent of the network operator.
At Eatonville, no great commemoration, or mark for the general public.
"In other words, it means distribute 12 million blood products before someone is infected with HIV.
Other applications could affect the aerospace engineering.
Following the Bundestag elections, which will take place in September 2009, Merkel will again be Chancellor only if they are able to regain their feet one way or another, with a joint force, the CSU, having played an important role in the success of 2005.
It could be start the flow of the financial market, or parts of it.
"In nous- stressed Mercandelli- more controls and inspections are needed, as well as greater intervention on the training of workers, and this, at school."
It is the second increase in the price which follows an increase of two penny in February, and comes following a research carried out by a society of consultation.
A clear but complex pessimism invades American journalism.
The risks should be recalled to drivers, "said Martin Korˇán, the psychologist Transport the hospital Na Homolce.
A virtual operator win the Czech Republic this year.
Spiegel Online presents answers to the question in a series of articles "What do you think is true without evidence?"
It lasted, he added, until teachers and students came from the same place.
A lady of Miami wrote on a website: "This person is full of ambition".
Several people have rightly pointed out that an Internet browser is not an operational system.
Anti-cancer treatments being more aggressive, patients are often in need of recharge in red or white blood cells.
In Germany, according to a current study, flights are cheaper by almost 50 percent.
In a US magazine article of the American Chemical Society, researchers have presented a Californian removed formed of microfibres as hair, who washing of dust in the movement on an area to ensure a constant perfect and grip.
For some, it is linked to a "safe job".
"We need more charm and more dribbles", demanded Jol.
Pankseep argues that what is fear among humans and rats is probably also felt the same way in both cases: how could anyone check whether rats and humans feel the same thing when they behave in a similar way?
Firstly, by his name flamboyant - although it is known as' Marcel, which has to do with the sport as it takes the name, according to legend, boxeur Marcel Cerdan, a lover of the singer Edith Piaf.
Beˇlohlávek considers the Czech national anthem as one of the finest anthems.
"Worrying data provided by the Anmil, and the tragic events of recent days, confirm the importance of the issue of prevention in the workplace," says the President of the Republic, Giorgio Napolitano, in a message to the president of the National Association of Anmil for the mutilated and disabled at work, Pietro Mercandelli.
We must work to the maximum speed, "said President of the Ukrainian League Grigorij Surkis.
They as the anomaly of the support gravitationnel.
Suburban buses are equipped with card readers integrated into the driver's till box.
"We know how to take a step back," said Marcell Jansen.
Today we are starting in March we end, in June we learn the sums.
These people photographiées "in the street artists' are able to pass on stage of the passion, the sadness, the joy... in exciting the public.
And already buses drive into the night on the 'Autostrada Brennero direction.
Not many.
A few children speak during the night.
A filtering dam has been put in place on the peninsula of Quiberon.
Two minors have helped to remove traces of the double homicide of Ózd
In the US as in Europe, the crisis appears to speed up the phenomena that has been incubated for some time, so much so that, in the new climate, they have solidified and are revealing themselves.
For Elena, this is the first time, for Luca already the third or fourth time.
It presented his hometown the world through books sincere, full of dialect, such as "mules and Men" (1935) and "" their Eyes were watching God "(1937).
The more functions you use, the lower the average expected battery run.
The opposition does not provide for actions of protests in view of the results. It is trying rather to get his message on the need for economic reforms to the voters.
Not in sight
As soon as you leave your seats, they are gone! '
The pressure spin a turbine which in turn, leads a generator.
It is clear that the rest helped him remain brilliant, without rusting.
Share price fell by 75 percent to EUR 3.30.
He huge resemblance to her sister has not prevented her from developing her own personality.
Without dismantle, he was brief and precise.
"Protect the people of Kent is the intention the most expensive to the Police of Kent, and we are closely monitoring the behaviour of those who are accused of sexual abuse in the region, in order to minimise the risks to the public."
Then they found a cyst in his vocal cords.
The employee who cannot be named, is accused of violating the section 8.1 of the act, i.e. of the clause which deals with the preservation of information.
At the end of trade, the stock exchange of Prague bascula in the negative
The fate of the tandem, having suffered a catastrophic loss of voice of 17 percent, will be on the agenda of the party congress exceptional, held the last weekend of October.
"The guidelines that I have read [are] that this is something that we will all have to digest and with which we can move forward.
Other operators would also refer to the nature of the Czech market.
An employee of the Ministry of Defence was in transit when he forgot two highly classified documents, on a train going in the direction of Waterloo.
The eye to aspects of the bee plays an important role, since it is able to see in all directions, in a 300 degrees.
This amount would be twice that produce nuclear power plants.
The courts have banned the glamour rock star, Gary Glitter, accused of sexual abuse of children, to travel to France and Spain.
The main strategy of Vodafone in this area is the discovery of a partner to put in place a common network for a rapid mobile Internet. "
"The office has not met, on this subject, signs of behaviour anticompétitif, it has no reason to intervene in one way or another.
In Europe, the crisis has suddenly accelerated, pushing banks to emergency measures in the United Kingdom, the Benelux, Iceland and Germany, a sign that the markets are facing "not only a US crisis, but a global crisis," added the analyst at FTN Financial.
Waves, tidal currents, is the new renewable sources on which the behemoths like Chevron asked me, and now trying to get their hands.
He was ill since 2007.
The project has turned into a anthologie the intoxicating spirit of flamenco, which will soon be published in a book of collecting portraits exposed to the gallery.
"We must examine all aspects of the case for the coming weeks, to assess the options to avoid the building societies and their members pay a hefty bill" said Mr Cole.
For some, it is linked to the "safety of work".
It is enough to insert the Opencard card with the chip and the coupon bought earlier will register itself on the card.
Many voters believe that they will find salvation in a party which extols Virtue, Law and Order: they do not see that this government has given up on what was the reputation and the dignity of our country.
"Paul Gadd was not present at the time".
I do not refer to those who wake up fully awake and recount something that happened the day before, but children who speak during their sleep.
At a conference in the upper School of Public Administration
Will it be a birthday party without genuine.
We think she has suicidée by suffoquant with a plastic bag.
We have done our views on the form that should have the package of measures to stabilise the market, "confia the Agency Bloomberg the democrat Nancy Pelosi.
He shouted the scandal when the Prefecture ordered the dissolution of the City Council.
The wake up-morning we are sad when it sounds almost every morning at 7 a.m., but it is even worse when you think the pace of storm that we must present life.
The head péquiste, Pauline Marois, has emerged the common-of-Quebec that the government Landry was launched in 2001.
These are often historic places, charged with memory, "it is as if a friend of mine has disappeared, someone that we knew, with which we have shared a path and emotions" observed the director of the movie Nuovo Paradiso, which one Tornatore the first Oscar and the Grand Prix of the Cannes film festival 20 years ago, and tells the poetry of a hall in the province, and the nostalgia of a way of living the cinema, perhaps lost forever.
Welt Online depicts the most important cases.
Similarly, has cooperated with the Zuschlags, society Biogate Kft., who is now in liquidation and in 2003, has made the bills the order of the Foundation Jobb Jövo˝ért Alapítvány, the association Atlasz Egyesület and the association Vörösfenyo˝ Egyesület, for a total of about five million HUF, but behind which no provision has actually been provided.
The real estate financier Bavarian Hypo Real Estate (HRE), from the DAX side, obtains credit of a billion to protect themselves from economic turbulence from a consortium of German banks.
But given the attitude of mobile operators, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
There is no precise figures; we talk about 50 000 who are under way through the Alps and collapse in the newsstand to beer, 10 percent of visitors would express come to Italy this weekend.
Paul Newman the magnificent
How is it possible that prices in the Czech Republic are so high, compared with Europe?
According to the MEP, it is necessary to raise awareness of these reports in the widest possible circle, equally among the Roma and non-Roma.
"UEFA constantly has an eye on us."
The implementation was missing.
In a democracy, even critics have the right to speak.
But I do not know how to prove it.
But if you stop and take the time to look at the history, it is a very beautiful city ".
The billions in aid for banks in Europe and the United States does not mask the concerns of investors.
It is the same government that condone torture: Little it is important that a young adult is now psychologically destroyed, probably forever after so many years of violence.
Werner Faymann, the chairman of the SPÖ, confirmed that he wanted to discuss with the ÖVP.
Currently the sisters Cruz are taking their new activity in the trend very seriously.
I believe that we can now feel comfortable to receive or to prescribe a blood transfusion to recover the health, "says the head of the direction of Héma-Quebec.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely competetive.
In recent days, Washington Mutual, a bank with a capital of $327 has made use of the syndicate of bankruptcy, and while the New Yorkers returned home for the weekend this Friday evening, another bank, Wachovia, having debts of savings accounts worth $440 million, sought desparately for buyer to save it.
Only the neural imaging methods have helped to remove the contradiction between the two theories in leading now on a third explanation. "- said Andrew Schotter, Professor of the ability of economics at the University of New York.
What should be a symbol for the fact that we can pay with our life for a moment of insufficient attention.
Even if he speaks, he is sleeping and is therefore.
The course of action of the great German bank Hypo Real Estate collapses and pulls Dax into the abyss.
He was born in Ohio in 1925, a German Jew father and mother of Hungarian origin.
Is to be ready for the return.
"But what we want is that it should not be just a spectacle," commented the leader Sebastián Proulx, replacing Mario Dumont, who returns from a holiday today.
Student Agency is the only carrier coach services to offer stewards onboard.
And he adds that it is essential to make it more efficient, the public administration.
Staging is also thanks to music composition and guitares of Jesús Torres is Paco Arriaga, the popular song of Michel Ortega, el Pulga are Moi of Morón; the percussions of El Pájaro, and the breaches of Rafa El Viola and the cooperation of a player, Juanfra Juárez, "which plays the role of the eternal companion of this kind of artists who were considered divas".
When the price of oil declined in 1980, the idea of using marine energy was set aside, but now the ecological movement and the further increase in the price of oil has given a strong growth to the sector
Journalists can clearly see where the web is going.
But the film maker regrets not having secured funding for films such as "Captain Alatriste" or "The ghosts of Goya" - more than double that obtained for "Sangre de Mayo ’ –, because he was not been able to turn a few scenes written in a script signed by Horacio Valcárcel, with whom he has worked during most of his career.
And to top it all, they are all listed in a book which will bring the relax bookshops 30 September.
Dark matter affects the flight of space probes
The savings and transfers of Hesse-Thuringia, which holds 85 percent of the capital of the Helaba, however has drawn a lock at the beginning of the year on any union with WestLB.
The Socialist Christians have transformed Bavaria for decades and now, these are the same modern people who are turning their backs to it.
Thus the "dance of the butterfly" reminded me of a Cuban popular dance and "dance of the snake" of some tangos.
On a purely theoretical, I cannot contradict him, but I believe that prove.
Issues that arise after the accident: The stewards in the because they are illegal immigrants?
The judgment of Google is therefore somewhat contradictory: It is severely criticised by those who fear the transmission of their personal data, because they believe that their inner world and their private sector suffer when they begin to use Google services. Therefore, they address them in the spirit of revolt that it is against the multinational companies proud of their image conservative.
In the end, read the mangas, that is what I prefer already for years.
But in this approach that followed Christof Koch and Francis Crick, it focuses more on the nerve correlations of the aware that on the mechanisms causals: The two can be identical or not.
To capture the moment of personality of these artists we should not make photos on stage.
But as of today, is in force this new measure against hypocrites, against which tip and then goes to drink coffee in the bar during working hours.
"I do not propose to make peace with Syria solely on the basis of a pension Heights," signala it.
"We have made great progress.
Which is relative because it will not be easier to handle an injured CSU, and the crisis of the social democrats still lasts.
Its cost is higher than 1,000 euros and is the responsibility of the driver.
Charges brought against him are multiple murder, assault with intent and committed by interest.
In other sectors of the processing industry, rising prices has developed between 0.6 percent and 9.1 percent.
But Dannemarie could not benefit from the situation caused no major problems to an Illhousien team which fell back just a little to make a "compacter" defence, except in the last few seconds to play when, after a big scuffle, the ball was very close to crossing the goal line.
The second weekend of the party of beer is also known as the weekend of Italy.
Some residents, including the bloggeurs which had already talked about the move towards the luxury of the East Village, have opposed the idea of selling extra Place, saying that this humble small property should remain public.
And New York Times from yesterday confirms that the current crisis divides the Republican Party, even more divided between its old East Coast soul, which is moderate, in favour of the federal institutions and the business community, and its new soul, which is on the contrary, conservative, hostile to "those in Washington" and the world of finance, powerful especially in the States of the Centre and the South.
For now, not super heroes.
According to the survey, the equipment would have been bought by the company to operate Investment Kft. of Kiskunhalas, who was in liquidation since 14 September 2005.
Today, began in Paris, the European summit for the Equal Opportunities, including the guest is France, as representative of the current presidency of the European Union.
The World Energy Council (WEC) of London estimated in 2007, only 15% of the world needs electricity could be covered by the operating systems of the choppy seas of the seas.
"Sometimes God creates perfect people.
This financing plan for thaw of the crisis on Wall Street and the credit market paralyzed, has become the central issue in the presidential campaign.
Target for 2008, reach 5 million download, and given that today there are nearly 3 million and 600 miles, it is likely that with the exit of the new version, we can even exceed the figure planned
Back compete in memory the cowboy charm of Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid (1969), the young man sensuelle rejecting his wife (Elizabeth Taylor) in The chatte on a roof burning adapted of Tennessee Williams in 1958.
But the opposite must not be ruled out.
The basic models do not support in principle that maps with a maximum capacity of 2 UK.
The problem is that the commercial state of all Czech mobile operators prohibits such a resale.
The electronic vouchers are valid from tomorrow not only in the capital, but also in the surrounding areas of the city.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to walk at home.
In this new geopolitical context, the prime minister believes that occupy the territory is a duty.
The evening of the prizes will be presented by Coldplay, with this year, the selection having been restricted to four categories.
Rieger has been HSV's physiotherapist for nearly three decades, and has a great reputation like many former players.
This, the representatives of the ÚOHS must very well know, but their interests are apparently elsewhere.
From yesterday, there is also the possibility of buying the voucher by Internet on the web pages of Dopravní podnik: Www.dpp.cz.
The winner will be rewarded by a price of 300,000 euros.
Steve Ballmer has found that if the computers were sold with the necessary instead of applications unnecessary, they would go five times faster.
I feel better than ever, I'm delighted with my 30 years.
The talks come, however, only to begin, said in the financial centre.
The saga of Meat loaf will be honoured.
Flights and hotels will again become profitable - it is the result of a study conducted by a provider of financial services and American Express travels.
A Dark Street in the City, Often Forgotten, and Maybe Soon are now on sale.
It is entirely invisible, i.e. that it sends nor does not reflect electromagnetic radiation, especially no visible light.
Two months ago, Locklear was released from the clinic in Arizona, where she was interned for care of a nervous breakdown.
"A city without cinemas is a blind city, it is as a face without eyes"
The new has been watered down by the recent concerns that the crisis would be durative.
Saturday night, President George W. Bush spoke to Pelosi, then, the White House has also welcomed the news of the agreement.
For years, a mysterious phenomenon is because of confusion among researchers - the anomaly of the support gravitationnel.
Publication printed against broadcast.
Otakar Jeremiásˇ and Jaroslav Krcˇek are the authors of the arrangements for the anthem.
From April to June, the economy class ticket prices have fallen by an average of 12.5 percent compared with the previous quarter, while variation in prices of business-class and first class tickets have been far less pronounced.
While the debts to have barely budged, the background flagging loans.
"What works with drivers is the system of sugar and the whip.
Attention to the fungus orange juice, and bone.
And the mobile operator has quite logically the monopoly on its network.
The BBC correspondent Frank Gardner said that this episode had (surprised?) people of Whitehall.
Therefore, an early prevention is very important, as well as regular screening tests.
The head of state expresses its "sincere appreciation for the ongoing effort associations in favour of prevention in the workplace, the protection of workers victims, assistance to the victims' families and awareness of public opinion"
It is has the right instincts, "has, however, warned Bill Clinton this weekend.
Analysis Paris history of the sitting Morning Meeting historic Morning Meeting
Or heels of transgressing or clothes.
The blips were prepared by the agency Euro RSCG.
The problem of American journalists, the money, the money.
"With these 3%, we manage to maintain an inventory that meets the needs of hospitals.
Verdant announced have a long list of clients in expectation of authorisations necessary to draw of energy.
Observed from this point of view, emotions are closely linked to the regions of the cortex that characterise primates and especially Man.
Without making a great match, the yellow and blacks created the most chances and managed to convert one to win the match.
The largest owner on the stock exchange of Prague is the investment bank Patria Finance, with about 25% of holdings, followed by the 14.7 percent of the bank Ceská Sporitelna and the Tiger Holding Four S. a.r.l. with 13.5 percent.
"Frm Godbout, who created Hydro-Quebec at Lesage, to Lesage who started the quiet Revolution and the nationalisation of hydro-electricity, to Bourassa who made the James Bay, our party was able to forge its future," said Jean Charest.
It is not unthinkable that one will have to resort to financing in full spread.
If the pressure which requires new mergers were to increase, it could see potential partners gradually slipping away from it.
The assistant trainer Cornelius Jol has acquiesed and given the thumbs up.
Because, for Barrick Gold, the best way to conduct a public debate would lead to ruin anyone who dares to support a position contrary to his?
"Passing the road on the left," she writes, "you will find the brown and white modern public school, with its gardens and its areas for games well maintained that Howard Miller has always taken care of, although he hardly knows how to read and write.
The process of marginalization of cinemas, with the birth on the outskirts of big multisalles, and the death of consomption of the single rooms in central areas of cities, is a major events which is inevitable and no doubt; it has all the hallmarks of a genuine cultural crime.
Interest rates at Hong Kong are at the same level as in the US.
But for the moment, it is accompanied by a total silence.
"I have not abused her sexually.
Count on cheap mobile phones playing music for not much more than a few hours.
Tells us what you do in Paris.
Saturday that is the rain that prevented the celebration of the second race bulls planned.
Already for 2007, they had been cut by two thirds.
In return, the state should recover options on the shares of the financial society that can be exchanged in correlatively to the evolution of the situation in a way so as to reduce the burden on the Public Treasury.
Terms of supports the financial system will be examined on Monday to the House of Representatives.
According to the political scientist recognised, the erosion of the CSU began well before the sad duo Beckstein-Huber takes office.
Sellers must decide whether they will in turn increase the cost to consumers.
The celebration of the Second crucial time for the Improvement of the Team Record.
Bad weather has hit the fair, because ultimately two festivals out of three could not take place.
The Prime Minister does not preclude a large meeting, "not necessarily a summit", but a time when "there will be a common vision".
Three buses are reserved for Italians, and in one of the busses only Brazilians travel.
If Members of the opposition are in parliament it is because they have been appointed, not elected.
Their method, made public by the authorities in charge of the investigation, was to receive the money of subsidies obtained by issuing fresh bills, behind which no real provision was given, and thus the associations never had respect for their commitments.
For these they obtained invoice books from the market at Józsefváros, while the manufactured stamps at Kiskunhalas.
It was Mr Vic Toews, former Minister of Justice (ironically) in the Harper cabinet, who allowed himself last summer to say of Louise Arbour that she was a "disgrace" for Canada.
A government which takes no account of the fact that Omar Khadr was a young teenager at the time of the charges being levelled against.
Stress is evil of the twenty-first century.
The Prize for the economy to Paul Krugman.
He stressed that the proposal includes consumer protection, which he also supports.
Thus, the probes can save a lot of fuel.
, the final vote could be done by Sunday.
"We should find a picture with which they react very positively, such as a mother or father," said the psychologist.
The total amount to the aid of the system should be divided into two parts.
While today the Ministry of Public Administration spreads data on the reduction of absenteeism in the workplace because of illness - writes the association of the consumers - the number of active loafers continues to rise.
Of this school students are largely Hispanic, and low incomes.
The impact will be measured in Vancouver Whitecaps in the semi-finals.
The "economic pressure" that feel journalists is increased up to 79%.
Similarly, almost 93% of students have passed the examination of English-language-arts
On the one hand, Japan is the country of technology and the latest trends, on the other hand, it is tough, disciplined and traditional.
Does not mean that there are plenty of reasons to buy a reader independent.
It he: "Some people have not enjoyed".
This means that companies will have to find £81 million to settle the interests of the first year.
Minister's office Alesˇ Rˇebícˇek think it will discourage drivers a dangerous driving.
To ensure that it does not know, five bills fictitious received of society Works Team Kft. have been presented to the MRI.
Has see what you think...
Renièrent legislators and supports the call to the project of President George Bush.
It has not managed to get in the novélisation of the law on telecommunications, recently adopted, an extension of the powers of the CˇTÚ on the field of economic competition in the telecommunications, although many specialists promised an improvement in the situation.
However, in view of the dynamic and impondérabilité of the crisis, there is no certainty.
It is our duty to bring attention to this phenomenon, not in assessing the alarm on its social gravity, and improving legislation.
The process must be held in a heartbeat.
With a goal and simple methods, the SV Hamburg becomes first of the league.
Until now, his admissions are not very detailed, and although he promised on several occasions to tell everything to the last detail, he has not yet done so.
By 228 votes against and 205 votes for, the representatives refused the Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson the means that he asked.
German domestic flights have even been divided by two according to the study.
It may be that it will not for long.
"The first day of course in Japan.
That is how we need information campaigns in the press and above all negative advertisements, believes the psychologist.
According to article, the kidnappers wanted to release the women hostages after the ransom had been paid.
I am pleased because it has agreed to play a role in my work and I honour ".
Thanks to a technique of palpation of the human brain, it could also find that the Catholics were able to activate the part of the brain responsible for the regulation of pain.
The stars of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco as Diego El Cigala, Chano Lobato, Cristina Hoyos, Enrique Morente, El Lebrijano, Antonio Canales, Vicente Amigo, among others, are part of the selection made from around seventy artists photographed.
"They could propose to restore and manage it, something which Avalon could equally do, but we'd rather maintain it as public property."
Forgers did not paying attention to the fact that the company HIB Kft., based in Nyíregyháza, was in liquidation when (2001) the group of Fiatal Városért Egyesület was supposed to take a meal at home. According to our information, it is for this reason that the liquidateur of the company denies having made this bill.
The victory against the project of the motorway enabled it to change its own image.
The interest in the image of Eatonville born with Zora, that everyone here calls Hurston.
If Mr Obama really wants to eliminate the differences, he should then consider carefully, the models of education that work, rather than dismiss or view them as insignificant.
Dancers love to dress for classes and tests, to look in the mirror and feel good.
"The strike will continue," because "the fishermen will not give up" and "do not want to travel to Paris', has announced Liliane Cariou, the chairman of the Committee of Fisheries of Lorient.
"We understand the situation and want to be really sure that the words proclaiming that American troops come on the territory German not oppressors and enemies, but as liberators," is written in the letter, signed "Persons, which the fate of the Sˇumava National Park is close to my heart."
No, not Mr, I am Spanish but I have lived here thinking two years.
As soon as the somniloquies are trying to stay calm.
The celebration of the Second crucial time for the Improvement of Record of the Equipe.
Paul Newman was part of that. "
The song, written by Jim Steinman, has required a great voice like Meat loaf.
BSkyB said that the force to reduce its share of ITV would not be sensible and instead was excessive – especially given that BSkyB has just give up its voting rights.
The name hepatitis is a generic name given to infections in the liver and caused by various types of virus.
I am pleased because it has agreed to play a role in my work and I honour ".
"I am so happy," he said to reporters.
"The needs are increasing because the population ages.
A line of attack stressed since yesterday in Republican television commercials.
You turned 30 a little while ago: has this been hard for you?
"We have worked very hard on the issue and have made significant progress towards an agreement that will work and will be effective in the market and for all Americans," said Paulson.
They have achieved this subsidy of EUR twice 500 000 HUF, but these have not been used to the objectives indicated in demand.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to work at home.
A presidential visit comes at the same time quune General Assembly committee of the "crisis" created by fishermen Breton for measures in the face of soaring oil prices, which reached a record of 1.14 euro per litre on average.
The course of the obligations, however, are going particularly well.
The situation was discouraging.
Otherwise something will happen that no one would hope for at the moment - that the financial crisis can be overcome in 15 months.
I find that the woman is more mature, has more experience and are relishing life with fewer problems.
Everyone knew that it was ill.
However, he adopted, faced with this problem, its position in point.
"I didn't go out of my area" Favre said about all his passes to Coles.
Cornelius is the brother of the entraineur in-chief of Hamburg Martin Jol.
In April 2007, her real father, Terrance Randle, found her dead in his apartment in Plymouth.
In Borussia, Luhukay has not yet managed to find a functional 11.
It was sufficient to the mining to open its books, its files and establish a real debate, through the newspapers, the media publications and funding of research teams independent that could shed light on the issue.
It will never disappear but we must see the "death" of the absolute operating system, which must give way to a relative operating system.
The office of the minister Alesˇ Rˇebícˇek thinks it will discourage drivers from dangerous driving.
Paul Newman (1925-2008) - Death of an icon
The five German, the five Italian and the Romanian and their eight Egyptian companions are doing well and are safe, announced the Egyptian national television.
Good, except perhaps the plums salt confites, brrrr!
Seth Donlin, a spokesman for the Preservation of 2008, confirmed that the city wanted to sell the street, stressing that the agency's mission was to develop the property rather than the deal.
And a privilege for us to have followed the path of an American artist so lucid and generous.
It will be put to the vote early next week.
Oh there is life.
You find yourself in front of people, of characters that sometimes you do not know or give you just a few minutes to photograph them.
I am a woman from the scene, I am very anxious and concerned, I would like to have everything now but of course it is not possible.
As we have already mentioned several times, the entry of virtual operators on the mobile market has made a significant drop in the price of services.
Finally he arrived at Terminal 3 of Heathrow Airport on 22 August and remained there while his lawyer, David Corker, went to the limited court of jurisdiction of Uxbridge, West London, to record him on the list of people accused of sexual abuse, as required by Scotland Yard.
His modesty, sensitivity and talent which flowed from sources unknown shouldhave equally distanced him from the power which gives birth to real sacred monsters.
The lists of price of these firms tend to come to a select few.
Sunday, Barack Obama and John McCain, the candidates for the presidency of the two major parties in America, to support the rescue plan of the government's $700 billion, but there are politicians who are demanding the resignation of the US Treasury Secretary.
There is nothing left to collect the hostages', when suddenly, "this surprise" occurred.
He added: "Beyond the form, the fact that according to the bill, a hundred people were lodged there, did not ring very true either, since the establishment only has eleven chambers, which do not have that much place.
The probes become are unexpectedly faster or slower.
In Germany, prices have been falling even more important than in other European countries.
Paul Newman was one of them. "
It was not in fact a portrait that everyone appreciated.
After the bankruptcy of Washington Mutual Friday, the authorities have held the purchase of banking activities of Wachovia by its rival Citigroup.
The team with its arrivals late committed - the Brazilian Neves and Silva, the guardian of purpose Petric like Jansen débauché of FC Bayern - is certainly slowly, but it is not yet.
The subjects spent half an hour in an MRI scanner, during which they received 20 shocks in four part installments, while watching either the religious painting, or the more general one.
In Asia, Japan's main index Nikkei fell to 11.743,61 points after an increase from 1.26 percent.
The essence of the great masters of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco, released all tensions to get the relaxed aspect of the man or woman.
Although she was once a star of literature, a contemporary of Langston Hughes and the only black woman at Barnard College of the 1920s, she was buried in an unknown grave in Fort Pearce, Fla, where she lived.
At boarding it is therefore necessary not only to show the smart card to the driver, but also insert the Opencard into the slot on the side of the box.
For example, Avalon Bay, the manufacturer of recent buildings of luxury on First Street.
And was shot in its response to the proposal: "In any case, my life continues.
For those who accuse the Commission to be useless, given that his views will not be binding, refer reply: "Everything depends on the work that the Commission will be able to do, and the quality of its proposals.
"I am so happy," he said to reporters.
It is one of the most widespread formats and besides it, the vast majority of devices are also able to read music in WMA format.
. "Many points have been marked by little time."
Fortis employs 85 000 people and is one of the 20 largest European banks and the 10 largest insurers.
At the time, I was very pleased to have begun to learn the language of two years ago.
But given the attitude of mobile operators that are, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
Even if it is a shame to be just as underwear.
A court has been told that years of abuse inflicted by her stepfather led a woman to commit suicide.
In the same way as in a city bus or in a tram.
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
Shareholders and creditors of the bank did more than hoped.
The time limit that we had given ourselves was the opening of markets this morning.
With children very nervous and who have difficulty relax, relaxation techniques can be used to help calm internally.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a job at risk, I supprimerai.
It wants to repave Extra Place, and create a smooth transition to the shops and boutiques, which should open in the new buildings.
It is not just about the attitude of CˇTÚ, which, unlike Britain and other developed countries, has unfortunately no power to intervene in the economic competition in the Czech Republic.
For me, it was clear that I had to be travel a day.
This vast region is much more developed in humans and other primates and appears to be entirely absent among other people.
Etudiants victims of the rent ladies, up to EUR 900 for a chamber.
And a privilege for us to have followed the path of an American artist if lucid and if generous.
And furthermore, something even more profound, in a sense, even worrying: A reputation, suffering, an image of inadequacy, a sense of isolation which tends to involve the entire class of directors in a growing number of the West.
Is a long list of active principles inhibited by grapefruit and other juices.
"And this is because we do not know what will be the mechanism and the price of buying assets.
In demonstrating the assumption of neurologists, the members of the team 'against failure" were prepared to bid higher than those made by the first group and the group "for victory".
"Our challenge for the next decade is to maintain the safety of our products.
This is the second weekend of the beer festival, known as the 'weekend of Italians'.
Dre Décary however, bears in mind that "trust is extremely fragile".
The elites in danger.
On demand, the CD of installation can be shipped at home or at work.
And here, it gives them a lot of importance.
AIG will consider giving up more than 15% of its assets
The waves, which moves the sludge to the top and bottom, is converted into water pressure of the pistons and cylindres within the cork.
Particular interest, they say the Institute for research of electricity, deserves at the moment, the potential tides.
Two minors have helped to remove the footsteps of the double homicide of Ózd
The impact of Montreal has qualified for the semi-final round series first heats of the first division of the USL, thanks to a 3-1 victory (4-3 in total of goals) at the expense of Seattle Sounders yesterday, at the second and decisive game of the series quarterfinals in total of goals, the stadium Saputo.
The witness said that at 4.30 p.m., Locklear "pushed hard on accelerator, doing a lot of noise, trying to back out of the garage, and going backwards several times; she was driving with her sunglasses".
It is not necessary to store and react with intuitive logic based on data from previous maneuvers. In this way, it uses only a few dozen kilobytes of memory.
Llamazares has asked the Andalusian federation of the United Left to assume its responsibilities in the Silva case
"They believed that a return home, Czech their would be beneficial," said Chalupa.
They also have the necessary resources and the legitimacy to use resources: two invaluable things which no market or international organisation can ever have in a similar way.
It was full of scrap metal, rags, barrels, posters, leaves and strings. "
The ADQ has urged the support of the adoption of the North Plan by the government.
The one which is most appreciated by Italians, is the tent of the brewery Hofbräu.
Abuse of a step-father-" which led to suicide "
In any case it is a hardly studied phenomenon.
The bloodshed US stocks
Any combination of roles, but only the desire for a corner where a great project for Rome.
Now, at the most half of the $700 billion can be spent. The first 250 billion will be issued immediately after the adoption of the law by Congress, probably on Monday. This first amount will serve the Treasury Secretary to buy bad debts from banks, while the use of an additional $100 billion will be left to the discretion of the President.
In the context of the tragic accident of the coach of the Student Agency society near Padua, Italy, raises the question whether stewards and passengers can move within the coach during the journey.
This is what we think is the most contributions from the point of view of customers.
High-end mobiles also allow, for example, the purchase of music online.
In most cases, the rental offers also entail a number of violations: free contracts, unregistered, without limit of rent, sub-leased.
"Yes, we have a serious financial problem
Moreover, the state has a right to buy shares in banks taking part in the plan. In this way, the risk of taxpayers is lessened, since they can even benefit as soon as the economy and the saved banks will regain firm feet.
"In other words, it means distribute 12 million blood products before someone is infected with HIV.
The report by the inspector General was very critical of the role of Mr González in this case, saying that he considered 'first responsible "of the redundancies, and ultimately" abdicate ’ its leading role, "managing remarkably not involved in the case.
This is a problem that must be resolved, according to reporters interviewed, if we want traditional journalism, as the general public knows it, not to be reduced substantially.
A spokesman of the local Islamic Community said to be "deeply shocked" at the announcement of this desecration, which comes during the religious month of Ramadan, which is coming to an end.
I believe that yes, but in the end it joined and these activities have a lot in common.
In other sectors of the processing industry, rising prices have ranged between 0.6 percent and 9.1 percent.
BSkyB has lost his trial following the verdict of the Competition Commission, which would have to reduce its participation in its rival ITV provider.
The opposition fears that the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe that followed the election process does not recognize the validity of the election.
After the waves, the tides.
Also interesting, some functions specific modules, as anyone who can reduce the dimensions PowerPoint presentations, useful for example, to send them by email or to import queue PDF in the module of drafting graph, retaining the original aspect of the page.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely competetive.
In the first half, the aircraft manufacturer and delivered 97 aircrafts.
Shame, Mr Toews, it is, in this instance, and not elsewhere.
What world do we live in?
Share prices being sucked into the eddy in Europe and the United States
This is one of the many accusations against her.
Despite all their efforts, it is still not sure that their plan will get the green light.
For 46 years, the CSU was the single "sovereign" of Bavaria giving 18% of GDP.
That is why, according to the researchers, the rise in prices is what triggers the brain to violent reactions in the striatum.
Current system is also no universal that the phone.
During the war, he was, as a German of 'Cˇeské Budeˇjovice, part of the marine forces in the Baltic countries.
The interests of 2009 cover seven months to the end of September this year until the end of March.
That is one aspect of the American mindset which is kept secret until the end.
Lance T. Izumi, a former member of the studies in California, and former director of the department of education in the Pacific Research Institute for Public Policy, is the co-author of the book "not as good as you would think. Why the middle classes must be able to choose their school."
The 'rescue teams' should not use immediately 100 billion, though this would be good if they notaient in which case it would be reasonable to touch the taxpayers' money, with the aim of preventing biggest damage.
"In other words, it means we will need to distribute 12 million blood products before someone is infected with HIV.
"Everything was not very nice to see today," confessed later Marcel Jansen.
The talks, however, have only begun, according to sources in the financial centre.
"We have ensured in a letter to the President of UEFA that the preparations for the 2012 European Championships will not suffer."
Part of the Madrid press is also sees Washington as the scapegoat.
Portraits of which, thanks to the choice of the camera and equipment, given the photograph classic.
His lawyers, Michele Gentiloni and Gaetano Pecorella, asked that the estate agent can go the way of the city of province to a home in the capital.
A day very intense but, at the same time, exciting, we expected.
However, in view of the dynamics and unpredictability of the crisis, there is no certainty.
In addressing the draft of the hydro-electric dam Eastmain1a-Ruper, Mr Charest pointed out that its operation was scheduled for 2012.
"The practice of faith should change and in many cases, actually change our personality," said Wright.
For the Democratic candidate, the current débacle "is the final verdict of eight years of bad economic policy implementation by George Bush and supported by Senator McCain."
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
But the launch of Android being delayed and the iPhone already on the market, will cost them dear.
Mr Bush salua progress in the negotiations
The head of the Department of Justice, the Prosecutor General Alberto Gonzales, is accused of being involved in this case of dismissal, and in the end, he resigned.
It is a benign change of sleep called somniloquie.
UNIPOL: Court ROME, DANILO COPPOLA remains in GROTTAFERRATA.
According to Monica, they are not just beautiful and famous girls who are lending their names.
The assistant trainer Cornelius Jol has acquiesed and given the thumbs up.
But of course this is the future.
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
If Members of the opposition are in parliament is that they have been appointed, not elected.
Then I quickly crept back into my place.
Although the President can veto this decision, Congress has the right to put it in a minority.
The midfielder Antonio Ribeiro scored the winning goal in the 90th minute of play.
"This is reformism," emphasises Brunetta.
It will not work, "he stressed.
And it is precisely on tidal energy that states such as New York, Maine and Alaska, among others in coastal areas, have invested $7 million in 2008 and foresee investments of upto 35 million in 2009.
We cannot ignore the threat longer - highlights the day-Anzeiger in Geneva.
More than a third of students, been many newcomers, is studying English.
According to the results of a recent research, religious belief works as a kind of painkiller, which would have helped to make death more bearable for Catholic martyrs.
A fight taken to extremes: MP3 players versus mobile phones.
What happens if someone uses my data against me, if he looks at my work? ask users, who worry after seeing the information monopoly excercised Google.
A former PM of Bangladesh has been denied bail
Of these European roots will grow one of the glorious faces of the American dream.
As a result of domestic price fluctuations and for export, the prices of industrial production rose by 0.7% compared with the previous month, and 3.2 percent compared with the previous year.
What I will do that is to give happiness in my son and raise with a lot of love.
This is the second weekend of the beer festival, known as the 'weekend of Italians'.
They are red in colour and remind one of the machines used to punch tickets, and passengers have perhaps already noticed them in the underground stations at Roztyly, Budeˇjovická, I. P. Pavlova, Florenc and Vltavská.
This whole process must reflect what the bee done to avoid the other bees.
The written version of the economic recovery plan to $700 billion to buy the appropriations dubious banks, and to use in several times, is ready.
They are, indeed, free of the costs of construction, operation and maintains the mobile network, relatively high.
Note the case of Bologna, the first Italian city, which concerned about these closures, has decided to resolve the situation with the signing of a protocol between the Mutuelle and Anec, the first of its kind in Italy, to defend and promote cinemas single rooms historic centres and periphery.
Elena first claps Luca, then embraces him.
At the last change, the loss of the ball by Bowens, may well be the most charming play of the game.
She did in addition mention the new husband of Widow Dash and wrote that Lee Glenn "sells drinks of any kind and everything that can serve travellers.
"He has set the bar high," said George Clooney, which is perhaps the only today who is trying to enter the screen like Paul Newman: By being very honnêt and privacy serious and a long way from the objectives.
I believe that the portrait is the most difficult kind of photography.
It took the second time, when the jets transformèrent a 0-0 in an explosion.
In my view, similar are not enough to prove the experienced the same.
Until now, physicists could not explain this.
The sailors have already shown on Monday their determination by burning, from the beginning, tyres and deposits of fuel pellets to the ports of Brest, and Lorient, while the demonstrations were to Concarneau or St Brieuc.
The director of the company was a man from Romania, who Iván Kubatov would also have sent documents society, between 2002 and 2005.
Criminals have painted on several graves, such as the Jewish symbols Etoile of David; the detectives believe, however, that it could have been done to disguise the feeling of hatred of extremists to the Muslim immigrants.
The Spanish bank Santander said yesterday that it would buy the branches and the customers of the British bank accounts.
Indeed, the Prime Minister, who said in April that there would be no election in 2008 and probably not in 2009, has not ruled out the possibility of a ballot this autumn, what the law allows him.
People are less and less attention to the operational system but increasingly the Internet browser.
It would have taken note of the extent of deception only after the divorce.
"All the work is done.
Behind him, during his speech was thrown a kind of mills in pictures.
And that is why his application has been received in strategic places.
The site of the newspaper L'Equipe reported the news.
On the other hand, a wave of reputation for the existing leaderships economic species that have proven to be inadequate and full of grey area.
The Sudeten called for a referendum in the US
From January to March, prices rose in 41 of 48 European cities examined still 6.9 percent, on average, compared with 2007 in 41 of 48 European cities examined.
Mr Randle affronta the father of her daughter, who had also written a letter to confession that not as well: "I consider the bandais and regularly".
In Rome, Alemanno gave the order to make the Commission for the future of the capital leave.
While virtually all mobile can read MP3 files, no MP3 player can make phone calls.
The same applies to music for travelling, which is normally compressed, in short – MP3 music.
It is "irritating" to see that the institutions that have had a prudent behavior during the resumption of the housing market, must now pay for the institutions much less cautious.
Tourists kidnapped in Egypt are free
Italian, "whose dynamic salariales- explains the ministre- these last 8-10 years have doubled compared to the private sector, and well above the rate of inflation.
New York has hundreds of Avenues, boulevards, streets and other parallel roads, some famous, others merely functional.
But there nevertheless new negotiations on the reunification of the Deka-Bank with the Länder banks.
When the agreement was announced, a true not revolutionary.
Its cargo, more than two tonnes of hashish, the reason for which they were arrested.
For the moment, we have four systems of this kind in phases of the project, in preparation of a single federal approval and part of the energy could be used for a military installation.
No final decision has been taken on these stop, continuing the it said.
Unlike any existing system, the avoidance maneuver works in an entirely instinctive manner.
Included in the program of the Month of the photograph of Flanders, the exhibition "reflects the international importance of flamenco, more every day," explains the creator, who clarifies that "Flamenco - people '" can be anyone but, having seen the pictures, the observer realises that they are not typical images of artists on stage.
Newman, rather than sitting on his myth, was committed to the end.
The police examines the weapon and the circumstances of its use with the help of experts.
How does the 'new' anthem sound?
It is precisely the entry of a virtual operators on the mobile market that has led to a considerable reduction in prices, which subsequently led to similar reactions from the traditional operators.
Attacks on Obama are rising while the date of the elections approach.
The spokesman for T-Mobile Martina Kemrová says in a rare agreement with the declaration of O2: "We have not seen until now a project that is both viable and bilaterally advantageous, which could serve as a basis."
"Because it fascinates me,"
For the Helaba, this is not particularly good news.
According to her the final vote could be made by Sunday.
The BBC correspondent Frank Gardner said that this episode had many people from Whitehall.
Read in detail the investigation, we see that in Milan, for a bed in the area Brianza, it is approximately EUR 450; for a simple, we are going to 650 least EUR Gaza Strip (area Nere), an average of 800 (area, Udine Lambiate, and fiera) to a maximum of EUR 900 (area Vittoria)
A virtual operator will win the Czech Republic this year.
The OSCE, having sent 450 observers from 43 countries, does not recognise the elections.
His spokesman Tony Fratto said that Mr Bush was pleased the progress made on Saturday and appreciated "the bipartisan effort to stabilize our financial markets and protect our economy".
In this way, the organizing committee, in accordance with Fermín Bohórquez, Pablo Hermoso of Mendoza and Leonard Hernández, has decided to suspend the celebration of the bulls race.
A dancer sévillane will pay tribute to a dancer also sévillane.
In the online magazine "Edge", contributions by famous scientists are being published for several years.
And in addition, there are the currents and tides.
When we will no longer be the most expensive country
The host of the Festival, Felix Romeo, was confronted by public fascinated who has not seen the last time during which the Peruvian, with a staggering memory and with a great deal of humour, has described the birth of his literary vocation, which is due to "its thirst to read" and "to live new experiences"; how he wrote a "very methodical" thanks to the hard work of documentation, correcting and in redrafting part of the text to face a "lack of inspiration"; how Faulkner, Victor Hugo and Alexandre Dumas have influenced his vocation and how his memories inspire his novels.
That is how it necessarily plays a dominant role in a certain segment of the business.
The Czech national anthem will celebrate, next year, its 175th anniversary.
"I wanted to the back because I think it is these women who have an enormous influence in their time and now no one knows and highlights his work," says Bayón.
A repeat of this combination is out of the question.
If someone believes that it is not possible to achieve peace in places such as work or through personal relations, this manual demands such a belief.
This week was discussed in more than a change of strategy for Microsoft.
The only one who relies on a travesty of justice to assess the guilt of the accused.
Worse for El text, which entered the arenas of Los Llanos without penalty or glory.
The Dow Jones index lost nearly seven percent, following a fall unseen since 1987.
"The entry of a virtual operator on the mobile market would be possible following the conclusion of an agreement between a mobile operator and the virtual operator in question about renting the necessary infrastructure.
Already the way to go to school I was afraid.
For example, the bees.
Run! 'S run and reserve the seats at the bottom of the attempts.
MP3 player finger, they put at risk the hearing.
Not before throwing the cashier, or to withdraw of the species or make a payment, but before the counter of customer service, where the usual customers where their checkbooks, tourists were the direction for the shop Macy, and the new customers were of Auditors.
But I do not know how to prove it.
Often mentioned in the words of Prime Minister recently, the opening of the north - the northern the 49th parallel - had never been the subject of a presentation.
Unlike the opposition politician, the Russian observers have described the democratic elections.
In practise Sixth Street put under constant analysis an assessment of capacity of students and an exemplary attitude.
The Rock star Meat loaf, will be honoured at Q Awards for his epic song Bat Out of hell.
Thanks to this, they have sought to calm angry members of the group on the basis that one day after the Bavarian "tsunami" they have demanded personal consequences for the loss of an absolute majority.
Eatonville is classified historic city since 1998.
The money comes as many private banks that banks.
But is it that the waistline brain is at the root of the sensations?
Five years ago, it is true, even under the direction of Edmund Stoiber, at the peak of his career - the socio-Christian union had 60.7%, while today, a year after the coup against Stoiber, there have only 43.4 percent of their strength.
"It remains us here, but I foresee be," he entrusted to its militants, bringing home of loud applause.
However, I do not think so.
The interior minister wants the driver who had more than three administrative penalties for alcohol, has to install in his vehicle a system which prevents to start the vehicle drunken driving, or if he does not.
No title could bring back profits.
Sylvana already know that word with Mangas - in his new Log exchanges, it speaks of Japan.
Transactions with the actions CˇEZ rose almost half the usual daily exchanges.
"She had the air disoriented," that is why the agents have led to the center for drugs and alcohol to achieve a test.
"He has tried to do too much in the first period, noted Guy Carbonneau.
The price of the production of paper, print and publishing have not changed.
The investigation reveals that the 'issuers' have also made mistakes by mentioning the transport of goods by road as delivery, a right that the company which actually makes thr bills could not exercise, given that its profile was the council in investment.
Other sources say that the refinancing would be provided through the funds until the end of 2009.
Generosity, love of life are vibrants features of the actor disappeared.
Despite all their efforts, it is still not sure that their plan will get the green light.
For me, it was clear that I had to be travel a day.
The pressure spins a turbine which in turn, feeds a generator.
"The overall financial disaster, we must the US president," is the daily lives of Rome, La Repubblica. "The president has not even been able to block with his own party behind a bill, improvised in a hurry, to help a desperate situation..."
But it emerged then, that the prosecutors dismissed were not more criticised than their colleagues, which incited some observers to attribute their dismissal to political reasons.
According to the results, believers Catholics have been able to exclude a large part of the suffering.
The biggest losers till date, before Dow Jones, were American Express which lost nearly 14 percent and Bank of America with a loss of about 12 percent.
His Rachel, Rachel, in 1968 (based on the novel by the Canadian Margaret Laurence), with his wife Joanne Woodward in the leading role, depicts a female portrait of melancholy.
It provides for: Better control by the elected representatives of its implementation, new mechanisms to ensure the reimbursement of public money, new provisions to contain the number of houses seized in default, and a right to scrutinise the salaries paid to executives of companies rescued.
The new plan provides for the payment of a first tranche of 250 billion to which will add another 100 billion if President the judge necessary.
Despite all their efforts, it is still not sure that their plan will the green light.
The song of nine minutes 50 seconds, was the title of the hit from the album of Meat loaf of 1977.
In my view, similar are not enough to prove the experienced the same.
It is quite often, especially among children and adolescents.
Shortages are very rare.
It represents both a historical model of a takeover of blacks and a community of nearly 2,400 people where the poverty rate is twice the national average.
Moreover, there is another question to the ÚOHS.
With a goal and simple methods, SV Hamburg reaches top of the league table.
In the world, the stock markets fell to his knees.
The lists of price of these firms tend to get elected.
"But above all, a greater sense of responsibility of employers towards a phenomenon which represents a social emergency."
One aspect is that the circuits associated with almost all human consciousness include the Perifrontal Lateral Coretx (from the fact of its participation in short-term memory and functions of direction and execution).
Try not to arouse the child before to go to sleep.
The number of stadiums for the European Championship could possibly be reduced from eight to six.
Josef Pokorny´, the director of the Department of the movement of road vehicles, believes that the law is sufficiently the problem.
, the liberal government, in coming to power in 2003, has refused to implement it.
For them, sugar is represented by, for example, the time they save when they skip a red light.
If it is impossible to study and to discuss issues that displeases the rich companies of the world in a country such as Canada, on threat of repeated charges, where can one do so?
What could be really interesting is that the accused, János Zuschlag itself, decides to lift the veil on history.
A forecast that unleashed a lot of controversy, and who was a danger to the economist for years, but now has proved correct.
Brunetta: "As of today, breakfast before the work".
Moreover, the program differs from the original proposal made by the Bush administration, which stated that the $700 billion should be spent at one go, to buy securities on questionable credit.
But the Mexican press knows who are the Princes of Asturias and knows the importance of the journey.
Elena first claps Luca, then embraces him.
As the network has not changed much over the course of human evolution, it could by all means participate in horizontal sensations of all kinds.
According to the dancer, "we are not trying to recount her life but to transmit her way of thinking.
The one who will take the place of George W will have a great work to do.
This can be explained by the fact that Google, unlike Microsoft, does not ask its users for identification code, or asking for money for its applications. The documentary code and the package of program, continually updated, has a much more accessible, younger and cooler feel to it, in comparison with the practices of the official software giant.
Stars in the starry sky of Paris.
Taxis and even some veterans and local residents of long standing cannot give advice to extra Place, because they have never heard.
The new Czech anthem four new versions.
The development of the North would be in line with the principles of sustainable development.
The two right-wing parties that have raflé almost 30 percent of the votes, the Freedom Party and the Alliance for the Future of Austria, led a campaign against immigration. Some of their slogans were even considered, according to the criticism, as xenophobic.
Monica Cruz is petite but full of vitality.
Following the experience, we cannot shake off the impression that the confusion in competences leads to profitable situations for them.
If the adrenalin does not put in your to restore the balance of your body and if the stress has become a problem, it is time to sit in the sofa, from its spirit and focus on the reading.
"We are discussing the expansion of this project towards success, but in the Czech Republic the negotiations are not very promising.
But how can we ensure that it has the same thing when it behaves in the same way that we?
In other sectors of the processing industry, rising prices have ranged between 0.6 percent and 9.1 percent.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
Oil prices fell sharply on Monday, because people fear that the rescue plan for the financial markets, will be able to revive the economy.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a job at risk, I supprimerai.
What is it that it means?
As regards MP3 plays, with the exception of the iPod, you don't need any software.
To capture moments of personality of these artists we should not photograph them on stage.
The intelligent car theft of bourdon emulating
Petr Koblic, the director of the stock market in Prague, said last week that among those involved, the stock exchange of Warsaw would be the new owner the less good, and has not ruled out the fact that this could lead to the disappearance of the stock market in Prague in the future.
They are often linked to other changes in sleep such as nightmares, terrors of the night, bed-wetting or sleepwalking, but this is not always the case.
The profession has not always been kind to the beautiful Paul Newman to which the roles fell just cooked long in the tooth.
There is no single, which determines its appearance
Expansive this wave of admiration balayait Hollywood without either the nationalities or passports.
The development of Orlando has already prompted Interstate 4 up to the west of the city.
The Nasdaq stock market index of technology was 1548 points with a fall of more than seven points.
According to Bush, the project should solve the main causes of the financial crisis and to help stabilize the economy as a whole.
Microsoft is right, its operational system is losing importance but also its software.
"Everything has been done to shelter the real economy and the ordinary Americans suffering from the ongoing crisis on Wall Street," said the democrat.
At 35 years, Gebrselassie won the 26th world record of his successful career in which he has won the World Cup or the world record for any distance between 1600m and the marathon.
Which explains why the residents are both proud and protective.
They go at night, remain the day of the festival at 10.30 p.m., and fall.
The big words were not lacking in the letter from the chairing committee of WestLB to employees of the house.
Through the programme Personalized Search launched two years ago, users can, for example, store their own history of research and can see what they have sought, what they have cliqué. Thanks to this, in the long term, recommendations, based on the same logic, will be able to give answers much more personalised, and we will submit products and services on the basis of our previous statements and preferences registered.
She would know of the extent of deception only after the divorce.
Since its creation, on 28 September 1998, Héma-Quebec has applied the precautionary principle.
There are even people who swear: if Obama wins, we leave the United States.
Nicolas Sarkozy is expected to the ground by fishermen.
In exchange, it is recovering a right to vote in the bank and influence.
"A woman even died."
It is enough to fill the device directly from the computer, through the USB connector.
The office workers continue to queue to buy their morning sandwich from mobile stalls, and it is impossible to find a taxi between 16h and 19h during the week.
However, it is quite unlikely that an echo of such activity would not reach the managers of the mobile operators.
And so increases still more the conviction of the various classes, before the actions are the same ideas of social elites until now at their peak, their way to listen and to be, their culture in the complex acceptance of the term, to have the same time, and to be always more foreign to the views of the majorities.
In 2010, it will pay the interests of the whole year, which could also double.
The police munichoise is reinforced by seven policemen of the South Tyrol Transit Forum, by of the rescue services Italian volunteers who support the Bavarian Red Cross making a statistic on the countries where the Italian occupy the first place before the British intervention (60) and the Austrian (approximately 80) with nearly 200 medical interventions.
Cooperation between several people is something that has been improvements in the various applications: In the Road calculation, various users can intervene, avoiding conflicts on the changes in the drafting of texts, because every employee is a colour of comments for greater recognition in the process of revision.
Nothing however came out of this ternary display.
one must be ready for the return.
Action road safety the most expensive in history.
What method would be better to develop technologies able to avoid an obstacle, if not imitation of an existing obstacles in nature?
IMMIGRES: New YORK Times SE request SI Italy TSEs racist?
It begins with an instrumental section that lasts almost two minutes.
According to Merkel, concealing difficult to his disappointment caused by the fiasco, the loss of ground of the CSU does not influence of the grand coalition of Berlin.
Then, when I became a dancer, I started to take care of my dressing.
The pace was not very sustained during an encounter where the attackers found it difficult to do anything.
We can, of course, record music directly onto the memory card, but few card readers know how to deal with them, given the tiny dimensions of memory cards used in mobile.
According to the information of MTI, the young man was premeditated her crime. The weapon with which he was going to commit their crimes hidden on the scene of the crime.
The main cause is that according to estimates, only one in ten patients receives medical treatment.
Conseillera, how you choose
A future, says that the mayor of Rome, "will not be limited to the usual local border, but which will further" not only in the context of the future metropolitan city and its legal status of Capital, but also in relation to the role that Rome can and should be, as Capital of Europe and the Mediterranean '.
In the recent past, 15 of these banks have failed.
The septuagénaire McCain has repeatedly put forward its indisputable experience in foreign policy, while emphasising the "naive" of his opponent on these issues that were at the heart of this first contest.
The spending of the second half of the $700 billion depends on a new decree of Congress.
When a rat is a danger, it does the same as many other animals: plays dead, flees or attacks.
Unfortunately, the Czech regulators deal with this issue in the way of a hot potato disposed of in the passing of a target.
Anyway, despite all these arguments, the winning card for the democrats is George Bush.
Martina Kemrová said about this: "Competition on the mobile market was, moreover, recently increased by market entry of a fourth mobile operator.
Said the chairman of the committee of the banking and financial regulation of the House on Sunday to Reuters Barney Frank.
What is more, the irregularities occur at the level of speed.
The operational system will always be necessary because it is essential for the hardware and software to understand.
Following a work of almost a year ago, carried out by volunteer developers, monitored by Sun Microsystem, the new package Open Office is now available to the public with various innovations: the welcome screen, and the interface have been reviewed and are less dry. There are also other more important innovations, such as the compatibility with Apple Mac os X operating system, and support for the new format ODF (Open document format) 1.2, the latest version of the ISO standard.
Eric Smith made another pass and intercepted him.
Whose orders seem to have been similar: And that it is with this second goal!
According to the vision of the newspaper El Mundo, it is the failings of the political direction of there who led the global economy to the brink of collapse.
Thirdly: 'This evening, be back here at half past ten sharp! Is that understood?!
You will achieve nothing, because in sleeping, it is not aware to hold his thinking.
Illhaeusern has finally found the road to victory on home territory after a long period of famine.
Also associated with the negotiations, the two candidates in the US presidential election were in favour of the understanding; however, they did not fail to express their dissatisfaction with things having had to get this far in the first place.
The report was critical of officers of the White House, legislators and former Prosecutor General, Alberto Gonzales.
The sun was on the eve of their but its shelves obligeaient yet to put out by way of visière to see the royal couple get off the plane.
Moreover, there is another question to the ÚOHS.
For me, it was clear that I had to be travel a day.
Because I have also a weakness for traditions, customs and habits.
It is sure that there are more than one who speaks during the night.
And noisy, explains Marco Guarda, it is not for the Italian.
In Bologna, where students are concentrated in areas close to the University, it costs 250 / 280 euros for a bed in a double room, and 370 to 500 for a simple room.
Saturday the rain prevented the celebration of the second scheduled bulls race.
More than four hundred people made use of the service during the morning.
Is the Virgin Mary for a better result in better results?
According to the Russian observers, this is due to a country ruled by Alexander Lukashenko, which ensures prosperity and stability, while according to the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe (OSCE), this is because illegalities are made in the counting of votes.
His fellow Democrat Ohio, Mary Kaptur believe that these are the same people who are taking action, that those responsible for the collapse of Wall Street.
But the committee would prefer that the street rest in the hands of the city, and asked to submit a new proposal next month, said Susan Stetzer, the local manager of the Committee No 3.
Do not say that.
In the whole of the processing industry, prices have risen by 10.2 percent during the past year.
I conclude that an emotional system such as the fear is activated in a brain aware of its own activity.
This boxeur Rocky Graziano, offender, tormented, violent, unforgettable in Somebody Up there Likes Dr (marked by hatred), Robert Wise, a role for James Dean, resumed after his death, which launched really Newman in 1956.
Of graffiti on the walls, a bottle of beer of 22 onces vacuum, is based on side of newspapers that have just been thrown.
Blood mixed are often children beautiful.
The high-end mobile also allow, for example, the purchase online music.
Miroslav Cˇepicky´, the spokesman for Vodafone, has his doubts: "The Czech market is relatively small for a segmentary approach, which is the basis for most virtual operators.
The song is performed by Katerˇina Kneˇzˇínková and Adam Plachetka.
They desperately need this, and I show you an example.
New cases of positive drug tests at the last Tour de France: this time it is the Austrian team Gerolsteiner's, Bernhard Kohl, who qualified third, and was the winner of the jersey for the best climber.
Paul Newman the magnificent
Passengers can receive their coffee and their newspaper to boarding.
No one with operator, however, is against such a procedure.
Today we are starting, in March we end, in June we will make the sums.
Prices are not the lowest.
The reason may be that the geeks see exactly the problematic relationship between the rights of the individual and Internet, and what the Web 2.0, the key word as proclaimed in recent years, derives precisely behind him.
Since the disease can be detected by a routine examination in the laboratory, it is advisable to consult your doctor as soon as you observe unknown symptoms.
The SPÖ wants to show that the cooperation of both parties is indeed possible - that is what already exists in certain regions and in the Socialist partnership.
For many, the main advantage of mobile music is their prices.
Paul Newman the magnificent
Sudanese soldiers had killed six of the kidnappers this Sunday in the border area between Sudan, Chad and Egypt, and had arrested two of them.
Krugman is one of the biggest critics of the economy and foreign policy of the Bush administration.
The company has analysed data reservations the first half of 2008 and has established, after a price increase in the first quarter, a sharp fall in profits in the second quarter.
Shortly after, the witness, who initially had not recognised the actress has given that Locklear has been arrested in the middle of the motorway and is out of his vehicle.
In fact, it is not so much interested by the bus itself, but rather by the points system, the maximum speed on the motorway and the use of mobile phones while driving," said the expert Horˇín.
But that would require also some efforts from Damascus.
But that is precisely what should seem strange to the CˇTÚ.
Moreover, it is these bills that have been found in the raid on the office of Árpád Kemecsei, the Ministry of Education.
There is even people who swear: If Obama wins, we leave the United States.
But the court was told that Ms Randle, assiduous volunteer of National Trust, was haunted abuses that it had been inflicted twice a week.
But we must not give up so easily.
Almost two Republicans on three rejected his plan.
This 1: 0 scoreline (1: 0 at half-time), Hamburg owed to a successful strike off the head by Mladen Petric (in the 11th minute); and the fact that the weak Gladbach players weren't able to do any harm to the weak Hamburg players.
No, sir I am Spanish but I have lived here two years.
Demonstrations by the dissenting young on Sunday evening in the main square in the capital of Belarus to reject the legislative results in advance.
'Four hundred prominent professors economy, including three Nobel Prize, we have written to tell us: We request to Congress not to press and carefully examine the way to take, "he said yesterday.
In New York, Wall Street opened with marked losses.
The youth have recognised the fact that they are accused. For the moment, they are accused of complicity.
After the fall of Tuesday morning, the stock exchange of Prague regained its losses.
On the road, someone firm hats yellow the trees to return to the path, the signs and even an election poster of a large Bavarian People's Party.
The global financial crisis has a significant impact on the markets of actions that are falling.
At that time it was in Europe to the outbreak many cases of the human form of mad cow disease, a new variant of Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease, tells the one that takes the strong since its founding in 1998.
Only a few days ago, the big investor Warren Buffett was involved in society.
The cinema of the 1950s and 1960s fascinates us and much of our work is inspired by it.
But I think he appreciated the end of the match.
In this way, the ODSZ has abandoned its is boycotting originally planned.
'I want to become a young mother; the candidate I am not worried "
In Hong Kong, the Hang Seng index-has gone awry 2.1 percent to 18.286,90 points.
And do not forget the deposit.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
The political analyst David Gergen believe that the provision of John McCain, although honourable, has not been sufficiently "brilliant" to allow it to halt the decline in the polls to five weeks of the presidential elections.
Negotiations for the ransom are already underway.
"Sometimes what one feels goes beyond any expression, and now I have lost a great friend," began crying Robert Redford, "my life and my country were better thanks to its existence.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a job at risk, I supprimerai.
Andik, the owner of Mango, a galant man, and the Baron of Rotchil finished the evening without their jackets because they had lent them to two women.
He did not failed to describe the economic ideas of McCain as outdated.
The first time this has happened that may surprise you, but in reality it does not matter.
To produce energy on a large scale, however, we must use technology with a higher environmental impact.
Such a bold drum in life as in literature, Hurston led readers the shop of ownership of the first mayor of Eatonville, Mr Joe Clarke, who was then divided into several private parties.
We do not have to go look too far to find examples.
The same man who fought for civil rights was also the racer who finished second at the Mans 24 hours in 1979, doubled of a sex symbol, albeit part of a model couple formed in 1958 with the actress Joanne Woodward.
The market for student accomodation does not know of crisis
The proposal of this potential acquisition was made public in the meeting of this month.
Night would involve unnecessary costs, explains Marco.
The global financial crisis has a significant impact on the falling stock markets.
The documents that he has lost contained assessments on Al-Qaeda and the resources of the security forces in Iraq.
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred the gates of the community.
No operator, however, is against such a procedure.
The office of the minister Alesˇ Rˇebícˇek thinks it will discourage drivers from dangerous driving.
But the buteur Illhousiens will not be able to enjoy his happiness long and will be forced to return to the changing rooms a dozen minutes later and leaving its coéquipiers in digital inferiority.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to work at home.
And if we start to list all his appearances, it could also mention the strapping moustachu who raised the weight in a travelling circus.
It is better for example, they will still need forces.
Financial the state was, according to a newspaper article, refinanced in the very short term for projects in the long term for which he had borrowed money - which is no longer possible for the fact of distrust of the markets.
It is exclusively to the Office for the protection of economic competition (ÚOHS).
At the end of April, the City Council of Gioia Tauro was dissolved; already in 1991, and always because of alleged packs between organised crime and local government, local politicians had been released from their function to administer the City.
He added - "we must make a further effort on the communication and awareness of public opinion.
It was a blow for everyone.
Last week a delay happened in the release of the new version of Windows Mobile 7.
McCain, he wanted to build a fleet of 45 nuclear power plants by 2030.
A cafard fled before the danger, but if it feels of fear?
The Treasury estimates that the interests of the loan will rise in 2009, to £450millions.
According to the indictment, a large part of the bills were false.
BSkyB has bought its share in 2006 following an agreement to prevent NTL, now called Virgin Media, buys ITV.
You are what you divulgues subject to tone
The film maker of "Volver empezar" has influenced on its usual way to work on the staging of the players, with which he used to repeat before starting the film and that there is no role, since it seems "humiliating" and considers that "the role of the filmmaker is to go to the cinema, theatre and to be informed".
The figures provided by Anec, the association main traders, want to say: The last five years, 316 cinemas traditional to have closed, and it is the rooms of the main cities that have especially paid the price: 10 less in Florence, 9 in Milan, Naples, Bologna and Rome, 6 and less in Turin, 5 in Palermo.
The right-wing camp is intact, only party that voters have become more aware, more critical and more stubborn.
In the Swedish town, hotel prices have increased by 26.3 percent, the highest in Europe.
But given the attitude of mobile operators, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
Across the world, every year, a million people die of the most serious form of the disease, such as cancer or cirrhosis of liver caused by hepatitis B.
It is between different a letter preserved in a private archive, who is now lodged in the collections of the Jihocˇeská veˇdecká knihovna.
"It is a traditional position that all governments have reiterated.
In the online magazine 'Edge, "contributions are published for several years by famous scientists.
The 10-year interest of the Treasury fell to 3,632%, against 3,827% on Friday evening, and for 30 years to 4,161%, against 4,357% the previous day.
And only the party took place Friday
On what is based your new collection created for Mango for the fourth season?
They go at night, remain the whole day at the festival and return at 10.30 p.m.
Microsoft is seeking a receptionist (virtual)
But it is a shame to be wearing them just as underwear.
The architects of the plan would like to see it put to the vote in the House of Representatives today, and in the Senate on Wednesday.
The other RECHERCHE- The University of California, Berkeley, and it also, in the search for a new removed.
But it is said, keep your eyes wide open: and it is not without reason.
Researchers at the root of this experience hoped that the sight of the Virgin Mary refers to a kind of state of faith among the believers, while the choice of the painting of Da Vinci, not very different from the first, was on his calming effect.
The US President George Bush himself is glad of progress in the negotiations.
In this case, it is still of someone who speaks with the heart and not with the brain.
Then he found a kyste in the vocal cords.
Other applications could affect aerospace engineering.
The reasons for this fall in prices would be a slowing economic growth, explains the firm.
The authorities Thaï the bloquèrent the passport control, and in the end, it out Hong Kong.
And the inhabitants of the territory, the First United and the Inuits?
One has the impression that the traditional elites, their parties, their programs, but also their observance, their newspapers, their accredited intellectuals, their format, one would say, which is not new, one would have more difficulty to understand and therefore to represent the deep layers of Western societies, and that the economic crisis strengthens, increases and agitates in way which is potentially too much.
It is now become a city of pilgrimage
Monica Cruz is small but full of vitality.
Krugman is one of the largest criticism solutions in economy and foreign policy of the Bush administration.
The Hang Seng index in Hong Kong stock exchange lost four percent during the exchange, but later, he effaça part of losses and reduced the drop in nearly 2.5 percent.
It is not so important if the plan will be adopted now, or early next week, according to Marek
So, in just 100 words, Hurston associates Eatonville to self government but also to illiteracy, remariage, and sex.
It is astonishing that in recent weeks, this is precisely the classic groups of citizens who are rather far away from CSU, such as the self-employed, artisans, holders of the box and graduates of studies higher.
I am curious to know if I could see also here.
But I do not know how the show.
After spending during the last eight seasons, more time than anyone in uniform of the jets Shaun Ellis, the defender was thought to have all seen.
The leader of the Hungarian diplomacy is in negotiations from today in Washington.
The other sectors of the processing industry have increased between 0.2 percent and 0.9 percent.
Járóka said: We need to break the vicious cycle of poverty and segregation
The necessary tools to the opening of the mobile market virtual operators are probably even the telecommunications regulator, "said in its statement Chaloupa.
The experts say that it is a technology still in its infancy, from the fact that marine energy does not dispel fears about its environmental impact.
For example, there is Avalon Bay, the builder of recent luxury buildings on First Street.
Historical cinemas are closing in favour of Multiplexes.
Waiting lasted more than 35 minutes, it is incomprehensible since 11 000 people are expected to these races.
Another English, Oscar winner Sam Mendes, said that working with Newman was the high point of his career.
The actions of the Bank Goldman Sachs accusèrent a drop of almost 10%.
But the coach can have an accident or slow down a steep, also at a time when the steward serves coffee or distributes the newspapers.
From April to June, prices were already 3.6 percent lower than in the previous year.
If not, you can use the integrated bodies that have virtually all mobile, but a minimum of MP3 players.
All depends on it, "he says.
"It works," she observed, "it worked for us"
The perception of the obstacle takes place in a split second, and then the mini self robot, imitating the movement of bees, immediate changes the direction of its wheels sufficiently to avoid a collision.
According to Democrat Senator Harry Reid, legislators are working so that Congress will arrive at a final agreement by Sunday.
I am pleased to have a wonderful family who will at best ".
During the break, they then all out their Bento.
Many residents were fascinated, Mr Franklin told, while many are moquaient of it.
The pace was not very supported during this meeting where the attackers were difficult to speak.
Concerns for the Afghan antipolio campaign.
It is a shame that, having and moral, the government does not respect the existing laws.
In Germany, prices have been falling even more than in other European countries.
Yes, there are solutions.
In terms of points, the biggest drop in its history (684,81 points) had previously been recorded on 17 September 2001, the day of the resumption of trade after the terrorist attacks of 11 September.
They have a personality and a unique character.
He complained of scandal when the Prefecture ordered the dissolution of the City Council.
The TAN have allowed to shorten the dormant period, which stretches between the time when the person has been infected and when the first virus can be found in blood by our technique, explains the specialist.
Five paragraphs in the guide to the Florida transformèrent this city, located just outside of Route 17, a road that runs through the centre of Florida, often forgotten, which in black and chapter in the history of the human drama.
The festival of banderilles which concludes with the bulls racing at the fair of Pozoblanco has been suspended yesterday morning, after the horse keepers have established that the ring was unusable.
And accentuating more sense of urgency, "every day that goes by the fall of a financial institution" in the US, said Mrs Piegza.
Behind him, during his speech, was projected a kind of windmill of images.
The general coordinator and Member of the United Left, Gaspar Llamazares, said today that it is the regional federation to take a decision on the case of the former advisor of Youth and Sport of the City of Seville, Francisco Manuel Silva, who resigned last week after being accused of treatment with his family.
Among the rain of tributes which fell yesterday on Newman, a great friend and former colleague Robert Redford (they had acted together in The Sting and Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid) said, very saddened: "His presence has made my life and this country better."
Every day, Italy, there are 2500 accidents at work, 3 killed and 27 people who are disabled permanently.
The life of this woman which has made an impression on the history of dance in Europe in the period between wars, fascinated Isabelle Bayón.
In the first half of 2008, flights and hotels were less expensive than the previous year.
Sheikh Hasina should return after 17 October, said a former leader of the Awami Party.
This month, at a meeting of the committees of owners of neighbourhood, representatives of city agency and Avalon Bay have outlined a proposal to allow the manufacturer estate to buy the street.
The payment of 350 other billion should be ratified by another vote in Congress.
Last spring, Mikitenko aged 36 years, surprised everyone by winning the London Marathon in 2: 24: 14.
"Say what you want, we will see ourselves to the cross, on Obama or McCain.
The public expects, without really is in hiding, when Google will reveal its true nature.
The programme will be overseen by an independent body, in which the chairman of the Federal Reserve will take part.
The futures of crude oil, fell by 7 percent to $99.80 a barrel. The New York Mercantile Exchange, in sales of this morning.
If a rat or a cockroach flees from danger, does that mean that it also feels fear?
If he had done, "it would be more advanced today" commented on Mrs Marois alongside its candidate in Jean-Achilles (vote today), Françoise mercury.
It should buy, with the financial companies, the housing unsaleable which lead to financial firms in huge losses and threaten the stability of the entire system.
"Today, the city has five, but by the end of the year, there should be four-20," he Opatrny´.
The crisis of 2008 for these journalists is a crisis of a destroyed economic model.
Ping pong player bitter and retaliatory in the magnificent The Hustler of Robert Rossen (1961), it will resume the man on the return in The Color of Money of Martin Scorsese, which won him in 1987 her only Oscar on nine nominations.
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
But given the attitude of mobile operators, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
We think she committed suicide by suffocation with a plastic bag.
While Hong Kong is part of China, it establishes its monetary policy itself, that is, regardless of the Chinese central bank.
Bad weather spoils the fair at Pozoblanco
Price reductions have taken place in the sectors of production of textiles and textile products (2.5 percent), as well as in the manufacture of machinery and electrical appliances (0.3 percent).
More than 90 graves were severely damaged the graveyard of Traun, near Linz, between the night on Friday morning, according to the police, a campaign.
At the time, the department said that prosecutors were dismissed because of poor performance.
You do not consider - you pay for.
Of subtle degrees of felt, associated with our nature volubile, emerge, because we can, with the help of words and grammar, differentiation and categorising of the Member for the blame to others.
In the MDAX, the actions of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
The unforgettable interpreter of "Butch Cassidy and the Kid" died as a result of cancer at the age of 83 years, in his house of Connecticut.
"An affront to the prescriptive legal and moral, and especially in the right direction" write prosecutors, the two local authorities had expressed a willingness to pay consultations to Maître Piromalli.
Other European stock markets also have all gone the same way: In London, the FTSE 100 index has seen a decline of 3.2 percent for the moment, the CAC 40 in Paris has lost 2.9 percent.
"We can no longer time to lose.
All are able to read MP3 and the vast majority of music that you will own will precisely be in this format.
It was a victory for a country that has had trouble to cope with a suicidal food culture.
However, the law will still undergo many changes.
We don't need to remember a capacity of gigabits, or even of mega-extend.
The House of Representatives should be able to proceed with the vote of the law on Sunday, and the Senate on Monday," the Republican Senator Judd Gregg hinted.
. No signs indicate the street.
It's just that, Naomi Campbell called me, – I have known her for some time, – to invite me to participate in London at a parade for charity in favour of support for women and the clothing that we exhibited - I exhibited two clothes of our collection created for Mango - were sold at an auction to collect money for Naomi's NGO.
Austrian the famous journalist Gustav Chalupa, born in 'Cˇeské Budeˇjovice, confirms.
To imitate the functions of the eye, engineers have put forth the idea of a laser rangefinder.
The Crown Prosecution Service has suggested that the ministerial officer be placed under the surveillance of the Metropolitan Police, given the sensitive nature of his work related to the Committee associated with the secret services.
It is also the point at issue in the letter of the Committee executive board in place: In any case, would be covered a global solution for the establishment.
Not before, otherwise it blocks, and not all the yellow caps on the same benches, we must distribute them in the Chamber! '
"The first day of courses in Japan.
The times jostling through its path.
Heinz-Christian Strache, which has abandoned the right of the Austrian Freedom Party, and Filip Dewinter of the Belgian right Vlaams Belang, take part in a demonstration to present the organisation 'cities against the Islamisation "in Antwerp, on Thursday 17 January 2008.
Of course, Fodor was not the case.
The cause of this exclusion is that the stock exchange of Warsaw is owned by the state.
"It is a bad sign for the market, which sees the Congress unable to adopt a plan," said Lindsey Piegza, FTN Financial.
"I am surprised and even a little shocked the speed with which the memory of scandals such as the collapse of Enron and WorldCom, have disappeared from public attention" said Krugman at the end of 2002.
This wave of admiration swept Hollywood without care for either nationalities or passports.
Has television, President Lukashenko and the members of the central electoral commission welcome their success.
Before off for the US, Nicolas Sarkozy will take a detour by the Kingdom.
A group of other issuers of bills is composed of those who were well aware that they were asked to pass bills.
Besides the primary functions of making telephone calls and sending SMS, it is able to read music and films, to record them, to take pictures with a camera of varying quality, and even to serve as a navigation guide.
But this time, Elena accompanied it as a sweetheart, and therefore there is nothing like this, he says.
But it is difficult to convince people to give their blood, but above all to retain and encourage them to become regular donors.
1001, the number antistress
"However, it has not led to any conclusion on this point.
Among the groups of internal trade and according to the allocation of sectors, in August, the initiatoring sectors of profit on investment showed the most significant rise of monthly price (0.7 percent).
Superglue to walk on the walls.
Since I am very small clothes plaisaient me; I désirai go to my grandmother to look in the filing of my aunt, and to see his clothes.
At the trial against him, last week it had secured the release domiciliaire transformed into a house with Grottaferrata.
"We are pleased with the progress achieved this night, and we greatly appreciate the efforts of both parties to stabilize our financial markets and to protect our economy," said Tony Fratto, the spokesman for the White House.
The first news of the failure of the rescue plan has seen Dow Jones temporarily loose 700 points.
A great tragedy occurs
The change of strategy is welcome.
This malfrat appealing in the scam brillantissime The Sting (L), Oscar for best film in 1973.
It would be absurd to buy an expensive and high-end gramophone for the house to play the new album of Maxim Turbulenc.
The american of Dow Jones collapses despite the rescue of the financial market planned by the state.
So far, Embraer has delivered 41 aircrafts to its Chinese customers in eight years.
About 30 feet wide for 120 long, it looks like a gone poussiéreuse rather than a busy active.
Rats also have sensations
Saturday night in Minnesota, the Thunder has filled a deficit of 3-1 in the match return to win 4-3, but the Whitecaps have acceded to the semi-final round 5-4 in total of goals.
Of breaks will be made to Bressanone, and Holzkirchen, while many other bus with Italian registrations plates are once again a pause shortly before Munich, on the motorway 8.
The beginning of course does not seem to be set as strict as home in Lower Saxony.
Elena, Luca and others come together, Marco makes a last speech and explains the plan of attack.
Refer Rome, gave the order to leave the Commission for the future of the capital.
The world over, stock markets fell to their knees.
But 1001, and not one more or less.
A Committee chaired by Benedict Pelletier and Julie millstone (Transport and natural resources) has an important place has started work.
Because I have also a weak to the traditions, customs and habits.
To support the sector, it should be between 16 and 18 million per year.
For me, it was clear that I had to be travel a day.
A pension, based in Badacsonytomaj, did in fact have only three houses, and maximum of 10 people could spend the night there, but the bill was for one hundred and thirty customers.
This creates an immediate political problem for which the rules: That is to say as respond to the difficulties and the protests of individuals and families who is also an electorate.
"We have made great progress towards an agreement that will be effective in the markets," said the representative of the Bush administration, Henry Paulson.
None of the Germans caught who lived in Czechoslovakia before the war, he believed that, following the Benesˇ decrees, it would be expelled from the Republic.
Some prosecutors have been accused of being close to the Republicans in Congress, while others have refused to investigate the allegations of vote fraud against the Democrats.
A UN spokesman said that happened despite the promises of the Taliban not to address nor inhibit the thousands nurses in vaccinations.
In short - victorious goal for Kovalev
Next year, there will need a visa to go to the United States?
"I heard a woman at my local Chinese supermarket, talk on the phone of Lehman Brothers, the bank that failed, and its thin CEO Dick Fuld, with the same familiarity she may have used to criticise a colleague.
On the press, he cited another reference, conservative, the programme 'Roads to the North "John Diefenbaker, Prime Minister of 1957 to 1963.
A cafard fled before the danger, but if it feels of fear?
Soccer - The Impact in the semi-finals
Blood tests carried out on test tubes Kohl are part of those made in recent weeks by the Lausanne and Chatenay-Malabry.
A statement would surprise and do not on the part of representatives of the operators.
"The Supreme Court has rejected the request of Sheikh Hasina saying that she does not require bail because she had been allowed to go abroad for medical reasons," said her lawyer Rafique-ul Huq.
In Kent Police had given the travel ban last Thursday after having demonstrated the sexes the guilt of Glitter for sexual abuse on child.
On the other hand, there is a growing pressure of competition in the "open skies" Treaty liberalising air traffic between the United States and Europe.
In the sectors of the supply of electricity, gas, steam and water, representing a significant weight in the industrial exploitation, prices have witnessed an increase of 0.3 percent in August, mainly because of the effect of rising gas prices set up by the authorities since 1 July.
In 1999 has appeared on the market a technique much more sensitive HIV testing: The acid test nucléique (Tan) that can detect directly in the blood donors the presence of the virus itself and not that of antibodies against the virus, which were the tests used so far.
I have called last week, and today I had doubts, but in the end it all went for the better. '"
I believe that in the photograph the portrait is the kind of the most difficult.
In this new geopolitical context, the prime minister believes that to occupy the territory is a duty.
Mr Bush salua progress in the negotiations
In cooperation with the University of Tokyo, Nissan has built a mini car robot, a system to command self-robotisé bio-inspired, type BR23C, he has equipped qualities of bees, the ultimate goal is to encourage the development of a system able to avoid obstacles.
This mechanism must only deal with a few signals per second, and respond to them.
If we take the example of the race yesterday: We are not!
Now that the election in Parliament of the Land of Bavaria is over, a union of BayernLB with the bank from Baden-Wuttenberg could be seen very soon.
The psychological importance of the agreement, signaling the adoption of the plan, is the most important thing at the moment," stressed Marek.
Michael Trerise, 57 years old, from Stithians, in Cornwall, has been jailed for six years after he admitted to eight counts of indecency acts.
When it comes to their interests, operators can be as. The chicane accompanying the creation of the U: Fon witness.
It is better for this way, as they will still need their strength.
Indeed, the activities of these firms their profits are non-negligible, and, at the same time, as opposed to the virtual operators real, they do not threaten them with their own marketing official.
As one of the first signs of an internal review of the party, the Vice-President and the Federal Minister of Agriculture, presented Horst Seehofer as a possible successor to Huber. He also received a place in this small group of recognition, which initiated groping discussions with the liberal of the FDP, and with the free Electeurs, trained along the values of the right, about a possible coalition of the government in Munich.
The company account complaint against the driver of the lorry.
Even if he speaks, he is sleeping and is therefore at rest.
The show begins at 8.30 p.m. at the Lope de Vega theatre
In 2010, it will pay the interests of the whole year, which could also double.
In six months, the president Antonio Marzano and 49 other components of the Commission will put up the directives to Rome.
As he had already left before the Cˇesky´ rozhlas (the Czech public radio), he has chosen to the interpretation of solo versions of the singers with the young and representative, which are marked and appreciated.
The legislators thus refused to support President George Bush's call to the project.
But some fishermen in Brittany do not want to be represented by leaders of the National Committee on Fisheries, which has not supported their movement.
With a camera and a system of recognizing forms and faces, this "receptionist" can know how many people are in the place, who they are - what posts they occupy - and listen and hear the keywords of their conversations.
It is virtually impossible to find on a standard atlas.
The Impact should face the Whitecaps Friday and Sunday, but the details of the series will be confirmed today.
They say so much about it, I do know, many things are not true.
In the past, Glitter has already served a sentence of four months in the UK, for possession of images of child abuse.
The course of the obligations, however, are going particularly well.
But I wonder if we are ready.
The port of recreational craft of Quiberon was also blocked, but the connections to Sleeping-island not stopped.
Hillary and Bill Clinton, Nicolas Sarkozy, George Clooney, Julia Roberts, Robert Redford and Sam Mendes saluted the legend of cinema and the actor, Paul Newman, who died at the age of 83.
In the first half, the aircraft manufacturer 97 had delivered.
"We need to reach an agreement with the Palestinians, which means that it will be necessary to make almost all the territories (occupied), if not all," said Olmert on a daily basis.
The public is prepared to hear Barrick and to judge, but on the basis of civilised trade arguments, and not in the context of what many see as a continuation-muzzle (pursuing the "public debate," Barrick Gold has also submit a formal notice to the place of the authors of black Canada told to stop the use of the term...).
The reaction of Dennis Quaid, 54, on being called an unfaithful husband region was clear: it is "monstrous", he said to the "New York Daily News", that "Meg is again bringing up the history of our relationship and manipulating it".
That is the objective of various American research centres, and today, a team of four institutions are almost succeeds.
The second weekend of the beer festival is also known as the weekend of Italy.
None of the Czech operators did of a dominant position on such a market.
I am pleased to have a wonderful family which is doing very well".
"Because of the debt of the country and the rise of the trade deficit, the collapse of social security," referring to the silence of a graveyard, is no longer just a matter of time "- believes Milinkevich.
Particularisés mobile telephone services are offered for example by Amway, Bohemia Telecom, Starlife and others.
We must work at maximum speed, " said Grigorij Surkis President of the Ukrainian League.
I very much like my trip in town and observe women to see how they are dressed, how they combine their clothes, I often do.
The security concerns are the reason that explains the absence of stewards on board its vehicles said the director of the Asiana Litvine Alexei, which ensures, compared with SA, a very small number of lines.
The phone, after all, is increasingly becoming a computer.
In these groups, support for the CSU has fallen below 40 percent.
It is quite common, especially among children and adolescents.
The 15 million provided by the Madrid Commune are for Garci a "unique opportunity" to replicate with the settings and clothing appropriate the atmosphere "a Spain who was out of leader in the fight, since the fight for independence has led people to rebellion under the rule of Ferdinand VII," he said.
According Masi, "the choice of rotating doors is important even from a symbolic point of view."
Serious accusations have been launched by the judges of the Directorate of the anti-Mafia Calabria, against the mayor and Vice Mayor of Gioia Tauro, Giorgio Dal Torrione and Rosario Schiavione, and the mayor of Rosarno Carlo Martelli's Liberal Socialists, arrested this morning for external assistance of a mafia association.
The universal nature of the mobile is not without problems.
The favourite to win the Nobel Prize for Literature has said yesterday at the Hay festival Segovia that the novel, which currently occupies him "is a real audacity" and that "everything shows that he should not be writing it".
This service alone should be a compelling enough reason to buy a mobile with music playing capabilites.
So, following the latest step of the European Commission in the field of the regulation of roaming charges, a paradoxical situation may happen - the text-messaging from abroad will be for some customers mobile operators Czech cheaper than the country.
This episode has shown that the precautionary principle that has been applied, made sense. "
He was informed of the decision on Monday morning and was then transported from home to a secret location.
After the failure of the vote
"And we did not know whether the disease could be transmitted by blood.
Sign of the tense situation is the removal by the airlines of non-profitable routes, and the high number of airlines have tabled stock during the first half of 2008 - they were 24 companies in Europe alone.
All times, it drew attention to the fact that in the new system, there will be no entry visa, but tourists must be registered before the start.
He also stressed that the political party has "very strict ethical codes for all the officials'.
In this, Pavel Dvorˇák, the President of the Council of the Czech Office of telecommunications (CˇTÚ), who has repeatedly said that in the Czech Republic there was no room for another operator, is join operators.
A forced integration, among other things, put an end to the relatively idyllic isolation of the community.
But I do not know how the show.
Do not say that.
A crucial moment came in the 1980s.
Finally, the cities such as Perugia, in which the kind of letting are often taken by students from outside the European Union, there is a further anomaly: The rent asked foreign students is an increase of 25-30% compared to that applied to Italy.
However, given the complexity of the mechanism by which the aid to the markets can be effective, will follow a "disappointment".
Modernisation goes hand in hand with the increase in opportunities, and the consequences of such a policy are also visible.
The number of stages for the European Championship could possibly be reduced from eight to six.
Gary Glitter forbidden to travel abroad.
The soul, precisely, who has made to feel a despotic with the vote which I mentioned earlier.
The direction of the Polish football league PZPN has been suspended by the National Olympic Committee after many scandals and replaced by Robert Zawlocki, administrator independent.
"He has tried to do enough in the first period, noted Guy Carbonneau.
"The name of our society and our number of tax were placed in a stamp on the wrong place."
It would reduce the costs," he says.
The importance is to make life better for women in the developing world.
Similarly, the VAT rate of four bills established on behalf of the Hotel Révfülöp by order of Jobb Jövo˝ért were incorrect, since the benefits of the society do not pay a VAT of 25% as mentioned, but a VAT of 15%. In addition, the employees of the hotel only print bills, while the false ones were drafted by hand.
Many residents were fascinated, Mr Franklin said, while many made fun of her.
Monday, Huber has launched a scathing remarks to the CDU. According to him, they would have been much more support from the sister party.
Vodafone heads rather its attention on obtaining its own 3G licences.
America very fond least without Paul Newman
She wanted to make promotions for a new film, spoke of her private life in an interview, and has now created trouble with her ex: The Hollywood star Meg Ryan unveils her life with her former partner Dennis Quaid.
The launch of Mobilking will not take place in other countries in the region, "said in a telephone maintains for Mobil.cz Jana Studnicˇková, spokesman for the financial group penta.
According to the calculations of scientists, the black matters would be a good fifth of the mass of the universe.
For its part, the Speaker Gianfranco Fini has pointed out that "this phenomenon of the dead white is an absolute social emergency, who insult the conscience of each of us, and requires all the institutions, to make a real effort to stop it quickly".
We have already raised the issue repeatedly on Mobil.cz, the fact that the Czech operators are some of the most expensive in Europe.
However, according to what the manager said, it would have been impossible for so many people to occupy this place, at the same time.
Passers-by said they did not think often of Extra Place, and suggested its development.
It would make it the Nice country in a nation of racist? This is what if intéroge the New York Times who has dedicated a long, discussing the issue of racism in Italy, working on the case of young Abdul William Guibre, a native of Burkina Faso, killed last month in Milan, for stealing a sounding biscuits.
Student Agency is the only carrier coach services to propose the stewards.
The Czech national anthem will, next year, its 175è anniversary.
The Hamburg SV will celebrate its 121 years on Monday.
For the moment, no issue with a complex project and serious in this area has contacted, "mentioned Vlastimil Department Srsˇenˇ press Telefonika O2, in its statement for Mobil.cz.
"But this is not an amnesty for our country.
Especially in the case of the three companies mentioned it can act of thousands of customers.
Members of this pair very criticised have, in any case, felt that they were not particularly in their seats.
Her lawyers have said that the court refused to give her because of her indictment for having extracted 50 million Taka ($729.000,00) from a businessman when she was PM.
Indeed, the operator is specifically men.
Almost two Republicans out of three rejected his plan.
"This saga unpleasant ended with the suicide of the victim.
But the interests that are at the same time increase, will subsequently charged, each year, the 700 financial companies that collect deposits.
The problem is that trade of all mobile operators Czech prohibit such a resale.
Everyone knew that it was ill.
I am a pragmatic émotionel.
At the same time, in Europe, we had further proof of the global nature of the crisis.
Bastian Reinhard would also have wanted be more relaxed.
So far, Embraer 41 appliances delivered to the Chinese customers in eight years.
Perhaps Mr Garverwill please explain how he can ask for a "public" debate when he disregards the views of the public?
But there is no one or two methods to combat fatigue daily and the problems linked to the world of work.
A minimum of functions and the resemblance to the controls on a cassette player commonly used in the past, or gramophone, is obvious.
However, it is clear that, to block the super power of the multiplex cinemas, the traditional hall must also improve the quality of its sound and image, because the public today is more demanding.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the provision of services. "
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely concurrenciez.
Do not wake the child up.
Even tougher action was decided in Poland.
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred the gates of the community.
Monday, the House of Representatives will be the first to vote on the bill responding on behalf of Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008, and then his fate will be in the hands of the Senate.
These past two weeks, the markets for raw materials have been buffeted by the financial turmoil on Wall Street, as well as by two powerful hurricanes in the Gulf of Mexico.
And there will be a maximum of five Members of the opposition in parliament, those who are best suited to power. "
"The fiasco of the five-ways motorway, very fast, a genuine civic pride" said Ms. Nathiri.
The arrests of this morning follow those of July, following which the police announced having decapitated the Piromalli clan.
The news of the positivité Kohl to the EPO of third generation, was confirmed by the head of the French anti-doping agency, Pierre Bordry, which has communicated to the Associated Press, be notified the positivité the Austrian authorities.
"It works, observed," it worked for us "
This is the first step towards the concept of a technology for instant avoidance. According to estimates by Nissan, this system will make its entry in manufactured cars in steps over the next ten years.
Especially in the case of the three companies mentioned the number of customers can be in thousands.
Has Eatonville, no great commemoration, or mark for the general public.
The problem is that trade of all mobile operators Czech prohibit such a resale.
Coaches are divided into urban, where there are places standing and a maximum speed limited, urban with places standing and a higher speed limit and coaches long distances without place standing with the maximum speed the higher and seats equipped with seat belts.
Listen to the four new version of the national anthem.
In a recent past, 15 of these banks have failed.
Trerise wrote in a letter to confession: "I feel responsible for his death".
I am pleased because it has agreed to play a role in my work and I honour ".
This is a very interesting, especially if we consider that in Alaska, the US continues to extract oil, and recently President Bush has set up a project for new excavations
According Masi, "the choice of rotating doors is important even from a symbolic point of view."
It is unnecessary since it is unconscious and you are waking it up.
The price of milk has increased to five pence per litre
Coaches long distance Student Agency have no standing markets, which has been confirmed in Aktuálneˇ.cz by the director of the company Radim Jancˇura.
When we will not be the most expensive
He stressed that the proposal contains the passages of consumer protection that he also supports.
But what has just been mentioned is just one example of the big changes that the ongoing economic earthquake foreshadows or is already engendering: not only in the US, but throughout the West, and maybe not only here.
At the same time, the Belgian, Dutch and Luxembourg governments have together met to nationalise the European financial conglomerate, Fortis.
Hepatitis: When do we need to consult a doctor?
Fishermen in The Turballe and Croisic, in the Loire-Atlantic, have stopped in the evening the blockade of the important refinery Total of Donges.
Researchers asked the participants in the experiment to look at two paintings, one being that of the Virgin Mary painted by Sassoferrato in the 17th century, and the other, the Lady with the Ermine painted by Leonardo da Vinci in the 15th century.
The psychology of one-upmanship: Why are spending more money?
The rule allows companies concerned, to take part in a programme of assurance, where the secretariat the Treasury ensures the tools at the root of the concerns, for which the companies have paid a premium equivalent to the damage predictable.
That is why it is also difficult to determine what may be consciousness among other animals.
A Slovenian lorry which was probably leaving a hard shoulder without using indicator lights must have blocked the path of the coach.
But the Conservatives have always strongly in this region south of key importance for the Hungarian economy. In the future, they will be forced to the coalition.
He served when even of these companies, because at the request of Maître Zsolt Szente, coaccusé and editor of the acts of foundation of companies, it has established bills to their names, the order of associations with Zuschlag, as the associations Atlasz and Y-Generáció.
But, if Congress feels that the programme is not successful, it has the right to block the remaining grant, following two stages: first with the additional $100 billion, then, finally, 350 billion dollars.
"We are about to agree on a plan that will work and be equally effective on the market.
The excellent results achieved by the school speak for themselves, but the policies on education within his party (the Associations support for the National Education long bilingual education) and its huge support for the bilingual education, obscure the predicts the response to Mr Obama.
"Senator Obama does not seem to understand that..." he accused has several occasions.
Such as Tesco Mobile proposes, in Britain, SMS at least two times cheaper than its competitors.
The profits of these sales were nonetheless paid to his Foundation for children with difficult childhoods.
In Germany, according to a current study, flights would be even cut up 50 percent.
In this case, we could exclude animals.
The second weekend of the beer festival is also known as the weekend of Italy.
Ironically, indeed, while we were convinced of henceforth entering a world of networks, technology which is increasingly more sophisticated, convinced that the global finance is now intended to dominate the world, that we became aware in a single stroke, that our future will have to settle scores with more things that are very material such as water, harvests, oil.
For his personal consumption, he called for a bill, on the model of which was made other bills that they would introduce, among other things, to the Ministry of Youth and Sport, the Ministry of Social Affairs and Labour, and the Municipality of the Capital, to access subsidies.
The right-wing camp is intact, it is only at the heart of the party that voters have become more aware - as mentioned Der Spiegel, the low score of the Bavarian CSU in the country.
And above all, it has regained the confidence of the public who had been badly shaken by the contaminated blood scandal in the 1980s and 1990s.
Most people are always their mobile on itself.
The celebration of the Second crucial time for the Improvement of Record of the Equipe.
This collection of portraits of the current intoxicating spirit of flamenco entitled 'intoxicating spirit of flamenco - people', is exposed to the gallery El Fotómata, located at No. 20 of the streets of the Mata (street parallel to the Peupleraie of Hercules), which will be open until 16 October.
The stock exchange of Warsaw made a proposal to buy the stock exchange of Prague
After the fall of Tuesday morning, the stock exchange of Prague réctifia its losses.
You are not even have to do too much attention to the music formats that the mobile or the reader is able to read.
"At the moment, we do not believe that there is room on the Czech market for a virtual operator as such.
Other politicians CSU have interpreted the defeat as a warning to the CDU and also for Angela Merkel.
The financial crisis from the point of view of the European press
They launched a watermelon from their car '.
In this respect, a study in the US in 2007 showed that the vehicles equipped with this device cut up to 65% of offences during the first year of installation.
If you are part of the auditors more demanding, choose the mobile-walkman (Sony Ericsson, some Nokia and Samsung).
A formulated answer like this is not suprising, coming from the representative of the operators.
They have promised to welcome him "in a constructive spirit" and hope that it "will come with concrete proposals".
The problem is that trade of all mobile operators Czech prohibit such a resale.
The many initiatives promoted in the education sector, have a particular importance for a more direct awareness on young people who enter the world of work.
The actress Heather Locklear arrested for driving under the effect of a drug
Here, too, there are factors to consider on the basis of price and quality.
Gebrselassie Sunday, preceded by four Kenyans, recorded a time of 1: 02: 04. half way.
But in most cases, you will be limited by the absence of standard output for headphones.
The continuation of proportion of Barrick Gold clearly shows that, contrary to what it claims, it has no desire to a debate transparent.
Eatonville and the world seemed to have forgotten.
Some aircraft are having a structure that an index of tree, in the manner of the Explorer offer of Windows, others are capable of the two (iriver, Samsung, Sony, Cowon, the smart phones with operating system).
On behalf of the 'European Year of Equal Opportunities "guaranteed for all, the objective of the summit for equal opportunities in Europe held every year since the summit in Berlin last year, is to ensure a single platform to support the measures taken in favour of equal opportunities and the fight against discrimination, targeted at Europe and its Member States.
The first company to focus on marine energy has been the Enersis, who in 2005, has siglé an agreement to build a plant in the north of Portugal.
Apart from the fact that we must go very early to withdraw the chip, the queue is 15 minutes, and we must leave his bag to back to the entry.
Analysts at Barclays Capital said that the frenzied negotiations over the weekend, concluding with the agreement of rescue "do not seem to have managed to revive the market. "
The value of the stock exchange of Prague is estimated between 5 to 10 billion kronor Czech by specialists in the market.
She said to me, following my visit to the bank. "I put my savings in the market for Monetary Fund.
Most patients do not know of the virus, because the pathogenic gene destroys liver cells on the sly. In many cases, the first symptoms do not appear until after 20 to 30 years.
Among the undecided voters, who are those who look, Obama has won for 39% of respondents, while 25% of them are giving the victory to McCain, according to a CBS poll.
Issuers of the fake bills did not inform themselves on travel agents of Budapest either, which was part of their choice, but only organising trips abroad. Thus, naively, they have indicated stays in Hungary on bills to be settled in cash, which also goes against the accounting practices of the agency.
It embodied for everyone an ideal of beauty and truth.
According to the indictment, the manager of the society Collab Kft. was forced to make false invoices by one of the defendants, Ludovic Györfi.
Platini, the UEFA president: A grace period for Poland and Ukraine
No final decision has been taken on these cessions, said FT.
They do not believe that the regime which has been good to foreign observers in order to resume talks with the European Union is prepared to carry out a democratic watershed.
The singer, who will receive an Oscar at the ceremony in London next week, declared being "honoured" to get this recognition.
The fourth largest world aircraft manufacturer, Embraer, maintains its forecast for 2008 with 215 aircraft deliveries, re-affirmed Fredrico Fleury Curado, its chairman.
Especially in the case of the three companies mentioned the number of customers can be in thousands.
It was a privilege to be here. "
Ms Boyd summed up everything by saying that "Zora saved Eatonville".
Molter reacted cautiously to the proposals of the red.
This is not the first time that the Deta-Bank, which, with its 3,000 employees, counts as one of the largest employers in the financial centre of Frankfurt, comes into play when it should be consolidating the sector of the coffers savings.
With some, we have managed to make progress in the negotiations, "said the spokesman of the Pavel Kaidl group.
Already for 2007, they had been spoiled the two thirds.
Despite this pitiful electoral defeat, heads are not yet fallen, and the debate on the personal questions to the heights of the Bavarian CSU was postponed.
These research has tried to draw up a neural pattern of this kind of 'game' to the aid of experimental auction.
The greater pressure on the apparent CˇTÚ, the creation of the U: Fon, has been exerted by society T-Mobile.
When energy is born waves, now the big moves.
So far, the EU has not really busy of the crisis, which, as a tsunami, crosses, hand in hand, the old continent.
After the fact that the bank is, according to the latest reports, at the gates of insolvency as of Sunday evening, this rescue measure will not be able to reassure people either.
Police officers arrested two occupants of a van while its other two fled.
"We have not stewards. We objected to it from the beginning.
Jancˇura is prepared to remove these services
In this way, "Triennat Zenobia and Juan Ramón" comes to an end with a repeat of this work with Congress International held in New York, with the restoration of the Nobel Museum and with the moving exhibition "Juan Ramón Jiménez: the citizen of light" which was inaugurated in May last year and which, having travelled in the various provinces of Andalusia, will go to New York at the International Congress.
Monica is warm and timid.
Other believed that they would simply remain in Czechoslovakia.
On Wall Street, fear travels.
"And this is because we do not know what will the mechanism and the price of buying assets.
The defence of the traditional film hall is a subject that for me, has always been important: the closure of Supercinema in Bagheria, the place of my childhood and adolescence, was the spark that convinced me to make "New cinema Paradiso" which I have been thinking of already since 10 years.
I look forward to the films 'La última hora' and 'En busca de tumba de Cristo'.
It stems from a letter filed in the collections of the Jihocˇeská veˇdecká knihovna (The scientific Library of Bohemia south).
If you understand what he says (which is not usual), have not the temptation to the question to obtain information.
For their operation to be effective, indeed they need far fewer customers than a classic operator.
Already the way to go to school I was afraid.
Its beauty in the eyes of blue background was long their card asset, some would say its weakness.
Sunday, on the occasion of the Day of nationality, the Czech Prime Minister Mirek Topolánek formally presented the new recordings of the national anthem Kde domov mu˚j (Where is my homeland?).
But the opposite must not be ruled out.
The public prosecutor believed that 10% of are listed on the bills and VAT went into the pockets of Kubatov.
Sanctions, including a ban on visas for 40 Belarusian leaders and the freezing of some assets, could be lifted if these elections are considered as fair by observers.
In the video presentation, the receptionist detects a third person, but it understands that the person is not part of the group that is speaking with her and that she is not part of the company.
If Members of the opposition are in parliament is that they have been appointed, not elected.
With this film Garci does not expect to win any prizes.
Illhaeusern has finally found the road to victory on the ground after a long period of famine.
The OSCE, having sent 450 observers from 43 countries, does not recognise the elections as fair.
The choice of mode of use and requirements of the future owner.
People that Naomi is a person central aim.
Coppola is being investigated for bankruptcy in the framework of the investigation on the Unipol-Bnl escalation.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
Here is the least condemning view of this act, without any insinuation of criminal intent.
And Windows 7 will contain less applications, much fewer than Vista.
But what great athlete of substance.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to walk at home.
Quebec has greatly built its relations with the North, he said: The gold rush in Abitibi, engineering of Quebec, the James Bay.
"These results cannot be demonstrated by any existing economic theory.
Since there was a long queue, competitions began and we had not yet been our bag to back to the entry, although once fact, the withdrawal has been worse.
"We will present an appeal against the order of the Supreme Court"
Pupils arrive one after the other from eight o'clock, until eight forty, when the Professor begins a round of the 'home' room.
Another facet raises the question of how the various business models of each of these banks can match.
"The real men choose Mobilking - an operator which satisfies them, and that they can trust," said David Seibert, the CEO of Mobile Entertainment Company, which is exploiting this virtual operator.
Iwan Wasjunik Deputy Prime Minister said that the preparations would soon be placed under the direct responsibility of the President and the Prime Minister.
Indeed, Italy, thousands of employees of the public administration correct and productive, met to declare war on illegitimate standards contained in the decree.
And various ways, the city that it has become a tourist décrit- thanks to its inclusion in the tourist guide to the Florida published by The Depression- era Federal Writers Project- 'remains a place at hand.
Staging has made thanks to two outstanding contributions: That of Miguel Poveda which chantera new Isabela in one of his performances, as he had done to "The Puerta abierta"; and that Professor Matilde Coral, who was exceptionally well liked to work with the one that was his pupil.
But that does not reduce the greatness of Gebrselassie's capacity as a long distance runner.
But what does that mean for the emotions?
Fortunately that I had planned to work at the end of the afternoon, because I découvrais to my local subsidiary of JP Morgan Chase, two dozen people queuing.
Would remain in the rigour the NordLB.
Pursuing an Orwellian logic, it says that the biggest airline aurifère of the world has brought a defamation suit of six million against three authors and a small publishing house penniless in order to launch a "public debate transparent".
The accident in question, during which has died a hôtesse aged 22 years, has apparently been caused by a lorry driver who cross the road to coach.
A cafard fled before the danger, but if it feels of fear?
Links between politics and “ ndrangheta, arrested mayor of Gioia Tauro.
No confirmation came from AIG.
The documents passed into the hands of the BBC before being handed over to the police.
Passers-by said they did not think often of Extra Place, and suggested its development.
The Czech market is in comparison with other very specific.
What matters is whether the coach is equipped with a technical sheet that states which ones are standing places and which aren't.
Colossus to the attack.
Nicolas Sarkozy is expected to the ground by fishermen.
According to the calculations of scientists, black matters accounts for a fifth of the mass of the universe.
The question is whether it is in his interest, or, possibly, the Socialists will reach an agreement according to which Zusi would plead guilty alone in exchange for the return of a large part of the 50 million HUF.
The Germans are constantly in the sights of kidnappers.
None of the Czech operators did of a dominant position on such a market.
The testing of various materials, such as glass, téflon, and paper made of glass, have shown that the new adhesive is ten times more powerful than the legs of these reptiles, and at the same time, "detaches easily from walls" explains Liming Dai, engineering researcher at the faculty of the University of Dayton.
They were about to stop a van to inspect it when the driver broke orders, suddenly accelerated and the chase begun.
For the image to be complete, one must add that the existing golden parachutes are not changed. The cap is only concerned with new contracts, so as to motivate participation in the plan.
Portraits of which, thanks to the choice of the camera and equipment, given the photograph classic.
Prime Minister, however, was restricted to explain why the North was "a jewel the huge potential", but has not given to date, investment figures, or priority in the future projects.
It was a privilege to be here. "
In 2007, the data Inail confirm that the dead white were approximately 1 200.
All depends on it, "he says.
The government has provided £14 billion to protect the deposits of 2.6 million bankers with Bradford & Bingleys.
Letters - A country dishonoured
The Director-General of Building Societies Association (BSA), Adrian Coles said he is "irritating" to know that companies and their members will have to pay the bill...
It was difficult to obtain an Oscar
But it is still not enough, according to Eric Schmidt, which is one of the influential people in society.
"The police convened two minors to interrogate them in the case of the double homicide of Ózd. According to suspicions based, they have helped to remove the footsteps of crime.," said the spokesman for the Department of Borsod station.
"On the contrary," he said, "you must ensure that your child speaks Spanish ".
'I want to become a young mother; the candidate does not worry me "
On average, 14% of those who offer their blood are not accepted, because they are suffering from AIDS or malaria, and if they have travelled in a country where there is malaria, they will be excluded for a period of one year.
Barack Obama and McCain both support the rescue plan of banks
Moreover, officials have noted that the registration plate was "forged" because it did not correspond to the one written on the grey card of the van, this is also why they have blamed the detainee of falsification of documents.
It belongs exclusively to the Office for the protection of economic competition (ÚOHS).
"Obviously, Washington does not intend to you," said to his constituents the Republican Scott Garrett, a member of the Finance Committee of the House.
Given that no fridge knows how to grill meat nor any television how to take photographs, we are here in the presence almost of a miracle.
Rescue operation of Wall Street - Democrats and Republicans are
American prosecutors are investigating and following the judicial forums for the governement.
The stock market value of Warsaw has proposed two hundred million, about five billion Czech kronor, for the purchase of 100% of the package of shares of the stock market values of Prague.
"It is a player 'poor
One of the resolutions adopted proposes to rename the Central Beauharnois in dam Adélard-Godbout.
A change in the law, which is being drafted, for more than a now by a group of 30 experts of the Transport Ministry, could provide clarifications on the movement of stewards on board a bus.
HSV fighting Gladbach 1: 0
"The best years of my life," he said, 'took place in places dark, wetlands and repugnant ".
Has Minsk, "you have noticed that there was an election, you?"
This week, Ballmer has confirmed this idea.
Industrial prices have continued to increase
"I feel responsible for her death."
It may sound paradoxical, given that we have three networks and a mobile penetration that far exceeds 100%.
According to the two bills from the Zuschlag in 2003, this place has assured the restoration of a group of 90 people, members of the association Biztos Bridge Egyesület.
Its aim is to draw attention to the chronic cirrhosis of the liver, caused by the virus, on the causes of its development and on the importance of early diagnosis of the disease.
When Google chrome happened on the network, I was one of those who joined the theory that Google chrome is the first step on the part of Google to compete with Windows.
The complicity of murder is causing a detention of up to five years.
The virus of hepatitis, according to the genes pathogens, spread mainly in two forms: The hepatitis A and E through the digestive tract (for example: Food or water contaminated), the hepatitis B, C, D and other viruses by blood and organic liquids (sperm, vaginal secretion, salive).
The new law also provides to limit the so-called golden parachutes for the managers of companies participating in the programme and it establishes a committee, which will ensure the supervision of the funds.
This causes a lot of anxiety.
This case is one of the many accusations that her.
The crisis, indeed, is a crisis of financial institutions that have, of course, close relations with banks abroad, but, above all, are involved in a large scale in one state with the balance sheets of individuals and families who live in one country.
On the contrary, they are trying to do everything possible to a potential competitor to appear.
Despite these circumstances, as a photographer, I always attempt to convert my ideas into reality".
Of Rome, the minister communicates that "in three months, the absence of disease public employees were reduced by 50%, 60milles workers in a year.
A number of cabinet officers of the Department of Justice have also handed in their resignations.
Mr Bush salua progress in the negotiations
Professional fishermen, who do not pay taxes on diesel, now pay about 50 cents per litre but they believe that the threshold of profitability of a boat is achieved with a diesel below 0.30 euro per litre.
So many other Paul Newman have gone to history.
He made that statement in an interview published Monday by the Yedioth Ahronoth newspaper.
UNIPOL: Court ROME, DANILO COPPOLA remains A GROTTAFERRATA.
As in the case with an aircraft it is not clear when turbulence will strik and an air hostess could bang her head. "
That's how the driver tests the validity of the registered voucher.
The song Kde domov mu˚j was sung for the first time in 1834 on the planks of the Stavovské divadlo (the theatre of the state) in Fidlovacˇka (cobblers' fair), and was an original Czech composition by Josef Kajetán Tyl, accompanied by the music of Frantisˇek Sˇkroup.
In Lorenzo Bini Smaghi, the executive committee of the European Central Bank economist, Krugman is a "high-value", but also a divulgateur the style "very aggressive, particularly critical of the excesses of liberalism of the Bush administration.
The american of Dow Jones collapses despite the rescue of the financial market planned by the state.
The shares on the stock exchange of Sydney lost more than five percent, but ultimately managed to reduce losses to 4.3 percent.
In southern Egypt, five Germans have been abducted.
In 2006, a study concluded that 66% of employees of Microsoft used Google to seek information on the Internet.
It demeura one of seven national symbols even after the creation of the Czech Republic independent.
BSkyB loses the ITV legal battle
The phone, after all, is increasingly a computer.
The phrase 'You do not consider "is enshrined in majuscules on the registration plate.
Glitter, 64ans, has informed the authorities that he wanted to go abroad, leaving to be recorded in the lists of accused of sexual abuse.
At the time of her death in 1960, Hurston was poor and her books were out of print.
"And this is because we do not know what will the mechanism and the price of buying assets.
The appointment of a special prosecutor able to force the witnesses to testify, was one of its most important recommendations.
The first of these phenomena is the updating, the extraordinary revival of the double category State - sovereign, compared to a kind of renationalisation of the economy.
More than a third of students, many of which are newcomers, are studying English.
Its fans have found in 1994 in The Hudsucker Proxy of the Coen brothers.
A Minsk, "have you noticed that there was an election?"
But it also make sweat-shirts, old fashioned boxers, cardigans made from cashmere, cotton trousers, babies, and mini-shorts...
Why your new collection created to Mango for the fourth season?
In six months, the operator has managed to gain more than 100 000 customers and has become the fifth largest operator of the country.
Issuers of the outrageous bills have also fallen in excess, when they mentioned the company Pigal Kft, belonging to the hotel and catering sector. In their accounts, neither the name of Jobb Jövo˝ért, nor that of the Hoppá appear, according to the information given to the public prosecutor's office.
Starting with the interceptions ordered against Dal Torrione, the pm writes, "the possibility of marrying the demans of a businessman, representative a well known group close to the Piromalli, unifying the choice of the public administration with the interests of the clan.
Thus, the probes can save on a lot of fuel.
Nearby table with such as that of the extraordinary family Chagals, the presidential table prepared by Mango, seemed even more spectacular.
The film maker has tried to "introduce the many characters and illustrate the social analysis" he has always admired in the work of the famous novelist, he explained today during the presentation of the film, with Quim Gutiérrez and Paula Echevarría at the head of the long list of actors.
"I am not ready, warned the Russian.
The novelty anti loafers was presented today by the Minister of the public administration, Renato Brunetta, and by the Secretary-General of the Council Presidency, Mauro Masi.
"Now is the time to act responsibly (...) threat your job, your savings, the entire industries and the stability of the whole economy," he said before a crowd of 35 people.
It is apparently it a force of attraction whose effect is visible on other bodies.
I do not believe that they have understood the contribution or the legacy that she's given the world "said Valérie Boyd, author of" Wrapped in Rainbows ", a biography of Hurston published in 2003.
And already buses drive into the night in the 'Autostrada Brennero direction.
However, the question for Obama is whether his desire to achieve a bilingual education that defends the investigation in class of languages other than English, goes beyond its interest to eliminate the differences.
You will achieve nothing, because in sleeping, he is not sufficiently aware to organize his thoughts.
Let us not forget that the financial group Penta supports Mobilking, and, among other things, owns the U: Fon in the Czech Republic
If this equipment for places standing is not approved, passengers must remain seated.
The jets, "the coach Eric Mangini, who were asked to describe this madness, said" the second time or the third? "
Truth to speak, reading mangas is what I love best for some years now.
But in this case, we can at least hope that all human brain have the same situation.
The arguments used by them were virtually the same - a market that was too small and too saturated, problems with the quality of services, etc.
Khaleda Zia, the rival always of Sheikh Hasina, has been set free on bail earlier this month.
"In these cases, I am very federalist, and this will be the Andalusian organisation which will have to assume its responsibilities," said Llamazares as regards the behaviour of the political party that he will adopt in the City Council in Seville.
But there is still a possibility - a virtual operator.
Catholics said that while viewing the painting of the Virgin Mary, they felt "safe", as though in the protection of someone who "takes care" and they felt themselves "quietened, and peace invaded them".
The Czech market is in comparison with other very specific.
The Cardinals were in possession for the last 10 seconds, when the Jets recovered the ball, and Jay Feely made a goal from 20 yards taking the advantage to a 34-0.
Repeated drunk-driving offenders will have to install an alcolock system
But it does not reduce the greatness of Gebrselassie capacity as a runner.
Sheikh Hasina like Zhaleda Zia, denies the accusations against her.
A mockery strange the fate has been using the list of Electeurs Universities, between in the legislation Gabriele Pauli, to measure against Stroiber was the possibility of coup by the duo Huber-Beckstein, and then treat bluntly the very ambitious local politician.
Graves Muslim desecrated while Austria fluctuates to the right.
Before the increase in February, the wholesale price of milk of Jersey had been changed the last time in 2002.
Suburban buses are equipped with card readers included in the till the driver.
"I am not yet ready, warned the Russian.
This is not always easy or possible in the jungle media today.
Brussels has asked the independent Scientific commity, to examine the problem, given the intensive use of mobile music devices and the increase in the number of young people exposed to noise that they generate.
Police control of a van in the province of Alava: two thousand kilos of hashish found
Zora has described reality well" said Dinkins, 90 years old, a young girl of Johnson that Hurston has immortalised, citing the songs without colour, interpreted by men who have recognised their beauty."
As soon as somniloquy appears try to stay calm.
Still him.
After a divorce, he has been married 50 years to Joanne Woodward were, in which it was true even if the opportunities does not enough not to be.
Meanwhile, on the other side of the Channel, the British government seems to have nationalized another bank rocked by the financial crisis.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to work at home.
In the case of mobile cheap, do they will play music for a few hours.
Men were to be held until the kidnappers have found a road sure to flee.
Jancˇura denies that the two seats reserved for the rest of the stewards have been sold.
The Hang Seng index China Enterprises following the movement of Chinese actions of the Hong Kong stock exchange lost 3.8 percent, markets are closed to Shanghai.
Graves Muslim desecrated when Austria fluctuates to the right.
This is the second weekend of the beer festival, known as the 'weekend of Italians'.
A tankard, cries Marco, costs 8.25 euros.
Microsoft is right, its operational system is important but also its software.
The Nobel Prize for economy goes to Paul Krugman.
Civil rights, moreover, have helped to create space for many other Zora Neale Hurston- black writers, actors and artists who went in addition to the damage, as it, army of a cheerful confidence own and guidelines such as: "How can they be depriving the pleasure of my company!"
Energy is sent to the side through the cables under sailors.
A statement would surprise and do not on the part of representatives of the operators.
He knew that he was right.
No member of the opposition has seen the Belarusian parliament after the elections on Sunday.
"We will take the necessary steps to be prepared to the application of the law, as soon as it is signed," he said.
There is certainly no appropriate place in the world to present a way that Paris and there is certainly no living artist more extraordinary and good live that Valentino.
With a victory in 2: 03: 59 on a flat course, Gebrselassie has beaten his record of 2: 04: 26, made last year in Berlin by 27 seconds.
After the marathon negotiations which have gone on for days on end, the representatives in Congress and the Administration have finally announced Sunday that they have concluded agreements in principle on the rescue plan for banks.
The British building society may have to pay a bill of more than £80 million to cover the rescue of the Bradford & Bingley bank.
One who lives a life online, consists of what he shows about himself, and that is how we can define the principle behind the behaviour of young people today.
Even after the accident, the director do not consider their job as a job at risk.
One of the resolutions adopted, proposes to rename the Central Beauharnois into Barrage Adélard-Godbout.
But in this case, we can at least hope that all human brain have the same situation.
Has the poster, there were José Luis Moreno, Curro Díaz to Juan Bautista, which would have had to face in the arena of Castilblanco
Sylvana already know that word thanks to Mangas - in her new exchanges Log, she speaks of Japan.
Still on this front, it is possible to create "hybrid" PDF documents between the typical graphics of the format Adobe the elements of a worksheet or a text editor.
As I didn't yet have the school uniform, I wore an old skirt of my mother, a shirt, blue rising socks and black leather shoes.
It altogether denies the right to the quotation of credible sources and the debate on facts and interpretations, which represent the basis of intellectual work.
The Ministry has been inspired by similar campaigns in the Anglo-Saxon countries, where we can commonly see images with drastic images of the victims of accidents.
Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, said in commenting on the results of the compromise that the programme will work and will be effective, however other measures must be implemented. According to Pelosi, there is no question here of the rescue of Wall Street, but put in motion the wheels of the economy in the other direction.
The loan of £14 billion will be repaid when mortgages of Bradford & Bingleys are released.
At the end of trade, the stock exchange of Prague bascula in the negative
In a letter from 1955 to The Orlando Sentinel, Hurston questions the request of the Supreme Court to a forced integration, defining its decision in Brown v. Board of Education "insulting rather than glorifieuse of my race '.
Not in the same way, because they had already withdrawn their economies of smaller banks, such as those of New Jersey, Pennsylvania, and Staten Island.
At them, three groups surenchérissaient with a partner, in different circumstances.
Paul Newman was one of them. "
After many years, the county has rejected the proposal of the motorway.
I came to present the new collection that my sister Penelope and myself have created for Mango for the new autumn-winter season, but also to attend the presentation of the second edition of Mango Fashion Awards and also the Opera dinner in honour of Valentino.
"Everything was not very nice to see today," confessed Marcel Jansen later.
If we cannot be part of Germany or Austria, at least we want to live under the management of the United States of America.
Microsoft will surely attempt to launch Windows 7 and Windows Mobile 7 at the same time.
Man has even used the company Szi-Beri Bt. to establish fictitious bills that have been used in the context of the application of Biztos Bridge.
Being more aggressive anti-cancer treatments, patients are often need to recharge in red blood or plaquettes.
Already depressed at the beginning of the sitting, Wall Street slumped still further after the unexpected rejection by the House of Representatives of the rescue plan of banks that was supposed to lend a bit of stability to the markets.
The market for students try does not know of crisis
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
According to the candidate for the opposition presidential elections in 2006, it is desirable that it remains so, despite that "the power has been afraid in this Parliament which has no weight, to bring even one opponent".
More than half a century of a seventh American art in flux flowed through him.
The news has been watered down by the recent concerns that the crisis would be durative.
This incredible success was achieved through another ingredient that put forward by Mr Obama.
The board of AIG met Sunday in the evening to examine possible, according to stop it said.
Favre found Coles for yet another two touchdowns, the first when a corner back fell, and the second, 10 seconds before half-time.
The loan of £14 billion will be repaid when mortgages of Bradford & Bingleys are released.
Because if our economy, which is heavily indebted vis-à-vis Russia, between in crisis, and that we do not reform, we are in danger of becoming a protectorate of Russia.
Obama has said that he is the future.
Building societies in the bill B & B.
"In these points contact, there are available to the passengers with a one-stop trained staff, which will help those involved with the purchase by Internet and, moreover, will the coupon they have bought on the map," said the spokesman of the project Martin Opatrny´.
Of course, Fodor was not like that.
"This black matter, which is also in the vicinity of the Earth, might be responsible for this anomaly," he writes.
As director, Newman revealed of ill-known aspects of its real sensitivity pudique.
The titles of her dances are reminiscent of flamenco.
In June, Merl said that the decisive question, namely through what business model the viability of the Länder banks should be guaranteed, had not previously determined by the German grouping of the coffers of savings and transfers.
The House of Representatives of the United States intends to vote on the rescue plan, the vote in the Senate should follow on 1 October.
The Impact will mee the Vancouver Whitecaps in the semi-finals.
More than half a century of a seventh American art has ever-changing through him.
Unlike the politicians of the opposition, the Russian observers have accepted the democratic elections.
But before the course begins, it was for me to appear.
It is virtually impossible to find in a standard atlas.
Werner Faymann, the chairman of the SPÖ, confirmed that he wanted to discuss with the ÖVP.
Not to mention the realities which provide a service training, consultation and assistance, ideal for small and medium-sized enterprises, which could also be open to the prospects of business.
It would be more "regrettable", that "the trouble and the changes that contain a divorce for every child are again rekindled in public" for their son of 16 years Jack. "
In this part of the programme of supervision of Education, Bruce Fuller and Lance T. Izumi discuss the position of the candidates on the bilingual education.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a job at risk, I supprimerai.
The unit of Alex Kovalev, Tomas Plekanec and Andrei Kostitsyn enlivened the attack in a gain of 3-2 of the Canadian the rocket barrage with the panthers of Florida, yesterday evening, the Centre bell.
Then, in a puddle of blood, the phrase 'You will pay'
"From the beginning, I insisted that the two singers, and the choir, have a clear diction and that they sing simultaneously, so that the words are well understood," he said.
At the most he hinted at possible avenues of progress, including hydro-electricity, the forest, but above all the mining sector, boosted by growth in emerging countries and the reconstruction of public infrastructure.
And if the subject of free can be a way for the broadcast in homes, it is precisely in the business, that Open Office the result is the great challenge, which can already count on various projects in the public administration and schools.
Apart from the positions of yoga, the classic massage or spa treatments, Susannah 's Marriott meeting in the pages of a book' s all a menu of methods suited to the taste and the time.
Yet, even before the entry of operators such as Tesco Mobile or Virgin Mobile on the market, names similar to those heard at home are being heard in Britain.
MP3 players, however, have the advantage of having easy controls.
We cannot save that if people living in the peripheral areas: 300 euro for a bed, and 450 for a simple in the area Predestina, Centocelle or similar.
Net falling oil following the concerns of the world of the New Economy
It stresses that the figures of participation seem too high, and the generalisation of the vote in advance (26% of voters in Minsk) opened the voice to all the manipulation.
Firstly: Crown of small yellow hat.
The winner will be rewarded with a prize of 300,000 euros.
At the libraries, it will also be possible to register the electronic voucher on the Opencard in vending machines installed in the lobbies of several underground stations.
"In 1998, when Héma-Quebec began its activities, only 38% of people still had confidence in the system of blood in Quebec, recalls Dre Décary.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risk".
In short - But victorious of Kovalev
One of the fathers of cinema and the homeland died during a particularly obscure period, when terrorists and the stock markets threaten, the esteem of American has fallen, desperately searching for reasons of dignity.
It is based on a key recommendations of the reports Krever and Gélineau that when we don't know and a serious disease can be, Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease which is characterised by a brain degeneration leading inevitably to death and introduced measures of exclusion.
As regards holidays, the logic is complicated: x days after the first year, x days after the third, up to 15 days in all, past a certain number of years.
And this time the old neighbours of Hurston see it as a saviour.
Historic Paris Analysis of the sitting Morning Meeting Historic Morning Meeting
It is in October that will be taken the decision on the fate of the duo Huber-Beckstein toppled
The elections were held now everything revolves around the coalition, during the debates on public television, the party leaders have barely suggesting their cards.
"This place was magnificent" said Danny Fields, the manager of the Ramones, who took the photo in November 1976.
As long as the issuing bodies, governments and commercial banks less affected are still prepared to support the system, we can assume a reduction of arrears on time.
That is the timetable set by the Capitol for the work of the Commission for the future of Rome "Capital, which took place this morning, the new headquarters, behind the baths of Caracalla.
It is always good to read the guideline papers of medicines that we take, and, if something is not clear, speak clearly to the doctor or pharmacist" stressed the expert at the agency called Ansa.
The newspaper 'El Masri El Jom "said that, in the words of a German mediator, the release of the hostages was delayed because the kidnappers feared for their safety.
"We believe that raw materials will not escape this infection.
In other sectors of the processing industry, rising prices has developed between 0.6 percent and 9.1 percent.
The Italian version is déchargeable at http: / / it.openoffice.org / download / 3.0.0 / download300.htmlet and added to the English version that stood in the Mirror since Friday.
When at the end of the war, he was captured by the British and placed in the prisoner of war camps of the region Holstein, dozens of Germans approached him to learn Czech.
Witness also the slogan 'bloody "throughout the campaign.
The 700 billion plan to buy up with taxpayers' money the bad debts, active to risks and unsaleable of the US financial institutions.
They simply informed the first group of the real value of the product in question, and they then made their bids.
"It must be in line with reality.
As in a plane, said an expert
According to Australian Prime Minister Kevin Rudd, the American legislators should soon resume negotiations and adopt the proposed supports the financial system.
Vargas Llosa confess that the novel that he is writing requires "real courage"
This work also tells, in a way, the life of this woman who performed in places as distant, especially for the time, as India, the United States, or Russia, but also throughout Europe, since she was usually in London.
David Nailey, a professor at the University of Western Ontario in London, warns about the risks of fruit juices. He said that they are dangerous, if taken with the ingestion of certain drugs during the 236th national meeting of the American Chemical Society underway in Philadelphia. He launched a new warning: a glass of orange juice, grapefruit or apples, reduces the absorbtion of some vital medicines, cancelling their benefits and putting at risk the health of patients.
Shareholders and creditors of the bank have nothing more but to hope.
It was the highest Jets score in one game.
However, in view of the dynamics and unpredictability of the crisis, there is no certainty.
This whole process must reflect what the bee does to avoid other bees.
Virtual operators the advantage of being able to focus on a target group much more concrete.
If Members of the opposition are in parliament it is because they have been appointed, not elected.
A number of cabinet officers Department of Justice have also given their resignation.
Space physicists have known of the existence of dark matter only for ten years.
"To avoid the coalition of red and black, we are ready to take responsibility of government," said Haider.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
The accuser Advisor, Nora Dannehy now will be whether the officers asked during the investigation, lied to investigators, obstruant and justice.
During the hearing, part of the defendants writing the manufacturing method of invoices, as it had already done before the public prosecutor earlier.
This service alone should be a compelling reason to buy a musical mobile.
It is beyond me. "
In February we were informed of the launch of the virtual operator Mobilking in Poland.
The actress Heather Locklear arrested for having conducted under the effect of a drug
The Bush plan was far from perfect, but according to the vote in Congress, a real danger threat that Washington is not proposing to political tool to deal with the crisis.
The European tourists kidnapped in the Sahara are visibly free.
Thus, he who is sovereign, has certainly more power than he who is not, that is to say, whoever has the misfortune to live in a place without harvest, oil or water.
For example Tesco Mobile in Britain offers SMS that are at least two times cheaper than its competitors.
Asian stock exchanges a dramatic fall on Tuesday, even if the figures did, during the day, manage to erase some of the losses.
Everyone knew that it was ill.
The high court of Truro has referred he linked regularly its beautiful daughter, Stéphanie Randle, during his childhood, 5 to 7 years.
"Among all the major roles he has interpreted, he has never been so proud as to play that of the dedicated husband, loving father, caring grandfather and philanthropist," he said.
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy a phone.
"During the 90-minute debate, John McCain had a lot to say about me, but nothing on you, denounced Obama, yesterday, in 20 000 personnesrassemblées for an election rally in North Carolina in pouring rain.
Unlike any existing system currently, the avoidance maneuver is entirely a knee-jerk.
In 2010, it will be necessary to pay the interests of the whole year, which may double.
Suddenly, everything is linked.
"The phenomenon has now reached very serious proportions, so much so as to exclude whole categories of young people from the right to study, because the overall costs become very high - explains the responsible for the office of studies of Sunia, Laura Mariani- in these cities, the strong demand from the students has distorted the market so that a process of widespread increase has initiated itself for residents.
Trerise and his wife divorced in the 1980s, and he returned to live in Cornwall.
In August 2008, compared to the same month last year, we have seen the biggest increase in production sectors of energy and materials aimed at a subsequent transformation (16.8 percent).
It was the best that could mark the jets at a time.
Trerise and his wife have divorced in the 1980s, and it retourna live in Cornwall.
What is it that I was excitée.
It has become popular and people have spontaneously appropriate.
Now the company has other things on which focus on, for example, the next version of its operating system, Windows.
There is no single cause which determines its occurrence
The BR23C uses lithium polymer batteries which are lighter and whose focus of energy is higher, which makes their life longer than models that use lithium-ion instead.
They want and calm investors before the start of trade on the Asian financial markets, which are located in the first time zone, where the decision of Congress could affect trade on Monday.
In 1945, some groups of Sudeten Germans were allegedly addressing themselves to the President of the United States with such a desire.
Namely the suburban trains and buses 300-499, which the inhabitants of the Bohemian community essentially use to gain access to the capital.
The British newspaper Telegraph published an article that researchers at the University of Oxford have conducted an interesting experiment in analysing to what extent the belief in God could influence tolerance to pain by human beings.
However, in view of the dynamics and unpredictability of the crisis, there is no certainty.
A person aware of the situation said to Reuters on Monday that the aid commitments were EUR 35 billion.
In the English press, the government would take on board the whole loans under way in the bank Bradford and Bringley, with more than 41 billion (75,5 billion US) of mortgages.
Coming to cinema, you expect the various movies you shot last year to be released.
The insurer American International Group, that the US monetary authorities have fixed, plans to give more than 15% of its assets to repay the $85 billion that have been put forward, according to the Financial Times reported on Sundays.
"I feel responsible for her death."
They wear road signs of mosques removed in red.
The dispute began by radiation in December 2006 to nine American prosecutors made by the US Department of Justice.
It was great, almost better than to go to the amusement park.
According to the results, the Catholic believers were able to exclude a large part of the suffering.
Among students of CM1, 100% have passed the examination of state of maths of 2008, expert level.
America changes.
Brunetta promises and suggests by smiling, "a good cappuccino at 7h in the morning is an excellent and healthy resolution".
The disease can be cured, if it is detected in time. The virus can be eradicated from the body; this way the risk of infection disappears and the development of cancer is stopped.
What does not understand - or does not understand - Barrick Gold is that the public who supports the authors and publishers of black Canada is primarily because it rejects the brutal manner of the mining.
Sylvana and the secrets of Bento's box
In April 1999, it has refused the blood of people who had been more than a month in the UK since 1980.
The Treasury estimates that the interests of the loan will rise in 2009, to £450millions.
Soon, on 8 October, will start the hearings relating to the ongoing criminal proceedings against János Zuschlag and his accomplices.
Tuesday morning, they have conducted operations snails in the French and the Calvados, causing traffic jams of nearly 10 km.
The research borehole américo-European Casini-Huygens used this device physical, just as the solar borehole Ulysses.
This should be no problem for MP3 players, even the cheaper ones of which are able to operate for 9 hours on a single charge.
Readers are easier to manipulate, the mobile have more expertise
She ran making use of a clever strategy, leaving the group of runners from Ethiopia and Kenya take a clear advantage, then beating them around 18miles 1⁄2 later.
The presentation of the first edition illustrated the "Journal of a poet recently married" in the church of Saint Stephen' to New York, where Juan Ramón Jiménez is married with Zenobia in March 1916, is part of the activities by the Ministry of Culture of Andalusia to celebrate the "Triennat Zenobia and Juan Ramón" (2006-2008), organised to commemorate the 50th anniversary of the concession of the Nobel Prize for Literature and their deaths.
In the South, it is now a junior partner, although it has so far resisted the crisis better than the banks of Munich and Stuttgart.
Speak in sleeping
It should be added that the ÚOHS has relatively broad powers to disclose such activity, and if he does not want to settle the explanations of operators, who said they had no idea that this would happen, their contractual conditions the banning.
Sandrina Fasoli yesterday, the Belgian exit winner of the first edition, watched its models in the window of Mango the 54 Boulevard Haussmann in Paris and it began crying almost of emotion.
The author, Brendan Gill, wrote: "Extra Place is a small cul-de-sac narrow, dark day and night, and defined by the doors of a warehouse in iron rouillé and persiennes, full of newspapers last week that soars along the gouttières."
Drugs: Never with of fruit juices.
It will not work, "he stressed.
Young people know him mainly through the cultissime Slap shot of George Roy Hill (1977), Reggie Dunlop, coach of a team Hockey unorthodox.
Building societies against the B&B bill.
But it says it has not been able to contact the children of dangerous areas of Helmand and Kandahar, located in the south.
In this case, it is someone who speaks with the heart and not with the brain.
The option of doing nothing is simply not acceptable, "he said.
In the online edition of the journal of information on the left German, Franz Walter analysis of the causes of the dramatic defeat of the CSU in his article entitled "The revolution in Bavaria eats up its founding fathers'.
The board of AIG met Sunday evening to examine possible cessions, according to FT.
And it is, it is party to the party of beer.
"And this is because we do not know what will the mechanism and the price of buying assets.
The leaders of the US Congress and the government of President George W. Bush agreed on a greater accordance of the financial assistance to the US financial system.
The circumstances surrounding a shooting before the release of the hostages are still unclear: the kidnappers were close to putting an end to the kidnapping, before the Sudanese army killed six of the kidnappers without warning, according to an Egyptian security official.
Others have proclaimed extra Place as a real rareté- a fragment virtually identical to the city that should be treating in peace.
Sometimes a girl offers a boy a Bento she has prepared herself, with particular care, in the hope of being able to know the boy a little better during the break.
Today, however, the U: Fon is ready to support the argument for not accepting a virtual operator.
The Thai authorities stopped him at passport control, and in the end, he went to Hong Kong.
However, they have not said openly the value of information, feel less worried about the credibility.
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
In the sky, he meets his daughters with pride; on earth, something which one does not habitually see in America.
"The hesitation over action to rescue the US financial markets around will have repurcussions around the world," observed Joseph Yam, the head of the Hong Kong Monetary Institute.
"The Syrians know very well what they will have to give up to get the Golan Heights.
This analysis is the first of a series of experiments, in which academics, scientists, philosophers and theologians are taking part from various sectors of the university.
But I do not know how the show.
But also remind them to take the belt before start.
After the excellent results, there is the question of what would be the impact on the regulation of the pain of subjects if it shows the believers Madone a painted by Leonard or by a painter the same arms?
Moreover, the manual offers other methods as contact with the nature or natural 100% of revenue which help to relax.
What matters most consumer awareness and make this information to public domain.
Isabelle Bayón plays the part of the Sevillan dancer Tórtola Valencia
The Hypo Real Estate must from now on pay interest on a fraction to what it has the right.
"You do not embrace your white teacher because she is white - I want to say that there is now a line of cultural demarcation" said Ms Nathiri.
The kidnappers had demanded a ransom of a total of six million euros from Germany; the money would have been given by the German wife of one of the hostages.
Sony Ericsson, whose mobile-walkman series walkman have the same menu as MP3 players, is the most advances in this domain.
The events, and the desire to thank the designer Valentino, chairman of the jury of the competition, have fact that we were in a luxurious dinner at the opera Garnier of Paris.
Five years after, a biography lauded on Hurston carried out by Robert E. Hemenway, a true bestseller, the réintroduisit and American cannons.
At the same time, in Europe, we had further proof of the global nature of the crisis.
The question that he would envision a coalition with Wilhelm Molter, the current president of the ÖVP, as Vice-Chancellor, is open from Faymann.
Most affected are especially investment funds from the old daughter society Württemberg Hypo and those of course that have a life beyond 2009.
Currently, we estimate that there are 200 million patients with chronic hepatitis C-type in the world.
"What works with drivers is the system of sugar and the whip.
I am an emotional pragmatic.
The government should negotiate new advance in the case of mortgages that it will buy, while reducing payments of debtors and allowing them to keep their homes.
Dramatic reductions in the rates of Hypo Real Estate and Commerzbank led the German index (Dax) to a profound deficit.
In my view, similar are not enough to prove the experienced the same.
According to the BSA, no society has failed since 1945, the date of the first history.
Ms Boyd summed up the very saying that "Zora saved Eatonville".
"God created the time of persons perfect
If it is true that the judges are independent and impartial, this is not the truth they deem, especially in the case of prosecution in libel, but the law.
Additionly to Windows and Mac os, the suite is as usual available for the Linux operating system.
I believe yes, but in the end they are joined and these activities have a lot in common.
"You have noticed that there was an election?" questions the Social Democrat leader Alexander Kazulin, one of the last two political prisoners released in August this year.
Residents proclaim now that the elimination of racial segregation in schools, although in some positive aspects, has weakened the cohesion of Eatonville and weakens the confidence of the young.
The lawyer US general has appointed a special accusing to check the question of the dismissal of nine American prosecutors in 2006.
She could not participate in the Beijing games because of a hypothetical pain in the back, but promised to win in Berlin, improving her personal record by nearly five minutes in her third marathon.
"I do not believe that Senator Obama has the experience and knowledge needed to be president," he also assured.
They desperately need this, indeed, and I shows you an example.
Closer to us (1990), to its sensitive Mr Bridge, troubled in his old age by a marriage that did not fulfil all its promises.
"Anyone who wants to safety in Jerusalem, and especially does not want that tractors and bulldozers to crush the feet, as has happened to one of my best friends, must renounce parts of Jerusalem," noted Olmert referring to the two attacks in the city, in July, where several people were killed and dozens of people injured.
They say so much about he, I know, many things are not true.
Nine fifty five in the morning.
Researchers of space know about the only black for about ten years.
Olmert would make in exchange for peace almost all the occupied territories
This represents a discovery since Microsoft, version after version, has not ceased to add functions and "perks," to Windows.
It must react instinctively and instantaneously, since this technology is the most vulnerable and most internal of the protection envelope, a layer of protection for times when collision is considered inevitable.
It was the biggest loss of points in the space of a day of history.
According to economists, the announcement of the fact that the rescue plan will be adopted is going to be a first major psychological factor to revive the financial markets.
"The first day of course in Japan.
Youth, in general, often have profiles on several social networks, from Facebook to Xanga, and they can connect them to other sites, such as to Twinter, or last.fm, reading his musical habits, and then he can connect them to a further system, as FriendFeed or Blip.fm. These young people can also maintain blogs, in which are automatically uploaded their most recent photo galleries that they store on Flickr or Picasa.
The street, however, has fans.
In other sectors of the processing industry, rising prices have ranged between 0.6 percent and 9.1 percent.
For five years, they go to the party of beer, already three virées this year alone.
Carmen Tórtola Valencia, daughter of a father Catalan (Florenç Tórtola Ferrer) and mother Andalusian (Georgina Valencia Valenzuela), was born in the neighborhood of Triana and at the age of three years will go live in London with his family.
. People signs indicate the street.
And even if we could prove that for Man: How could anyone show the same for rats?
Free speech opinion Orwellian of Barrick Gold
In his article entitled "Who?? The party chairman of the reserve with the issues of the coalition," the Austrian newspaper conservative deals with the situation of internal policy confused which has gone after the Austrian elections.
As soon as we turn to other species and that we address the issues of felt or in general of the conscience, we are moving into the difficult terrain because the hardware is not.
Henry Paulson said that the law provides the necessary tools to spend $700 billion for the urgent needs of the financial system, the vast takeover of dubious credit, their insurance, or to avoid the risk of the system triggering the collapse of one or more important financial institutions.
After many years, the contée has rejected the proposal of the motorway.
However the board of directors of Deka, of which each half is supported both by Länder banks as well as groups of savings funds, has charged the directorial commity to initiate talks with WestLB for common commercial activities.
Darrelle Revis, corner back, intercepted a misfired shot and ran 32 yards to make a touchdown.
He admitted that the restitution could possibly include East Jerusalem.
"I feel responsible for his death."
The company, with its present value of 156 billion dollars, is worth more than IBM (140 billion dollars), Intel (124 billion dollars) or Coca-Cola (110 billion dollars). The AdWords / AdSense advertising areas threaten the turnover of advertising agencies, while the benefits introduced at an increasing speed cause severe headaches not only to Microsoft, but to many other creators of computer programs.
Listen to the four new version of the national anthem.
"Why Japan in particular?" Asked me my friends when I was told that I wanted to spend a year to school in Tokyo.
In his message speech before the plenary, as one of the spokesmen main consultation of experts, Lívia Járóka, MEP Fidesz European People's Party, has drawn attention to the segregation in education, because it is a violation of the law affecting the Roma children, and one of the main obstacles to their success in life.
The system is not yet available on the Spanish market trade in any form, although some vehicles industrial and office has already an experimental basis.
Paul Newman was part of that. "
Currently the sisters Cruz take very seriously their new activity in the way.
To force efforts to improve the safety of blood products and work on the ground during the years that followed, we have returned public confidence, "said it before proudly say that at the beginning of 2008, nearly 94% of the population québécoise had now confidence in Héma-Quebec.
Two extremes, between which there is enough room for everyone.
Meat Loaf- or Lee Marvin Aday, its true nom- has suffered from health problem in recent years, suffering even an operation to cure his a gap of heart become illegally, having collapsed on stage, in 2003.
"I feel responsible for her death."
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
Open Office, this is the third edition of the "anti-Microsoft" package
Following the category of issuers of bills company is directly related to the accused.
The bank of the Land of Rhineland Palatinate was attached to the way to the bank from Baden-Wuttenberg in Stuttgart.
On the one hand the artist.
Songs can be bought by simply visiting the web pages of the operator (or those of another source) from the mobile device, and buying it.
I believe yes, but in the end they are joined and these activities have a lot in common.
Everyone knew that it was ill.
Financial markets such as Frankfurt or London would be even more affected by the decline in the price of hotels than industrial cities such as Hanover, Cologne or Stavanger.
"This shows how the market was on this plan", she added, fearing that a draft adopted in several days is "too late".
The ADQ said support the adoption of a North Plan by the government.
The problem is that the commercial state of all Czech mobile operators prohibits such a resale.
Four times candidate for the Oscar (he has won one), Garci believes that the three films candidates representing Spain this year at the Academy of Hollywood, "Sangre de Mayo," "Seven French billiard tables" and finally the winner, "The blind sunflowers," are not representative of the young Spanish film industry, "which should be better known," he said.
In the draft presented at the surprising CEATEC, taking place in Japan, bees bourdonnantes have given the strategic idea of the engineers from Nissan, for the draw on how they must devise the next generation of detectors of obstacles.
In January 2006, the Association Y-Generáció and Szövetség a Modern Magyarországért have applied for a grant from the public utility of the Socialist Party, Táncsics Mihály Alapítvány (TMA).
However, observers criticisms are, in addition to all this, the contradictions that concern: For example, the top management of society has refused, in its entirety, the protests of employees, after it has doubled the price of the mother of enterprise and after that the company has found it too expensive restaurants daily multiple, taken any day. It pales next to the fact that already in 2006, Google agreed to the Chinese government and according to the terms of the agreement, the company detects all the results that injure good taste, and the interests of the Chinese regime.
Passers-by some said they did not think that rarely to extra Place, and suggested its development.
A few hundred Belarussians met Sunday evening immediately after the close of the polling stations on the central place in Minsk to protest against the fraudulent nature of legislation.
The choice of mode of use and requirements of the future owner.
The middle ground Antonio Ribeiro marked the winning goal in the 90th minute to play.
What we can do is take into account a number of very simple precautions such as:
Obama has said that it was the future.
The reason for this striptease of thought is the press relations Ryan for his new film "The Women '- is told the story of a adultery.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the offer of services. "
Despite this, something is still missing - a virtual operator, which would force the traditional operators to lower prices.
Traffic control of the police in Euskadi (Ertzaintza) on the border of the Community of Armiñón (Alava).
Of course it is the second largest shop of the brand in Europe that has been opened with 1.335 square metres of surface.
10 years ago, in 1998, the CSU measured at 47.7 percent, for the first time since the 1950s, with a score below 50 percent.
According to the spokesman for lElysée David Martinon, President "will discuss with them solutions that can be imagined to help their businesses to regain competitiveness and to secure the conditions of jobs and pay sailors'.
These blips will "haunt" spectators until 2010.
In Iraq, 4500 soldiers have been killed, and the Americans have not been forced to pack up and leave.
At the foot of the stairs, the Spanish Ambassador and other authorities were present.
"When you ask the taxpayers to take extraordinary measures as a result of the irresponsibility of some, it is not enough to congratulate yourself.
The new Czech anthem has four new versions.
"It is a question that we have dealt with the Ministry and, at the beginning, it prohibits any movement of passengers.
"If what you suggest happened, it could be a violation of the contractual conditions that we would then examine and could lead to a stop in cooperation with the company in question," responded Martina Kemrová to our question on this issue.
I believe yes, but in the end they are joined and these activities have a lot in common.
It is companies publishing their own list price of mobile telephone services, but these are only public in part.
It is clear that the interim result more clearly reflect the unpredictability of the premier League that the domination of his HSV.
As he has already said, a collaboration will surely be unsuccessful if Faymann is trying to interfere in the internal affairs of the ÖVP.
The company wants to bring charge against the lorry driver.
It is the fault of the climate.
In a month, our national currency has weakened by 1.7 per cent against the euro, and 7.1 percent against the dollar. Compared to August 2007, it has strengthened of 7.5 percent against the euro and 15,9 percent against the dollar.
Avalon Bay announced several months ago she wanted to repaver the back streets and install of seats, some are also used by a coffee that the manufacturer phases space.
Several members of the First Division Leauge were already convicted of manipulation of compulsory relegation in the previous season; in the end, the beginning of the League had even to be shifted at the last minute.
Today, it is probably insulted, since the requests for its investment under house arrest, on the basis of a reduction of his detention conditions, continually fall on deaf ears.
Otherwise, we risk that other countries will suffer the effects.
Listening to music at full volume for a prolonged period using mobile music devices like MP3 players, can cause permanent damage to the hearing.
Foreigners who come to discover the history of Eatonville, its raison d'être, are still treated with caution.
For the CSU, the failure was not quite a surprise, but on Sunday, a process came to end that was likely to have done so for ten years: the undisputed hegemony of the national party ended.
Today, the agreements, the largest in American journalism lies between who run the newsrooms- i.e. directeurs- and reporters who work for them.
But look at everything in detail and from the start.
On the other, the person.
GTS Novera the group, which would take a step back and to become a real Telefonika competitor in the field of customers company, does not hide, long enough, its intention to launch a virtual mobile operator.
There is no beer, not yet.
It was a group of elected Republicans that wrecked the first draft agreement last week.
Many at Eatonville, like Ms Jones, a courageous teacher who has a weakness for bright red, always fear that their insular community will not be understood.
The first was Jimmy Carter, who, from its decisions, Saudi US economy and were reports (as it has always today, as a private citizen) with the enemy Islam. "
In the MDAX, the actions of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
"We have made great progress.
The documents are in the hands of the BBC before being handed over to the police.
But, according to their revelations, the American journalists are often "sick" during the year.
The industrial export sale price rose by 1.1 percent compared to July 2008, while if compared to those of a year ago, it fell by 3.9 percent.
They have not been that according to the opposition.
Later, Dow Jones recovered a little.
At least for these aspects of our conscience which depend on the prefrontal cortex, including the consciousness of who we are, and the ability to predict and decide, it is reasonable to assume that human beings are different even from other primates.
According to a spokesman for the police, the actress has been cooperative and alcohol abuse has been ruled out from the beginning, although "according to the observation of police officers, at first sight, we thought that Locklear was under the influence of a medicine".
"The scientists-concluded the executive UE- confirm that there are good reasons to worry, and that the European Commission will now with the Member States and other interested parties, what could possibly be taken to better protect children and adolescents, against exposure to noise from mobile music devices and similar devices.
The course of the obligations, however, are going particularly well.
At the time, the department said that the prosecutors were dismissed because of poor performance.
The everything is born of the account of the case of the inspector general of the Department of Justice, who criticized the actions of some cabinet officers.
Medicines: never with fruit juices.
The plan also includes aid for property owners, who have problems to pay.
In this way, instead of infinite combinations of bees to avoid the other bees, in our case, we could use that the movement rotatif, the acceleration and the slowdown as plots available to the mini self robot
In almost perfect conditions - sunny time, 48 degrees at the start, 55 degrees at the finish - Gebrselassie won on Sunday, maintaining an impressive average of a mile every 4 minutes 43 seconds
"Say what you want, we will be the ones to put the cross on Obama or McCain.
The office of the minister Alesˇ Rˇebícˇek thinks it will discourage drivers from dangerous driving.
On television, President Lukashenko and the members of the central electoral commission welcome their success.
US President George Bush himself is glad of progress in the negotiations.
Clothes designed for the comfort of underwear.
Remind yourself that if the child seems very anxious several times, it is advisable to consult a doctor to check what causes that much anxiety in children.
Obama? The first anti-American president. That's why.
(Today there are 90 percent of blacks)
This has been one of the recurring themes of the end of the week, which started on Friday with a big cocktail party to celebrate the 50th anniversary of the arrival of Jean Lesage at the head of the party.
Ehud Olmert, the president of the stand-in government of Israel, ruled in favour of the return of almost all the territories occupied in 1967, including the West Bank and East Jerusalem and the Golan Heights, in exchange for peace with the Palestinians and Syria.
The transport (MHD) pragois will introduce, on Wednesday, the chip in their ticketing system
Sheikh Hasina as Zhaleda Zia, deny the accusations that they get.
It is certain that they can be made redundant at any time, but cannot be for political reasons.
This mechanism must deal with that some signals entrants per second, and respond to them.
Dennis Quaid outraged at counter-attack
"Because it fascinates me,"
The fact that Belarus, economically increasingly dependent on Russia, would improve relations with the EU, where because of the political order of Belarus it described as undemocratic, Lukashenko and several senior politicians do not receive entry visa, was one of the expectations of the opposition. Belarus has taken credit for the reduction of Russian natural gas imports which are increasingly more expensive, and helped the passage of the Beltransgaz society, owner of gas stations across the country, has passed into the hands of the Russian.
On behalf of the French Presidency, this high-level conference was opened on the one hand, by French Minister Xavier Bertrand, Labor and Affairs, Exchange and on the other hand, by Vladimir Spidla, European Commissioner for the work, Social Affairs and equal opportunities.
There is a line of border on which there is no agreement for a very long time and, when the opportunity arises, I reiterate that position on behalf of the government, "he said.
The police in Kent has said that it would not discuss specific cases or potential travel destination of Glitter within the county.
In its edition of the 17 September, The Devoir published a letter from Mr Patrick J. Garver, vice-chairman of the Canadian mining firm Barrick Gold.
The hopes of the people of Düsseldorf rest on Frankfurt.
The future is perhaps promising.
This part of the brain, along with several other functions, plays a role in the mechanism of "self-promotion" of the nervous system.
A clear but complex pessimism invades the American journalism.
Fall of actions in Asia
I feel better than ever, my 30 years am delighted.
Windows 7 will be lighter and it will no longer have as many programmes involved.
Roger Levesque was the only one to outplay Matt Jordan for the Sounders.
Of the main ways as at election time.
Eatonville has long been defined as a paradox of triumph and fighting.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
Despite all this, the opposition is still feeling a palpable improvement in the political system: the political detainees have found freedom, and Minsk is prepared to have a small confrontation with Moscow, still refusing to recognise the South Ossetia and the Abazzia separated from Georgia and Russia with which Belarus form a confederation on paper, consider the two territories Independents for a month.
In this respect, the economic crisis seems to produce two phenomena convergent.
In short, no more breakfast during working hours; no more coffee or croissant.
Sellers in detail must decide whether they will in turn increase the cost to consumers.
It is indeed that took place this weekend.
Part of the press Madrid is also the scapegoat in Washington.
If you have already a mobile and want to buy an MP3 player cheap, take a Cowon, a Creative, a Sony, a Samsung, a Emgeton, or a iriver.
And the music player is one of the most power-hungry applications.
Vietnam, this nation has lost 50 miles soldiers and was sent back home to the fesses.
Perhaps
I read it in my mangas.
These drinks, consumed especially the summer because they are refreshing and rich in vitamins, if taken with some vital medicines, can alter their effectiveness, absorbing or reducing according to cases, with serious consequences to the health.
Cautious, the two candidates have ducked questions concerning the extremely unpopular financial rescue package of $700 billion (470 billion) adopted yesterday evening by Congress.
"The main interest of Avalon Bay is to revamp this abandoned alley, and make it public" she said, pointing out that it was the city that made her the offer for the sale in the first place".
The following category of issuers of bills is that of companies directly related to the accused.
The complicity of murder can entail up to five years imprisonment.
"In the trains integrated into Prazˇská integrovaná doprava (integrated transports of Prague), supervisors are equipped with card readers, in which they establish the validity of temporal and zonal vouchers," said the master of tickets Filip Drápal of the organisation Ropid, which oversees the time-table of the community transports of Prague.
Some music players upmarket are capable of much more than just a reading of music, but it is unknown functions, of course, most of the mobile.
It was the enemy of Richard Nixon and the defender lost causes and overcome, as the foundation for the fight drugs created in honour of his mother died following an overdose and the creation of its own brand of organic food.
We switch on the computer only to run Firefox, Explorer or Chrome and every day people spend more time surfing the Internet than to open windows.
Whose orders seem to have been similar: and hurry up with the second goal!
"On the contrary, he said," you must assure you that your child speaks Spanish ".
The Euro-American research probe Casini-Huygens used this physical device, just as the solar probe Ulysses.
After the fall of Tuesday morning, the stock exchange of Prague réctifia its losses.
"We need this second goal," whistled Hermann Rieger in the corridor of the changing rooms of the Hamburg ring.
But before the course begins, it was for me to appear.
The police examines the weapon and the circumstances of its use with the help of experts.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
Take, for example, sixth Street Prep, an elementary school in eastern Conté of Los Angeles.
The possibility of obtaining energy from the movement of the sea is considered for hundreds of years, and in the 1970s, together with the first oil crisis, the research intensified.
No one was afraid to go to ridicule or to exaggerate.
The spending of the second half of the $700 billion depends on a new decree of Congress.
For the names of companies that would be on the bills, it was decided, among others, during the touring province north of Lake Balaton, carried out by István Lados, at the request of János Zuschlag.
We should start to propose for transplants early next year, "says the Dre Décary which describes this programme of removal of umbilical cord blood as very popular.
This measure is being introduced by administrative sanction for two reasons: face ones behavior before it becomes a criminal offence.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a job at risk, I supprimerai.
When he was released, Glitter took the plane to Bangkok where he would have to board a flight to London.
That is something that savers and households are now that the time they are uncertain. "
The rest of the hour was relatively quiet, but when the gong rang, I was assailed in the hallway.
Open Office, this is the third edition of the package "anti-Microsoft"
"In the case of long-distance journeys, it is not possible to reserve these places; they are blocked."
In the sectors of production of consumer goods, prices rose by 0.3 percent, while those sectors producers of energy and raw aimed at a subsequent transformation did not change compared with the previous month.
A little more than three miles from the finish, Gebrselassie made his final push to pull away from Kwambai, who finished second at 2: 05: 36, improving his best record time by five minutes.
Has the death of Hurston in 1960, it was poor and his books were out of production.
People behave similarly, which is why some scientists deduce a subjective comparable.
It is primarily affect the conscience of young drivers, the motorcycle, pedestrians, without forgetting professional drivers.
This is what the European Commission said in a statement distributed in Brussels, quoting the opinion of the Scientific Committee, on the unexpected health risks and recently identified (Csrseri) of the EU, published today.
What does it mean?
In their comments on Tuesday on the international financial crisis, which is worsening day by day, newspaper leaders of the European press already forsee a "second 11 September".
"If the passenger needs to check the validity of the registered voucher, it's as easy as asking the infromation from the driver," said Drápal.
A late war of roses for the former couple Meg Ryan and Dennis Quaid: seven years after their divorce, the two Hollywood actors are engaged in a disgraceful battle - in full view of the world.
Reuters announced that after debates that extended till past midnight on Saturday, local time on the east coast, the leaders of Congress agreed on the controversy that has been raging for days on end, connected with the rescue plan for a total of $700 billion.
"I have never seen anything like this," said Ellis.
Democratic Representative Rahm Emanuel, a former of the Clinton administration, has compared the "good instincts Obama's economic" to those of Bill Clinton during the 1998 financial crisis.
I believe that yes, but in the end it joined and these activities have a lot in common.
It is precisely at the request of Iván Kubatov that the Romanian builders have created the companies Fa-Bani Jos Faipari Kft. and Jos-Investment Bt.
Other cabinet officers, including the former colleague of Bush, Karl Rove, have been criticised for not having cooperated in the investigation.
It remained as one of the seven national symbols even after the creation of the independent Czech Republic.
Tuesday, with the start of trade, the stock exchange of Prague continued with its downfall of the day before, when it lost almost six percent.
As in the plane, said an expert
A very intense but, at the same time, exciting, day we expect.
Mr Field, for his part, said that some underestimated the attractiveness of the street in its current state.
Obama said in the CBS that McCain has not had any role on the substance in the negotiations, while he was in daily contact with the Treasury Secretary.
What device choose
We have seen his face on vinaigrette pots, sauces, biscuits and other foods, which tasted rather awful, albeit a joke at the outset.
What is it that it means?
This is the first time in the history of the United States that legal capping will be in force on the allowances of general managers – commented the chairman of the committee responsible for financial services of the Chamber of Deputies, the democrat Barney Frank.
, the liberal government, in coming to power in 2003, has refused to implement it.
. Coppola is investigated for bankruptcy in the framework of the investigation on the escalation Unipol-Bnl.
"Black children had used to be embrassés- I remember bien- we embrace our master the morning and evening as" said Nathiri N.Y., daughter of it Dinkins and head in-chief of the protection of the Community of Eatonville, a non-profit group.
In this outfit I presented myself in front of the desk, and tried to pronounce everything correctly: 'Sayonara Wo She Sylvana...' - my name is Sylvana, I come from Germany and my birthday is in a week.
The office and employees of shops which are in front of me, frightened of another potential debacle, have transferred money to a bank that seems more reliable, the one that seems to be causing the most rescue on Wall Street.
That is what it is like when a committee board wants to demonstrate its ability to act in difficult times.
Eatonville is classified as a historic city since 1998.
According to the deputy, a collaboration of the European Union geared towards a goal and an action is necessary for an acceleration of the process of desegregating schools. This respect for anti-discrimination directives and preparation is of paramount importance.
"We cannot believe, that you would give the territory to a foreign government, which oppresses and destroyed the minorities and has done nothing to victory of the Allies without taking into account the quarter of a million people," is written in the letter.
While no result had not yet been announced, many young people were came to demonstrate against the power of President Alexander Lukashenko: "The dictator, resignation".
Passengers can buy a coupon 30 days or 90 days (this will be valid from 1 January 2009) and both the register on their smart card information points and the offices of Dopravní podnik Agency (the transport), located in the underground stations Muzeum, Mu˚stek, Nádrazˇí Holesˇovice, Andeˇl, Roztyly, Letnˇany, Kobylisy, Rajská zahrada, Kacˇerov and Luka.
Then they have cancelled and we have achieved that passengers can go to the toilet during the journey on condition that they have their own seat, "he unveiled its position.
Friday, the winner was Daniel Luque which has cut three ears and has been brought in triumph, having made the movement of arms against the bull with taste and aesthetic.
American shares suffered a bloodbath on Monday and the main indices of stocks experienced their largest fall in the last 20 years.
Outraged "of course, everyone has struck down to put an end to such tragedies which, by their size, are the rest of the media and the participation of the public, even if the daily reality we are dramatic cases, even repetitive in their dynamism.
Not even in joking.
According to the chief economist of Patria Finance David Marek, the plan is a good idea, but its implementation will be very difficult.
The principle of capping means that if the secretariat of the Treasury is buying bad credit in an auction, it will collect a surplus of tax on the golden parachute, unless the President of discredited bank retires.
In addition, and this is an example that Mr Obama could copy, reported Linda Mikels, principal of Sixth Street, the school has created the instruction of the English language by "full immersion".
The most resounding example of recent times is probably the coordinated action against paedophiles in Brazil, during which Google sent to the Brazilian Government the information that it had collected from the social network called Orkut, thus allowing an identification.
And it is only thanks to the important benefits of the reimbursement of costs of accounting downstream from the restructuring of the former group Depfa, as well as the interest payments, according to the book tax procedures and commercial procurement for companies to Konzern that the deficit of the gains of about 16 percent has proven to be moderate.
It is clear that the rest him has been brilliant, but not rouillé.
Unfortunately, only a few have a universal USB connector, because not all can be directly connected to the computer, without a special software.
The bad boy arrived in Australia, Russell Crowe, dared appoint Newman as his greatest inspiration.
Beyond the surreal speech by Mr Garver, the prosecution of Barrick Gold is a direct attack on freedom of university research and the quest for truth, which are essential for a democratic society.
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition, which would like to join the fight.
The bloodshed of the US stocks
The new Czech anthem has four new versions.
Indeed, earlier Roma children start school, it increases the chances of them becoming productive members of the labour market; by the taxes paid from their income and consumption, they become part of the state budget.
Police control of a van in the province of taken: Two thousand kilos of hashish found
Even taking into account the additional purchase of such a card, you will not exceed two thousand kronor.
No later than last year on the island of Réunion the chikungunya virus appeared which, like the West Nile virus, is transmitted by an insect in the blood.
The domestic sale price of the processing industry has only witnessed a small increase of 0.1 percent in comparison with July.
Austria think seriously about regain his courage, following his oscillation to the right in the parliamentary elections yesterday.
Extreme means as at election time.
Witness information is available to the public, gleaned from CˇTÚ websites.
The individual arrested was accused of drug trafficking and carrying of false documents.
After the victory on Sunday, Gebrselassie said to reporters having suffered cramps in his calf two weeks ago, and having missed training for a week.
They have not been according to the opposition.
In particular, in Tar, they are contesting the exclusion of additional benefits in the event of injury as a cause of service hours; the extension of hours of home leave for ill workers, during which are carried out inspections and other items from the new provisions sought by the minister.
The song is ensured by Katerˇina Kneˇzˇínková and Adam Plachetka.
Madrid in the race for the 2016 Olympic Games
Paul Newman the magnificent
Dramatic reductions of Hypo Real Estate and Commerzbank led the German index (Dax) to a profound deficit.
For one, it is probably impractical to spend eight thousand kroner for a reader, in the same way as a Pink Floyd fan would find it hard to use headphones bought for twenty kronor at the market.
If they had taken into account all the mistakes that occurred during the race, it would be an elimination note straightaway.
"However, it has not led to any conclusion on this point.
The English call him tank but the awesome Marcel of Brussels stands out among all the other.
I am pleased because she has agreed to play a role in my work and I am honoured ".
It is indeed what took place this weekend.
Dennis Quaid outraged counter-attack
But he adds moreover, in his chair of the patio romance post that gives on Lake Sabelia, where Hurston was certainly entitled, that "it was never too long".
This is what we think will bring in more customers.
And to facilitate its implementation, as legal reform can be made by ordinary routes but reform made by punishment requires a reform of the organic law.
As he said, the Schüssel-Molter orientation was, in any case, rejected.
To cut corners to everyone in Congress, it has also added a provision that if the government were to take losses for five years with this programme, it could put in place new taxes to help recover its implementation.
In the first round, half of this amount will be spent.
The cause of this exclusion is that the stock exchange of Warsaw is owned by the state.
It lasted, he added, until teachers and students came only more of the same place.
The problem is that trade of all mobile operators Czech prohibit such a resale.
The support gravitationnel is a manoeuvre of space probes, for which they get an extra boost in the field gravitationnel a heavenly bodies, the Earth for example.
I was already afraid on my way to school.
Inseparable except in intimacy, in these times unknown to the public, where we discover from intimate gestures and stolen looks of artists who do not care to be on stage.
With grief in his heart on the recent death of his brother, Nati wore a Mango dress and a couple of ornaments from ELAH, which was breathtaking, and arm in arm with her son Luis - a tall man, almost two metres in height – she accompanied Valentino to the dinner prepared in his honour.
A few months after the attacks of September 2001, during the days of the collapse of Enron, Krugman wrote in an article published in the New York Times, that the second event would be more important than the first, in terms of impact on US history.
The disappearance of Paul Newman has been staggering for cinema goers this week end, while his major roles flash on the black screen of memories.
"There are few areas still belonging to the city, and we hope that the city will keep Extra Place" she said.
No financial movement has taken place, either, since the invoices were cancelled later, but which the people have avoided mentioning in their accounts.
With the popular song festival "of Mines," Bauer began in 1997 a long journey to photographed the singers, dancers guitaristes or with a camera to mark.
If the music is for you, essentially, a background noise and if in the day you will listen to that for a limited time, for example by taking the tram, you only need any mobile reading the MP3.
From it, "now, everything is more than the moment when the systems of entry and electronic control of the Atlantic will be put into service".
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
"UEFA has constantly on the eye '.
The Press (diepresse.com)
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
The assistant entraineur Cornelius Jol has acquiesé and lifted the inch to approve.
Stress is the evil of the twenty-first century.
You would not yet account, but at the moment we are seeing an insidious erosion of our rights, freedom and democracy, the word that Harper continues to brandish and whom if hollow in his mouth.
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
However, the law will still many changes.
Students become victims of expensive rent; upto 900 euros for a room.
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred the gates of the community.
Mr Bush was happy with the progress in the negotiations
In the context of this experience to a bizarre 12 believers Catholics and as atheists have been subjected to shock, while each of them was a painting representing the Virgin Mary.
The head of the Deta-Bank Franz Waas said during the presentation of the figures of the semester ending August that he saw no sense in the merger of the house of the Mainzer Landstrasse with a bank of Land, the Helaba or WestLB.
The ageing population also has implications for the network of blood donors which brings together on average than 3% of eligible Quebecois the blood donation. "
The historical cinemas are closing in favour of Multiplex.
Alice Walker, Tony Morrison and ruby Dee came to the Zora Festival every year to Eatonville, to pay tribute to Hurston, the writer the most famous of the Harlem Renaissance.
Has he been released from the narcissistic mirror, the American actor with the charming smile?
If mobile operators turn a blind eye to such a procedure, why block the creation of a virtual operator?
A few days you started on the bridge with Naomi Campbell, is it not?
For a price of three four thousand kronor, we can have a very decent walkman.
Has used half of the applications provided with the system?
Mixed blood often makes beautiful children.
I find the path alone, fortunately I have not lost.
99% of the shares are in the hands of the Polish state which wants to secede from more than 60% of its shares in a few months of activity.
The total amount of aid to the system should be divided into two parts.
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred to the gates of the community.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
Askale Tafa Margasa of Ethiopia came second in 2: 21: 31, while Helena Kiprop, Kenyan draft third in 2: 25: 01.
Der Spiegel (spiegel.de)
But it is also important if you have always on you of headphones or a handsfree with connection.
It identifies the obstacles in the way of 180 degrees and a distance of 2 feet before the BR23C, it assesses the distances and sends a signal to the microchip of board, who turns on avoidance maneuver.
"This is the fundamental point: If we do not do this, the trauma, chaos and the disruption on the daily lives of Americans will be immense," said the Republican Judd Gregg.
He was born in Ohio in 1925, to a German Jew father and mother of Hungarian origin.
Meanwhile, geek culture and its American "savages" reunite the passionate, the activists and enthusiastic users of the computer from many countries and see in Google the next generation of big business, "trendy" corporation, as opposed to its rival, Microsoft, classified as invader of the world because of Windows, even though the two are fighting for the same cause.
Regardless of this, the feeling that mergers between the various institutions of the public sector is especially urgent is spreading.
Then I quickly crept in my place.
The directors who imagine they will lose their jobs in the space of three years, are 47% at national level.
The only government that, despite the fact that Canada signed the Geneva Convention, goes back on its word and leaves a child soldier in inhuman conditions.
We need to continue with the recovery plan for the markets, but we're there," said Paulson
This epochal change is also the problem of any Christian Democracy, and therefore also that of Angela Merker.
It is better for this way, as they will still need their strength.
According to a statement from the Hypo Real Estate, the need to finance the group is covered by the medium-term credit and the company being protected from the influence of the international financial markets which is largely outside the current jurisdiction of the state.
I read it in my mangas.
It proclaims that every society must pay a sum proportional to the deposits that it holds, and that companies intermediaries must pay about 18% of the cost.
"He is a mediocre player"
When energy gives birth to waves, big ones moves.
In the US, the economic turmoil is even being felt among journalists: in the press, it is time for supression. And many blame the Internet, the murderer of the newspaper.
This episode has shown that the precautionary principle that has been applied, made sense. "
Proof that confirms t that the first responsible for their disappearance is the advent of the multiplex, because it is the three Italian regions that have made the most of new cinemas multisalles: 195 screens in Lombardy in the last five years, 81 in Tuscany as Emily-Romagne.
In 2007, a strong laryngite has forced to cancel concerts.
Most of those in front of me, I apprendrais Starr later, my 'personal banker allowed', were all the queue for the same reason that me.
Cornelius is the brother of the entraineur in-chief of Hamburg Martin Jol.
It begins with a section instrumental that has lasted almost two minutes.
"Several one who are disappointed not to be able to have access to it," because Héma-Quebec does not have the resources to propose this programme complex and expensive in all hospitals in Quebec.
Should Mr Obama not take the example of Sixth Street Prep and replicate it in other schools made up mostly of Hispanic students learning English.
Illhaeusern finally...
Both by formal measures and informal pressure, they ended up with the creation of a first virtual operator, which was followed by others.
In 2010, it will be necessary to pay the interests of the whole year, which may double.
Sudanese the kidnappers had demanded a ransom of several million.
We cannot ignore the threat longer - highlights the Tages-Anzeiger in Geneva.
WestLB would bring a "competence block" doubled by a durable productivity in such a case.
If the quality is in Rome, as in France with the Attali Commission, I am sure its contribution will be crucial.
'"The Committee is absolutely independent; all the political, social and cultural ideas are représentées- wishes to emphasise Alemanno- it will offer ideas of development of Rome which can use policymakers policies, which remain the Committee and the City Council.
At the time of her death in 1960, Hurston was poor and her books were out of print.
The ÖVP prohibits the SPÖ of meddling in its internal affairs.
Host my mother had also made this kind of Lunchbox - this is really something other than the miserable by-case Germany.
Almost all mobile are now able.
The celebration of the Second crucial time for the Improvement of Record of the Equipe.
Everyone knew that it was ill.
Similarly, in the summer of 2002, the bill on behalf of the foundation Jobb Jövo˝ért, which later bore the name of Együtt a Harmadik Évezredért, swarmed with mistakes of form and substance.
Young people in particular, tend to be regard Eatonville as Hurston did her entire race: beautiful, problematic and all, neither better nor worse, but also proud, creative, hardworking, crazy and mixed than other racial and ethnic groups in America.
But given the attitude of mobile operators that are, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
The first debate on Friday between the two candidates for the White House has followed another to know who John McCain or Barack Obama, has prevailed.
However, they have not said openly the value of information, feel less worried about the credibility.
"During a movement, there is no risk. The situation can be compared to that of service in aircraft.
Another problem occurs during the recording of music in the mobile.
Immediately after the General Council of the Liberal Party over, Jean Charest has made yesterday in Jean-Achilles, Quebec, where the new Minister of Health, Yves Bolduc (left), is trying to get elected on the occasion of the-election today.
In 2007, the Inail data confirmed that the number of dead whites were approximately 1200.
Although the concepts are different in "intoxicating spirit of flamenco - people ', the photographer admits that he loves photographed the portrait of people know them, and to enter their lives for a moment more or less long.
What matters most is consumer awareness and making this information open to the public domain.
, on the contrary, we want to see progress, and further, to a prospective deepest, working seriously the development of Rome and its future. "
The directors are almost always of wages, while the Editor can win 10mille dollars a month, in addition to retirement and the payment of insurance.
In the latest episode of this financial catastrophe, " Citygroup will buy banking operations of the Wachovia Corporation, said the government on Monday.
But the complaints many interested parties (including the company GTS Novera, already mentioned) show that they are in negotiations with all operators, similar constraints.
It will not work, "he stressed.
It foam - and counter-attack.
What interested me was to create an intimate atmosphere which would allow me to capture the personalitie of the stars of flamenco with a camera".
Due to the increase in the price of kerosene, passengers in economy class had to pay an average of 7.1 percent more than in 2007, while on long flights, which consume a lot of fuel, the prices have even gone up by 29.2 percent.
He took a second look, when the jets transformed a 0-0 into an explosion.
This has said there are three years in the elections of the Bundestag of 2005, i.e. at the time of the much-discussed Stoiber.
American the Dow Jones index collapses despite the rescue of the financial market planned by the state.
(At the same time, the federal government has been successfully some 50,000 web addresses and 1,000 terms of research that he had won in relation to the strengthening of the law on the protection of the child, voted several years ago, but in the end, it fails to get the lists of research private users, or the whole list of Internet sites and the key words of these two months.)
Later, the other two houses fell at odds as well.
The intensity with which it happens is also very different.
As I do not explores the language and awareness among rats, or the sensations, I do not know if they exist.
That is what surprised the researchers also for years: Objects kites are not always 100 percent of the way in which it expects to the venerable institution laws of gravity.
At the same time, thousands of employees public, are united to contest the standards of the decree Brunetta making use of the Codacons.
But given the attitude of mobile operators, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
Tom Wright, Anglican bishop, welcomed the results of this research.
That is that one aspect of the American mindset kept secret until the end.
On the side of the opposition, it has welcomed the broad outlines of Plan north with scepticism.
"He has tried to do too much in the first period, noted Guy Carbonneau.
If that, internally and subjective, does not measure and, because of the hardware particular, analyse based on our own experience, then his comment raises serious problems.
A source of the Ministry of Interior said that Jacqui Smith, the Home Affairs Minister has been reassured and happy to know that Glitter was banned from travelling in France and Spain.
The Spanish-American novelist acknowledged that "there is no way" to measure and know whether his books are changing lives. "But I refuse to believe that literature is a pure amusement, a short-lived experience," said Vargas Llosa, who said that it "has the effects" and "makes people less similar", because it asks of writers' "not to give in to frivolity" and to assume their vocation.
Paul Newman was one of them. "
The court was told that Ms Randle, aged 34 years, has committed suicide at home at Mutley, Plymouth, on 1 April 2007.
Giorgio Dal Torrione, mayor of the UDC at the time of the collapse, was appointed head of a center-right coalition, after a tie in May 2006.
None of the Czech operators did of a dominant position on such a market.
They have not been that according to the opposition.
"And the choices are diverse: Ocean Power, for example, uses a system of buoys linked together.
He also hopes that Quebec calls the members of the Council of radio and Canadian telecommunications and that they have a right of veto on the decisions taken in Quebec.
Hidden in the development of its huge park, a few miles of the sunshine, the brilliant and the giant Orlando, is a quiet town where are born pride and the complications of the African-American experience.
The chairman of the committee regional calabrais Agazio Loiero, cannot deny that "collusions between local councils and organised crime, there are more than a" in its region: "There are places where the mafia intensity is stronger than in others, where the collusion is almost inevitable.
It is possible to limit these data making use of solutions such as the reduction of the level and duration of exposure to noise.
In Afghanistan, almost 200,000 children have missed the recent immunization campaign against polio, for reasons of violence linked to the Taliban, said the UN.
Who lost his son Scott by overdose dédia him his film Harry and Son in 1984, for modesty and sadness.
Everyone knew that it was ill.
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
According to the BSA, no society has failed since 1945, the date of the first history.
The neurophysicien Joseph LeDoux is convinced that many animals also have sensations.
The two parties are trying to prevent the building of mosques and minarets, saying that they would be a political symbol of the Islamisation of Austria and Europe.
But also remind them to wear seat-belts before starting a journey.
The supercolle to walk on the walls.
The two minors, which, according to the information to make (agency MTI Hungarian) are girls, defend themselves free.
The second weekend of the party of beer is also known as the weekend of Italy.
A spokesman for the Kent Police said "The police in Kent will do everything necessary to protect our children as well as those abroad.
It should be managed by the Ministry of Finance.
The Sudeten Germans wanted that Sˇumava National Park be a part of the US in 1945.
In exchange for help, Washington will have shares in rescued companies which will be worth dividends in case of profit and that it will be able sell when the storm is passed.
Printed publication against broadcast.
The anthem has again been recorded by the orchestra of the national theatre under the direction of Jirˇí Beˇlohlávek.
According to the head of Google, after ten years of work of global confusion, they are still at the beginning of their aim to deal with all the information.
The academic world, to which we belong, has long been known manage the debates and the disagreements and resolve conflicts.
None of the Czech operators has a dominant position on such a market.
On both sides, there were, of course, those who have expressed their doubts about the plan.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a job at risk, I supprimerai.
When Sylvana Hiltrop, 16 years, must be present for the first day of the Highschool Tachibana, girls are beginning to giggle laugh: The German is so "kawaii '!
Elena first claps Luca, then embraces him.
Much more irregularities occur in the speed.
The second weekend of the beer festival is also known as the weekend of Italy.
To another group, they promised that if they were to win the game, then they would receive an additional $15 as a reward.
But pressure in the direction of a functioning market honest and lower prices is apparently not part of the interests of ÚOHS.
The populist party BZÖ is open to negotiations. The Greens are not yet willing to agree on the coalition.
However, the OSCE reported Monday already challenging the campaign, in which most of the candidates for the opposition could not appear in the media, and particularly the fact that the opposition could not be present at the counting of votes.
"I didn't go out of my area" Favre said about all his passes to Coles.
This is not a mere of male body in cotton shirt, milling and without sleeves.
Next year, will we still need a visa to go to the United States?
But we want to be independent.
To begin with, such music does not go on vinyl record, and, from the point of view of quality, there is no objective reason for that to happen, anyway.
'"According to data scientifiques- continues a responsible UE- it is a clear risk and we must react quickly.
In the world, around half a billion people suffer from chronic hepatitis B or C, while in Hungary, the chronic disease of the liver is mentioned among the main causes of death.
None of the Czech operators has a dominant position on such a market.
In fact, it is attacks that do not say much; they are obviously attacks of racial nature, and do not respond to the question of all voters: Will it be a good president? We also the polls, who say all that Obama wins and with a good advantage.
They wear road signs of mosques crossed out in red.
However, in view of the dynamics and unpredictability of the crisis, there is no certainty.
"If the project is moribund (...) then the relay will be quickly passed on to the Fed (the US central bank, included) and other central banks to manage the crisis, which will further tighten the credit conditions, said Brian Bethune, chief economist at Global Insight.
It is probably true that a classic operator with its own network has apparently not much chance (besides it would be difficult to find clients, now).
And the sooner the better.
The technology-dominated Nasdaq index, has yielded 199,61 points to 1.983,73 index and the broader Standard & Poor's 500 8,81% (106,85 points), 1.106,55 points, according to the final figures.
Napolitano does not hide the fact that "there is certainly a problem of resources: it is essential to invest in training and information"
According to the Czech business daily E15, the Polish proposal represents the highest offer that has been made to date for the purchase of the stock market in Prague.
After its privatisation in 1990, the former financial state had first of all evil speculated on industrial real estate loans, which then had been filialisés the bank Aareal.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the offer of services. "
He embodied for everyone an ideal of beauty and truth.
There is already a European standard of safety which limits the noise level of portable music devices to 100Db, but the concern is growing about the hearing damage that may result of excessive exposure to such sources of noise.
The government has provided £14 billion to protect the deposits of 2.6 million bankers with Bradford & Bingleys.
We have already had negotiations several times with all the Czech mobile operators about the possibility.
Adrian Coles, BSA
With a final role of godfather of the Irish Mafia in Road to distress of Sam Mendes in 2003, the circle was completed.
A court in Bangladesh has rejected a request for bail from the former PM Sheikh Hasina, who is likely to be arrested upon her return.
In February we had informed of the launch, Poland, the virtual operator Mobilking.
The multinational trade and tourism agency has also indicated that the shares will not be sold to Thomas Cook.
Sooner or later it will eventually a fatal accident," he said, a year ago, to Ty´den.cz.
However, in view of the dynamics and unpredictability of the crisis, there is no certainty.
In this transition, Stoiber, which until now was the shots behind the scenes, also receive an active role. The former head of the regional government and former president of the CSU, has appointed on 28 September as the most bitter of his political career.
It was a blow for everyone.
Has the view of all this talk of a rebellion of the masses "present" on the agenda, seems quite frankly excessive.
The draft law states that in the next five years, the President must introduce to Congress, a proposal that will rule on how the losses will be returned to the taxpayers, from the financial sector.
This is what we think is the most contributions from the point of view of customers.
The obligations of the bank Hypo Real Estate appeared before be an alternative investment of speculation, now their value should be seen as dependent on the stability of the international banker system after the tightening of the banking crisis and the crisis in the same institution that has brought the crisis in the establishment by the takeover of the bank Depfa.
Kohl, too, is positive, that this is the fourth case of doping.
Given that the building societies are organisations without shareholder, their members end up paying the bill either by higher costs or lower interest rates on savings accounts.
The awesome Marcel
"Serious accusations of potentially criminal conduct, although unfounded, have neither been fully confirmed nor resolved," said the inspector General, Glenn Fine, in his report.
The second time began after the jets and the Arizona Cardinals have salement played under obscure clouds.
The project of the motorway happened just when the girl the most famous of Eatonville had recovered its appeal.
The cause can be attributed to modernisation "devouring its parents', put in place in a consistent way in the region by the CSU.
In 2010, it will be necessary to pay the interests of the whole year, which may double.
Has the view of the painting of religious issue, they have realised 12% of pain in less than when they watched the work of Leonard.
Verdant Power, on the contrary, is already producing energy for a commercial center and a car park using six turbines Marine in the East River in New York.
But that is precisely that would seem strange the CˇTÚ.
In this project, the photographer takes up the special iconography of the intoxicating spirit of flamenco from different angles.
Open Office has paid particularly attention to the interaction with the suite Office 2007, and it is possible to open the documents with the new extension of Microsoft (.docx, .xlsx, .pptx.)
This should reserve of the night of sleep before all creditors in the long term on the decision of whether they should secede from their commitments.
Demand will acquire ground in many market segment of travel by air.
"When a static panel which warns against a danger is installed, it will probably quickly merge with the environment and the drivers will see more," signala Korˇán.
At 5.40 p.m., official time, the plane of the Spanish air force in which the Princes of Asturias traveled landed in the presidential hangar of the airport Benito Juárez in Mexico DF.
Could this accident be somehow related to the elections?
Most of the time, I have no idea what I eat exactly here in Japan.
According to the court, such movements (that the entry was not granted) would allow him to influence his society and to have access to evidence that was used to accuse him.
However, I do not think so.
The work has just started, and there is still much to do in the two countries'.
It is more robust than other institutes dependent on refinancing from the inter-bank market since it has no customer deposits.
It is as independent, worthy, and private as it was in the 1930s, when Hurston said that the rural population in Florida was often reluctant to share its true thoughts with the white man, who "knowing us so little, did not know what he was missing out on".
Currently, we figure to 200 million patients with chronic hepatitis C-type in the world.
The cap wage is not mentioned in the specific case, the limitations depend on how the secretariat the Treasury suggests its aid to the company.
"Say what you want, we will be the ones to put the cross on Obama or McCain.
Condemnation for loss of official data.
After a first half without aim of both sides, the middle ground David Testo and Rocco Plancentino marked the other nets training montréalaise.
The private bank Sal Oppenheim, has signed up to 23 million new shares.
But given the attitude of mobile operators that are, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
While the economic situation is deteriorating, the demand for raw materials, including oil, should slow.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risk".
In the long term, we need Members of the European Union to forget their national egoism, and centralise control over divided financial markets.
In the same way that in a city bus or in a tram.
In most cases, it is a question of firms in charge of multi-level marketing.
Today, Eatonville is an anomaly in Florida: Six miles from Orlando, it can at any time see itself as a back street after a summer rainy day, small as it was when it was founded by 27 black families in the 1880's.
On the side of the opposition, the broad outlines of Plan North have been welcomed with scepticism.
AIG must quickly achieve liquidity to repay the loan of 85 billion that he has made the Federal Reserve to the risk of the American authorities take 80% of its capital, diluted share due to the current shareholders.
But attention, because the Belgian brand does not only that the tank tops.
Similar to the price of petrol being identical at all service stations is a matter of chance and hard struggle of competition.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
This phenomenon can be very sporadic (once in life, for example, associated with an episode of strong foot), or a more regular (every day, once a week, once a month...), the day after the child does not remember anything.
If one of the operators accepted the creation of a virtual mobile operator, the ÚOHS will find it difficult to remain impassive faced with the rejection (left to discrimination) of other interested parties.
Lawmakers hope that it will be adopted during the coming days.
Attacks on Obama are rising while the date of the elections are approaching.
"We are very keen to be able to propose to our clients not only telecommunications services fixed, but also mobile.
And a few years ago, it has been proven beyond any doubt that the disease is transmitted by the blood.
But of course this is the future.
Not to mention the missed deliberation of credit for traders: Debt antécédente of the state is around 10 million.
Thus, the future is perhaps promising.
According to the press office of the Group of the deputy Fidesz People's Party, Járóka warned that alongside distinctions found in the recruitment, Romans disappears from the labour market, in the first place, following their low qualifications.
Really anybody is to ensure the command readers the most rudimentary - who do not necessarily correspond to the cheapest (see our choice).
In March, she completes its tasks and then disappear, because this experience must have a specific time period.
This incredible success was achieved through another ingredient than the one that was put forward by Mr Obama.
Track runners such as Gebrselassie and Paul Tergat, both Kenyans, converted into long distance runners, have contributed to lowering the marathon record by more than two minutes in the last ten years, since 1998, when the Brazilian Ronaldo da Costa won in Berlin in 2: 06: 05.
But that does not mean that there are plenty of reasons to buy an MP3 player independently.
Among those invited to take part in the consultation are the European social partners, as well as the most prominent representatives of the legal protection and civilian agencies of Europe, in the field of equal opportunities.
But is it that the core of the brain is at the root of sensations?
Last week, Meg Ryan had expressed in an interview for the American newspaper InStyle the causes of the failure of marriage, "Dennis had long been unfaithful, and it was very painful."
However, the leader of the United Left has called for investigations to show "transparency" for the irregularities that Silva could have made: "The United Left has always defended cases of this kind to have a maximum degree of transparency".
You do not think - you pay for it.
Of course, if even more banks collapse like dominoes, then neither financial resources, or new improvisations will not be enough.
Less cumbersome, crowded month, less complex.
Passion for portraits has led Bauer to execute the idea two years ago with "portraits of old athletes' ('SportARTproject").
However, they have not said openly the value of information, feel less worried about the credibility.
Roger Levesque was the only off Matt Jordan for the Sounders.
According to its index, the Taiwan lost 3.6 percent.
Since the rallying to Czechoslovakia is allegedly promising - by knowing the Czech national character - that of brutality, of attitude without ways of incomprehension, oppression and servitude, the authors of the letter urge the American president to take in its hands the protectorate of the Sˇumava National Park for now and forever.
With little ego, the ultimate show of quality.
The development of Orlando has already pushed Interstate 4 up to the west of the city.
But even without admitting this argument, it should at least be worrying for the ÚOHS that three mobile operators are clearly proceeding in a similar way.
Olmert is also ruled in favour of retirement of Israel from the Golan Heights, which is, according to him, a prerequisite for the conclusion of a peace agreement with Syria.
We have four versions - with a song solo male or female, an interpretation with choir and an instrumental version.
Jaroslav Horˇín, an expert of BESIP (safety of road traffic) on safety in transport, does not see the displacement of stewards on board as a major problem.
The polls and analyses made just after the elections, have defined the extreme right as the political bloc the height of the country, which is demonstrated by the majority of young voters who has made a difference, because concerned about their future in the European Union.
Of April to June, prices were already 3.6 percent lower than the previous year.
In March when they have completed, the Committee and the City Council will evaluate the analyses and projects, in order to present in June, the strategic plan for Rome with the "official" stamp of the Capitol and its mayor Gianni refer.
The beginning of classes does not seem to be as strict as back home in Lower Saxony.
But we must renew the members of this network of donors as they get older and cannot give their blood.
Based on the accounts of Benito Pérez Galdós, José Luis Garci récrée the famous battle of Spaniards against the French in "Sangre de Mayo," which is the film the most ambitious its filmographie with nearly 15 million budget.
The choice depends entirely on the mode of use and requirements of the future owner.
By a union of the bodies of the financial institution Düsseldorf with the Deka Bank in Frankfurt, "the central institution of the financial markets of the financial group of the Sparkasse" could be, according to the letter made public Monday.
"We do not want this watered-down" trend will result in fact, in a minor attention, because it is precisely when attention is acquittal that is the tragedy.
Michele of Milly, the spokesman of Avalon Bay, said that although the company wants to exploit the street, this does not necessarily mean that it wants to be the owner.
The administrative officer of the Director-General of society Delta Trió Kft., caring of trade of fuel and cars, whose headquarters was in Budapest, but where there was nowhere to be found, was Iván Kubatov.
They have not been that according to the opposition.
If he does not report his movements to the authorities, he could face a sentence of up to five years in prison.
The written version of the plan was made public before the opening of the Asian markets, on Sunday evening at 20h, local time in Washington (i.e. Monday at 2 a.m., according to the local time in Central Europe), but has not caused spectacular rise in the stock exchanges.
"They would have thought that this would have remained between the walls of the Ministry of Defence and the Cabinet Office," he said.
Figures which show the gravity of the phenomenon which remains one of the main causes of death, and almost twice as many deaths as homicides.
The reaction of the market with the outcome of the vote in the US House of Representatives, who refused to adopt the stabilization of the US financial sector, is also noticeable home.
The part, precisely, which made itself felt despotically at the vote which I mentioned earlier.
German domestic flights have even been halved according to the study.
According to the results, the Catholic believers were able to exclude a large part of the suffering.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
In August 2008, the rise of the most significant price has been observed in the manufacturing sector leather articles and shoes (2.8 percent), with first, the manufacture of bags and belts with a monthly rise of 4.6 percent, then the production of shoes with 2.5 percent of monthly rise.
- Ah, well...
The Brazilian manufacturer is banking on the Chinese market especially for its aircrafts in the range of 30 to 120 seats.
The reason so-called for which the authors cannot sign the letter is the fear of the desire for revenge "Czech oppressors.
Scientists have inspired the legs of geckos, overlaid hair microscopic who can assure the animal, a perfect adhérente.
The larger houses éditrices work their way to the Internet, seen by many as the "murderer" the paper newspaper.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
As Héma-Quebec distributes each year between 400 and 500 000 blood products, it will take more than 24 years before a case of transmission of HIV by a blood products strikes.
But is it that the core of the brain is at the root of sensations?
It could be the flow of the financial market, or parts of it.
It was present at the promotion that the brand Mango has done to Paris to its new headquarters but and the presentation of the Sakharov the most important of the way that the Spanish house sponsoring.
For years, a mysterious phenomenon leaves researchers in the concern: The dark influence on the speed of space probes during the games gravitationnel support.
The good people of the Ministry said that bailouts can take place in the context of an auction, but also directly.
Well, this is nothing compared to what happened the day of racing.
It is certain that more than one speaks during the night.
The sale price for export of the industrial sector, HUF, rose by 1.1 percent in August compared with the previous month, while they have suffered a fall of 3.9 percent on 12 months.
When he said the deux- the jets have missed 21 points in the third temps- unquestionable Mangini said: "I can tell you that I have more appreciated the second time that the third.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
"I am concerned that such a huge number of young people who use frequently portable music devices and mobile phones at full volume, can damage unconsciously their hearing in irreparable" says Meglena Kuneva.
"We celebrated, a few weeks ago, the bank of our thousandth sample of umbilical cord blood and are expected to take more than a thousand per year.
This time, the decline is due to the fall of shares on the Wall Street.
In the women's race, Irina Mikitenko, born in Kazakhstan, now a German citizen, has completed a remarkable year with the seventh best time of 2: 19: 19.
If the information to tell behind a real and virtual operator will soon be home, the Czech mobile market will perhaps be movement.
The men continue to squeeze on the pavements, with their trolleys and their shelves of muffins for meetings matinières.
While virtually all mobile can read the MP3 files, no MP3 player knows telephone.
The Minister of State for road safety but also the General Directorate of Road Safety and the Technological Foundation Institute for Automobile Security will participate in this initiative.
And that's it, it's go to the festival of beer.
Unlike bees, though, it cannot move upwards, downwards or diagonall; it can only move in two dimensions, and only in the direction in which the wheels can turn.
Who will take the place of George W will be a huge stain to do.
We need to review the existing control systems in the scientific opinion, so that they are fully effective and can follow the new technologies "
Moreover, you will hear what he says, but you will not know what he is dreaming, because of the way you interpret information and the conclusions you draw from it.
Will it be a birthday without a genuine party.
The price of the best equipped telephones, which also come with a standard connector for headphones, does not exceed 15 000.
The global economy is in a vacuum, just when the history of capitalism is witnessing one of its biggest changes.
Moreover, the rain has accompanied the expectations of more than 40 minutes during which took place rebellion and assault of Baraque.
The course of the obligations, however, are particularly well.
Everyone spoke at, pouffait laugh and I had a lot of questions - in this case, it is quite difficult to understand the Japanese English.
In this respect, music players (even the most rudimentary ones) are much more efficient.
A few hours before I asked in the street, the taxi driver, if it was aware that the Spanish Princes were visiting the city to conclude their official trip.
Not only is it here, but it is in us" he insisted, to make it clear that he solicited a national myth.
In October the decision will be taken on the fate of the toppled duo Huber-Beckstein
The boss of Virgin, Richard Branson, a group of consumers and the regulator Ofcom were all contrary to the purchase.
On the basis of an agreement between shareholders, some 90% of the papers would be sold.
Then, do you become mother?
More specifically, the experience is as follows: an instrument issuing sparks and broadcasting the shock is set on the left hand of the subject.
After 10 days in the hands of their captors, tourists kidnapped in Egypt should be released and the Italian Foreign Minister the confirmed.
It in recruitment two hundred.
The silence of the night falls on the place of October.
In addition, his album Bat Out of hell was nine years in the rankings English, and was sold to more than 40 million copies worldwide.
And to better understand the mangas and culture, at a time, I have also begun to learn the Japanese.
Although this is an intermittent phenomenon, the tide is more predictable than the wind, the sun, or waves, and therefore more reliable as a source of energy.
Too often the policy is frustrated by the management of the newspaper and emergencies that occur from time to time.
This accident could be somehow related to the elections.
Correspondents have pointed out that the terms of her release are contradictory; since she was allowed to leave the country for medical reasons, they do not see why she could not remain free on her return to Bangladesh.
To operate in a limited period of time, we should have now an agreement. "
Miroslav Cˇepicky´ indicates the problems: "The law allows such speculation, however, the services of these companies are used by only a few customers as a percentage.
When the agreement was announced, one would have thought a truly revolutionary step.
In June-announcement the maire- we present the strategic plan from the work of the Commission for the future of Rome Capital. "
The Attorney General, Ramsey Quaife said in court that friends had told that Ms Randle, who was a good surfeuse and cyclist, seemed since 2006 "emotionally dead," and "had lost all hope to life."
Obama should be able to confirm his advance on Thursday with the performance expected from his colistier, Joseph Biden, in the first and only public debate with his rival, Sarah Palin.
According to Alemanno, indeed, "we need a sketch of strategic reference, neither firm nor immobile, to allow our city to improve, which is absolutely necessary, while thinking about its future in a spirit of unity,".
"The issue was resolved.
It has not even used the words' middle class "or" workers'. "The rout financial advantage clearly Obama, who is regarded by the Americans as the most able to save the economy to the brink.
Even the cheapest mobile phones (for example The Vodafone 527) generally have a hot-swappable memory card slot (the type M2, microSD, etc.).
In the case of mobile cheap, do they will play music for a few hours.
The community has begun to hold a festival Hurston to demonstrate the catastrophic consequences that would create the motorway.
The 19 participants of the excursion in the desert should already be on the way to the Cairo.
Most mobile and readers will create themselves a library media classified according to the name of the interpreter, the title of the album, style, or according to the judgment of the user.
The causes of this résideraient for American Express in the weak dollar, which has led to a 'desire to travel in decline of American tourists'.
The contamination is much higher than the average among a population of three groups: Those who have suffered a blood transfusion before 1991, consumers of drugs and tatoués.
"We will keep a certain potrion of the territory, but we must give the Palestinians a similar portion (of Israeli territory), since otherwise, peace will not happen," he added.
Isabelle Bayón is in the skin of the dancer sévillane Tórtola Valencia
Has the support of their theories economists, the members of this group of researchers have pursued analyses of financial supervision.
"This is a cosmetic change, highlights Alexander Milinkevich, a former opposition candidate for the presidency in 2006 and leader of the pro-European movement, because the important thing is the voice, and here, the executing power.
None of the Czech operators did of a dominant position on such a market.
Cornelius is the brother of the chief trainer of Hamburg Martin Jol.
It is not just the European Commission, but also the Federal Services for Authority Surveillance which have, only recently, made it clear to the government of the Land of Rhenanie North-Westphalia that the time was running out in the search for a solution for the future.
At the end of trade, the stock exchange of Prague bascula in the negative
But he less often acted as young people than as marginals: neurotics, alcoholics, swines or desperate men, including its perfect features which reflect the excessesive and the revolting.
Only 13% of journalists are working under contract.
It's nice to hear the civic affection in the voice of the nephew of Mr Franklin, Edwin Harvey, 18, who plans to return to Eatonville after college to work for the local government or for the Police forces, who need additional forces.
"We are very careful about how to tell the story" said Hortense Jones, 59, resident since forever and the oldest parishioner of the village.
Precisely tomorrow, Congress of Deputies will vote an initiative of the Spanish Socialist Party, which proposes to settle in school buses this system as has been done in France.
Model citizen, and more.
In the 1950s, the dispute on the mix of races led hatred to the gates of the community.
An honest man, in the widest sense of the term.
Of course, I want to become mother because my body wonder, and I want to become a young mother; I do not want to lose it.
The implementation of various stylistic means breaks with the classic side of the image, with a touch of modernity, this reflects the perception of flamenco according to Bauer: "A very traditional music with roots, that is changing and surprises us every day."
Augustus Franklin, 77, remembers that Hurston usually came to the city without warning, on board a large Chevrolet, a cigarette in the mouth and wearing trousers here, where even today, we are proud of traditional clothes.
"We need to break the vicious circle of poverty, segregation and the unemployed to give the opportunities provided by democracy to the Roma children, so that they can participate as citizens of the future of Europe," demanded Járóka.
The individual arrested was accused of drug trafficking and falsification of documents.
Linebacker, David Bowens let the ball go because of Warner.
Having experienced in July, an increase of up to $145.29 the barrel, prices have dropped to nearly $90 a barrel this month, before pick up again at the sight of the deep uncertainty of the financial markets.
Paul Newman, disappeared Friday, 83 years, died of lung cancer in his Crawford of Connecticut, remains one of the last icônes of American cinema of the good years.
The favour of Hispanic voters is a complicated business.
The compromise, born from the plan, is supported by both candidates for the presidency, Barack Obama and John McCain.
On both sides, there were, of course, those who have expressed their doubts about the plan.
Only the most ladies are doing the same with maps memory of 8 UK.
The problem is that the commercial state of all Czech mobile operators prohibits such a resale.
Repeat offenders of drink-driving will install the system 's alcolock
Not surprisingly, this fundamental difference is completely obscured by Mr Garver.
In the MDAX, the shares of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
I think about 500 people have pneumonia tomorrow, and some people like me, do not even figurerons in the classification with the exact time, because of the chip that they gave me who I think has not been properly the outset.
But with the noise renouvellés a partial nationalisation, the likelihood that approached the sureté has now become a mere hope based.
But their entry in parliament can mean space on television, meetings in the regions and the draft laws. "
But also the pool in groups of conversation
The most prestigious prize in fashion
He has put forward its ability to make the right decisions, and to restore America's image in the world.
But these measures are necessary," he commented on American television.
Several people have rightly pointed out that an Internet browser is not an operational system.
Has fallen substantially the risk that some donors are infected without the knowledge and that we can detect them.
A formulated answer like this is not suprising, coming from the representative of the operators.
There is no risk of unwitting use of mobile Internet, followed by an astronomical bill of data transmission.
Every time you want to hear something, you just have to get your the mobile out from your pocket, whereas you may have forgotten your MP3 player at home.
"An overwhelming majority of young Romans have no secondary qualifications, and as a result of a poor quality of elementary education, only a tiny fraction have the opportunity to obtain a diploma."
The fares and hotels are falling
Now is the time when no moral no longer exists: Abuse, torture, arbitrarily detain a Canadian citizen at the whim of a head of government minority so far (what will happen after 14 October...).
A Sevillan dancer will pay tribute to a dancer who is also Sevillan.
This is not merely a male body in a cotton shirt, milling and without sleeves.
Towards 8.30 p.m., the most important stock index in the world showed 10.579 with a fall of five percent.
Milk is growing up to five penny per litre
WestLB bloc would be a "responsibility" doubled to a sustainable productivity in such a case.
The driver control the validity of the voucher registered.
If tourists in Manhattan stood far from the newsstand and giant TV screens of Times Square, they would not realize that they are in the eye of the storm.
With an annual budget of $297 million, Héma-Quebec not only provides blood products, but also of tissues, including greffons bone, heart valves, the Globes eye and skin that is almost exclusively used for the big burned.
It is enough to fill, through the USB connector, the apparatus of music from the computer.
Kubatov gave bodies, 15 bills in total, issued by companies operate Investment, Delta Trió, Fa-Bani Jos, Jos Investment and Linaxtrade, for a value of 14,2 million HUF.
"This is not wasted money, said yesterday, the Dutch Finance Minister Wouter Bos.
There was no one in the polling stations.
So many other Paul Newmans have gone down in history.
The campaign by Mr Obama stresses that "African-American and Latin students have less chance of granduating than white students." This is true.
Things have a bizarre appearance and a completely new taste.
In October, November and December 2005, the company issued several bills on the sale of computer equipment, for a total of about 18 million HUF.
I am not mounted on the bridge to the blow.
At the end of this, a butchering of WestLB could take place, a butchering which here is obviously not desired.
The alcolock would prevent this because it is a trendy system on the vehicle which measure the rate of alcohol in the suspense and prevents to start the car if the driver does not before; or when the rate of alcohol of the driver is higher than that allowed.
Lukasenko - his rivals: 110 - 0
The same music for travel, namely music high-pressure, to put it in a simplified, MP3 music.
"We have been excluded from the electoral commission and our observers have not been able to participate in the count," regretted Yuri Potemkin, the spokesman of the Union of the Democratic Forces, a heterogeneous reunification of twelve parties.
"As far as raw materials, our most pressing concerns is to understand how far the virus American diffuserait it globally and in particular, China."
"I have changed, I do not want to take risks".
From January to March, prices had risen by 11.9 percent in the second quarter, they have fallen by 23.6 percent.
Pablo Picasso the assumed on the Côte d'Azur, Leonardo Di Caprio bore a diamond in the blood of Edward Zwick, Al Pacino in "The godfather of Francis Ford Coppola and is part of the holding of the Association of gay heavy-handed.
Miroslav Cˇepicky´ said about this: "We are open to talks with potential virtual operators, and especially in the field of infrastructure costs and shared.
The start of the second half-time would be decisive with first two chances falling to Riahi and Temporale for Dannemarie, and immediately after the opening of the score for the Illhousiens by Marais, well positioned to use a ball rebounded on a first attempt by Diebold (53rd minute).
Now begins a new season of accountability and transparency.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a job at risk, I supprimerai.
The juice fungus has already been heavily criticised for held accountable to increase the effects of certain drugs, antibiotics, anti arythmiques tranquillizers, anti staminales and neurological, until the toxic levels.
The Financial Services compensation Scheme confirmed to the BBC, that the 59 building societies are included in the list.
But in almost all countries where virtual operators appeared , the traditional operators always made an attempt, sometimes more sometimes less, to prevent their creation.
Things that can certainly be transported from one place to another in the land, but which are definitively linked to a limited area, a territory.
Because WestLB, injured, is under heavy pressure.
This new emphasis of the nation-crisis is in perfect harmony with the importance that the increasingly large recent developments of the economy tend to place to a factor which is inherently linked with this element: territoriality.
What chance that the politician used the word relatively and also slipped that the German banker would not be saved by the movements of crisis.
"The aim therefore, is to restore the worker the guarantee of assurance – he ajouté- so that the fate of those who has an accident, must not depend on the spontanéisme or enlargement of the legislator"
In a corner of the car park, the Latin Americans sing of gold alongside their flag; they have already celebrated last night.
They bring you down just to collect the jersey (first mistake, travel all the way only for that) and (after a long queue) surprise!, the only size was S (second mistake, because I need a size XL)
Of Saturday evening, representatives of legislators rencontrèrent the US Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, in order to give the bottom of the government a final form.
Secondly: 'When the doors of the beer tent open, we run for ir,' cries Marco in the early morning.
The Treasury estimates that the interests of the loan will in 2009, to £450millions.
And in the role of actress, when you endosses clothing at this point, you really put in the skin of the man.
All depends on it, "he says.
'Push the limits of our last great northern border': This is the long-term ambition that Jean Charest presented with visual force while remaining within limits, at the end of the General Council of the Liberal Party of Quebec, Lévis, yesterday.
They call the race perfect, but I think it was the worst race to which I have never been involved.
The Dax has clearly slipped below the important psychological barrier of 6,000 points and côtait to 5.839 points with a deficit of 3.7 percent.
The politician and his accomplices are accused of fraud, in the form of criminal organisation, permanently and regular damage, having led especially important. Other charges have been used against them, for example, false and use of false.
During the shooting before the release, six kidnappers would have been killed.
The Hypo Real Estate needs annually for about 50 billion - of the global appropriations for the Depfa a means to refinancing short term.
Then a visible jaundice develops on the skin and the whites of the eyeballs, the cells becoming more transparent and urine takes a darker color. Cure can take two to three weeks.
Never they might think that in the glass offices and bees' nest above their heads, bankers and hedge fund managers who monopolize New York, are having the worst "working day at the office" since the fall of 1929.
Obama is really cheeky: he believes he will win the highest office of a nation that has two black governors and five black senators! "
And I believe that we can always dreamed of becoming the host city for the 2016 Olympic Games..
The process must happen in the blink of an eye.
"According to this scientific report it appears that 5-10% of those who, listen to music at full volume using mobile music devices, for over an hour a day and per week, during a period of 5 years, risk a permanent hearing capacity loss."
The American physicist Stephen Adler of the Institute for Advanced Study in Princeton still believes staunchly that Einstein was not wrong and is trying to explain the anomaly of the gravitational effect with the help of so-called black matters that astronomers have identified in the universe.
The Sudeten Germans were in 1945 that Sˇumava National Park is included in the US.
The President of the second section of the criminal court in Rome, Carmelo Rinaudo, decided to reject the body of the estate agent, Danilo Coppola, who had asked to leave his city, Grottaferrata, for a house in Rome.
In 1975, the writer Alice Walker went to the anonymous grave of Hurston and began to fight to revive her reputation.
In conclusion, don't worry, it is nothing of bad, it is an episode that has lasted only a few minutes.
Has 26ans, Kohl is the fourth cyclist positive for EPO Cera, the third generation, after the Italian Riccardo Riccò and Leonardo Piepoli, and German Stefan Schumacher, also of Gerolsteiner.
A newspaper of the Mississippi River, in the southern sandpits the US, wrote an article: Once in the voting booth, we know that the American patriot will give his vote.
In my view, similar behavious is not enough to prove similar experience.
They agreed with a ransom, "said the official.
Has none of the operators of a dominant position, none has therefore a corresponding responsibility increased its behaviour on the market.
People say that Naomi is a person with a warm heart.
When the Germans Czech should at least see that the issue of their expulsion of the Republic will arise, very few of them are avouaient such a possibility.
A young stewardess from the Plzenˇ region, who had been working for the company for two years, has died in the accident on the Naples line.
The Treasury estimates that the interests of the loan will in 2009, to £450millions.
Prince is smiling and dressed in blue sea, Princess, when it has the hair is dressed up in the wind, very quite soberly and is not its peep-toes' normal '; perhaps they had said that a storm threatened.
30 September is the World Day of hepatitis, organised for the first time in 2004 by the organisations representing patients around the world.
A court spokesman said 'Thursday, 25 September in court of Ashford, Kent Police has asked for an application to prevent Paul Gadd to travel in France and Spain until 25 March.
Héma-Quebec celebrated yesterday the 10th anniversary of its founding, and its chairman, Dre Francine Décary, had reason to rejoice, because Héma-Quebec has become one of the largest providers of blood safety and effectiveness of the world.
"The Italian exploitation has developed an irrational" observed Paolo Protti, chairman of the Anec, "it is useful to build new structures, but we need to ensure the survival of those that already exist, because when a firm in a city, these fréquenteurs are not necessarily all prepared to go to the multiplex.
His lawyers have argued that it needed this bail to return to the country in order to prepare elections in December
To place the blame on the CˇTÚ is a fairly common trick in communications, through which the ÚOHS is washing its hands of the matter.
But pay attention, the Belgian brand does not make only tank tops.
None of the Czech operators did of a dominant position on such a market.
While we can take many examples, such as the lover who looks at photos in the morning, taken by a circle of common friends, with who his infidel lover has spent the evening, or that of the company that has dismissed one of its employees, for the sincere opinions that he voiced on his blog about the top management, we can be sure of one thing: the end of privacy is to be reconsider these days.
Do people who believe in God feel less pain?
Well the four achievements of the new version of the national anthem.
Her dancing was sensuelle and they told me that my way of dancing was identical to hers, "she says.
The French film-maker Bertrand Tavernier the considered, not without humour, "as a challenge living in the" underplaying "judging its benefits too supported.
It is not the dancing and singing itself, but of personality and the nature of the artist who ogre the public with his art.
Cryogenic death threatens it by the fact that its fuel may soon be frozen.
Walk on walls? – "this material may be used as a temporary adhesive" adds Liming Dai.
Virtual operators have the advantage of being able to focus on a much more specific target group.
The Ertzaintza continues its investigation to arrest the other suspect, who has managed to escape and to determine the origin of the drugs that were seized.
In this school students are largely Hispanic, and of families with low incomes.
The press review of German speaking territories
The federal government will have the opportunity to delay the procedures of foreclosures on housing tied to mortgages affected by this plan, and to set limits on the pay and allowances of departure paid to executives of companies affected.
All depends on it, "he says.
And this time the old neighbours of Hurston see it as a sauveuse.
We were able to reduce this period to less than a week.
Also disappear with him the grey areas of this secret star, quiet, committed, allergic to shards of show business, which we will not quite pit the puzzle.
Moreover, Járóka has insisted that education as fundamental right of human beings plays a key role when we must make the other fundamental rights.
However, in view of the dynamic and impondérabilité of the crisis, there is no certainty.
What is certain is that everything is really good.
According to the public prosecutor, money from subsidies, was spent for personal use, while the benefits were justified by false invoices.
The mistakes are starting with the withdrawal of dossards, which you have to go ahead.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
Sergei Lebedev, leader of the Commonwealth of Independent States, told the Russian news agency Ria Novosti: "People do not believe in words, but in deeds." In this way, the absence of the opposition is proof of the maturity of the Belarussian voters.
The opposition has therefore enter the political game because "we must begin a dialogue with the European Union.
Jean Charest has described it as "vision" continuity with the prime minister Liberals that preceded it.
To confirm the rising tension between Italy and immigrants, the NYT also refers to episodes of intolerance in Milan, Parma, Rome, Ciampino and Castel Volturno.
What are these machines?
Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, the chairman of the House of Representatives, Nancy Pelosi, and the Republican representative of the negotiating table, Senator Judd Gregg, have announced the good news a few minutes after midnight, yesterday, after marathon negotiations spanning two days.
Transactions with the CˇEZ shares rose almost half the usual daily exchanges.
"I wanted to work with Pepa Gamboa and the Commission has proposed to interpret the dancer sévillane Tórtola Valencia and I felt that incredible".
The number of people who deliberately, does not have on public pages for that it is not possible to locate them, is not insignificant. The services of Google online, via the treatment of text the treatment of image, reading of information can be replaced by alternative versions, which are not linked to enormous servers parks and assemble not our best profile, which have existed to date.
And as everything is so well organised I never felt lost here, even if Tokyo is the largest city that I have ever seen. "
In its flights, each bee is its own area, oval form, which in fact, is very similar to our hull secure protection - has explained, during the exposure, Kazuhhiro Doi, the director of the department research and development and technological public relations of the brand.
From Andoh is the intelligent knee-jerk reaction which is essential, not the treatment of data, and even less the capacity to store.
It has a right of reply.
According to the indictment, a large part of the bills were false.
These tissues are analysed, processed and frozen before being stored in Héma-Quebec which manages also the only public bank of umbilical cord blood in Quebec.
The anthem has again been recorded by the orchestra of the theatre national under the direction of Jirˇí Beˇlohlávek.
A signal to the Asian trade
And no
Of course, there is an analysis of relevant markets drawn up by the CˇTÚ according to which the telecommunications are, from the point of view of economic competition, a single market.
Hundreds of fans came to the inauguration of the festival two years after, and many back in January, to commemorate.
Short-term investors can still use an automatically taken postponement of losses for the next few years on the next income tax capital stock market gains.
"We have made two steps forward and one step back, but the most important thing is that the dialogue has been initiated between Belarus and the EU," said Alexander Milinkevich to our newspaper.
The carrier must manage the safety of the stewards by internal regulations, "he says, and also think that from the point of view of the law, the problem is not resolved.
During his final race in Vienna, he spoke of "a European brotherhood" to avoid the rise of Islam.
Then the quarter back Brett Favre has managed to make a happening in Laveranues Coles from 12 yards for a touchdown, sign of an afternoon when their relationship has taken a step forward.
How this will all be lumped together with the union of certain entities with the Deta-Bank remains to be seen.
Plan North will be "concerted, ordered and environmentally friendly, he promised.
In this respect, the music players (especially the most rudimentary) are much more efficient.
In an interview given to the ABC, McCain said: "We will all have difficulty swallowing it (...) but doing nothing is not an option."
A mono-themed library (of course named Hurston) opened in 2006 on a magnificently repaved Kennedy Boulevard.
The same service, in the same price category, but with a greater capacity of memory (up to 16 GB) and a better battery life (normally between 15 to 35 hours), is guaranteed by an MP3 player produced by one of the companies mentioned above.
But given the attitude of mobile operators that are, the indifference of the Czech regulators is disconcerting.
In 2010, it will be necessary to pay the interests of the whole year, which may double.
We do not have to look too far to find examples.
If you call from time to time, procurez you, to be sure, a second charge for the work - that being the case for appliances more expensive.
Although the text content in the letter, given the current knowledge of history of the post-war, seem somewhat naive, according to some survivors, it illustrates the expectations of the Sudeten Germans of the time.
They do not feel isolated as in the past.
On the other hand, no legal prescription does not prohibit not the carrier services.
They have not been according to the opposition.
For some, it is linked to the "safety of work".
But in this case, we can at least hope that all human brain have the same configuration.
While Ryan has lived alone after the divorce, Quaid has remarried and will soon be the father of twins.
The new Czech anthem has four new versions.
At the same time, in Europe, we had further proof of the global nature of the crisis.
Life today being so hectic, there is rarely the time to spend an hour to give blood," laments Francine Décary.
Men were to be held until the kidnappers have found a sure way to flee.
Medicines at sirk- the Italian Agency of the medicine, which gave the news in a letter dated two years ago, alerting doctors and patients not to assess the danger of this mix and to pay attention to what we drink, taking medication for example, Diazépam or the methadone.
Heinz-Christian Strache, the head of the Freedom Party who won more than 18 percent of the votes, conducted its campaign against wearing headscarves and burkas, and has even expressed its opposition to the food alaha.
If the US president doubted the opinion of Germans of Sˇumava National Park, it would have to organise, according to the authors of the letter, a referendum in the region to establish whether its people wanted to be part of the US, or live under the management of the US.
No such agreement has been reached at the moment, because potential investors have not presented enough interest in the traditional operators, " said Kristián Chalupa of the External Relations Department of ÚOHS in response to our question.
In April 2007, its true father, Terrance Randle, was found dead in his apartment in Plymouth.
According to the most recent polls, with highlighting the economic issues, Obama has once again managed to get a bit ahead. Advance of McCain, achieved with the appointment of Sarah Palin as colistière just after the Republican convention, has melted away.
The answer is simple, there is a lack of competition, which would like to join the fight.
It was a nice ovation. "
To operate in such a limited period of time, we should already have an agreement now. "
Witness information available to the public learned from CˇTÚ websites.
According to the sources, on Wednesday at the earliest, the a priori should be put to the vote in the Senate.
(Today there are 90 percent blacks)
"It is an initiative that am very fond" observed Giuseppe Tornatore 'and I hope that other cities will follow the example of Bologna putting in place other measures.
The ministerial officer of the Cabinet Office, who had forgotten top secret documents in June on a train, will be condemned by the Official Secrets Act, the BBC has learned.
Obama has said that he is the future.
Charest put on the North
Buses belong to Marco, which is a long, doubled to fake fur coat and glasses for the broader silver eels pairs.
The law ignores the steward
During the shooting before the release, six hostage takers would have been killed.
According to its index, the Taiwan stock exchange lost 3.6 percent.
Abuse of a father-" which led to suicide "
Asked about another channel whether he would vote for the proposed plan, his Republican opponent, John McCain, said: "I would like to see the details, but I hope so."
When the morning, the group of Marco is finally coming to six hours 30 as planned on the parking lot near the place Thérèse, almost 50 other bus across Europe are already here.
No one was afraid to be ridiculed or to exaggerate.
The General Council of the end of the week has provided the Liberal leader a platform with nationalists resolutions, including 'constitutional' aspirations which have appeared as a letter to the post: The PLQ calls in particular the recognition to the "specificity of Quebec" in the Constitution.
The main cause is that according to estimates, only one in ten patients receiving medical treatment.
As Kristián Chalupa adds: "Abroad, where virtual operators are normally present, we can see that their entrance to the market has contributed to a fall in the prices of mobile telephone services. "
People behave similarly, which is why some scientists deduce a similar subjective experience.
Other operators also refer to the specific nature of the Czech market.
Even if it is the year of the election of a black president, Senator Barack Obama, who has also cited an open dialogue on the issue of race, many here remain cautious the view from abroad.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would be likely to walk at home.
He has left his five girls a letter containing these words: "Always and until the end, your father was incredibly grateful.
Success is not so sure.
Christopher Dodd chief negotiator and the president of the banking commity of the Senate, said that lawmakers have agreed on the responsibility of the financial programme, the protection of aid against losses, the agreement of relief, and the punctual effeciveness of the plan.
Has Bari to read, we must count 250 / EUR 350, at least 350 for a simple.
The judge Christopher Elwen Trerise said: "You are truly bizarre as abnormally attached, your victim was certainly terrorised, especially at the age of 7 years.
American prosecutors investigate and continuing the courts for the government.
The Austrian 26ans has placed on the podium behind the Spaniard Carlos Sastre and the American Cadel Evans, raflant to the shirt and peas the best climber.
What could Zuschlag have been making &amp; united in their factory invoices?
Who said territory, state government policy, inevitably said, and therefore Leadership.
The psychology of one-upmanship: Why are we spending more money?
The biological clock am not afraid.
Although the legislature composed of 110 people in this country of 10 million people is doing very well with the opposition for many decades before the elections yesterday, the opposition between its forces under the name of Forces Démocratiques Nations (ODSZ) was seriously hoping that Lukashenko would renew his term as President for the fourth time in dubious elections, in the footsteps of the amendments to the constitution in 2006, "would" this time the presence of a few Members of the opposition in parliament.
That afternoon Alejandro Talavante concluded with two banderilles planted on the back of the bull and cut one ear which when the audience discovered applauded more than his fight with the bull itself.
Anyway, despite all these arguments, the winning card for the democrats is George Bush.
From there, the appeal of Michele Carruba, director of the Department of pharmaceuticals of the public University of Milan: "These findings are generally, immediately reported to the various national and international agencies of medicines which will as required change the informative notes of medicines.
- oh, well, we cannot go to the airport for customers at this time... Are you from hereabouts or …?
While the third group received these $15 before the auction, but the members of the group also lost money if they lost the auction.
If Barrick Gold really wanted to a public debate and transparent, it could do so in accordance with the scientific standards used by the authors of black Canada.
They have not been that according to the opposition.
In the first half of 2008, the night flights and hotels were less expensive than the previous year.
Nothing is yet come out of this display ternaire.
That is condemning the least of this act, without any insinuation of criminal intent.
The choice depends entirely on the mode of use and requirements of the future owner.
But the opposite will not be ruled out.
A small rat scampers to the bottom of the alleyway near a door that once led the CBGB, and which has now become the location of a chic clothing store.
Indeed, they will buy their coupon by Internet and we will register it on their Opencard cards in one of the thirteen Meˇstská knihovna (municipal libraries).
In cases where the somniloquie is very frequent, it would be good to observe the child and consult a specialist, to see if there is a problem which causes a lot of anxiety and in order to obtain an explanation for this problem.
"There is no clear legal interpretation of the role of steward - no legal prescription is dealing with this role.
On the press, moreover, the Prime Minister has refused to rule out that he would call for the elections this autumn, although he noted that it was a very busy period.
Many players in "Sangre de Mayo" repeated in front of the camera, as Miguel Rellán, Carlos Larrañaga or Fernando Guillén Cuervo.
We could see this as a cause of short term, but I prefer to move forward rather than constantly beat myself against a wall.
Of course, if they asked me to name a perfect race, this one certainly woulnd't come to mind.
It asked her if she was here to visit someone and told her that it would respond in a few moments.
At the same time, in Europe, we had further proof of the global nature of the crisis.
But the Department of Preservation and Development 2008 of the city that manages the street, has no interest in the bear.
The song, written by Jim Steinman, required a great voice like Meat Loaf's.
We always remember Hurston as a person who was alive and eccentric, who returned frequently after her family has moved to Jacksonville, Fla.
However, it became clear that there was room for such operators and that they could have a real success.
Jörg Haider, the President of BZÖ, is again open to all proposals.
Well, almost all journalists are pessimistic about their future.
Krugman, 55, is a neo-Keynesian who teaches at the University of Princeton and is also a famous writer of the New York Times.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the provision of services. "
In the MDAX, the actions of Arcandor fell after the announcement of an increase in the capital.
A change in the law?
They have withdrawn their money on savings accounts of so-called thrifts (such a society of the building), associations of credit, and the type of savings banks and their local subsidiaries which do that in a state, and who say treat customers as their families.
Some companies are working to bring some functions of OpenOffice on the Web (on the cloud), and in the next few weeks, they should make the final outcome.
In the sectors of production of consumer goods, we measured inflation of 6.8 percent, while the sector of initiators of profit, saw a reduction of 1.4 percent.
"The Ministry of Transport does not consider the activity of stewards as something that would fundamentally endanger the safety of passengers," concludes the spokesman Hanzelka, by saying that the control of security on board coaches is under the power of the police and the office for safety at work.
The new Czech anthem four new versions.
We are checking their state of health, "said Frattini.
She asked me to go up for a noble cause, but if she had asked to act the pear tree, I would have done it anyway.
In the two games, participants could earn money, but during the auction including an essential element is the surfeit of a third, all under the waistline brain, called striatum, was being movement of intensive way at the loss of the game.
The law on the road transport is only the term recipient of vehicle; it does not define its rights and duties, "adds more ambiguity the spokesman Hanzelka.
On the distributor of drinks, a poster their request to use their own research tool Mok, "research. Our future".
At the same time, in Europe, we had further proof of the global nature of the crisis.
In this way, the ODSZ has abandoned its originally planned boycott.
The fact is that dividends have been cut.
Especially personal stories that will attack the emotions.
But it is also important if you are always carrying headphones or a handsfree with connection.
These are potraits which, thanks to the choice of the camera and equipment, give the impression of a classic photograph.
And it is, it is party to the party of beer.
Of course, the nervous comparison helps: rats and humans have similar brain cores, cockroaches on the other hand don't even possess a brain.
The police have pursued and have arrested two occupants, a man of 28 years, identified as A. A. J., according to the information disclosed by the Department of the Interior of the Basque Government.
Nothing but on Monday, financial institutions weakened have received more than 100 billion - recalled the Viennese newspaper, Der Standard, which adds that fears that European taxpayers also will have to delve into their pockets, very deep, in a similar way to the US in order to resolve the crisis, are becoming more realistic.
You never know what pathogenic will emerge in the system.
Less monumental than Brando, whom he resembled and who was for long a kind of rival on screen, more cautious in his game, certainly more fragile, but equally an apostle of freedom and the iconoclast of dramatic conventions.
The internationalization policy seems really out of the game and has little to say: the evidence is provided by the European Union, which is divided as usual, between the various interests and between the various national strategies, to decide on a common policy.
While those who have caused much greater damage, and are the authors of irreparable economic crimes roam freely or at least go back to their own homes at the end of the procedure, he does not have that possibility.
The umbilical cord which was once considered a biomedical waste is full of a rich blood stem cells that can be used to treat serious diseases, such as leukaemia.
Elena, Luca and others come together, Marco makes a last speech and explains the plan of attack.
The North, 70% of the territory Quebecois, includes a portion Labrador that the Quebec has always claimed, said the prime minister at the point of press.
Eric Schmidt said, recently, the Financial Times that the main ambition of Google is to gather more information on its users. This is necessary for the founders of Google can respect their original purpose which was as follows: "Set out in a system all the information in the world!".
In Rome, in areas close to the central universities (San Lorenzo, Piazza Bologna), it costs around 600 euros for a simple room, 450 for a bed in a double room.
It is not entirely clear to all Internet users that the words used in research on the Internet, the IP address of the computer which launches research and the pages consulted then by the interested parties are listed.
According Masi, "the choice of rotating doors is important even from a symbolic point of view."
The Dow Jones points to 10.809,25 has lost in the first hour of openness 334 points, or 3.3 percent.
But before the classes began, it was up to me to introduce myself.
The European tourists kidnapped in the Sahara are visibly free.
Since 1946, the SPD has reached its worst results with 18.6 percent in Bavaria.
To support the sector, one would need between 16 and 18 million per year.
Useful advice
"The government considers UEFA's decision to Bordeaux as a sign of confidence in Ukraine and its ability to hold, in collaboration with Poland, the European Championship," announced Wasjunik.
, it was bloc in the middle ground and it was just the moving Riahi at the forefront of the attack.
Here, too, there are groups on the basis of price and quality.
"I am not out of my area" Favre said about all its fishways to Coles.
We have here a government that is the only one, of all the Western countries involved, not to have brought back its nationals trapped in the concentration camp at Guantánamo.
After an emergency meeting, the three Benelux countries have announced the partial nationalisation of the banking group Fortis to 11.2 billion (16,3 billion US).
If Barrick Gold really wanted to a public debate is to the public that it should have presented his vision of the facts.
Additionally to Chevron, Verdant Power Inc. of New York and Ocean Power of New Jersey, which run the route of energy from the sea, and the sums invested until today, although their details are unknown, indicate the observers, that there is a growing interest.
After the fall of Tuesday morning, the stock exchange of Prague réctifia its losses.
The cheapest normally cost less than three thousand.
At the moment, this service is accessible to nearly a hundred thousand people, owners of the smart card Opencard.
Prices have fallen by more than $20 a barrel since last Monday.
In other sectors of the processing industry, rising prices has developed between 0.6 percent and 9.1 percent.
After the creation of the Tchécoslaovaquie in 1918, the first couplet became a natural part of the national anthem.
The most expensive action in Czech history targetting road safety.
The incident took place when various officials of the Unit of the illicit traffic taken control of the realization of vehicles on the N-1, on the border of the policy of Armiñón.
To combat these differences, the education programme of Mr Obama supports especially among many issues, "transitional bilingual education" for those who learn English.
A witness saw her making strange manoeuvres in trying to back out of her garage in Montecito, according to what a spokesman for the police patrol of California unveiled to People magazine.
After a first attempt by the visitor captain Kauffmann which grazed the woodwork on a shot from far, Illhaeusern took the upper hand slightly with another shot from far by Fonderflick, then with Hirn going above, Roman with the end of his foot or Diebold tickling the Dannemarie defence.
Paul Rees, editor of Q magazine, said: "There are songs that transcend things like the time and gender, and Bat Out of hell is party
"Of course, we have a lot of concern for this: We have to give our newspapers opponents in Russia, local authorities we put a spanner in the works for the dissemination, but I can see that they are increasingly to support the elections, even in the circle of elderly," said Milinkevich, referring to the fact that in the current regime of Lukashenko, which considers social security as its main result, the layer of pensioners the most sustained officially really no longer regard it as appropriate.
He has been reproached - especially in Kenya, rival country to Ethiopia - for orchestrating his runs, and avoiding the stars of the marathon from around the world, counting rather on the hares as if they were in a track competition, and giving more importance to world records than to the sense of competition.
Elena, Luca and other come together, Marco takes a last speech, explains the plan of attack.
If the test turn out positive for Cera, the Austrian will lose his third place in the Tour and will compulsorily suffer a ban of two years.
Because in him is projected a whole country enamored of the self-made man, the soldier of the Pacific War, wounded in battle, who in the early 1950s studied dramatic art at Yale then frequented the Actors' Studio in New York, before triumphing at the theatre, cinema, and television soon afterwards.
The Sudanese kidnappers had demanded a ransom of several million euros.
In the choice of a concrete, do you especially for life accumulateur, the ability of memory, quality and sort out its and, of course, the ease of the contract.
"As liberals who preceded us, we thought otherwise to transform the challenges in new opportunities for growth and development."
Despite this, Iraq has been, for the most part, the weakness of Bush.
Specialized mobile telephone services are offered for example by Amway, Bohemia Telecom, Starlife and others.
The assets which AIG plans to give up comprises of its subsidiary of air leasing International lease Financial Corp., its participation of 59% in the insurance company Transatlantic Holdings and its property portfolio and its investment in the private equity, it said.
But what a great long distance athlete.
Adrian Coles, Director-General of the committee commercial building societies, told the BBC that this decision was unfair.
Bradford and Bringley will be the second bank, after the Northern Rock, that the British Government is nationalizing since the beginning of the financial crisis.
The Gallup Institute, an opinion poll published Saturday gives an advance of five points to Obama (49% to 44% to McCain), believes that it is the Democrat who has learned his own way.
But of course this is the future.
In smaller cities, prices are lower in absolute terms, but they have a major importance in the economy in towns and cities.
An estimated 100 thousand patients are infected with hepatitis in Hungary, but only seven thousand are taking treatment. This draws from the fact that often patients do not know that they are infected.
Remind you that they are harmless for the child and that the next day it will remember most of what happened.
Inés Sastre did not stay for the visit of the palace dependants, but showed us photos of her son on her mobile phone before she left.
56% of directors at national level, are convinced that reporters share their values, while at the local level, this percentage drops to 23%.
They will have to give up their current relations with Iran; they will have to give up their relationship with Hezbollah (Shiite movement); they will have to abandon the constant supports they attach to terrorism of Hamas (Shiite movement), Al-Kaïda (terrorist network), as well as that of Jihad (holy war) in Iraq, "précisa the Prime Minister.
Not only.
The trend has been marked especially in Paris and Rome, where passengers were paying 30 to 37 percent less than a year earlier.
The initiative was already announced last June and it now appears in the report by the Minister of State in which this initiative is seen as a pilot project that will last a year.
Retirement from the Golan Heights
"McCain has still not understood, while Obama has," said, this weekend, a Republican spot to a Democrat, accusing it of not having grasped the impact of the crisis on the "American in the street.
The German Embassy in Cairo refused to make any comment on this story.
However, in view of the dynamic and impondérabilité of the crisis, there is no certainty.
After the fall of Tuesday morning, the stock exchange of Prague regained its losses.
Locklear has been arrested for suspected driving under the effect of a substance that has not been disclosed and was imprisoned at 19.00 hours and released a few hours later.
The North contains "nickel, zinc, copper, platine, however, money, iron, bow, and even diamonds", according to the list of Mr Charest.
"But why should I eat a hamburger outside home, when I have beef in my fridge?", he used to joke.
Gyo˝zo˝ Farkas the manager of the society, said to the site hvg.hu that when the public prosecutor had him convened and had shown him the bills, he had been able to immediately identify them as false documents.
Energy is sent to the shore through the under-water cables.
With a few exceptions, the street has always the same look.
Glitter, also known by his real name Paul Gadd, was not present at the hearing the limited jurisdiction court of Ashford, but was represented by his lawyer Corker Binning.
To Elena, this is the first time, Luca already the third or fourth time.
It has thus indirectly confirmed that operators in the Czech Republic were, in any case, not support the idea.
This numbers 5-10% of users of these devices, and can be quantified around 2.5 to 10 million people in the EU
I already knew the word thanks to my mangas.
The whip is the threat of fines or an accident.
You do not think - you pay for it.
"I photograph the master outside the scene to capture of the elements of his character" Günther Bauer - photographer
And Lyn, the uniformed doorman of my building, has changed the subject of our usual conversation about Brad and Angelina or shipments of my commercial of fruit and vegetables.
The new Czech anthem four new versions.
"If I was reasonable, I would not do it, but I will and hope that I can finish it," he concluded in his speech at the festival for exchange of ideas and thoughts which saw a hundred writers, historians and journalists and thousands of people for four days in the town of the aqueduct.
But even if consciousness does not depend on the language, it is surely influenced by it, so that animal consciousness, in whatever way it is produced, is probably very different from most of our states of consciousness.
In short, the request of leadership, feeds below, a powerful and more ramified délégitimassions movement of the ruling classes and traditional political orders, in the 'uprisings electoral "improvised or, in the changes of collective mood of recent just days, from the conservative rise in Austria Bavaria, in the fall of Labour in Britain, the US Congressmen rebellion against Bush (and it may well be that the victory of the Right in Italy is not arrival by chance).
In short, the crisis appears global from the point of view of economics, but is exclusively, in addition, political here.
I believe yes, but in the end they are joined and these activities have a lot in common.
Regardless of the outcome of the trial, the authors and the editor of the book Black Canada will have to spend considerable sums to prepare their defence and weapons to fight, with very unequal arms, against an army of lawyers supported by the almost botomless pockets of the mining company.
According to information non-official, it seems that perhaps we could receive the first virtual operator already by the end of the year.
"At the beginning you think you travailles for posterity, then you realise you travailles for prosperity, and now you happy to make a film in addition," explains Garci after more than 30 years of professional career.
While for the sceptics establishing a parallel with the vision of horror of Orwell, they do not see the bulk of the Web 2.0.
Now, the leaders of the CSU put all their energy to stabilize, one way or another, Beckstein.
Werner Faymann, the chairman of the SPÖ, confirmed that he wanted to discuss with the ÖVP.
The Germans are constantly in the sights of the kidnappers.
In 2007, a strong attack of laryngitis forced him to cancel his concerts.
As we know, Kubatov acknowledged during the investigation that he issued bills upon the order of companies such as Atlasz, Hoppá and Együtt a Harmadik Évezredért Alapítvány, and that he pocketed their counter-value.
With the show in strength of fishermen who have severely disrupted the access of several ports on Monday in Brittany and Normandy, the President of the Republic has decided to go on Tuesday morning to the port of Guilvinec, in Finisterre, to meet their representatives.
The course of the obligations, however, are going particularly well.
In Rome, Alemanno gave the order to make the Commission for the future of the capital leave.
A rat or cafard fled before the danger, is it that it means that it is also fear?
Has the door of the hotel where they remain, one of the four major hotels of the city, a journalist rigolo Mexican television awaits them.
Some experts fear that the general theory of relativity of Albert Einstein, which describes the force of attraction of matter according to the curvature of space, may not be entirely correct.
Promoter of a small group in Congress known as "the caucus of sceptics," the Democratic representative Brad Sherman presents things differently, but comes to the same conclusion.
The 'safe job' at the level of staff (our editors, ndr) in America is still on the agenda.
I believe that animals have sensations and other states of consciousness, without me or anyone else having been able to prove it, just as we cannot prove that other human beings have a consciousness.
In Vietnam, the nation lost 50 thousand soldiers and were sent back with kicks to their rear.
A group of volunteers was playing lottery, while another group took part in a playful auction, while with the help of a process of functional magnetic resonance (FMRI), the researchers studied the active brain areas of the trial subjects.
In a nation as huge as the US, with 300 million inhabitants and thousands of journalists, reviews, radio, TV and the Internet, employers often provide what they want, and it is fast becoming a matter of take it or leave it.
The new version of the $700 billion plan to curb the financial crisis affecting Wall Street for months has yet to be approved by both chambers of Congress.
I am pleased because she has agreed to play a role in my work and I am honoured ".
In New York, Wall Street opened with losses sensitive.
Rescue operation of Wall Street - Democrats and Republicans agree
Because the state financier was not sufficiently profitable, the Depfa then committed itself more to infrastructure projects and in the funding of projects in common between private investors and the State (Privat-Public-Partnership, PPP) and diversified internationally.
The actress Heather Locklear, the famous Amanda of the series TV Melrose Place, was arrested this weekend in Santa Barbara (California) for having driven under the effect of a drug.
For nearly 18 years, the space borehole "Ulysses" steals in the area.
And will the inhabitants of the territory be the First United and the Inuits?
Behemoths in the attack.
Despite everything, nothing has changed.
In April 2007, the Office of Fair Trading said that the purchase of shares by BSkyB in ITV sowed doubt on the effective independence of ITV, encouraging by a result, the Competition Commission to investigate
Paulson: The plan must be effective
He stresses that his schedule has been fulfilled, including a mission of the board of the federation in China and a Quebec-New York summit.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a job at risk, I supprimerai.
The money comes from private banks as well as from banks in the public sector.
Things never revealed until now, so much so that the success of the black candidate seems almost certain.
But if your shelves are stacked with vinyl records of rock, jazz and blues music, it is more likely that you have dreamt of buying a gramophone.
Six out of ten senior executives of printed newspapers and journalists are convinced that journalism at a national level is going the wrong way.
It will not work, "he stressed.
However, in view of the dynamic and impondérabilité of the crisis, there is no certainty.
It is true, I look forward to leave.
The times jostle through his path.
Last month, Gebrselassie had missed the Beijing Olympic marathon, craignant- can be under the eyes of today - that air pollution is increasing its problems of asthma.
And yes, the dream of many of us is that Madrid should host the Olympic Games, and after the failure of 2012, this could be achieved by 2016.
Such geo-strategic thoughts, however, reveals only one of the sides.
Although it is favourable that immigrants learn English, Mr Obama has recently seen this issue as insignificant, when he proclaimed that we all need to stop disagreeing about the wording of the laws in English.
Anyway, despite all these arguments, the map winner for democrats is George Bush.
We have already seen this kind of attitude in several similar cases.
The movement has spread to other ports of the Atlantic coastline and the Channel, for example to Sables d'Olonne, in the Vendée, where fishing boats were idle, or at Le Havre, where twenty vessels have blocked ship movements of trade.
It is the day of the release of OpenOffice.org.3.0, the open source suite of personal productivity applications which aims to reach more users, at home offices, professionals in the public administration, proposing a free alternative to the famous Microsoft Office.
In the same way, the Ministry of Culture of Andalusia has bought eight hundred copies of "Journal of a poet recently married," edited by Pedro Tabernero and illustrated by Jacobo Pérez-Enciso, to perpetuate the work of one of the most famous Andalusian poets.
Under the law, the secretariat to the Treasury will put in place a combined strategy: it can, at the same time, buy bad debts, securities on mortgages and bad mortgages and other types of "toxic" debts.
Germans of Cˇesky´ Krumlov ask in the letter, the US president not to allow "sˇumavská zˇupa" (region of forest in Southern Bohemia) - annexed by Hitler under the Munich Agreement - to be made a part of Czechoslovakia.
For me, it was clear that I had to travel there some day.
"We know take back," said Marcell Jansen.
On Monday, investors are worried again despite the agreement on the rescue plan, which is the largest in history, reached this weekend by the leaders of Congress.
Signs pointing out the danger to drivers are, according to him, already less effective.
The Brazilian aircraft manufacturer promises to deliver 215 planes this year despite the threat of recession that loom over the global economy.
No resistance on the part of employees has been recorded, ensures the Secretary-General: "It is a process shared by employees, and we had the cooperation of all".
The Prime Minister does not exclude to trigger the elections before the end of the year
According to the testimony of the latter, it was to identify pensions and restaurants.
The English-called 's tank but the awesome Marcel of Brussels stands out among all the other.
In fact, none of these companies worked, what the accused explained by the fact that they did not receive work.
None of the Czech operators has a dominant position on such a market.
The hopes of Düsseldorfois are based on Frankfurt.
Other admirers including neighbours for a long time, said they were happy with this shortcut simply because it is one of the last and oldest streets of the block.
The Chinese authorities have refused entry on their territory, and has therefore been forced to leave in Bangkok, the police Thaï and immigration officers have insisted that he is back in England.
The difference between these two groups is in fact that the emphasis was placed in a on the victory, while in the other, on failure.
Try not to excite the child before it goes to sleep.
This 'territory twice as big as France', ' is here, is in Quebec.'
Don't ever tell the child that you can listen to him at night to know his secret.
Depending on the capacity (Max. 2 GB), you should not spend more than 1 100 kronor.
Those of Boulogne-sur-Mer have decided to wait for the holding of the meeting on Wednesday at the Ministry for deciding any actions.
The suspect in the double homicide of Ózd, a young man the corner 23-year-old, was remanded in custody, on Sunday.
The detainee, A. A. J. aged 28 years, has been in custody for committing the various crimes and will be judged in the next few hours.
The Court of Appeal for Competition ordered BSkyB to reduce its share of ITV from 17.9% to less than 7.5%.
"Without them, she would probably now a young woman happy, promising, and success."
His message was precisely formulated, it came out of his lips in a persuasive manner.
New investigate the case of the US prosecutors.
The genial thug in the brilliant The Sting, winner of an Oscar for best film in 1973.
Barely the plans had they been made public that the government of the Hessen said any participation of the Hellaba in them.
But Barrick Gold seems not to trust the public opinion and rejected the petitions and letters of support for the authors of Black Canada.
"Then, a gang of young whites would launch oranges and other objects at people sitting on the side" said Mr Franklin.
A way to characterise the emotional media campaign that the Ministry of Transport has the intention of launching on Wednesday.
Sheikh Hasina like Zhaleda Zia, denies the accusations against her.
However, as shown by the example of Mobilking in Poland, invest in a target group unusual can also be a good shot advertising.
"What works with drivers is the system of sugar and the whip.
Among the most affected by the closure, Emily Romaine is at the top with 82 cinemas single rooms lost, followed by the Tuscany (44) and Lombardy (41).
You can listen to the four new versions on the server iHNed.cz.
Monday, the US House of Representatives rejected the draft supports the financial system, which it would have had to spend up to $700 billion (nearly 12 bilions of Kcˇ).
But he said they do not feel good, and refused to go to London.
Public officials of Orange County wanted to build a five-way motorway through the town to replace the Boulevard Kennedy, the main street with two ways for the community.
People of Jersey have to pay more for their milk
The mobile operators is easily understandable, the entry of another operator would mean an increase of competition, would have led to lower prices and thus reducing their benefit.
Elena, Luca and other come together, Marco takes a last speech, explains the plan of attack.
It occupies the same function as your wife or your husband when you have to say something to your mother-in-law.
But precisely at this point intervened regulators, in developed countries, who defended not the interests of the mobile operators, but those of their clients.
"If we wanted to respect the law strictly and formally, the activity of a steward is against the law on the road," said the spokesman for the Ministry of Transport Karel Hanzelka.
On the contrary, the mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely concurrenciez.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risk".
It is annoying to see that the institutions that have had a prudent behavior … must now pay some of the bills institutions that were much less cautious.
Also in terms of price of flights, the trend was on the rise in the first quarter.
Of Kristoffer Klein. Enlarge. Hard landing for international player Marko Marin.
Yes and no.
On demand, the installation CD can be shipped to home or work address.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risks".
Defeat the laws of gravity thanks to a super glue and, in the future, walk on the walls like Spiderman.
Of New Yorkers any have become very familiar to the world of finance in recent weeks.
I already knew thanks to my mangas.
The search for the essence and the magic has been the constant of this work that is now on exhibit at the El Fotómata gallery.
During the investigation, it was revealed that the 23-year-old man owed a lot of money to a man of 53 years.
"However, it has not led to any conclusion on this point.
The talks had turned into a sprint in the last few hours for fear of the fact that would cause another failure on investor sentiment.
Which is shocking is concord almost touching the three mobile operators, which stems from their reactions.
Monica Cruz, who has presented to the shop with a pair of trousers and a shirt — its own collection, and for the dinner was a roll up our sleeves in Little long sexy and black dress, has moved when during the night visit to the opera, accompanied by Goya Toledo, they have shown the Chamber of repetitions of ballet and bearing in mind the good old days, it has taken a bar and it made a gesture of a large is complied.
"Eatonville, first black to integrate fully city, home of childhood of Zora Neale Hurston, this description that it did in 1935, is not so easy to make these days." The city in five lakes, three short of croquet, 300 skins foncées, 300 good swimmers, full of goyaves, two schools and not in prison.
The next morning, we have had the pleasure of seeing Olivier Martínez – another fine man who drives a motorbike - and John Travolta, who arrived at the intercontinental Hotel in Paris, with its into, goats and asked in advance, that there are no smell in his bedroom.
For the moment, Microsoft is more interested in the launch of its own online services to become an alternative to Google.
Despite these changes, the main idea of the programme, which was to obtain finance to buy bad mortgage securities, whose value chuta, because hundreds of thousands of Americans are unable to pay their mortgages, was maintained.
Wednesday 1 October 2008 will noted in the history of Prazˇsky´ Dopravní podnik (the transport agency of Prague) as the date on which passengers in the metro, the trams and buses will have, instead of a ticket on paper, an electronic coupon in their pocket.
On the value of the dependant society, the Hypo Real Estate must proceed with amortization which should have a real effect on the calculation of gains and losses, but which still remains unclear.
It is a central point but also an example of rural culture black sudiste- a few times scorned, other times acclamée- reminiscent of the birth of slavery.
This face through the ages, it was him.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risk".
Two former ministers from two different parties, Pierre Corbeil and Michel Létourneau (former Member of the Party of Quebec of Ungava), have already begun consultations with thirty communities.
According to internal rules of the society, new services are not announced until they can be used. What is certain is that in the coming months and years, they are going to move the world on new points. While some believe that the draft scanning and filing of books and magazines by Google is reaching a dimension so large that the company will soon face the Supreme Court of the United States; others tremble before its Health system, because in it, we can build a comprehensive medical benefit from our results of previous studies, our doctors and our problems.
Indeed, each of them explained the phenomena found at auctions by the pleasure of winning and the show in front of the risk.
Barack Obama's proposals on education is an interesting example.
Even after the accident, the director does not consider their job as a risky job.
It is an essential part of Japanese teenage vocabulary and means "cute".
Debate: Bilingue left in the English language
We have said that this is a distortion benign, that is why there is no treatment, unless it is linked to a distortion of sleep that can be treated (for example, if it is linked to a apnée of sleep or of stress).
The supply of operators is unfortunately miserable and it is limited, in most cases, the radio tubes quickly facts.
At the end of trade, the stock exchange of Prague bascula in the negative
The multinational trade and tourism has also indicated that the actions will not be sold to Thomas Cook.
Instead of a new Pearl Harbour, as the billionaire Warren Buffett, it is more appropriate to speak with a second 11 September.
According to the calculations of scientists, black matters accounts for a fifth of the mass of the universe.
According to the statistics, between 30% and 75% of drivers arrested for having led more than once drunken driving, includes the car.
American legislators effectuèrent a turning point in the talks on the adoption of a rescue plan in the form of financial aid of EUR 700 billion dollars (about 12 billion kroner), given the US financial system.
I have lived in Rome for 25 years, and when I pass by the Rialto, or Quirinal of Via Nazionale, now closed, where I have shared so many emotions, I turn to the other side to avoid seeing the panels blackened by the dust.
Kinga Göncz think there is a good chance that the 12 January, the Hungarian-US visa waiver to enter into force, which is what the foreign minister said in Chicago, before the leaders of the Hungarian community.
The choice is wide.
In 2010, it will be necessary to pay the interests of the whole year, which may double.
The driver of the last to try to avoid it through a sudden move, but he fell short by his right side.
In all cases, progress hinges on the nervous system as we gauge it in rats and Man.
Haider is prepared to govern Austria, to prevent the coalition of red and black.
The Republican senator said that in the proposal, are mentioned the creation of a committee of control of the Treasury and the cap of redundancy payments senior leaders, and that he was personally very attached to these points.
"The principle of the glue can be imagined as a series of tubes prepared as a pile of spaghetti." Explains Zhong Lin Wang of the Georgia Institute of Technology in Atlanta.
Gioacchino Piromalli, the former mediator between the clan and public administrations, and his younger son and lawyer, namesake of the boss, already condemned for criminal association with the mafia, and to pay 10 million euros, were also arrested.
This will allow children to have a more peaceful sleep.
It is not what the American people have mandated, this does not protect the taxpayer dollars - said the Member Republican of California, Darrell Issa.
For some, it is linked to the "safety of work".
A fight taken to extremes: MP3 players against the mobile.
Other operators also refer to the specific nature of the Czech market.
And perhaps we continue to call more expensive than in the rest of Europe.
It is a group of elected Republicans that wrecked the first draft agreement last week.
According to the prime minister, it will be necessary to find "a special solution to the Temple Mount, the sacred and historical sites" located within the old city.
Given the nature of the mobile market in RT, it is clear that the entry of a player would submit further, and especially its services, high demands. "
The publication of "Journal of a poet recently married" concludes the Triennat
Free speech - the Orwellian discourse of Barrick Gold
In a comparison of 12 months, taking into account the domestic sales of processing sectors, the price of the oil processing sector has been rising the most significantly (32.4 percent).
This campaign costing 150 million will appear on television, radio, cinema, on the Internet, but also on leaflets.
This is what has been communicated by the Egyptian state television, the Arab television channel Al Arabija and the Italian media.
You can listen to the four new versions on the server iHNed.cz.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the offer of services. "
Even the new term sought by the Lega to curb immigration and facilitate the return of illegal immigrants, is cited as evidence of climate change in Italy.
The course of the obligations, however, are particularly well.
It is, however, a fact that search terms are not only made, but in justified cases, they are sent to a third party, and in this type of case, by law, nothing protects the personal rights of Internet users.
The majority of invoices was created by István Lados and his accomplice András O˝ri, which according to our information, was involved in drafting the files needed to obtain subsidies.
The chairman of the directorial committee of HRE Mr Funke explained that the group Hypo Real Estate should not have to resort to the financial markets in the mid term.
Two years ago, more candidates among these companies doomed always been to the traditional energy rely on marine energy.
However, I do not think so.
"By their nationality of the European Union, the Roma must be assured of their right to quality education, and be protected from a low-quality education and sectarian said." - Lívia Járóka.
People non-resident, as Rachelle Munson, a lawyer who frequent our church depuis1993, began to come in large numbers, and residents were beginning to reconsider the past.
"Chevron is currently studying the technology on energy océanique- said the spokesman of a parent company the colossus American oil tanker, the business daily Wall Street Journal- and assess the potential to cooperate with us."
Has the opportunity to its tenth anniversary, Google says that we can find at the bottom of the pockets of the people in the same way that the sky above their heads. He knows where they spent their holiday, which experts they should consult and what are their interests.
Forced integration, among other things, put an end to the isolation relatively idyllic of the community.
America pleases less without Paul Newman
The one who wants to hide something, or at least, to try to circumvent the monopoly of Google, can do it (by using, for example, Scroogle, which uses Google's search engine, while intentionally leaving no trace).
Vending machines which will operate from tomorrow, are easy to use.
In the end, read the mangas, that is what I prefer already for years.
To Elena, this is the first time, Luca already the third or fourth time.
Jersey Dairy has announced that it will increase the bulk price of its milk, to five pence per litre, from Monday.
Child when she lived in Coventry, Trerise had committed and bandée before the force of sexual acts, while his mother worked at the pub.
The phenomenon had already manifested itself a few days ago, with the vote in the House of Representatives, contrary to the rescue plan of $700 billion approved by the White House: a significant number of Americans were, and still are, more interested in punishing Wall Street than saving the US economy.
"We believe that it is easier to monitor someone who remains in the United Kingdom because we have devices able to manage any potential risks, much more effective.
Immediately after the takeover of bad debts, the government will be aggressive way to ensure that the amount paid to the leaders should not be exaggerated.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the offer of services. "
On the other hand, no legal prescription prohibits carriers from offering services.
Obama wins the points in the first televised duel
The police is examining the weapon and the circumstances of its use with the help of experts.
Its beautiful daughter out Plymouth.
There is a lot of similarities between their symptoms. The inflammation of the liver and jaunisse are characteristic, but pathogens and diseases caused differ.
"The mayor of Gioia Tauro was prepared to standardise the choice of the Town Hall in favour of the Piromalli clan."
All lies with it, "he says.
Following the reports by Gélineau and Krever, two suppliers were created in Canada: Héma-Quebec to serve Quebec and the Canadian company of blood to supply all other provinces and the two territories.
Internet users mindful of human rights have been able to breathe a sigh of relief in May, when Google, jointly with the organization of electronic legal protection EFF, has proved its right to court to the FBI. According to the ruling, in the future, Google will still not be bound by any of the points of the constitution to disclose information of any kind on the request of the FBI.
Journalists are not hard to see where will the web.
But not to take advantage of the taxpayers'.
She had an exciting life, a pioneer of the rights for women, like Isadora Duncan, Virginia Woolf or Sarah Bernhardt.
The beauty in his blue eyes was long considered his trump card, while some called it his weakness.
Battery life is also crucial
The European tourists kidnapped in the Sahara are visibly free.
I am not at all of the kind of person who loves speak to people, particularly in front of a class of 40 pupils.
But from an office, which must represent the interests of consumers and other also take care to ensure that no one takes its position on the market, such a statement is confusing.
He received a nice ovation. "
This case highlights what the New York Times defines as the "paradox of the North": The northern regions are both those where "more integration and more work," but also "an anti-immigrant the height of the country and the most important support for the Northern League"
In his fight with the second bull, after a fight much better, it was done to make by most of the public.
Ms Mikels, contrary to the bilingual education, has affirmed "we had a great success with a student who had just arrived from Mexico, 12 months after, if you go without his class, you would have had no chance to identify."
We have already led the negotiations about that possibility several times with all the Czech mobile operators.
In any case it is a phenomenon little studied.
But before the course begins, it was for me to appear.
He will meet the Foreign Minister, Condoleezza Rice, to whom he will confer the Commander's Cross with the Star of the Order of merit of the Hungarian Republic, and will have an interview with the foreign policies of the presidential candidates, Democrat Barack Obama and Republican John McCain.
And thus, it is the government of each state that all expect the speeches, plans to rescue and recovery, the new rules, and especially the affection of appropriations: When one is going through a difficult period, there is that the Member with the economic resources, the mass of financial resources able to try to put things in place.
The bond market has risen sharply.
"We have not escort. We object from the beginning.
The Police accuses the right-wing extremists had desecrated an Austrian Muslim cemetery, at the end of the victory of political parties of the extreme right wing the general election of the country.
There are not only 1,000 but 1001 ways to forget the chaos and the frenzy of daily life.
Finally, Günther Merl, chairman of the directorial committee of the Hellaba, voted against any business strategy involving a merger with his bank.
Remember that in the first match of the series on Friday, the Impact had suffered a defeat of 2-1 at Starfire Complex, in Tukwila, in a suburb of Seattle.
"It would have been given to the clan -écrivent the juges- to enter officially in the halls facilitating the possibilities, already considerable, control and orientement of the public administration"
"People were always happy to see Zora" he said.
The material, invented by the team of researchers, is a development of a special structure of carbon, called nano tubes of carbon.
According to the Czech press, the stock exchange of Vienna, the transatlantic exchange, the Nasdaq Stock Exchange of New York, the stock exchange in London and Deutsche Börse have all made offers to date.
The CˇTÚ (The Czech Office of telecommunications), which pointed out that the price of an SMS here was higher than in the rest of the Union, has confirmed the fact.
This is what we think is the most contributions from the point of view of customers.
Five hundred American journalists have been arrested by the Pew Research Center about the status of their profession and mental control for the future.
Those who will begin to use the shop online can forget once and for all the counters in the underground stations, where they would stand impatiently in long lines in order to obtain tickets on paper.
Cooperation in question, is a permit discussed by the Committee for energy, needed to give rise to a marine energy in Alaska.
The study - The US journal of Science published the discoveries of some researchers from the University of Dayton, of Akron, the Georgia Institute of Technology and the Air Force Research Laboratory.
Bills set deliberately
Go in circle, on three large screens, clichés spectacular hydroelectric generation, mining, Quebec seen by "Google Maps", maps, etc.
What we call as "afraid" is therefore the mental state in which we find ourselves when the activity of the localised defence system in the brain (or its aftermath, as the reactions of the body) absorbs of memory live.
On the contrary, he promised to run in Berlin.
For travellers, it is advisable to be vaccinated against the virus A and B. It is no vaccine against the C.
On both sides, there were, of course, those who have expressed their doubts about the plan.
Tecnologie to point.
The fact is that dividends have been cut.
The first $350 billion, as was the wish of President George Bush, must be available as soon as possible.
Today, the systems such as those in Portugal, or some in Scotland, are small size, and do not seem to create major problem in the ecosystem.
The Guilvinec, the 'crisis' committee should decide on Tuesday of follow-up to the movement and its participation in lentrevue at the Ministry of Agriculture and Fisheries in Paris.
For now, however, it is impossible to say with certainty when the two chambers of the US Congress will come to a vote, or if the negotiations will not be blocked, at the last moment by some unforseen problem.
Goodbye old cinema Paradiso, cities éliment historical rooms.
Impressive.
The magic wand consists in the fact that the company made before the operator is a customer classic company, which commands a large quantity of SIM cards.
Open Office is made up of five main: Writer modules for video writing equivalent of Word; Calc, is the Road calculation which aims to replace spreadsheet; Impress, for the rival of PowerPoint presentations; Dbase, such as the famous Access, is the programme which allows us to work on the databases; finally Drwa is the module graph.
"Sangre de Mayo," the dared say of Garci
None of the Czech operators has a dominant position on such a market.
The data of victims on the work seem to point out a small positive trend, but this does not mean that the number of dead white is impressive "said later the President of the Anmil Pietro Mercandelli.
"Everything was perfect.
In the manufacture of metallurgical products, we have seen an increase in the price of 13.2 percent, while in the important area of food production, drinks and tobacco, prices rose 11 percent.
The implementation has missed.
"Paul Gadd was not present when".
Nancy Pelosi, chairman of the House of Representatives, said Sunday that there are serious hopes that the House vote on the bill as early as Monday.
According to the latest survey of Sunia, the union of tenants, rent a room simple can cost a student, up to 900 euro in Milan, 700 in Florence, 650 in Naples, 600 in Rome.
Prospective "the global equity, interest rates and exchange markets, has become uncertain" wrote analysts at Deutsche Bank in a letter to investors. "
Already on Saturday afternoon, the fans are hailed themselves, the blue sky above the fray and the provisional league tables on the giant screen that showed their club as the first of the class.
The police began their chase until the vehicle stopped two miles up the road, where the two occupants got down to flee into a forested area.
Limitation of golden parachutes
The film a period of more than two and a half hours, "Sangre de Mayo" will make its way out to cinemas on Friday, which will become a TV series for Telemadrid of more than four hours.
"However, once I have the impression that this is a risky job, I will remove it.
In this case, it is still of someone who speaks with the heart and not with the brain.
The street is in the East Village and driving north of First Street- not to be confused with Second Street- between Bowery and Second America.
It was Buddhist and végétarienne and plaida for the abolition of a corset that prevented the free movement of women.
Not surprisingly, the Republican and Democratic campaign headquarters have declared their own victory in the televised duel which would have been followed by a third of American families.
It comes after 14 months of a crisis triggered by the bursting of the housing bubble, which has led to the collapse of sub-prime mortgages before spreading to other more widespread forms of credit securities (PCAA) and lead to a freezing of liquidity and to an exodus of banks and financial institutions.
"A woman is dead."
Admit some have not even voted: "What good, because they will do what they want my voice," said a young.
"It is much more important than the congressmans agree, as early as this week, they support the plan and they will devote as soon as possible.
In most cases, this is the potential power represented by the company that can generate fear, – not to be mistaken for compunction; fear of punishment, the desire for freedom or the possibly of revolt against the power that can generate a counter-reaction in Internet users.
The 500 reporters who were interviewed admitted to resorting to technology hoping that it would "do something good" for their journalism.
CSU: Thanks for a period of transition
The mobile market in the Czech Republic is relatively advanced, our operators proposing virtually the same services that their partners in western Europe.
The Nobel Prize for the economy has been attributed to the American Paul Krugman for his research on the models of trade and the location of business.
These devices have dedicated music player buttons, and consequently have ease of use closer to that of a regular MP3 player.
The Prime Minister said that the Government of Quebec would be very attentive to them and that the project would benefit them, particularly young people.
Although the President can veto this decision, Congress has the right to put it in a minority.
Investment in early education of Roma children means a strengthening of the economy of the Member States of the European Union.
Researchers in neurology and economy of the University of New York have managed to update the neurological basis of this behaviour and economic known and apparently irrational.
One hand, the conscience of the objective need of authoritarian leadership, the search for a person who will take control of the situation.
For 40 years, sociologists announced that they have been misled about the pace, but secularization, the results of education and the establishment of North German and in the region of Bavaria, could not remain without consequences on the loyalty of voters CSU.
The 19 participants of the excursion in the desert should already be on the way to Cairo.
"Everything depends on whether the coach has in its approval, permission to propose standing places.
And I believe that we can always dreamed of becoming the host city for the 2016 Olympic Games..
At the same time, in Europe, we had further proof of the global nature of the crisis.
On trade terms, the stock exchange of Prague fell
Embraer maintains its forecasts for delivery in 2008
The latest James Bond, the English Daniel Craig, noted that no James Bond died before him.
The shares of Goldman Sachs Bank showed a drop of almost 10%.
In Quebec, the committee Gélineau has fulfilled this mandate.
Negotiations to ransom are already underway.
"Mercandelli then denounced" the gradual deterioration of the conditions of safeguarding of compensation for the victims of work "and the" drift of assistance to which the system is moving in recent years ".
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy only a telephone.
"I feel responsible for his death."
I now come to the second new feature, which provides a fracture.
According to the calculations of scientists, black matters accounts for a fifth of the mass of the universe.
The author of "The city and the dogs' was the most waited for man at the third edition of the festival and has fulfilled his contract.
His fans saw him again in 1994 in The Hudsucker Proxy of the Coen brothers.
The biological clock does not scare me.
The journey costs 75 euros, including the welcome pot of Kaiser beer brewed according to the law of Bavarian purity, insurance and a responsible for the group speaking German - Marco has taken a language courses in Frankfurt.
AAC (the format used by Apple and its iPods), meanwhile, is less current.
They are several waiting in the hangar at the airport near the red carpet and a military row of 27 marine soldiers.
The interests of the loan will be paid by all companies that collect the money of savers, including 59 societies of the building.
In the end, read the mangas, that is what I prefer already for years.
How can I get my toddler to drink more water?
How can I "time-stamp" my data without publishing it?
How do I make my dog forget a command?
What's the correct way to store fats?
How can I build a wall mounted adjustable height desk?
What is the best oil to use when cooking in a wok?
How can I figure out why my washing machine is tripping the GFCI receptacle?
What should I look for in a running shoe?
Should I cash out my IRA to pay my student loans?
Do I need a transit visa at Amsterdam to stay in airport?
How can I remove paint from slotted screw heads?
Does a UK Citizen with a foreign passport need a Visa to enter the UK?
How can I locate and repair a break in a circuit?
How can I get my dog get used to a new small environment?
What is the best way to fix this garage floor?
What does it mean by a "research university"?
How important is a catchy first paragraph?
How can I remove a portion of a hardwood floor board?
How to strengthen calf muscles?
How to cite a letter in an anthology?
What's the best way to store unused sushi rice?
What is a good substitute for ground veal?
What does the origami represent in Blade Runner?
How to create a workout plan?
Is there a bus from Tbilisi, Georgia to Thessaloniki, Greece?
How do I motivate my colleagues?
OK we are all adults here, so really, how on earth should I live without bidet?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How does velveting work?
How do I recognize if a dish cannot be cooked in a gas oven?
What is the most important survival tool I should have when in the wilderness?
What is the process for PhD applications and contacting professors in France?
How can I replace a recessed light with a ceiling fan?
How can I explain to my boss that I am not able to complete a task?
What is the best way to store homemade sauces?
Do I need a transit visa at Amsterdam to stay in airport?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
Can I do anything to make my gas oven better?
How should I prepare a sub-floor for porcelain tile?
Does one need to fill in a form for a Visa On Arrival?
How do I install a bathroom exhaust system?
What does "To book in house" mean?
How can I stop sweaty hands?
How to build disassemblable structure?
Do I need to write a bibliography?
How to get rid of this shed?
How to I make my dog understand that I want him to go to a certain spot?
Is it possible to replace a ceiling fan speed controller with a switch?
How long can I keep a leg of ham in the fridge?
What is the correct way to read a gas meter?
How can I put my resume online when I already have a job?
How do I fix a door frame that my dog chewed?
How much copying is okay?
Do I need a visa to transit India?
How can I prevent my ferrets from chewing on wires?
How can I replace my light fixture with a ceiling fan?
Do I need a transit visa for layover in Italy?
How do I connect the wires to this USB receptacle?
What type of faucet is this?
What is the difference between a mode and a scale?
What does the conversation mean?
How do I maintain a good relationship with an employer after resigning?
How can I tell if my cat is pregnant?
Do I need a transit visa for a stop in London?
Where could water be coming from inside the joint between bathtub and wall tiles?
What are the pros and cons of storing bread in various locations?
How to get rid of weevils?
How long should it take to get a Russian passport?
How do I install this sump basin?
What visa do I need to visit my uncle in the UK?
How do I clean a pasta maker?
Can I use my dehydrator to raise bread?
What is the difference between a filler word and a discourse marker?
How do I make my dog forget a command?
Where can I find the dividend history for a stock?
How can I add tile to my fireplace?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
Do I need an airport transit visa through Switzerland if I have a Schengen visa?
What is the difference between a prawn and a shrimp?
Is it safe to travel to Kiev at the moment?
How can I get my dog get used to a new small environment?
What is this Chord Notation?
What's the meaning of "first-page-first order"?
Drinking how much water is considered too much water?
How do I connect a ceiling fan without a light kit?
How to teach a toddler how to treat a book?
How can I get my dog to stop being so sensitive to noise?
How should I connect to a short ground wire in a metal box?
Do I need a UK or Ireland transit visa when flying from the US to a Schengen country?
Do I need a transit visa in Paris and Panama?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
How can I replace a single switch with two switches?
How does the number of eggs affect a cookie recipe?
Do I need a transit visa for layover in Luanda?
What is the difference between chicken cubes and ground chicken?
How do I prevent an egg cracking while hard boiling it?
How do I get rid of this mould?
How do I prepare this porous interior wall for paint?
What does "respectively" mean in the Tenth Amendment?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
How do I wire a bath fan?
Why is there no hot water in the kitchen?
How can I get rid of mosquitoes?
Do I need a UK transit visa when travelling in the grace period of a J1 visa?
What are the pros and cons of feeding on demand?
How can I stop my dog from peeing on our neighbor's door?
How to address a person in a letter?
What is the difference between a bond and a debenture?
How do I fill a gap between my hearth and the hardwood frame around it?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
How do I wire a switch when the wire colors do not match?
How do I replace a bathtub drain trip lever?
How can I stop my pie from burning?
What is the best way to filter the Turkish coffee?
How do I know when it's time to change a tube on my amplifier?
What is the difference between a diphthong and a glide?
Is it appropriate for a TA to say "My Students"?
What are the pros and cons of being co-supervised?
Do I need a transit Visa when changing terminals in LHR(UK)?
Visiting Korea as an Indonesian citizen with a US student visa: Do I need a visa for Korea?
Can I pay a collection agency in a way that will improve my credit score?
What is the difference between a copula and a transitive verb?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
How can I paint a concrete floor?
Which survey software to use?
I want to make my own cheese. How do I get started?
Do I need a transit visa in Paris and Panama?
What is type of screw is this?
How do I track 401k rollovers in Quicken?
What are the pros and cons of feeding on demand?
How can I stop my pie from burning?
What kind of trade is this?
Is it normal for a cat to eat moths?
What is the origin of the black/devil riders?
Should I resubmit a rejected paper to the same journal?
What should I ask as an applicant in a job interview?
How do I remove mildew from a tent?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
How can I make an exterior door?
Should I remind recruiters about my job application status?
How can I help a dog to lose weight?
Can I travel to Finland with a multiple entry visa issued for Italy?
What is the difference between a complication/twist and a situation?
UK income tax & charitable donations: How much is income tax reduced by donations?
How can I replace the seal on the bottom of my shower door?
Do I need a transit visa?
How can I make an exterior door?
Semantic logic of the word "both" in English - different from "and"?
What kind of glass is this?
Will I Need a Transit visa or ESTA for the US as a Canadian?
Do I need a UK airside transit visa, if I already have a UK visitor visa?
How much thinset is enough?
What should I look for in a rope for climbing?
How long should you keep Salami for?
Can I apply for US visa while I am a visitor in Canada?
Should I look for a new job?
What are the pros and cons of feeding on demand?
How does leverage work?
Is it safe to replace a switch with a dimmer on halogen spots?
How can I determine why my lights are flickering?
Transit Visa in the UK?
How can I remove paint from a wood deck so I can stain it?
Do I need to install a sump pump?
Layover at Narita, Japan. Do I need a transit visa?
How can I remove a jammed, broken key from a lock?
What should I look for in electronic measurement of body composition?
How long can formula be stored in fridge and freezer?
How do my wife and I stop our son from learning to swear from us?
What is the difference between a conservatory and an orangery?
How to deal with dreaded tasks?
What are the pros and cons of feeding on demand?
How do I teach my toddler not to stuff her cheeks with food?
How can I connect additional wires to a receptacle?
How can I convince my boss I am the right person to lead a future team?
Do I have to validate train tickets in the UK?
Do I need to ground my pool?
How do I install a ceiling fan remote?
How can I move a drain line?
Do you have to have a thermostat for an electrical baseboard heater?
How can I connect my 30 amp electric dryer to a 50 amp plug?
What visas do I need for traveling to South East Asia if I'm a Canadian Citizen?
How can I replace the bulb in this ceiling fan?
How do I fix a vinyl covering that is coming away from the outside deck support beam?
What is the value to a student of a professor offering to supervise their PhD?
How long does cooked pasta last in the fridge?
What are the small white ants in my apartment and how do I get rid of them?
Will getting a second credit card help my credit rating?
As a student, how should I ask a professor for an opportunity to do research with them?
How long should you keep Salami for?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
What are the different types of drywall anchors, and what are the advantages of each?
How can I tell if my microphone is broken?
How can I reduce the noise from a bathroom fan?
Difference between an 'Abstract' and an 'Introduction' in a feature article?
How do you open a coconut?
What are the pros and cons of doubling on two brass instruments?
How can I store chopped onions in the fridge without the smell?
Flying from California to Texas: do I need ESTA?
How can I stop my pie from burning?
Should I replace or patch a plaster ceiling?
What are the principles of improvisation in Indian music?
How does leverage work?
What should I do if a professor says she doesn't understand my questions in office hours?
What Steps Should I Take to Troubleshoot My Gas Oven?
What are my lighting options for a pole-barn garage?
What can I do to make my writing less choppy?
Can I travel within the US with an expired visa?
How should I translate this?
How do I wire a ceiling fan?
How do I stop my dog from barking at people through the fence?
How hard is it for a graduate from Canada to find an employment in the US?
How should I store steaks in the freezer?
Do I tell recruiter whose offer I will decline, the details of the offer that I have accepted?
What went wrong with my brownies?
How does leverage work?
How to make good coffee in a Moka pot?
What are some materials that I can use to build a chalkboard?
Travelling to Romania on a short stay Schengen visa issued by France?
What is the motivation for a graduate student to help to develop a professor's MOOC?
Should I be flexible or decisive if asked when I'm available for an interview?
Is it more difficult to score a Tenure Track position in the US when applying from outside?
Is it advisable to apply to more than one PhD program?
How to decide if an advisor should be considered as a co-author of a paper or not?
What are the pros and cons of using a nanny-cam?
What is the professional way to deal with my manager's boss?
Do I need to apply for a visa to enter to South Korea if I already got Aus visa?
What are the pros and cons of LED lighting for home use?
What is the best way to treat a jammed finger?
Do I require a transit visa for Cuba?
How do I highlight my portfolio when applying to jobs that just ask for cover letter and CV?
What was the average size of French families during the Middle Ages?
What is the best way to introduce cats to newborns?
What should I look for in a good metronome?
What is the best way to clean a grater?
How can I train my dog to behave for grooming?
How is income earned on a J1 student visa taxed?
How do we help our toddler to sleep through the night?
What should I consider before wearing Google Glass to a job interview when I do development for them?
How can I find out my credit-score?
How do I raise my box bed?
What should I look for in a new kitchen knife set?
What is the best way to store chopped vegetables?
How to check the status of an application for a UK work visa for an Indian?
What does overhead rate mean?
Put onto a project I don't want to do. How can I tell my boss?
Why does my cat's sneeze contain blood?
How do you teach a toddler not to share?
Do I need a UK or Ireland transit visa when flying from the US to a Schengen country?
Is there a name for the inverse of the impostor syndrome?
What kind of lightbulb is this?
How can I learn how to focus better?
How can I fix a leaking sprinkler valve?
What could be wrong with my dryer timer?
Do I need a transit visa?
What's the difference between the Lao vowel letters "ໄ" and "ໃ"?
Moved to a new country and not enjoying the new job, should I look for a new one?
How to get rid of cellulite?
What is the best way to store carrots?
Should I apply for PhD program this year after one semester of research experience, or wait another year?
What is the best way to store energy?
What do I need to do to get a master's degree in neuroscience?
What could be causing my AFCI to trip?
Is it okay to give a gift to my research mentor who happens to be the dean?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
How can I find out how much a dealer would really pay for my car?
Why was the Avengers movie called something different in the UK?
Is it normal for a kitten to have a big belly?
Do I need a transit visa for Germany on the way to Canada?
How can I stop my pie from burning?
What happened at the end of Her?
What is the best way to cite an anonymous writer?
What's the best way to avoid slipping on ice?
How can I remove small paint specks from a wooden floor?
How to politely tell my boss that I want to take on a different role?
What should I do if I feel the pilot is guiding the flight in the wrong direction?
I found out that I have plagiarism in my published journal papers, what should I do now?
Is it a bad idea to attend an interview for a job you don't plan to take?
How do you keep a toddler safe around water?
Why is interest on MMA lower in the US than in Europe?
How do I reheat a casserole in the microwave?
Do I need a transit visa for a technical stop in Australia?
What is the difference between a school and a department?
What is the difference between customs and immigration?
What are the pros and cons of eating 1-3 grapefruits every day?
What is a timeshare?
How do I stop toothpaste from piling up on the cover?
What's the best way to replace this sink supply line?
As a student, how should I ask a professor for an opportunity to do research with them?
What is the best temperature to store honey at?
What kind of water filter do I need?
How can I install a new bathroom GFCI receptacle?
Calculate savings from/cost-effectiveness of installing a tankless hot water heater?
What could be wrong with my A/C unit?
Do i need a transit visa for Paris if i have a Schengen visa issued by Portugal?
Can a new company see how much you're being paid?
What are the pros and cons of using a nanny-cam?
What is the significance of the abstract painting?
Flying USA to UK via Canada with Spanish passport. Do I need to apply for a visa?
What is the rationale behind the choice of animation style for The Clone Wars series (2008-2014)?
How do I wire a ceiling fan with a light kit?
Should I tell my boss I have a full time job offer?
What is a good pine nut substitute for pesto?
How can I repair my floors' finish?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
What could be wrong with my A/C unit?
How should I translate this?
How much do I need to sleep?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
Is it appropriate to ask a professor via e-mail for a letter of recommendation?
What could be causing water to back up into my bathroom basin?
Can I use Romex in an unfinished basement or attic?
Why is my bread so dense and moist?
Canadian income tax & charitable donations: How much is income tax reduced by donations?
Where can I find a complete list of Freddie Green chords?
What is the best way to cite an anonymous writer?
What's the difference between a Flanger and a Phaser?
How long should it take concrete to fully cure?
My boss wants to buy me a gift. How do I account for taxes for this?
When is MSG suitable and when is it not?
How do I teach my toddler not to stuff her cheeks with food?
How long will cold brew keep?
What does "The Middle" refer to in the TV show "The Middle"?
What is the difference between a filler word and a discourse marker?
Does my story beginning hook the reader? (dialogue + narration)?
How can I stop my pie from burning?
How do I install a garden door that's thicker than the wall?
How can I remove this screw?
How to remove mold from Styrofoam ceiling tiles?
A colleague owes me money. How do I / should I claim it back?
Is it appropriate to ask a professor via e-mail for a letter of recommendation?
What are some good alternative shoes for strength training?
Should I appear in a test, if I have not completely prepared for it?
How to go from Gilimanuk to Denpasar?
Which ferry from China to South Korea is the cheapest?
How do I patch a large hole in plaster and lath?
How can I smooth out a poor drywall repair?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
What is the difference between splicing and superimposition?
What should I look for in a running shoe?
How do I seal an electrical box for a ceiling fan?
How can I remove a coffee stain from carpet?
Put onto a project I don't want to do. How can I tell my boss?
What would be a good substitute for Rice Wine?
How high should I make my yurt platform?
How do I apply ear medicine to my dog's ears?
Do I need a visa to transit in the Schengen area?
For publications, what do I do when my first name is abbreviated?
What trigger do you use to get up early in the morning?
Can I travel to the UK if my Schengen visa expired?
What could be causing GFCI breakers and receptacles to trip?
How can I repair a ground-fault?
How do I wire 2 switches to control a ceiling light?
How long will uncooked chicken keep in the fridge?
How can I get my colleague to stop calling me over to his desk when he wants my help?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
Which UK tourist visa should I apply for?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
When (if ever) in the interview process is it appropriate to recommend a colleague?
What is the difference between "mince" and "dice"?
How should I level the ground for my above ground pool?
How do I effectively remove dog hair from carpets?
What kind of valve is this and how do I disconnect it?
What is the difference between a copula and a transitive verb?
What is the best way to clean a grater?
What is "mud-jacked", and why is it not done in the UK?
How to remove a ticks on my dog?
Is it possible for me to take a visa to Vienna and travel to Prague?
Why does cheese sometimes slide off my pizza and how can I prevent it?
Do I need both a UK visa and a Schengen visa?
Protein: How much is too much?
Can I run a copper pipe for water in an exterior wall without it freezing in the winter?
How to prevent my dog from barking constantly when I am not at home?
Do I need a UK transit visa for flying to the Canary Islands?
How to deal with problems associated with dyslexia?
What should I do if I have an idea but can't work on it immediately?
How do I prepare this porous interior wall for paint?
Bag technique for washing clothes while backpacking?
What happened at the end of The Grey?
How should I store beansprouts?
What type of connector is this and how do I remove it?
How can I connect a receptacle to a two wire extension cord?
How do I remove paint from pipes?
What is Turkey Bacon?
How to get rid of this shed?
What are the pros and cons of a cultured marble tub?
How much is too much damage?
Is Greek driver's license valid in the US?
What is the best way to filter the Turkish coffee?
How to make a roux?
What kind of pie is this?
Should I have separate business and personal accounts for my start up?
When is it appropriate to work during a meeting?
How should I build a low profile stud wall in a basement?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
What's the best way to store unused sushi rice?
How can I help my dog's furuncles?
Is there a way to find out if I need a transit visa for Canada?
What are the pros and cons of using a nanny-cam?
What is the easiest way to open a foreign Bank Account?
How do I replace a bathtub drain trip lever?
Do I need to explain to my manager how I got a key to the business park?
What is a chairleg camstud?
Do I need an airport transit visa for layover in Germany?
Do I really need to file an income tax return?
Do I need a transit visa for a layover in Turkey?
Do I need a visa to visit Belarus if I have a Russian visa?
What is a "wet edge" and how do I maintain one?
Can I run water lines through the attic?
During my re-interview, should I tell my supervisor and their boss that I am looking for another job?
How long can you store the bones of a chicken in the refrigerator?
Do I need a visa to Transit US?
What exercises can I do to improve my timing?
How can I make these bath valves easier to use?
What is the first things to do when you start a new job?
How do I prepare this exterior concrete wall for paint?
What are the objective differences between the guitar and the piano?
How long should you keep Salami for?
What are the Pros and Cons of Trekking Solo?
How do I clean teak oil off of a paint brush?
Do I need a transit visa at Amsterdam to stay in airport?
How do I know if food left at room temperature is still safe to eat?
What is the cheapest way to send books from USA to France?
Is it possible to gut-load a mouse?
How do I remove a thick layer of paint from tiles?
How can I add tile to my fireplace?
How do I install this flush-mount ceiling light?
What is the current meaning of "Israel"?
How can I remove paint from a deck?
How can I improve air flow in my basement?
What does the term "match the market" mean?
How can I test a rabbit's vision?
What is this Chord Notation?
Do I need a transit visa for a layover in Turkey?
What are some stretching exercises for golf?
How do I remove paint from pipes?
What's the difference between a Flanger and a Phaser?
What techniques can I use to remember to do simple things that are context sensitive?
What is the difference between a filler word and a discourse marker?
What is the difference between Melange and Cappuccino?
What are the pros and cons of being co-supervised?
How can I move a drain line?
How can I thoroughly blackout a bedroom window on a budget?
Do I need a transit visa if I have 9 hours of layover at Delhi airport?
What is this language?
Can I continue to travel within the US on an expired visa?
Do i need a transit visa for heathrow airport?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
What are the pros and cons of being co-supervised?
What is good workout attire for weight lifting?
How to determine if a faucet is plastic or metal?
How do I leave my job when I work for a recruiter?
Do I need to apply for a visa to enter to South Korea if I already got Aus visa?
Should I replace or patch a plaster ceiling?
What are the pros and cons of being co-supervised?
Do I need a Japan visa?
What are the pros and cons of LED lighting for home use?
I want to run but have a bad knee. How should I deal with it?
What is the most effective way to get rid of silverfish?
How can I move a drain line?
Highest runs that a batsman can score in an over?
How to prepare for a race?
What is the difference between a copula and a transitive verb?
Do words like "start", "realize", and "decide" add ambiguity to actions?
What is the sound law to describe the etymology of “helix” and “vulva”?
Besides water quality, what should I consider before adding more tropical fish?
How to relax my wrists?
How can I know if my cat is in pain?
What could cause my in-wall air conditioner to blow 3 power boards?
What is the best way to clean a grater?
What options are there for consolidating a large amount of private student loan debt?
What does "basis points" mean in this context?
What can I realistically do to raise my credit score?
Do I have to pay interest to increase my credit score?
How do I install a water line for a refrigerator in a galley kitchen?
What does "basis points" mean in this context?
Will I need a transit visa for US as a Canadian Student Visa holder?
How can I remove paint from slotted screw heads?
How much meat is enough for my dog?
What's the easiest way to find a vacation rental?
What are these holes in my concrete wall and how can I mount things to them?
What is the meaning of the apearance of dogs in the good the bad the ugly?
Do I need a visa to enter the US as a UK citizen in transit?
What could be causing water to back up into my bathroom basin?
How can I thaw a frozen exterior drain quickly?
How do I tell my boss I am moving to a different organization?
What are the differences between a "traditional" IRA and a Roth IRA?
How can I get my thermostat C wire connected?
How to deal with the toddler when me and my partner are not on the same page?
Where can I go take a nap during the day?
How do I write a letter to a publisher?
Why does my cat lick the fur off her lower belly?
How do I wire a replacement ceiling fan?
Where could the water leaching from the base of the drywall be coming from?
Is it possible to overmarinade a steak?
How can I determine how much to talk about my personal life with clients?
How to ask management for more staff?
What is the best way to start learning a new course?
How can I fix low water pressure in one shower?
Put onto a project I don't want to do. How can I tell my boss?
How do I repair a flaking finish on my wood windows?
How can I get rid of my I-94?
What's a good book for learning how to play the piano?
Why isn't my mini fridge getting cold?
How to get rid of this shed?
What is the difference between department and faculty?
Is there a huge difference between 1.6amp and 3amp power usage?
Need to travel Tokyo in layover. Do I need transit visa?
Can I go to visit Schengen countries with visa type D-mult?
Is it possible to breed crickets?
What could cause ceiling fan lights to flicker on with power and then go out immediately?
What is the meaning of the butterfly?
My wife is pregnant and I don't want to be part of it, what I should do?
How should I make a budget?
What is the best way to introduce cats to newborns?
What can I do to stop my child from being over-sensitive?
What is the difference between a biscuit and a roll?
Can I use a wall tile on the floor?
How long can I store cooked rice in the refrigerator?
What is the meaning of the line at the end of Chinatown?
What can I do about a Rough opening that is REALLY out of square?
What's the best way to reheat frozen boiled potatoes?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
What is the purpose of the crown in the middle of a router mounting plate?
How can I help my dog's furuncles?
What is the best way to travel from IST to Istanbul?
How do I clean a Hammerite paint brush?
What is the difference between SCI and SCIE?
How to deal with dreaded tasks?
How do we get an eight month old back to sleeping in his crib?
Is there a difference between lifting for look/size/strength?
What are the principles of improvisation in jazz music?
How do I tell a colleague that I don't want to add him to Facebook?
What are the arguments for and against over-practicing?
Is it possible to get a Canadian visa without concrete plans?
How can I improve my auto insurance score?
How should I translate this?
Lose weight or Gain Muscle?
How to ask for an internal transfer?
At what age should a child be able to dress herself?
What are the pros and cons of using a nanny-cam?
Can I travel within the US with an expired visa?
What is the significance of the three Beggars?
How can I make sure to get up early in the morning and study?
What should I look for in a new car (automobile)?
How do I repair water-damaged hardwood floors?
Can I replace broken clips in a recessed light fixture?
How to truss a chicken?
What is the best way to clean a grater?
Why is there no water in the kitchen?
Do I need a transit visa for a technical stop in Australia?
How much outlining should I use in writing my book?
What are these bugs and how do I get rid of them?
Do I need a transit visa in Dubai?
How do I get the butter out of my chocolate fondue?
What should I do in a information call from the company of my interest?
How do I paint art onto a wall?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
How do I remove adhesive from outdoor concrete deck that is textured?
What are the pros and cons of using a nanny-cam?
Which rep range contributes to the most hypertrophy of calves?
Is there a difference between seasoning and flavouring?
How can I install an exterior electrical box flush in stucco?
What is the difference between a riff and a lick?
What's the difference between overtones and harmonics?
What should I look for in a new car (automobile)?
Is there a difference between 'Saucisson Sec' and 'Salami'?
Is it safe to eat freshwater fish raw?
What's the best way to replace this sink supply line?
How do I reconnect a ceiling fan light chain?
What is the best way to store oars?
How do you teach a toddler not to share?
How to properly insulate a garage?
Can I use metal studs for framing a shed?
How can I repair my floors' finish?
How do I clean a pasta maker?
Can anyone tell me what movie is this?
How to buy train tickets in Indonesia?
How should I respond to an inappropriate question in a job interview?
Moving - when should I start looking for a new job?
What is the difference between customs and immigration?
Do I need a visa to transit in LHR?
What is the proper way to store steak at home?
How do I add a light to my existing ceiling fan?
What is the best way to introduce cats to newborns?
What is a good length for the statement of purpose in a U.S. PhD application?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
How do I rebuild a large fence gate?
Why isn't my garage door opener button working on new installation?
How do I replace a drain stack?
What are the pros and cons of LED lighting for home use?
What type of snake is this?
How long does it take for a US citizen to get a visa to travel to Israel?
Is it unsafe to travel to Greece at this time?
Do I need a transit visa going through the US?
Can you claim child care expenses on your tax return in the UK?
How do I remove multiple layers of paint from wooden entrance ledge?
How can I clean powder of dry paint on carpet?
What is the significance of the appearance of the wolf?
What is the cheapest way to get from Eindhoven to Amsterdam?
Do I need a transit visa through Italy from Romania to Algeria?
How do I prepare an interior cement floor for painting?
How to motivate students to complete work that I cannot frequently check?
What's the best way to keep my garage from freezing?
Is there a remote switch I can use to replace a switch located in a wall being removed?
How can I build a wall mounted adjustable height desk?
How do I let my old manager know I don't want to return to his team?
What are the types of blood pressure measuring devices available? What are their pros and cons?
Where and how did the concept of "incorporation" originate?
If I have Schengen visa, can I enter Schengen area from different country?
How can I connect additional wires to a receptacle?
how do I tell my boss I'd like to work from home on a regular basis?
What is the origin of Jataka tales?
Do I need a visa to enter the US as a UK citizen in transit?
Do I need a transit visa for a stop in London?
Why and how did sherlock fake his death?
What do I need to work and travel in the US for 10 months as a Dutch citizen?
How do I remove the front panel of my refrigerator to replace the water line?
Does the spouse of British national with UK permanent residence need a Schengen visa to travel to France?
How do I remove the cover from my light fixture?
How does leverage work?
What should I look for in a running shoe?
What could be causing my bathroom drains to back up?
How long can olives be left out of the refrigerator?
How can I improve my writing fluency in English?
What is the cheapest way to send books from USA to France?
What is the best way to store ground coffee?
How do I remove multiple layers of paint from wooden entrance ledge?
How do I replace the front door on a stucco house?
Do I need a Turkey transit visa for a layover?
What Kind of Pan is This?
How do you ween a toddler off of breastfeeding?
What is the difference between "anaphora" and "deixis"?
How should I apply for a Schengen visa from the UK?
What is the cheapest way to go from Lyon (France) to Milan (Italy)?
How can I move a drain line?
What is the difference between chicken cubes and ground chicken?
How do I remove a stubborn element from a water heater?
How can I check my credit score?
Do I need a transit visa through Zurich with a Canadian visa?
How do I prepare a hole for concrete?
How can I get my dog get used to a new small environment?
What is the difference between a mode and a scale?
How can I get my toddler to drink more water?
Do I need a transit visa in Paris and Panama?
Can anyone tell me what kind of squash this is?
How do I replace a GFCI receptacle in my bathroom?
What is the proper term for the "year 0"?
What is the best way to clean a grater?
How do I teach my child to express his frustration?
What are the pros and cons of LED lighting for home use?
Is it normal to be so frustrated in one month of work and is that a sign to quit?
Is it safe to leave cooked poultry at room temperature overnight?
How can I get my dog to eat vitamins when she doesn't want to?
What does "years of professional experience" entail or refer to?
Do I need a visa to Transit US?
Do I need a transit visa through London from India to Toronto?
Do I need a transit visa for Germany on the way to Canada?
Where should I install a wall heater?
What's the best way to attach a hook to the back of my metal gutters?
How can I remove a lockset latch assembly that's stuck latched?
What variety of coffee berries are good for jam?
How can I develop my ideas?
What should I look for in electronic measurement of body composition?
What is the most effective plan to get abs?
Do I need to get a visa for Turkey?
What to do with a new mathematics conjecture?
How do I do my daughter's hair?
What does it mean to "boost your metabolism"?
What's the best way to store rice long-term?
How to make chapattis round and of same thickness?
How should you deal with a teacher who is difficult to understand?
Can I apply for a post-doc in global studies in North America?
What is the best way to fix a crack in an acrylic bathtub?
Do I need a transit visa in Zurich on the way to India?
Do I need to keep paper records for my business?
How can I make a sugar free strawberry syrup?
How do I make mayonnaise split?
How did Lori survive?
How can I replace a ceiling fan with a regular light fixture?
Do I need Transit Visa to visit London for 4-5 hours during layover?
How do I present a product idea to my boss?
Should I tell my employer if I'm job shopping?
How to deal with dreaded tasks?
What's the best way to keep my garage from freezing?
How can I wire a receptacle to a switch?
Do I need a transit visa for Denmark in addition to my single entry Schengen area visa?
How can I build a porch enclosure?
How do I repair spots of damaged hardwood floor finish?
What should my credit limit be?
Is it advisable for US citizen to attempt a visit to Cuba w/o going through an agency?
Is it okay to not connect the grounding wire to a ceiling box?
How can I explain to potential employers that I am unable to provide a relieving letter?
Do I need a transit visa for a layover in Turkey?
What's the best way to keep my garage from freezing?
How do I say "I need company stock, or I'm getting a new job"?
What is the difference between a copula and a transitive verb?
Where do I have to travel to to see this house?
How do I repair a flaking finish on my wood windows?
How to respond to an unofficial PhD offer?
How do I fix a door that's sticking closed?
What could be causing my water heater inlet pipe to corrode?
What is the difference between a concentration and a track within the major?
What is the difference between a copula and a transitive verb?
What visa do I need to visit my uncle in the UK?
How do I ask my colleagues to pay up for lunch?
what kind of faucet is this and how do I take off handle?
How can I safely practice trad climbing?
What's the best/easiest way to install and wire a wall light?
What to look for when choosing a dutch oven?
What's the difference between "writer" and "screenwriter" professions?
What is the best way to remove dried egg from a house?
What should I look for in a ladder?
What is the difference between a nation and a state?
What's this rhythm called?
Why isn't my 3-way dimmer setup working?
How long does it take from Heathrow Airport to King's Cross Station, London?
How do I reduce the acidity of homemade honey lemon juice?
How can i do pull ups at home?
How are trustees chosen?
What more can I do to improve my credit score?
How should I connect a grounding wire from a device to this box?
If I have Schengen visa, can I enter Schengen area from different country?
How can I repair my floors' finish?
How do I wire a new ceiling light with power to the ceiling and 3-way switches?
How to apply for a Schengen business visa instead of a work visa?
Can I travel to the UK if my Schengen visa expired?
What is the difference between an amp and a head?
Do I need a transit visa for London, UK?
How should I remove a leech?
Why is my furnace blowing hot air outside?
Do I need both a UK visa and a Schengen visa?
How do I tell my boss I am moving to a different organization?
Can children learn up to 4 different languages? And how to do it?
Why and when does a skin form on heated milk and how can I prevent it?
What sites can I use to crowdsource my writing project?
How can I repair a leaking shower?
How Long Can It Take For a Check I Write to Clear on My Account?
What is the difference between a copula and a transitive verb?
It is Possible To Be A Long Distance Runner and have a Six Pack? How?
Do I need a transit visa for waiting 23 hours in Dubai airport?
What is the difference between "State" and "Sovereign" in The Social Contract?
What is the difference between a power slide and a hockey stop?
What should I look for in a crib?
Can anyone tell me what movie this is from?
How do I avoid paying income taxes on the sale of my business abroad?
Where can I find a good online thesaurus?
What to look for when choosing a new bathtub?
How can I make sure I'll get credit for my work when working with unwanted and untrusted collaborator?
How can I repair a chewed-through power cable?
Why does it take my dryer 3 hours to dry a load of clothes?
How does bank deposit insurance work in Singapore?
Should I publish this?
What is the difference between an electronic and a magnetic ballast?
How can I repair my floors' finish?
Why isn't my mini fridge staying cold?
Is it possible for a U.S. citizen to rent a car in Brazil?
What could cause my light and TV to turn off, then back on?
Can I connect two load lines to a GFCI receptacle?
How can I get rid of mosquitoes?
How do I stop my dog from barking when I bring him outside?
What is this stucco-like finish called?
How can I improve my auto insurance score?
How long can I keep eggs in the refrigerator?
How can I remove a coffee stain from carpet?
What are the pros and cons of different types of windows?
How can I repair a leaking shower?
What is the significance of the appearance of the wolf?
What is the difference between writing in the first and the third person?
What should I know when applying for my first job?
How much time does it take to write a professional book?
How should I translate this?
What is the most effective exterior insecticide?
What are some good strength training routines for runners?
What does this tablature notation mean?
What is the difference between chicken cubes and ground chicken?
What accent (for the English language) is most widely and easily understood?
What qualities should I look for in a good walking pole?
Can I increase my credit limit by transferring money to my Credit Card account?
How to get rid of cockroaches?
Can I replace this receptacle that has four wires connected to it?
What kind of bug is this?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
How should I control my garage heater?
What is the best way to clean a grater?
How can I get my dog to stop being so sensitive to noise?
What is the difference between an electronic and a magnetic ballast?
What is the most effective exterior insecticide?
Why does turning my kitchen light off turn on my outside light?
Why did I end up with mushy corned beef?
What is a life CV ?
In the Avengers movie, why did the Chitauri troops die almost instantly when the portal closed?
How do I measure a standard sliding glass door?
Should I agree to have more insulation added to my attic?
How to teach a dog how to bark?
What is the best way to start learning a new course?
How do I remove this shower fixture?
How do I discourage my cat from biting?
What is the best way to clean a grater?
How can I tell the difference between play and aggression at the dog park?
Is there a difference between green and spring onions?
How do I wire two lights with a switch?
How common was smoking in first half of the 20th century?
Do I need a visa to enter the US as a UK citizen in transit?
How do I clean a pasta maker?
What is this guitar?
How do I repair terrazzo floors?
What do I do if a university does not inform me of my masters application status?
What is the difference between splicing and superimposition?
How should I deal with bullying while looking for a new job?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
How does the type of wood used to make an acoustic guitar affect its sound?
Is it safe to eat potatoes that have sprouted?
How to get across on LinkedIn that I absolutely enjoy, and am committed to, my company?
How do I bring up that I got a better job offer to my new current employer?
Do I need a transit visa in Milan?
How can I train my dog to stop eating everything?
What are the major differences between yams and sweet potatoes?
What are the different ways to hold drumsticks and what are the pros and cons of each?
What is the best way to store energy?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
What are the pros and cons of LED lighting for home use?
Is it possible to freeze wine for future use?
When secretly looking for a new job, how not to accidentally apply to my own company?
What are the benefits of getting a PhD in statistics?
What should I look for in a running shoe?
How can I remove paint from a wood deck so I can stain it?
How do I prevent water from leaking down my chimney?
Do I need a visa to transit through Germany?
How do you deal with someone who makes you not want to talk to them?
OK so what the hell happened at the end of Birdman?
What is an "Approval Letter", and how do I get one?
What is the difference between a "riff" and a "melody"?
Do I need to replace this water pressure valve?
What is the safest way to remove tinsel/ribbon from a cat?
How do I get a coworker to stop chit chatting?
What are some stretching exercises for golf?
How can I troubleshoot a ceiling fan light kit Issue?
How can I assess the quality of a paper outside my field?
What is this Chord Notation?
What is the difference between a mode and a scale?
Do Indian citizens need a transit visa for a 3 hour layover at Tokyo, Japan?
What can I do to learn violin before going to a teacher?
How should I remove a leech?
Do I need a Direct Air Transit Visa or Visitor in Transit Visa for the UK?
How do I prepare my home for the arrival of my premature baby?
How can I remove paint from slotted screw heads?
How can I politely tell a professor that I'm too busy to do research with him this term?
How do I reference a constitution?
Is it risky to invite a senior member of the company to coffee, if I'm an intern?
Which way does air flow into a furnace?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
How can I get the most out of my practice time?
What's the best way to install a pet door in an exterior wall?
do i have to file taxes in Canada if no income?
How to know when a fixture needs to be re-caulked?
Does it really make difference to play a song in a different key?
What is causing my sauerkraut to smell sweet?
Is it difficult for an Iranian citizen to get a visa to travel to Morocco as a tourist?
What is the difference between a perpetuity and an annuity?
How do I install a vanity that's higher than the mirror?
Is it a good idea to put Summary in place of Objective in your resume?
Do I need a transit visa at Heathrow?
What is this sound from my washing machine?
Why does my cat eat dog food?
I am able to self-fund a PhD, how can I use this when applying?
How can I make the best use of prime beef?
OK we're all adults here, so really, how on earth should I use a squat toilet?
How can I tell if my cat is pregnant?
How do I prevent water from leaking into my basement?
What does "OFF" mean in a script?
What defines a language?
What's the best way to present regression results in a conference?
How do I replace a bulb in this bathroom light/fan?
What are the pros and cons of eating 1-3 grapefruits every day?
What is the origin of Indian weekday names?
How do you say "not now"?
What is wrong with my gas furnace?
How to strengthen my forearms?
Is my cat's aggressive behavior playful or mean, and how do I stop it?
How can I make my homemade potato wedges crispy?
How can I add a new light fixture off of a ceiling fan wired to two switches?
How can I get rid of springtails?
Is it possible to get a tentative flight itinerary to apply for Taiwan visa without paying?
Do I need UK transit visa?
Does a Nicaraguan citizen need a visa for the UK?
How do I install a "Lite in the Box" (brand) faucet?
How do you remove paint from hair?
How to remove floor adhesive from concrete?
Do I need a visa to enter the US as a UK citizen in transit?
What is the difference between a check and a paycheck?
What is the best way to treat a jammed finger?
What is the best way to start learning a new course?
What can I use for a very small access panel?
What is the best way to fix this garage floor?
Do i need a Schengen transit Visa?
How should I phrase an email and/or conversation that I need to back out of an interview?
What can I do to stop my child from being over-sensitive?
What should I wear to a Systems Analyst Interview?
How do I remove paint from a porous table top?
What more can I do to improve my credit score?
What are the pros and cons of LED lighting for home use?
What is the best way to store oars?
Is there a public list of negation and affirmation cues?
How can I repair a towel rack that was ripped out of the wall?
What is the difference between chicken cubes and ground chicken?
What is the difference between chicken cubes and ground chicken?
How to remove a tick on a dog?
How do I approach my employer to apply for a patent for my algorithm?
How can I remove a stuck screw that will still turn?
Which reward/benefits card is the best value for money in Australia?
How do I plan for my PhD now that I have graduated with a Masters degree without thesis?
How to Deal With Unreasonable Expectations?
Paper Title, Is it better to start with a verb?
What is this technique called?
How do explain to my boss that I need time off for interviews, and why I am leaving?
How to deal with "unresponsive" colleagues?
What is the best way to treat a jammed finger?
Is it a bad writing practice to end a paragraph with question?
What is the origin of Indian weekday names?
What is the best way to clean a grater?
How often should I wax my bass?
What are the differences between Peer Reviewed Journals and Refereed Journals?
What are the advantages and disadvantages of having multiple advisers?
How does velveting work?
How do you remove the pit from a mango?
How can I improve the water pressure in my shower?
How long should it take to write 100k words?
What are the pros and cons of vinyl gutters?
What is the significance of the cat?
How to apply for a Schengen visa?
How did the Greek 'tropos' evolve into the Latin 'tropus'?
How can I replace a ceiling fan light pull chain?
What kind of steak is this?
How long will cold brew keep?
What does the term "Boardroom poker" mean?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
Why didn't my beer cake cook properly?
What kinds of documentation does a US citizen need to enter the UK on a tourist visa?
Now that Microsoft Money is gone, what can I do?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
How do I attach a receptacle box to brick instead of a stud?
Why did Solomon's soul belong to the Devil?
What more can I do to improve my credit score?
Where the did the concept of "smear campaigns" originate?
Is there a difference between a manual and an automatic grinder?
Meaning of the phrase: To drive the ball "on the up"?
What is the best way to store energy?
What is the difference between an electronic and a magnetic ballast?
Is there a difference between seasoning and flavouring?
I want to make my own cheese. How do I get started?
What foods can I eat to keep my energy up in an office job in the afternoon?
Can I travel to UK as tourist even my UAE residence visa was cancelled?
If lost in the wilderness, what is the first thing I should do?
How do I fix a broken tile?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
Do I need a business credit card?
What could be wrong with my air conditioner?
What is the best way to remove hair from carpets?
How do I stop my dog from pulling while on leash?
What type of asbestos is this?
How do I balance a ceiling fan?
What are the pros and cons of doubling on two brass instruments?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
What could be causing my baseboard heater to not heat up?
How can I help a cat who seems afraid of his harness?
How can I extend my Business Schengen visa?
Can I make my own malt?
How to deal with vague tasks?
What does the "to" mean in the General Welfare Clause?
How many keys are enough to learn to play piano?
Do I need UK transit visa to going to Ireland?
How do I prepare this exterior concrete wall for paint?
Why is my cat growling/hissing at me when I try to play with him or take his toy?
Must I specify where I will enter the Schengen area on the visa application?
What kind of wordplay is this?
What to do with leaky sink?
What should I look for in a ladder?
How do I find out how long a UK train should be, in advance online?
How long should I cook apples in the oven?
Why do admissions committees consider the Statement of Purpose to be important?
How can I repair my floors' finish?
How do I deal with a joist in the way of where I need to run a pipe?
How can I determine what is in my water?
What is the significance of the cat?
How do you write a character's internal monologue?
How do I make my room stop smelling so bad?
What can I do to stay fit in the car?
How can I get my dog to slow down when eating?
Can I ask for a higher salary if I've already said how much I want?
How to present a review paper at a conference?
How can author deal with late reviews?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
Do I need a transit visa for London, UK?
How do I make my dog forget a command?
what are the pros and cons of structured deposits?
How can I find the cheapest prepaid credit card?
Can I use brown sugar in No Bake Cookies instead of Granulated Sugar?
How do I prepare my home for the arrival of my premature baby?
How to increase conversational skills?
Why doesn't my Touch N Go garage door opener lift the door?
Is it better to stain before or after assembly?
What can I do to make driving in the rain at night easier?
Transit Visa in the UK?
How can I keep my cat from climbing on my desk?
Should I patch this hole in my slab?
How can I get the most out of my practice time?
Is it possible to switch to a better university for PhD after completing a Masters in computer science?
What is the best way to remove popcorn from the ceiling?
How do you teach a child religious views?
What are the pros and cons of feeding on demand?
What are the pros and cons of LED lighting for home use?
How do you ween a toddler off of breastfeeding?
Is is possible to travel when applying for a new visa?
What is the meaning of "$N industry"?
Do I need transit visa?
How do I know what size guitar strings I need?
How can I help my adult rabbit gain weight?
How to motivate yourself when you are in a company of a negative person?
How do I level a small yard?
What does the ending of the movie "Coherence" mean?
How can I explain to my child that I'm not superman?
Do I need to apply for a UK transit visa when I have a visitor visa?
How can I tell if my cat is pregnant?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
How can I stop my pie from burning?
How can I get my cat to clean himself?
How can I fix a very slow drain?
What does "the anointed of the Lord" mean?
What does a duplicated note in a chord mean?
Do I need a visa to enter the US as a UK citizen in transit?
What does the notation "2/3BII" mean?
Should I pay off my student loan before putting money into Roth IRA?
What is the significance of the missing elevator car?
What is the optimal length of time for pulling a shot of espresso?
How do I explain good sportsmanship to a 4 year old?
What are the pros and cons of being co-supervised?
Do I need to write a bibliography?
How do I properly paint a wood floor made of plywood?
Do I need a transit visa for layover in Luanda?
How to prepare for a race?
What is the best temperature to store honey at?
What are the pros and cons of eating 1-3 grapefruits every day?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
How to deal with meddling coworkers?
What is the difference between a copula and a transitive verb?
How much do letters of recommendation help in a statistics PhD program application?
What is the best way to learn to play a piece on the guitar?
How do you get a child to eat?
Is it possible to freeze wine for future use?
What's the difference between "writer" and "screenwriter" professions?
How do I duplicate these chips?
How much food should I be giving my dog to maintain his weight?
How can I improve my vertical?
How long can I keep eggs in the refrigerator?
Is it a good idea to follow up after an interview, and if so, how soon?
What kind of lock is this, and how can I replace it?
What should I look for in a cookie jar?
What is the difference between a concentration and a track within the major?
What would be a good substitute for Rice Wine?
How do I select the right generator?
How can I prepare this old exterior wall for painting?
What could be causing my sink and dishwasher to back up?
How to get rid of unwanted and annoying co-author?
How can I remotely monitor a GFCI receptacle?
Can I still travel to Schengen countries if I have an expired residence permit?
How to travel from Lombok airport to Gili Trawangan in cheapest and fastest way?
How to buy a bond?
What can I do if I am constantly invited as a reviewer, but don't have the time?
How do I stop my dog from barking when I bring him outside?
How do I fix this leaking dishwasher drain pipe?
Do I need a transit Visa when changing terminals in LHR(UK)?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
How can I edit my own, very old work?
What is the best way to fix this garage floor?
What is the shortest six in cricket?
How can I find replacement parts for an unknown faucet?
How can I add tile to my fireplace?
What kind of floor is this?
What is the difference between a copula and a transitive verb?
How can I get rid of fleas in my crawlspace forever?
What is the best way to read a textbook?
Do I need a Schengen visa if I have a UK tier 1 visa with Indian passport?
How can I tell if my microphone is broken?
How can I communicate I am leaving a company to someone I hired who hasn't started?
How to prepare for a race?
What should I look for in a running shoe?
How to get from Courmayeur to Milano?
What can I do to improve the chances of my being promoted?
How do I cut down a bathroom wall drain?
Is it a good idea to point to the person that referred you after you decline an offer?
What can I do to stay fit in the car?
How do I clean dripped paint from a wood floor?
How can I remove paint from a deck?
What's the difference between overtones and harmonics?
What are the pros and cons of being co-supervised?
Where to take photo for Schengen Visa?
How do you reduce a cream sauce?
Can I get a Master's in Economics with a Bachelor's in Mathematics?
How do I wire two lights with a switch?
How to secure a wooden box (tunnel) in a wall?
How do I repair crumbling wall plaster?
What weight dumbbells should I buy?
American citizen travelling to London from Ghana - do I need a UK visa?
What can I do when my dog loves going out at night?
What are the pros and cons of these 3 types of dumbbells?
Should I tell my employer that I am running for a political office?
Do I need to enter US from the country where I got my visa?
What is wrong with my gas furnace?
What is the best way to treat a jammed finger?
What does "the anointed of the Lord" mean?
How much of a raise to ask for?
Do I need a transit visa?
How do I prevent my cat from getting on the table?
What is the best way to store carrots?
How can I find the cheapest prepaid credit card?
Does a head of lettuce really need to be refrigerated?
Do I need to use a guitar capo for this song?
What is the difference between a nation and a state?
Should I write my biography in the first or third person?
What is the origin of Jataka tales?
What workout should I do if I want to prepare my condition?
What's a good substitute for cilantro?
How to select a good GPS receiver?
Does an Irish citizen need a visa for a week's tourist visit to America?
Does a US Citizen need a visa to enter as a tourist to the UK for 6 months?
How should I make a budget?
What is the difference between a riff and a lick?
In what countries is it possible to enter a life science PhD program directly after a Bachelor's?
How to address the person being recommended in a recommendation letter?
How can I learn to do Rabbit Showmanship?
What is the best way to fix this garage floor?
What does it mean by "Hitting the wall" in marathon run?
How can I remove a portion of a hardwood floor board?
How do I repair spots of damaged hardwood floor finish?
What happened at the end of Prometheus Movie?
What is the difference between splicing and superimposition?
How can I finish a hole in the wall?
What is the origin of the black/devil riders?
How can I make yogurt at home?
Do I need a transit visa despite having a Schengen visa?
Can I make my own malt?
How to open a beverage can that has a broken tab?
What is the difference between a perpetuity and an annuity?
How can I stop this downspout leak?
Do I need to write a bibliography?
Is it OK to use "I guess" in fiction?
Can I roast nuts in a convection microwave oven?
How can I get an idea of the work hours when applying for a job?
How do I troubleshoot an electric furnace?
Do I need a general or business visitor visa to take the IELTS in the UK?
Do I need UK visa to enter London from Cork, Ireland?
How can I tell if a journal is reputable?
I have a Layover in Japan, Going to stayfor a month, Do I need a Transit Visa?
How can I get my dog to slow down when eating?
What visa do I need to apply for going to Spain?
Should I tell my boss I have a full time job offer?
How do I help my dog adjust after moving?
Is «plausible» a false friend between English and Spanish?
What's the travel insurance definition of a war zone?
How long does uncooked meat last when kept in the freezer?
How do I paint art onto a wall?
How can I patch a large hole in a metal bathtub?
How can I stop my cat from jumping on top of my car?
How should I store speck?
What to look for when purchasing a blender?
How do I remove the cover from my light fixture?
How do I wire this ceiling fan?
Transit Visa in the UK?
Is it advisable in my case to take a second bachelor's degree?
How should I install a thermostat for a baseboard heater?
Is it possible to breed crickets?
Does an Indian with UK residence require a visa to visit the Netherlands?
Is it appropriate to send a gift to a professor for an online course?
What is a good pine nut substitute for pesto?
How do I wire this ceiling fan?
How do I bathe my cat?
How can I make a chocolate syrup that can be frozen?
How can I boost the water pressure in my shower?
How can I get my child to stop biting others?
Do I need a visa for layover at Germany airport?
Does a Nicaraguan citizen need a visa for the UK?
Why does my washing machine leak only during the spin cycle?
What is the best way to start learning a new course?
UK visa decision advice?
What is the best way to filter the Turkish coffee?
What is the significance of the artwork?
what are the pros and cons of structured deposits?
Do I need an airport transit visa for Germany if I have a Schengen visa?
What happened to Jack Swift at the end of Brokeback Mountain?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
What does it mean by "Follow-up Masters"?
How to prepare for a race?
How do I make mayonnaise split?
Do I require a transit visa?
What's the best way to seal around this faucet?
What does the term "match the market" mean?
How should I install a new water heater?
What kind of plug adapter do I need?
How can I get rid of fleas?
How do I keep my pool water clean without nasty chemicals?
Do I need to pay tax on the amount of savings I have in the bank?
How can I get rid of my I-94?
What are the pros and cons of different types of smart switches on the UK market?
What are the pros and cons of LED lighting for home use?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
Do I need a transit visa for London, UK?
What is the best way to store oars?
What does the conversation mean?
How can I safely re-heat a chicken pie without burning the crust?
How can I keep my dog from crying when he's kenneled in the car?
Is it possible to steam steak?
How do you teach a child to call for help?
How do I stop my cat from biting cords?
Can I travel to Paris for a day with a single entry visa for Schengen from Switzerland?
How to tell my company that I am having issues with my boss?
Do I need a transit Visa when changing terminals in LHR(UK)?
How to peel peaches?
Put onto a project I don't want to do. How can I tell my boss?
How do I measure a standard sliding glass door?
What does "university ranking" mean for a graduate admissions committee?
Is it really possible to create a mind palace?
What is the best way to seal this old fireplace vent?
How do I clean a Hammerite paint brush?
Is it possible to get a Schengen visa for future date?
What is the best way to filter the Turkish coffee?
What does "respectively" mean in the Tenth Amendment?
How can I replace a light fixture with a two way switch?
How do I know if food left at room temperature is still safe to eat?
How do I remove paint from a wood floor?
How should I mount a sliding closet door track?
How can one test if a vegetable is organic?
What is the effect of alcohol on the body?
What are the pros and cons of being co-supervised?
Is it ok to apply for more than one Phd student program?
Do I need to get a DATV to transit through the UK on a F1 visa?
How much would be a fair raise or salary increase to ask for at work?
How much is too much worry/anxiety in a child?
Do I need to get a transit visa for the stop over at a Canadian airport?
How to replace recessed halogen light from an eyeball fixture?
How can I avoid telling my boss about the new company that I'll be working for during resignation?
Is there a difference between seasoning and flavouring?
What is the best way to introduce myself in a letter to a prospective graduate adviser?
Why was there no narration in The Hunger Games?
Do I need a transit visa for a layover in Turkey?
What is the difference between a college and a university?
What is the difference between a macaron and an amaretti biscuit?
Is there a substitute for dashi?
What can I do when the upholstry on my computer chair is coming off?
How to make cookies less crumbly?
I was offered the minimum salary I requested, should I ask for more?
How should I apply for a Schengen visa from the UK?
How can I get my dog to eat vitamins when she doesn't want to?
How do I go about asking my boss for an extended leave to travel abroad?
How can I find out my credit-score?
How can I determine what is in my water?
How do I wire a combo with two supplies?
What is the difference between a creditor and a lender?
How do I know if I'm flossing correctly?
How can I stop my dog from peeing on our neighbor's door?
How do I decide how much to charge my boss for a painting?
How to fit a new door in a narrower frame?
What to do when a journal publishes a paper plagiarizing one's work but doesn't care about it?
What is the first thing to do, when buried in an avalanche?
What could be causing my new GFCI receptacle to keep tripping?
How to get rid of this shed?
How can I determine what size pressure pump and tank do I need?
I added insulation to my attic rafters, but should I have left room for airflow?
Do I need visa for UK visit if I have a work permit for Ireland?
How can I get myself writing again?
How to get rid of weevils?
Is it appropriate as a referee to contact an author after the editor rejected the manuscript?
How can I install a new bathroom GFCI receptacle?
How I prevent my computer from collecting dust?
Is there an alternative to the common genre-system for classifying books?
What kind of board is this, and where can I get some?
What are the pros and cons of eating 1-3 grapefruits every day?
Do I need seperate visas for travelling via Munich to Geneva, if I already have a Schengen visa?
Should I publish in a journal that appears on Beall’s list?
Do I need a transit visa for layover in Italy?
How to get rid of this shed?
What went wrong with my brownies?
What is the origin of Rap?
What does overhead rate mean?
How can I repair this broken bathroom tap?
How can I upgrade a 3 wire appliance receptacle to a 4 wire receptacle?
How do I take out time for my research while working a full time job?
How should I cite StackOverflow questions in my term paper?
How should I translate this?
What kinds of documentation does a US citizen need to enter the UK on a tourist visa?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
How can I ask for a raise at my internship-turned-full time job?
Is there a difference between a manual and an automatic grinder?
What is a good guitar solo to learn in the minor scale?
What types of developmental milestones should we be concerned about?
What is the shortest timespan depicted in a movie?
How do I finish a ridge cap?
What should I look for in a cooking class?
How do you get a child to eat?
Is it ethical to look for a new job at a conference my current employer is paying for?
How can I get my 4 year old to clean up toys without a battle?
How do I install a new, non load bearing wall in my basement?
How can I train my dog to be calm when greeting friends?
From London to Luton Airport by National Express - how long does it take?
How can I remove paint from slotted screw heads?
How can I level the joists and ceiling?
How long should a feeding be attempted?
What is the difference between AUG and CCG?
Do I need a UK transit visa when flying from Lebanon to Ireland?
How long can I keep espresso in the fridge?
Should I prefer long or short sentences in scientific writing?
Do I need a UK or Ireland transit visa when flying from the US to a Schengen country?
How to best store cocoa powder?
Does a Ukrainian citizen with UK visa and Estonian residence need a tourist visa to Spain?
How can I repair my concrete porch?
Why doesn't my cat like being held?
What is the difference between a filler word and a discourse marker?
What do I need to use a headboard?
What is the white film on my wet carrots?
What are electrolytes and why are they important?
How to compose a great recommendation letter?
What is the best way to filter the Turkish coffee?
Can I roast nuts in a convection microwave oven?
What type of switch is this?
How can I build a mantel around my fireplace?
How do I stop my dog from barking at people through the fence?
How do I level a pipe with the ground?
What is the difference between a copula and a transitive verb?
Flying USA to UK via Canada with Spanish passport. Do I need to apply for a visa?
How to make a strong mug of instant Coffee?
How do you play really short notes on the acoustic guitar?
How can I calculate the number of deductions I should use?
How to prepare for a race?
How do you help a child with nightmares?
How much cinnamon is too much?
How do I level a pipe with the ground?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
What is the best way to fix this garage floor?
How to optimize effort?
How can I apply for an Irish tourist visa?
What is the difference between "retired out" and "retired not out" in cricket?
How do I punctuate a statement that a character is ordered to say in a future scenario?
How can I combat my tendancy of always wanting to do what I'm not able to?
How do I make my own chocolate chips?
What this instrument is used for?
What are the advantages and disadvantages of various methods of supporting the classical guitar?
How can I control two ceiling fans and lights with one single pole switch?
Recruiter doesn't respond to my e-mail for a week. What should I do?
What is the best way to clean a dryer vent?
What type of screws should I use?
Should I tell to my boss that I don't like to work with the new colleague?
How can I repair some broken patio stones?
What is the reciprocity fee for US citizens entering Argentina?
How do I make this paint match?
How can I get my cat to clean himself?
Do I need a UK or Ireland transit visa when flying from the US to a Schengen country?
What is the best way to introduce cats to newborns?
do i need a Transit visa in London?
Is it possible to get a Schengen visa without travel insurance and a copy of the itinerary?
Do I need a transit visa flying from Germany to India though transit at London?
Vitamins: How much is too much?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
How can I repair drywall after removing tile?
How does velveting work?
What should a tenured professor do to move to a more research oriented school?
What is the significance of the billboard?
How do I build an on grade foundation for a shed?
What do I do with the ground wire?
What is a bloquers?
How do I leave a job if I haven't done much yet?
What kind of walkers are available and what are the pros and cons of each?
How do I patch a gap between my bathtub and wall?
What is the best way to store ground coffee?
What are the guidelines for declaring for the NFL Draft?
What does "basis points" mean in this context?
Should I be worried about my baby's eyesight?
What's this rhythm called?
What's the best way to season a cast iron skillet?
What is a short CV?
How do I repair a flaking finish on my wood windows?
How long can fish be left out?
How do I play the synthesizer on my own?
How long can I keep eggs in the refrigerator?
Can I wire a Bathroom Fan to two Switches in Parallel?
What is the origin of Jataka tales?
Can I use Romex in an unfinished basement or attic?
What is the difference between a school and a department?
How can I help my dog's furuncles?
What is the best way to read a textbook?
How can I independently control a light and fan, where only a single hot wire is used?
Do using trackballs put more stress on the hand, wrist and arm than a traditional mouse?
What is the difference between chicken cubes and ground chicken?
What does this notation mean?
How do I use tamarind powder?
How do I get rid of fleas on my rabbit?
Do I need a transit visa in Frankfurt, Germany on the way to India?
Where can I find LED indoor floodlights?
How can I get my 2.5 year old to sleep on his own?
Does drinking tea cause problems at altitude?
How can I determine why my lights are flickering?
What is the difference between chicken cubes and ground chicken?
What is the best way to filter the Turkish coffee?
What is the best way to get rid of steam on a mirror?
What is the significance of the Olympic logo?
Will I Need a Transit visa or ESTA for the US as a Canadian?
Can I stay in Europe for more than 90 days with a UK working visa?
How can I locate and deal with mold between floors?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
How can I secure a plastic toolbox to the wall?
How do I know if it is safe to remove a wall?
How does velveting work?
How to develop musicianship skills?
What are the features that I should look for in a good preschool?
Do I need an EU visa if I'm married to a UK citizen?
Is it possible to get a UK visa gift card while in the US?
How long does cooked garlic keep in fridge?
What is the significance of the statue given to Hank?
What to look for in a new/replacement toilet?
What is the origin of Jataka tales?
How can I get my dog to accept a harness without treats?
How can I add a GFCI breaker on two circuits with a shared neutral without rewiring?
Do I need transit visa to visit Zurich if I have a valid F-1 visa?
What kind of timer socket is this and how can I get it working?
Which is best way to apply to a company?
What went wrong with my brownies?
Where can a tourist apply for a UK Visitor (standard) Visa?
On what should i pay attention when buying a guitar?
Where will I clear customs traveling from US to Greece and back via Toronto?
What is the significance of the Origami Bum?
I have an unfinished translation of a speciality book. Should I write this down on my CV/SOP?
How to learn to cook?
How long can I keep espresso in the fridge?
Do I need a transit visa for a layover in Turkey?
What is a mezrag-holder?
How can I move a drain line?
What is the sound law to describe the etymology of “helix” and “vulva”?
How should I groom my dog?
Do I need a visa to enter the US as a UK citizen in transit?
How can I repair a leaking shower?
Is it possible to write a song without a key?
Do I need a Canada transit visa as an Indian citizen?
How can I remove a key that is stuck in a lock?
what is the difference between Erebor and Moria?
Will I need a transit visa for US as a Canadian Student Visa holder?
What is the best way to clean a grater?
How do I make my bread/buns super soft?
What is the best way to store energy?
What are some good distractions for an infant?
How can I help my child to stay still?
How can I get myself to read books?
What could be wrong with this receptacle?
What is the best way to cite an anonymous writer?
Why was the removal of the shrapnel just "thrown-in" at the end?
What is a good solo to learn in the major scale?
How can I convince my boss I am the right person to lead a future team?
How can I repair a hole in my subfloor?
How long does fresh parsley keep in the fridge?
Why does my ceiling fan turn off when I turn on the lights?
How long should I wait for plaster to dry/cure between coats?
How do I install a ceiling light where one never existed?
Where can I find the percentile retirement savings for my age group?
What kind of glass is this?
How can I remove a really stuck screw?
What is the difference between a check and a paycheck?
Is it worth it for me to get a masters in CS?
What went wrong with my brownies?
Do I need a visa to transit India?
How can I increase the numeracy of a toddler?
How do I level a small yard?
What are the pros and cons of being co-supervised?
Should I start looking for a new job? If so, how soon?
How do I determine if a wall is load bearing?
What are some inexpensive options for replacing a single-stall garage door?
What is the best way to store carrots?
Transit Visa in the UK?
What is the difference between a tortoise and a turtle?
Layover at Narita for 3 hours. Do i need a transit visa?
what are the pros and cons of structured deposits?
Do I need a transit visa in Switzerland?
How to snake a bathtub with no overflow drain?
How long can I keep espresso in the fridge?
Why does salted codfish turn chewy?
How to remove milk smell from hardwood floor?
Will paying off a credit card early affect my credit score?
How can I get thinner pancakes?
What is the difference between balls in Test and ODI Cricket?
What is the best way to clean a grater?
What's the best way to store asparagus?
Do I need a visa to enter the US as a UK citizen in transit?
How do I make my bread/buns super soft?
What is the difference between "Mongolian Grill" and "Hibachi"?
What Does a Compressor Pedal Do?
How long can I keep bread dough in the refrigerator?
What kind of lock is this, and how can I replace it?
What is the difference between "Solo" and "Improvisation"?
Is it a good idea to tell my colleagues that I sometimes have depressive spells?
What is required of an Australian citizen to get a visa for Ukraine?
What's the difference between TaxAct and TurboTax?
How can I find out my credit-score?
Bad ceiling fan wiring?
What is the best way to store my tent?
How do you peel chickpeas?
How should a PhD student approach a collaboration?
How to better prepare myself for the application to masters degree programs in the U.S.?
What could cause a battery hedge trimmer to have white smoke come out of it?
Do I need a DATV to travel via London from USA to India on F1 visa?
How can I patch a hole in this brick wall?
How long does it take for milk to spoil unrefrigerated?
Is it possible to check-in a double stroller on a flight?
Can a Brazilian citizen enter the country with a visa on a foreign passport?
How can I improve my writing fluency in English?
How does leverage work?
What is the best way to store my tent?
How do you know how much effort to do and for how long?
Can anyone identify this warship?
How do I (or should I) tell my manager that I am not enjoying my job?
What is the best way to store fresh berries?
How to encourage toddler to not throw food?
How do I replace a ceiling fan controlled by 2 wall switches with a standard wall plug outlet?
Do I need to provide a transit visa in Moscow?
Is there a difference between seasoning and flavouring?
How do I remove the cover from my light fixture?
What is the difference between a copula and a transitive verb?
How to make more than one good cup of coffee with a moka pot?
How do I install a new interior partition wall?
How do I improve my singing?
What's the best way to learn what each seasoning is?
What could be causing my GFCI outlet to trip?
What should I do with a dog who is afraid of everyone except me?
How did the Latin stem '-duce' evolve to mean 'from an effect'?
How long will a balsamic reduction keep?
Do I need a transit visa for Germany on the way to Canada?
How do explain to my boss that I need time off for interviews, and why I am leaving?
What is the best way to toast pecans?
What could be causing water to back up into my bathroom basin?
Is there a difference between a manual and an automatic grinder?
How do I make this paint match?
Why isn't my refrigerator getting cold?
What is a good pine nut substitute for pesto?
How can I get from La Paz, Bolivia to Puno, Peru?
What do I have to do in preparation for applying for a PhD?
How can I remove oil stains from a concrete floor?
What is the difference between portamento and glissando?
How can I repair my two sloping concrete slabs?
What kind of ambiguity is this called?
How do I teach my toddler not to abuse animals?
What can I do to stop my child from being over-sensitive?
How can I stop water from coming up through the floor?
What is the difference between a copula and a transitive verb?
What is wrong with my gas furnace?
What is the difference between sortition and demarchy?
Do I need a header for an egress window?
How can I test if a dehydrator is getting to the proper temperature?
Do I really need a redundant sump pump?
Is it ethical/legal to use the University's resources for a personal project?
Digital Era Threatens Future of Drive-Ins
Jessica murder Manu Sharma gets parole
U.N. Council to Hold Emergency DR Congo Talks
Iran, IAEA resume nuclear talks in Tehran
Thai protestors storm Royal army headquarters in Bangkok
40 still missing in deadly Canada oil train crash
Raghuram Rajan to step into eye of rupee storm as RBInbspguv tomorrow
Iran foreign minister tasked with nuclear talks
Bill De Blasio sworn in as New York mayor, succeeding Michael Bloomberg
United States presses Iraq on reports of arms deal with Iran
Modi appointed PM, swearing-in on May 26
Minn. dad claims third of $448M Powerball jackpot
Driver backs into mom, stroller with child then drives off
George Zimmerman arrested in Florida after disturbance call
Gulf of Mexico oil spill: Halliburton pleads guilty to destroying evidence
Spain princess testifies in historic fraud probe
More Flight MH17 bodies leave Ukraine
Lewis Hamilton holds off Nico Rosberg to claim Spanish Grand Prix
US-Russia reach agreement on Syria weapons
TSA drops plan to allow small knives on planes
Edward Snowden leaves Moscow airport
Mursi Supporters Rally in Egypt, Army Shows Muscle
Stocks edge higher after positive economic reports
Bachelet set for big win in Chile's 2-woman poll showdown
North Korea offers 'high-level talks' with US
Senate approves Obama nominee to key appeals court
Bangladesh sentences British Muslim and US citizen to hang
North Korea launches three short-range missiles
Obama begins Africa tour in Senegal
Protests as Beverly Hills demands Brunei sultan sell hotel
Britain to be first Western country to issue sovereign Islamic bond
Angelina Jolie's aunt dies of breast cancer
Bangladesh factory owners arrested
Apple files for 'iWatch' trademark in Japan
Classic crossword - Friday 31st May
Assad: Syria Will Allow Access to Chemical Sites
Maple Leafs edge Canadiens for 4th straight win
Benetton agrees to sign Bangladesh safety pact
Harris charged with 13 child-sex offences
Abdullah Widens Lead in Afghan Presidential Poll
7.2 quake hits central Philippines, killing 85
Israeli army resumes Gaza offensive
Berlusconi expelled from Italian parliament
Israel downs rocket near Egypt border
UN Rights Chief Presses Egypt on Morsi Detention
'Fast &amp; Furious' star dies in car crash
Obama says he's having a 'great time' on vacation
Ammonia leak kills 15 in Shanghai
Hong Kong democracy rally organisers arrested
EU foreign ministers to discuss Egypt on Wednesday
Google poised to sell Motorola to Lenovo
Dozens dead, 1,000 injured in China quake
Senate confirms Janet Yellen as next Federal Reserve Chair
Heavy Smog Hits North China City, Flights Canceled
Bombs and gunbattle kill at least 4 in Somali capital
U.N. Rights Council Launches Sri Lanka War Crimes Probe
North West mining royalties misused - report
Syrian rebel groups battle each other in north
Pope Francis announces first visit to Holy Land
Chemical arms watchdog wins Nobel Peace Prize
Heineken profits fall on lower sales
UN vote on Aust MH17 resolution
Nelson Mandela dies at age 95
Mayawati demands Presidents rule in Jammu and Kashmir
Cryptic crossword - Friday 31st May
Egyptian court bans Muslim Brotherhood
Tokyo to host 2020 Olympic Games
Uganda's president signs harsh anti-gay law
Manchester City win English Premier League title
Angelina Jolie's aunt dies from breast cancer
Rocks, tear gas fly as Thai protests heat up
Boston bomb suspect buried in Virginia cemetery
Boston Marathon bomb suspect buried in Virginia
Iran and UN Discuss Agreement on Syria Assistance
UN inspectors arrive in Damascus on chemical probe
Obama canceled meeting with Putin
6 killed in Philippines restaurant blast
Egypt freezes Muslim Brotherhood funds
Man Arrested Outside John Kerry's House in Mass.
Bryan Cranston to return as Walter White for Breaking Bad spin off
Six Cambodian opposition politicians charged with insurrection
China army newspaper slams US's PRISM program
Silvio Berlusconi expelled from parliament
Tokyo to host 2020 Games
Japan upper house vote to set ruling bloc's power
EDL leaders arrested on way to Woolwich
Mass grave found near Mexico City
Fugitive Snowden's hopes of leaving Moscow airport dashed
AirAsia chief hopes to raise up to $300 mn from IPO
Obama signs law aimed at barring Iran UN envoy
Death toll from Egypt violence rises to 525
Thai prime minister dissolves parliament
Michael Schumacher is in a STABLE condition in hospital - according to his manager
Turkish Police Clear Taksim Square
Conservative leader Abbott sweeps into power in Australian elections
Karzai Says Afghanistan Won't Be A Repeat Of Iraq
Wing walker, pilot die in biplane crash at Ohio air show
Child abuse images to be wiped from web
Nelson Mandela laid to rest
Texas senator filibusters against abortion bill
RFK killer Sirhan Sirhan moved to another prison -- on anniversary of JFK assassination
Australia returns asylum seekers to Sri Lanka in sea transfer
US Capitol Hill on lockdown after shots fired
Two killed in Bahrain car blast
Global chemical watchdog wins Nobel Peace Prize
Tropical Storm Andrea bearing down on Florida
Watchdog: Syria hands over last of its declared chemical weapons
Egypt's el-Sissi sworn in as president
Soccer Referee Punched by Player in Utah Dies
Ukraine crisis: Insurgents attack border guards
Suicide car bomb kills 30 in Baghdad cafe
Obama pressures Republicans to raise the debt ceiling
North Korea says to restart nuclear reactor
Justice Adly Mansour sworn in as Egypt interim president
Actor Bob Hoskins dies at 71
Venezuela's Maduro pledges continued alliance with Cuba
US President sweats over sweaters during NY shopping stop
Stocks, bonds rally after Summers exits Fed race
Trayvon Martin could have been ...
Python kills security guard in Bali
Obama to meet South Korean leader
Russia warns it will 'respond' if interests in Ukraine attacked
Spanish flamenco guitarist Paco de Lucia dies at 66
Belgian King Albert II to abdicate in favor of his son
Suicide Bomber Kills 15 in Northern Iraq
Suicide bomber kills 13 at restaurant in central Somalia
Hundreds evacuated as Sumatran volcano erupts
Latest Storm to Bring More Snow to East Coast
Aid pushes through to Philippine typhoon survivors
NTU slips in world university rankings
Buddhist mob attacks mosque in Sri Lanka's capital
Machete-wielding student aimed for mass carnage in Colorado
Bangladesh building disaster death toll passes 500
Man set on fire on National Mall
Mubarak retrial adjourned to June
US drone strike kills 11 in Pakistan
Australian PM Gillard ousted in leadership vote
Manila charges China fishermen over reef crash
Israel says it conducted missile tests in Mediterranean
Boston bombing suspect buried in Virginia cemetery
Bangladesh court sentences 152 soldiers to death in mutiny
Protests sweep Brazil despite concession
Egypt protesters defy cabinet threat
'Fast &amp; Furious' star dies in car crash
Car Bombs Kill Four in Turkish Town on Syrian Border
Actor Philip Seymour Hoffman found dead
Turkey may deploy army to end protests
Vivienne Westwood joins Balcombe fracking protest
GOP Sen. Kirk announces support for gay marriage
Couple get married in Britain's first Scientology wedding
Shenzhou-10 capsule: China launches 15-day manned space mission
PM: UK has 'paid a very high price' in Afghanistan
Russian Opposition Leader Placed Under House Arrest
Two explosions at Boston Marathon finish line
Senate confirms Janet Yellen as next Federal Reserve Chair
Syrian opposition agrees to Geneva peace talks
Clegg and Farage are extremists on Europe, says Cameron
Boeing 777 crashes while landing at San Francisco airport
Swedish court upholds arrest warrant for Julian Assange
Uganda's president to sign anti-homosexuality bill
Qatari emir hands power to son Tamim
Ancelotti named Real Madrid coach
Easing of concerns over Syria boost Asian shares
Philippines typhoon death toll rises above 5,000
Egypt braces for Friday of anger after bloody crackdown
Divers find human remains near Italian shipwreck
Mandela leaves hospital after 10 days
Police: Ohio mobile home fire kills man, 5 kids
Japanese politician arrested in China for transporting drugs
New York train crash kills four, injures dozens
Red Sox beat Tigers to reach World Series
African nations press UN Council to suspend Kenya case
Microsoft to cut 18,000 jobs in major reorganization
More than 1,000 inmates escape from Libya's al-Kweifiya prison
Dutch couple kidnapped in Yemen plead for help in video
China lands robot rover on moon
Malaysian plane shot down over Ukraine
Philippines welcomes 100millionth baby
US embassy in Israel marks 4th of July
Microsoft CEO Ballmer to retire within 12 months
Protesters celebrate after police leave Istanbul square
Dozens missing after boat sinks off Malaysia
Obama lashes North Korea as weak pariah state
Bradley Manning says he wants to live as a woman
Libya's first post-uprising prosecutor general shot dead
France to send more soldiers to Central African Republic
US to Seek International Coalition on Syria
Phil Mickelson wins the Open Championship with superb final-round 66
Bangladesh garment factory owners surrender over deadly fire
Sopranos star James Gandolfini dies aged 51
Bangladesh Building death toll passes 600
Petkovic, Halep Reach French Open Semifinals
Ukraine's parliament votes to dismiss president
Venezuela lawmakers brawl over election
Cyclone Phailin leaves trail of destruction
Hezbollah leader vows to fight on in Syria
Israel starts ground offensive in Gaza
IMF approves 17 billion USD aid package for Ukraine
North Korea warns foreigners in South to evacuate
Abortion Bill: Second night of debating in the Dail new Irish politicians have begun a second night of debating divisive laws that will legislate for the first time for abortion in limited circumstanc
Israel retaliates after multiple rockets fired from Lebanon
Captain of capsized S Korean Ferry Arrested
At least 6 dead in Navy Yard shooting
Everest avalanche kills 12 guides
Lebanon: Sectarian clashes in northern city kill 9
Pakistani Taliban chief killed in drone strike
Silvio Berlusconi expelled from parliament
Obama taps Foxx - NC mayor - to run Transportation
Ship sinks after collision off Philippines; 24 dead
Syria opposition votes to join peace talks
Sir Mick Jagger 'to become great-grandfather'
Samantha Lewthwaite: Interpol issues global arrest warrant for White Widow
Philadelphia woman pleads guilty to killing 2 Canadian tourists
Obama to attend memorial service in Johannesburg
Pakistan releases seven Taliban prisoners
Fast-moving wildfire spreads to Yosemite National National Park
North Korea says it will deport Australian missionary
Cars plunge into river as US bridge collapses
NFL seeks US$1.5m over Super Bowl finger
Saudis held over Tanzania attack
Obama cancels meetings with Putin amid tensions
Israel officials: Strike on Syria targeted weapons
Twenty20 World Cup: West Indies rout Bangladesh
Trayvon Martin could have been ...
Minimum alcohol pricing 'will save 860 lives a year', experts claim
Iran's President-Elect Calls Israel a 'Wound'
Margaret Thatcher dead after stroke
Death toll in Syria over 100,000 so far
19 firefighters killed in Arizona blaze
France deports Tunisian suspected of recruiting jihadists for Syria
2 Pussy Riot band arrested in Sochi
Adele named richest young musician with £45 million
Tropical Storm Andrea drenches Florida's west coast
UN withdraws Iran's invite to Syria peace talks
Afghan president delays signing US deal
Powerful new earthquake hits shattered Pakistan region
US strike kills 2 senior al-Shabaab militants in Somalia
Amazon's Bezos rescued by Ecuador Navy due to kidney stone
Captain, crew of South Korean ferry that sank arrested
Germany crush Brazil 7-1 to reach World Cup final
Communist rebels kill eight Philippine police
Egypt's Morsi faces trial for prison break
Iran nuclear talks enter crucial third day
At least 89 dead in China earthquakes
Jodi Arias eligible for death penalty, jury says
U.S. urges North Korea to release 85-year-old war veteran
Turkish riot police enter Taksim Square
Bolshoi director Sergei Filin confronts alleged acid attacker in court
Deadly plane crashes at San Francisco airport
Maya Angelou dies at age 86
François Hollande threatens legal action over affair claims
Hong Kong set for huge democracy rally
Egypt's Hosni Mubarak released from prison
Actor Bob Hoskins Dead at 71
UN Inspectors Visit Alleged Chemical Attack Site
Thailand's army declares martial law, denies coup
Demolition work to begin at stadium
Plane crash lands at San Francisco airport
Stocks End Mixed as Black Friday Unfolds
Blast in Pakistani city of Quetta kills at least 20
Nibali set for Tour de France glory
Woman dies riding roller coaster at Texas amusement park
British oil worker killed in Brazil
Jos. A. Bank buying Eddie Bauer in $825M deal
Scolari backs England to impress at World Cup
Nobel Prize winning author Doris Lessing dies
Woman dies in Channel charity swim
Dozens Killed in China Marketplace Bombing
At least 100 dead as typhoon batters Philippines
Siemens boss Peter Loescher to go after poor results
French Open live: Rafael Nadal beats Novak Djokovic in final
India's first post office savings bank ATM inaugurated in Chennai
Israel agrees to 24-hour Gaza truce
Twitter says images blocked in Venezuela
Sen. Mark Kirk announces support for same-sex marriage
Fast-Moving New Mexico Blaze Causes...
Earthquake of 6.9 magnitude strikes off Indonesia island
US committed to providing non-lethal aid to Syria opposition
Hosni Mubarak to be freed within days, lawyer says
G7 leaders agree on new sanctions against Russia
Syrian opposition seeks rebels' blessing to enter peace talks
High court checks President's recess appointment power
Abdel Fattah al-Sisi sworn in as Egypt president
Three arrested in dissident republican inquiry
Obama hails Mandela's inspiration effect
China airs confession by detained blogger
Three women, missing for years, found in US home
British stuntman dies in wingsuit mishap in Alps
Nazi war criminal dies
Harris faces three new sex assault charges
Eight missing after ships collide
Deutsche Telekom profit up, cuts outlook
South trains halted by suspected bomb
Japan mob loans scandal claims another lender
Eurozone debt crisis is over, says France's President
What makes India vote? Debate at Jaipur Literature Festival
Cyclone Phailin kills 14, leaves trail of destruction in India
Golden Dawn leader remanded in custody
'De-Americanized' World Needed after U.S. Shutdown, Says China Media
Missing Malaysia Airlines plane 'crashes off Vietnam'
French troop deployment lessens violence in Central African Republic
'Hundreds dead' in South Sudan clashes
Pistorius Neighbour Woke To 'Terrible Screams'
Powerful Blast Injures up to 40 in Prague
Interim deal struck on Iran's nuclear program
Microsoft To Cut 18,000 Jobs In Cost Plan
Iran to build 2nd nuclear power plant
Mohawk actor August Schellenberg dies at 77
French soldier stabbed on patrol in Paris
White diamond fetches record $34m at HK auction
Saudi Arabia rejects seat on UN Security Council
Car bomb near Iraq church kills at least 14
Italy finally forms new government
Israel, Hamas agree to Gaza 'humanitarian' pause
Malaysia: Chinese satellite found object in ocean
Three-year-old child in critical condition after 11 are injured in Chicago park shooting
Standard Chartered profit sags
Clashes in Turkey extend into night
Media: 2 rockets explode in Hof Ashkelon regional council
Dutch team heads for MH17 crash site
Rossi absent from Italy World Cup squad
Indian building collapse deaths rise to 14
Rwanda genocide trial opens in Paris, French first
Russell Whirlwind Century Stuns Tigers
Death toll in Bangladesh building collapse rises to 164
CII endorses underage marriage
Building collapses in Philadelphia, 14 pulled from rubble
JPMorgan to pay over $2.5 billion in Madoff fraud
Nineteen hurt in Mother's Day shooting in New Orleans
Four French journalists freed 10 months after being kidnapped in Syria
Treasury proposes 1.5% income tax raise in budget
Russian opposition leader Navalny briefly detained
Blast at Japan Chemical Plant, 5 Killed
US hijacker returns home from Cuba after 30 years
Netherlands Loses S&P Triple-A Credit Rating
6.8 quake in shattered Pakistan region
Pawar sparks row with 'bogus voting' remark, plays down it
Malaysian plane shot down over Ukraine
Pakistan PM heads to Kabul to push peace efforts
EU Ministers of Employment and Social policy to discuss employment boosting strategies
Gaza crisis UN Security Council calls for unconditional ceasefire
China market inferno kills 15
Bodies of Eight Beheaded Fishermen Found on Boat in Philippines
U.S. extends embassy closures due to 'serious threat'
AstraZeneca board rejects new Pfizer offer
Putin signs pardon for Mikhail Khodorkovsky
Turkish police launch assault on protesters in Istanbul park
North Korea fires short-range missiles into Sea of Japan
Madagascar presidential election kicks off
Forest team tackles fire drill in NE China
Anti-Hezbollah Protester Killed in Lebanon
Ukraine Refuses to Act Against Russian 'Provocation'
Hawaii passes gay marriage bill
Ethiopia: South Sudan Government, Rebels to Hold Talks
Hamas calls on Hezbollah to pull forces out of Syria
Hezbollah chief killed in Beirut
Starbucks starts paying UK corporation tax
Cop who pepper-sprayed students seeks workers comp, claims psychiatric injury
US actor Philip Seymour Hoffman found dead in New York
Turkish court cancels disputed Istanbul park project
Laos defence chief killed in plane crash
Helicopter Crash in Glasgow, Scotland
Russian journalist killed in Ukraine
Afghans Vote In Presidential Runoff
Bomb wounds 16 in eastern Afghanistan
Egypt extends presidential election voting 1 day
China welcomes US, Russia deal on Syria chemical weapons
Egyptians 'say yes' to new constitution
Four jailed for neo-Nazi killing spree that terrified Hungary's Roma
Cambodian strongman PM's party claims election win
Twitter Prices I.P.O. at $26 a Share
13:23 PSNI 'failed RUC officer families'
Obama hails responders at San Francisco plane crash
Stocks edge lower after earnings from retailers
Belgium King Albert II 'to abdicate'
Iranian rial climbs 10 percent after new president elected
Pistorius pleads not guilty to murder as trial starts
Police helicopter crashes on top of bar in Glasgow
Plane's pilots under scrutiny in mystery
Boston bombing suspect reported cornered on boat
German Chancellor Angela Merkel injured in ski accident in Switzerland
Chinese and American Ships Nearly Collide in South China Sea
French soldier stabbed on patrol in Paris
4 French journalists held hostage in Syria freed
US, Russia Closer to Agreement on Syrian Chemical Weapons
First book printed in the US sells for $14.2 million at Sotheby's auction
Duma faction leaders to submit statement on Crimean referendum
US, UN up pressure on Israel over Gaza
New Australia government upholds ban on Huawei
UN chief withdraws invitation for Iran to join Syria peace talks
Anthony Weiner's campaign manager calls it quits, report claims
Deadly tornado hits Oklahoma City suburb, at least 37 dead
Daughter and son-in-law accused of murdering elderly couple found buried in back garden after vanishing 15 years ago are remanded in custody
Egypt's Sisi sworn in as president
Japan, S Korean military planes defy China's new defence zone
Russia drops charges vs 16 Greenpeace activists
Taliban gunmen storm Pakistan prison, free hundreds
Brazilian Military ruler Paulo Malhaes dead
Israel: Syria using chem weapons
Yale University in lockdown amid gunman alert
Workers 'losing track of pensions'
Australian PM confident sounds are from Flight 370
Syrian opposition seeks rebels' blessing to enter peace talks
US issues global travel alert, cites al-Qaida threat
British Nobel-Winning Author Doris Lessing Dies
Mt Gox finds 200,000 'forgotten' bitcoins
Deadly Violence Marks Egypt Revolt Anniversary
Mandela's condition has 'worsened over past 48 hours'
NY Funeral Held for Woman Killed in DC Car Chase
China lands robot rover on moon
Florida Congressman Young Dies at 82
Eurozone unemployment at new record
Cyprus finance minister resigns
Couple found dead in swimming pool both drowned, tests reveal
4 officers injured in attack on Egyptian military intelligence offices
Death Toll in Pakistan Church Bombing Rises to 81
Earthquake hits near Indonesia islands
U.S. Senate backs border amendment to immigration bill
Fox News anchor freed after arrest for belligerence at airport
Two teenagers arrested after string of sex attacks on Manchester University campus
Philippe ascends throne of divided Belgium
Australian spirits are high aft...
Gunmen kill nine tourists in Pakistan
Duchess of Cambridge gives birth to baby boy
Planes in 'near miss' at Vietnam airport
Israelis, Palestinians set for talks on home turf
Councils 'unprepared' for deep cuts
India's Anti-Graft Party Forms Government in Delhi
Spanish government approves tight restrictions on abortion
Bangladesh factory collapse survivor gives up garment work
Cleveland kidnapper Castro commits suicide in prison cell
Teen stowaway 'traveled to Hawaii on plane wheel well'
Carphone Warehouse and Dixons reveal £3.8bn merger
MH370 search draws blank, debris may have sunk
Spain's opposition leaders call on Rajoy to resign
2 arrested as Dhaka building collapse toll reaches 332
Israel cabinet approves Palestinian prisoner release
UN urges Syria gas attack inspection
Astronauts make rare Christmas Eve spacewalk
Microsoft to lay off 18,000
Putin: Russia expects UN to denounce Kiev authorities' anti-constitutional actions
Hundreds believed injured in Texas fertiliser plant blast
Cambodia's Angkor temples added to Google's Street View
Zuma: Mandela 'responding better to treatment'
Israel's former FM Lieberman acquitted in fraud trial
Dolce and Gabbana sentenced to jail for tax evasion
40 still missing in deadly Canada oil train crash
2 Die and Many Are Hurt as Plane Crashes in San Francisco
NATO Soldier Killed In Taliban Attack In Afghanistan
At a Glance: Microsoft CEO Ballmer's ups and downs
Deadly explosion at Texas fertiliser plant
17 Hurt at New Orleans Parade Shooting
Democrat De Blasio elected NYC mayor
Egypt's interior minister survives bomb attack
Iran, six world powers clinch breakthrough nuclear deal
Shots fired at German ambassador's residence in Athens
Russian rocket explodes in Kazakhstan
'Never, ever give up': Diana Nyad completes historic Cuba-to-Florida swim
Government Shutdown Begins Over Health Care Feud
Afghanistan enjoys peaceful presidential elections
Two Indians among 39 killed in Kenya mall attack
3 Coalition Soldiers Killed in Kabul Car Bombing
Palestinian President greets released prisoners
Ukraine's opposition chief wants more protests
Envoy: New June 25 meeting to prepare Syria peace conference
Powerful quake hits Chile
Okla. inmate dies of heart attack after botched execution
Snowboarder buried when tunnel on Ore. mountain collapses; search resuming at dawn
Italian President Napolitano elected for second term
Eleven killed in forest fire in Chile
Nobel Prize for chemistry goes to computer whiz trio
Hundreds believed injured in Texas fertiliser plant blast
Bale scores on debut; Villarreal holds Madrid
UN War Crimes Court Convicts Six Bosnians Croats
Russia sent tanks against Ukraine
Snubs, surprises in Grammy nominations
Middle East peace talks: Israel promises release of Palestinian political prisoners after John Kerry discussions
South Korea looks to plastic surgery for new taxes
Putin demands US prove Syria chemical arms use
New Zealand legalizes same-sex marriage
Yacimovich urges cabinet to approve Palestinian prisoners release
Channel 2: Israel to free around 100 prisoners after talks resume
Ancient Tibetan Town in China Destroyed by Fire
Egypt declares month-long state of emergency
HM King Hamad Receives GCC Audit Courts Presidents
Austria: EU fails to reach deal on Syria arms embargo
Pro-Russians protesters storm Donetsk prosecutor's office in eastern Ukraine
Egypt's interior minister survives bomb attack
Scores killed in Baghdad car bombings
Shingles vaccine campaign to start
UN choppers strike at Ugandan rebels
Israel says it carried out joint missile test with US in Mediterranean
U.S. tells North Korea new missile launch would be "huge mistake"
DJ Dave Lee Travis Denies 15 Sex Charges
Rosetta comet-chasing spacecraft wakes up
Saudi Man Traveling With Pressure Cooker Arrested
15:08 'Comedy great' Mel Smith dies at 60
Twitter unveils IPO filing, aims to raise $1 billion
Chidambaram questions IMF's methodology for calculating India's growth projections
Co-op defends banking business after Moody's downgrade
Britain calls for de-escalation of tensions in Ukraine
US stock futures edge up ahead of jobs report
UN launches Philippines aid appeal
AstraZeneca to buy Bristol out of diabetes venture for up to $4.1 billion
Zuma heralds 'our icon' on South Africa's day of prayer for Mandela
Rescuers look for pilot in deadly NY Angel Flight
Death sentence for 152 soldiers over mutiny
Rousseff set to address Brazil protests
Doctors deny Mandela in 'vegetative state'
Mexico's Sinaloa drug chief arrested
UK Parliament blocks British military action against Syria
Matt Smith leaving lead role in BBC's 'Doctor Who'
Senate may vote on gun reform Wednesday
Strong Explosion Hits Hizballah Stronghold In Beirut
Russian protest leader says trial is Putin's revenge
Palestinians welcome Arab Idol winner coming home in Gaza
Heavy gunfire reported at airport in DR Congo capital
North Korea says detained American tourist to face trial
Last picture of couple feared dead after Malaysian Airlines flight 'disappears' in South China Sea
At least 32 dead, 170 missing in ferry disaster
More than 20 dead as anti-China riots spread in Vietnam
Iran condemns alleged Israeli airstrike on Syria
Microsoft To Cut 18,000 Jobs In Cost Plan
Nidal Hasan found guilty of killing 13 at Fort Hood base
FTC Accuses T-Mobile of Knowingly Billing Customers for Hundreds of Millions in Bogus Charges
Court clears Dana's brother of all counts of historic sex abuse
Fatalities reported in Fort Hood shooting
Syria Allows UN Visit To Chemical Attack Site
Insurgents battle Afghan forces near Kabul airport
Boeing 747 jumbo jet stuck after mistakenly landing at tiny Kansas airport
Rescuers search for survivors after 15 die in India building collapse
FEMA OKs aid for Texas plant blast
Thai protesters call general strike
Indian PM to step down
Cars plunge into river as US bridge collapses
Gunmen storm Nairobi mall, 15 killed
Typhoon Rammasun death toll hits 33 in China
Boston police say 3 taken into custody in Marathon bombing
Egypt announces one-month state of emergency nationwide
Raging, fast-moving California wildfire threatens Yosemite National Park
Tokyo stocks open lower on gains lock
Kerry in Japan amid N Korea tensions
Nduom hopeful in outcome of National Economic Forum
South Africa prepares funeral for the ages for Mandela
Meltdown in Taiwan parliament over nuclear poll
Snowden Nominated for Nobel Prize
Obama Urged to Prod China on Human Rights
Vince Cable worried by Help to Buy home ownership bubble
Facebook Removes Beheading Video, Reopens Debate
Connecticut passes stringent gun controls in response to Sandy Hook massacre
UN Security Council holds emergency meeting over DR Congo fighting
Report of two explosions at finish line of Boston Marathon
Taliban release video of US soldier's handover
Egypt's second try at new constitution 'an improvement'
Obama Visits Mandela's Robben Island Cell
Israeli Military Starts Ground Offensive in Gaza
Deaths in Pakistan church bombing rise to 43
Malaysia elections: Malaysians vote with power at stake for first time
Kerry in first trip to Egypt since ouster of Mursi
Prince George's Christening Under Way
Typhoon-struck Philippine city begins mass burial
Across US, people rally for 'Justice for Trayvon'
Over 100 Dead as Typhoon Slams Central Philippines
Bank of England names Cunliffe as deputy governor
US golfer Phil Mickelson wins The Open
Vietnam hands 5 heroin traffickers death penalty
Obama: Sexual assault threatens trust in military
Saudi women drive in protest with little problem
Syrian TV: Bombing in Damascus Kills 13 People
UNICEF calls for immediate safe access to women, children in Homs
Algerian president suffers 'mini stroke'
South Africa remembers Nadine Gordimer
Redford addresses PC convention ahead of leadership review
Hagel laments "political" changes to US defence budget
Sony to axe PC unit in major business overhaul
Two blasts hit Boston Marathon finish line, at least two killed
Cambodian opposition claims surprise win ahead of result
Former Malaysian PM Mahathir quits as adviser to state oil giant Petronas
Putin defiant as Crimea votes to return to Russia
Police: Gunman killed 6 in California shootings
French FM Fabius says Iran nuclear talks end without deal
Police detain Spain train crash driver as suspect
Malaysia Airlines lost plane: Nations rush to solve 'unprecedented mystery'
Kvitova blitzes Bouchard in a lopsided final
North Korea deports detained US war veteran
Nelson Mandela celebrates 95th birthday in hospital
Sachin Tendulkar to get Bharat Ratna, India's highest civilian honour
All gunmen in attack on Afghan presidential palace killed
Dana's brother John Brown cleared of two sexual abuse charges
Jury to get Zimmerman case
Unemployment Hits Record High in Europe
Egypt's Presidential Vote Goes to a 3rd Day
N. Korea may be preparing new nuclear test-report
U.S. regulator approves Boeing 787 battery system design changes
Searchers hoping pings come from lost Malaysian airliner
Stocks buoyed by Summers' withdrawal from Fed race
South Sudan (Republic of): South Sudan rivals discuss ceasefire, detainees
Iran's Rouhani says nuclear rights are 'red lines'
Court orders Mubarak freed
Mandela makes final journey home in SAfrica
South Korea declares expanded ADIZ overlapping with other zones
Mandela's family thanks nation and world for support
Engineers start ambitious Costa Concordia salvage off Italian island
Zimmerman acquitted in slaying
Myanmar welcomes more China exchanges
Chemical arms watchdog wins Nobel Peace Prize
Pope Calls For Peace During West Bank Visit
Poroshenko says Ukraine will not give up Crimea
Dubai rings in the new year with largest fireworks show ever
Kerry Heads To Geneva For Iran Nuclear Talks
Syria action 'would not cause radicalisation'
Nawaz Sharif declares victory in Pak elections
Missing yacht found, but no crew
Peaches Geldof dies aged 25
Cameron loses parliamentary vote on Syria military action
Biden: No doubt Syria regime used nerve agent
7 killed in California drive-by shooting
Israel urges powers to be tough in nuclear talks with Iran
Syria Allows UN Visit To Chemical Attack Site
Bank of England says no to more QE
The race factor in George Zimmerman's trial
Aircraft crashes at base in Afghanistan
Ukraine rivals sign deal to end crisis
Judge Strikes Down Utah's Same-Sex Marriage Ban
UK Parliament blocks British military action against Syria
Mattel 2Q profit falls, Barbie sales slide again
Ukraine v Russia: Diminishing Russian International Influence?
Obama urges military action against Syria, but will seek Congress' OK
Immigration reform passes key Senate test
Associated Press: Pro-Russia demonstrations break out in Ukraine
Syrian Conflict Death Toll Now over 93 000, UN Says
World Concern over Ouster of Egypt's President
Troops sent to protect embassy
France to await U.S. congressional decision on Syria
U.S., French presidents vow to punish Syrian government
Honda, Nissan and Toyota in Massive Recall over Airbag Inflators
Shashi Tharoor hospitalised after chest pain
Revelers around the world ring in 2014
Thai protesters obstruct vote; 1 dead in violence
Death confirmed in Canada train blast
Hot-air balloon crashes in Va.; 3 missing
France waits on US vote over Syria strikes
Kidnapped French journalists found on Turkey's Syrian border
The Caucus: Obama to Unveil Climate Plan on Tuesday
US-Russia reach agreement on Syria
US dollar dips as Lawrence Summers quits Federal Reserve race
Syrian prime minister survives assassination attempt
Afghanistan begins run-off votes for Presidential election
Bloody Days in Sudan
Live Blog: George Zimmerman Not Guilty
US captures al-Qaeda leader in Libya; raids Somalia
The US must show evidence of Syria's use of chemical weapons
Sri Lankan asylum seekers facing criminal investigation after being handed back by Australian authorities
Swedish court upholds detention order on WikiLeaks founder Assange
Police vow to solve shootings of 19 in New Orleans
Myanmar to free political prisoners
UK urges countries over Syria aid
Syria mocks Egypt Muslim Brotherhood model
Several Indian sailors dead after submarine explodes and sinks
Obama 'concerned' about Los Angeles airport shooting
Egypt call for calm after deadly Christian-Muslim clashes
Jordan elected to UN security council seat that Saudi Arabia rejected
Fresh gunfire at Karachi airport
Crisis-hit Maldives holds new presidential poll
Author Nadine Gordimer dies at 90
Actor James Gandolfini, 51, dies of cardiac arrest
Fire at hospital for elderly kills 21 in South Korea
More than 60 killed at Iraq funeral
Peaceful anti-G8 protest held in Belfast
Egypt orders arrest of Brotherhood leaders
Malaysia PM says still no sign of missing plane
Malaysia Airlines passenger plane feared crashed
Video: Video: Tornado destruction in Carney, Oklahoma
Pope to start delicate Middle East trip in Jordan
Gunmen Attack Shi'ite Mosque In Kabul
7.2 magnitude earthquake strikes Philippines
Video: Turkey showdown: Riot police take on protesters
Turkish protesters refuse to leave Istanbul park despite Erdogan's pledge
Libya Army Chief Quits after Unrest
Vladimir Putin attends Victory Day parade in Moscow
Facebook starts to unveil 'new home on Android'
Titanic Violin Sells for Over $1.6M at Auction
Xi: China confident of sustainable economic growth
Riot police disperse protesters in Istanbul park
South Korea sunken ferry death toll 'reaches 50'
Taliban video shows handover of US soldier
Afghan election board to release final results
President Obama on third stop in trip to Asia
Yahoo! confirms Tumblr deal for $1.1 billion
Mandela responding to treatment, South Africa's Zuma says
'I have terrible nightmares - I can smell blood': Recap as Oscar Pistorius begins murder trial testimony
George Zimmerman Verdict Propels Cable News Into Talkradio Mode
George Osborne says deficit can be eradicated without further tax rises
Death toll rises to 179 in China quake
Sir Alex Ferguson autobiography overview: Wayne Rooney urged Manchester United to sign Mesut Ezil 'before asking to leave'
Six rescued after boat capsizes in Dublin Bay
Jewels worth 40m stolen in Cannes
Putin opens Paralympics as protest staged
US child prostitution crackdown leads to FBI making 150 arrests
South Korea vows fast response to North; U.S. positions destroyer
Japanese FM visits Iran for talks
Gunmen storm hotel, kill foreigners
Meriam Ibrahim: Sudanese apostasy woman 're-arrested' with family at airport
Ukraine's opposition chief wants more protests
Mandela in Hospital for 3rd Day
Google officially unveils Android TV
Flood alerts issued as rain sweeps across country
Thai prime minister dissolves parliament
Egypt: Protesters storm Muslim Brotherhood's HQ
Dozens still missing after boat sinks in Indonesia
Bomb explodes near Israel patrol in Golan; no casualties
Snowden 'given refugee document by Ecuador'
Flight from Malaysia to Beijing has lost contact
MISSING MH370: Planes sent to check 2 objects
Saudi women drive in protest with little problem
Hollande arrives for US state visit
Boston bombing suspects not connected with Chechnya
President Obama warns Russia to stay out of Ukraine
Blasts kill 5 at Modi rally in Patna
French foreign minister: Iran nuclear deal reached
U.N. Chief Ban Ki-moon Condemns Crackdown in Egypt
Bolivian leader's plane rerouted on Snowden fear
Woman dies and man seriously injured after shooting in Newport street
Egypt rival rallies planned amid soaring tensions
Petra Kvitova crushes Eugenie Bouchard to claim second Wimbledon
Feds: Man planned Kan. airport attack
Nelson Mandela Goes Home After Hospital Stay
NATO Says Russian Action Threatens Peace in Europe
Queen, leaders to bid farewell to Thatcher
Soldier hacked to death in London
Huge Turnout in Malaysian National Elections
Muslim Brotherhood banned in Egypt
Fed expected to maintain stimulus
The impact of sanctions on Russia
Brazil protests tap into frustration of have-nots
South Korean Soldier Kills Comrades And Flees
Red Cross staff detained for 'espionage' in Ukraine
BJP may win more than 40 seats in UP Survey
Profile: Egyptian president-elect Abdel Fattah al-Sisi
Andy Murray wins historic Wimbledon title
Europe and China Agree to Settle Solar Panel Fight
Cannes thief stole jewels from hotel's Leviev exhibition
Egyptian court jails 102 Morsi supporters
Vladimir Putin Asks Parliament For Permit to Send Troops to Crimea
28 Wounded in Blasts at Bangkok Protest Site
Oscar Pistorius 'accidentally fired bullet in crowded restaurant - then asked friend to take blame'
Indian minister's wife died 'unnatural' death, autopsy shows
Russia, Syria Work on 'Concrete' Chemical Weapons Plan
NYC buildings explosion kills 4 others missing
Iran nuclear deadline extended to Nov 24
Indian Air Force inducts first three C-17s into service
Worker dies at World Cup stadium
Pakistan condemns Israeli aggression in Gaza
Ukrainian president compares situation in Kiev to Nazi Germany
How does world's cheapest car do in crash test?
Dozens die in Egypt bloodbath
Massive search launched for 3 teens feared kidnapped in West bank
Ireland free from bailout shackles but not out of woods
srael naval strike kills children on Gaza beach
Debt inspectors reach agreement with Greece
Kangaroo Court in Eastern India Allegedly Orders Gang Rape of Woman
North Korea may be preparing new nuclear test
World waits to meet new prince
17 Wounded in Shooting at New Orleans Parade
Russia seeks answers over deadly plane crash
Sichuan earthquake leaves devastation - in pictures
Watchdog gets details of Syrian chemical arsenal
Nigerian girls missing for a month
Murray wins Wimbledon title ends Britains 77year agony
US: Russia Massing Troops on Ukraine Border
Google threatened with contempt of court over privacy breach
Forest Whitaker 'We All Share a Common Bond'
Syria warring sides not in same room for start of talks
Pakistan military says officer killed by Indian fire in Kashmir
BA jet makes emergency landing after engine fire
Polling stations open at Ukrainian presidential election
What we know so far about chemical weapons in Syria's civil war
Egypt Tense as Army Deadline Looms
Arizona jury finds Arias eligible for death penalty in ex-boyfriend's slaying
Mitch McConnell tied in new poll. Does he miss Ashley Judd yet?
Royal baby on the way; Catherine enters hospital in labor
New major earthquake rocks southwest Pakistan
Obama meets with Mandela family
Qantas closer to foreign ownership
Morsi backers defiant in face of Egypt govt threat
Anger spreads over Korean ferry sinking
India's ND Tiwari marries son's mum
Bangladesh collapse search over; death toll 1,127
UK's Cameron: Syria, Russia must show chemical arms proposal is genuine
Kremlin: Putin yet to decide on using Russian troops in Ukraine
North Korean leader sends 'special envoy' to China
State Dept. issues wide travel alert, says terror attack possible
France drops terror charges against musician
Turkish PM Erdogan says "duty" to order crackdown on Istanbul park protest
Nigerian schoolgirls: Boko Haram releases new video, offers trade of schoolgirls for militant prisoners
Oil Prices Mixed in Asian Trade
Headlines in several Iranian newspapers on Oct 19
Top Asian News 7:48 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News at 11:00 p.m. GMT
China treasury bond futures close higher Tuesday
Indian stocks close lower
Spanish Nurse First to Contract Ebola Outside Africa
Pope urges action on climate change in draft encyclical
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on Sept 27
Headlines in major Iranian newspapers on Sept 24
Nigeria Confirms 2 New Ebola Cases
IS kidnap 90 Christians in Syria: monitor
Inspired Nishikori ready for London ATP final
Top Asian News at 10:00 a.m. GMT
21 killed in Tunisia museum gun attack
Oil prices mixed in Asian trade
Kerry cautious before new Iran talks, cites 'important gaps'
Gaza's summer training camps: 'No time left for playing'
Singapore shares open 0.19% higher on Thursday
How the Dow Jones industrial average fared on Wednesday
Who was 'Jihadi John?'
Target raises 2015 earnings forecast after profit jumps
How the Dow Jones industrial average did Monday
Shi'ite militia kill dozens of Iraqi Sunnis in mosque shooting
Twitter Sues US Government Over Surveillance
China Hushen 300 index futures open mixed Friday
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Fared on Friday
How the Dow Jones industrial average fared on Thursday
Top Asian News 11:42 a.m. GMT
Iran, IAEA officials meet ahead of March nuclear deadline: ISNA
How the Dow Jones industrial average fared Tuesday
Headlines in several Iranian newspapers on Oct 19
Indian stocks close higher
10 Things to Know for Today
Foreign exchange rates in Thailand
Singapore shares open 0.19% higher on Thursday
Pakistan: Pakistan: Daily Emergency and Response Situational Information Report, 22 September 2014
Bombings kill 19 people in Iraq
Your morning read for Sunday, July 12, 2015 in Toronto
Top Asian News 7:48 a.m. GMT
News of Terrorism and the Israeli-Palestinian Conflict (June 24-30, 2015)
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Fared Friday
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Did Thursday
Finance News Update, what you need to know
US Attorney general Eric Holder to resign
U.S., EU Boost Sanctions On Russia
10 Things to Know for Thursday
Oil prices down in Asian trade
How the Dow Jones industrial average did Friday
Foreign exchange rates in Singapore
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Fared on Friday
Top Asian News 8:39 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News at 9:30 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News 1:25 p.m. GMT
Top Asian News 4:39 p.m. GMT
Top Asian News 8:39 a.m. GMT
The Avengers star Patrick Macnee dies aged 93
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Did Wednesday
Your morning read for Monday, March 30, 2015 in Toronto
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Fared on Monday
How the Dow Jones industrial average fared Tuesday
How the Dow Jones industrial average did Thursday
Dead comet with skull face to hurtle by Earth on Halloween
Hajj to go ahead despite crane collapse
Oil prices rise further in Asia
Ukraine: Latest from OSCE Special Monitoring Mission (SMM) to Ukraine based on information received as of 18:00 (Kyiv time), 28 September 2014
71 killed in Syria bombing
61 rebels killed in military operations
Egypt court confirms Morsi death sentence
AT&amp;T helps U.S. spying on Internet: N.Y.Times
Top Asian News at 9:00 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News at 2:00 a.m. GMT
Oil falls in Asian trade
Pope meets Muslims in Central African Republic
China stocks close higher on Friday
Powerful earthquake hits Nepal
Facebook Activates Safety Feature After Yola Bombing
Avengers star Patrick Macnee has died at the age of 93
Canada's Pendrel, Batty win gold, silver in mountain bike
Isis brings its war to Lebanon - and it could be key to a masterplan
7.9-magnitude quake hits Nepal
US House Republicans eye reluctant Ryan for speaker
Ceasefire in Gaza underway
Suspected US drone strike kills 6 in Pakistan
Top Asian News 4:39 p.m. GMT
Top Asian News at 4:30 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News 7:48 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News 8:39 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News 3:12 a.m. GMT
Top Asian News 8:39 a.m. GMT
Singapore shares open 0.06% lower on Tuesday
Singapore shares open 0.06% lower on Tuesday
China treasury bond futures close mixed Wednesday
At least seven dead, scores missing after mudslide in Guatemala
Nigeria declares a state of emergency over Ebola crisis
Foreign exchange rates in Singapore
How much do you know about Secret Service?
Yemen: Security Council Press Statement on Yemen
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Fared on Monday
How the Dow Jones Industrial Average Fared Wednesday
71 killed in Syria bombing
5 things to know for your New Day -- Wednesday, July 15
Ebola outbreak: Get up to speed
Chinese shares open lower Friday
WHO: Ebola Death Toll Reaches 932
Attorney General Eric Holder to Resign
Female Suicide Bombers Attack in Nigeria
2nd US health care worker tests positive for Ebola
Headlines in several Iranian newspapers on Oct 19
AbbVie cools on $55bn Shire deal after US tax changes
Austria Finds Up to 50 Bodies Thought to Be of Migrants in Truck
Sierra Leone President Declares State of Emergency over Ebola
Ukraine: OSCE Special Monitoring Mission to Ukraine Deputy Chief Monitor to visit southeast Ukraine
US State Department releases Hillary Clinton emails
Chinese yuan weakens to 6.3459 against USD Friday
China treasury bond futures close mixed Friday
5 things you need to know this weekend
7.9-magnitude quake hits Nepal
US Approves $225 Million for Israel's Iron Dome
China issues yellow alert for typhoon Kalmaegi
Fourth Korean dies in MERS outbreak
China treasury bond futures open slightly lower Wednesday
South Korea cuts key rate as MERS feared to slow recovery
5 dead as tornadoes blast central U.S.
Yemen rebel delegation arrives for Geneva peace talks
Chinese yuan weakens to 6.1402 against USD Monday
A tale of two Trumps
Saudi airstrikes in Yemen's capital kill 29
7.5-magnitude quake hits 35 km east of Lamjung, Nepal: USGS
Nigerian president orders probe into mosque attack
Islamic State militants bulldoze ancient Nimrud city
Iran nuclear talks shift into top gear
UN takes over peacekeeping in Central African Republic
US Launches First Airstrikes Against IS In Syria
German intelligence reportedly spied on Kerry, Clinton calls
At least 367 dead after quake hits southwest China
At least 150 dead after quake hits southwest China
Iceland lowers volcano alert to orange
No Clinton apology over her use of private email
S. Korea Reports 7th MERS Death, Vows to End Outbreak
Militant attack from Afghanistan kills FC soldier in Balochistan
22 dead as bus falls into gorge in J&K
Computer glitch grounds US flights
occupied Palestinian territory: Saudi Arabia promises $500 million for Gaza rebuilding
Ebola patient in Dallas takes turn for worse
5.7-magnitude quake hits 140 km WSW of Naze, Japan -- USGS
At least 39 killed in Iranian plane crash
Militants attack UN as Mali hunts jihadist nightclub killers
6.6-magnitude earthquake strikes off Indonesia
Greece defaults on IMF payment
ISIS leader hit by airstrike
Tokyo shares open higher tracing U.S. gains
Iran hardliners attack nuclear deal
Taliban bomb kills 29 in Afghanistan
Turkish Airlines plane makes emergency landing after engine fire
Turks help Iraqi Kurds fight Islamic State in Syria
U.S. launches airstrike against al-Qaida leader in Libya: Pentagon
Israel renews air strikes on Gaza after rocket fire
Yemen separatists suspend participation in UN-sponsored talks
Sierra Leone to Cordon off 3 Areas to Stop Ebola
Israeli police shoot, kill Palestinian woman in Hebron
Greece delays €300m payment to IMF
Hong Kong stocks close higher by midday
Denmark to hold general election on June 18
Could Volkswagen scandal be diesel's death knell?
Netanyahu: Iran Nuclear Plan Threatens World
Burundi police fire tear gas in protest against president
UK to launch air strikes against IS in Syria
Google's self-driving cars involved in 11 crashes
Hawaii bracing as first hurricane in 22 years approaches
Israeli forces detain 12 Palestinians overnight
Ebola survivor donates blood to Ebola patient
Iraq suicide bomber kills at least 12
Indian stocks close lower
Tokyo shares open higher on buoyant U.S. market
Japan imposes sanctions on Russia over Ukraine
Ukraine Minister Denounces Russian Aid Convoy
Sierra Leone Reaches Final Day of Ebola Lockdown
6.1-magnitude quake hits Bay Area
Tokyo shares open higher following strong U.S. performance
Tianjin blasts death toll rises to 114, 70 missing
Jim Carrey's girlfriend found dead
Russia takes bite out of McDonald's in 'new Cold War'
Oil prices down in Asian trade
Israeli forces detain 2 Palestinians in overnight arrest raids
Why Hong Kong's protests are a big deal
Police clear protesters from Hong Kong HQ
Nepal quake toll crosses 5,000
Hajj to go ahead despite crane collapse
5 Irish students killed in Berkeley balcony collapse, officials say
13 Killed in Mosque Bombings in Nigeria
Secretary Kerry's Travel to Russia and Turkey
Live TV Now Focus on Europe 05:00 UTC DW News
Gaza cease-fire takes hold as negotiators gather
8.1-magnitude earthquake hits Nepal
Nigeria confirms 1 more Ebola case
Five hurt in car attack on pedestrians in Jerusalem
Avengers star Patrick Macnee has died at the age of 93
China stocks close lower Thursday
Three killed in California shooting
Suspected Boko Haram attacks kill dozens in Nigeria
Dennis Kimetto sets new marathon world record in Berlin
North Korean pair swim across sea border to defect to South Korea
US stocks slide in midday trade; Airlines sink
US STOCKS-Wall St jumps 2 pct; eyes on China
IED attack kills two people in Iraq's Baghdad
Chinese premier meets British chancellor
Thousands of Syrian Kurds flee into Turkey to escape Islamic State offensive
China: At least 10 dead in SW China rainstorms
Thousands of migrants and refugees arrive in Germany
Two killed, seventeen injured in Raiwind road accident
Protests mar opening of World Indigenous Games
Syrian Arab Republic: United Nations Under-Secretary-General for Humanitarian Affairs and Emergency Relief Coordinator, Stephen O'Brien statement to the press on Syria
Ebola death toll rises to at least 2,296
9 Killed in Fighting in Eastern Ukraine
Israeli settlers set ablaze Palestinian land in West Bank
Airstrikes, gunfight kill 21 militants in North Waziristan
Over 2,000 migrants rescued from wooden boats in Mediterranean
Boston bombing jury has question hours into deliberations
Prosecutors: Germanwings co-pilot treated for suicidal tendencies
Floyd Mayweather will fight Manny Pacquiao in Las Vegas in May
Palestinians and Israel agree Gaza ceasefire
8.1-magnitude earthquake hits Nepal
UN Peacekeepers Deploy In Central African Republic
Typhoon Koppu Hits Philippines
Israeli forces arrest 21 Palestinians overnight, clash with locals
Lewis Hamilton wins inaugural Russian GP
EU to slap new sanctions on Russia
UN Security Council urges Yemen's Houthis to end...
North Korea plans talks with South Korea next week
Marching for climate change
Investigators 90% sure bomb downed Russian flight in Egypt
Airstrikes, gunfight kill 21 militants in North Waziristan
Israeli security forces arrest 8 Palestinians in overnight West Bank sweeps
6 killed in Afghan capital mosque attack
2 dead, 8 injured in central Israel traffic accident
US launches new round of air strikes around Iraq dam
Rev.'s Early Reads: Sept. 3rd, 2015
Markets Live: China drags
Afghan talks on unity government collapse
Nepal earthquake death toll tops 5,500; 11,440 injured
Palestinian Shot by Israeli Police in East Jerusalem Dies
West Ham beats Newcastle 2-0 in Premier League
Nepal quake kills more than 1200
Greece's debt drama: What you need to know
Ebola outbreak: Get up to speed with the latest
Tropical Storm Dolly Heads for Mexico's Coast
Suspected Boko Haram attacks kill dozens in Nigeria
Strong earthquake shakes eastern Japan
Hospital: Teen wounded in US school shooting dies
Saudi-Led Coalition Resumes Airstrikes on Yemeni Capital
Hong Kong democracy groups to take to streets as key vote looms
UK 'concern' over Hong Kong protests
21 killed in Tunisia museum gun attack
Burkina Faso coup leader in custody
Typhoon Mujigae lands on South China
Boston bombing jury begins death penalty deliberations
Mixed Progress Reported in Fight Against Islamic State
Tropical storm pounds Taiwan, Philippines
Putin calls for broad international anti-terror front
New Zealand and Australia meet for perfect Rugby World Cup final
Two officers shot in Ferguson
4 Afghan soldiers killed in Kabul bomb attack
Malaysia to hold memorial service to remember MH17 victims
Somali man arrested after attempted rape
Thousands flee as typhoon hits north Philippines
Greeks heading to Brussels for crucial talks
Russian roulette in Syria
Police: Indiana man confesses to all 7 killings
Thousands in Hungary march against Internet tax
Indian police arrest six over ink attack
Three Turkish soldiers killed in PKK attack in southeast
German police arrest Al Jazeera's Ahmed Mansour
Pope secretly met Kentucky clerk over gay marriage licenses
Israel, Hamas agree to cease-fire
China treasury bond futures close higher Tuesday
EU expands sanction list against Russia, Ukraine
Prosecutor: Germanwings Co-Pilot Feared Going Blind
Obama to Wind Up Landmark Kenya Visit With National Address
Kentucky clerk Kim Davis could head back to court for altering marriage licenses
China blast death toll reaches 112
Soros ready to invest $1 billion in Ukraine
Iraq: Iraq Crisis Situation Report No. 22 (22 - 28 November 2014)
Islamic State issues video of beheading of US hostage
Chinese shares open higher Monday
Prince William begins Japan tour
EU to Prepare Possible New Sanctions on Russia Over Ukraine
6.0-magnitude quake hits Indonesia -- USGS
Myanmar ferry capsizes; 33 dead
South Sudan: South Sudan Crisis Situation Report No. 58 (as of 16 October 2014)
Egypt pays back $2.5 billion to Qatar
19 killed in Tunis museum attack
7.3-magnitude quake hits devastated Nepal
Third student dies in Washington school shooting
The Riyadh Conference on Yemen
Indian stocks close higher
Live Blog: Iraq In Turmoil
6.7 magnitude earthquake strikes western Greece: USGS
The lessons of history for Jeremy Corbyn
UK 'concern' over Hong Kong protests
Israel Police Clash With Palestinians in Jerusalem
Sierra Leone vice-president asks US for asylum
Guineans Go to the Polls in Presidential Elections
German lawmakers to vote on Greece bailout deal
Egyptian court sentences 3 Al Jazeera journalists to 3 years in prison
Prince William of Britain arrives in Beijing
NASA releases more images of Pluto
Taliban bomb kills 29 in Afghanistan
Israeli Spy Jonathan Pollard Released By US
Pentagon confirms US general killed in Kabul attack
Djokovic and Sharapova win China Open
Japan Prime Minister comes to U.S. for nationwide tour
Teachers steal the show
Sweden recognizes Palestinian state
China tells others don't 'stir up trouble' in South China Sea
Iraqi forces break militant siege of Shia town
Saudi-led air strikes in Yemen, raids kill more than 90
Five killed in Saudi Arabia shooting
Manchester United sign Falcao, Blind
At least 55 killed in suicide blast on Pakistani side of Wagah border
Vice President of Bolivia to visit China
Senate Republicans Plan Vote on Iran Nuclear Deal
Islamic State militants kill 40 Iraqi troops
Islamic State posts second propaganda video of UK hostage
Hillary Clinton stumps for Iowa Democrats, and herself
Japan says outraged by killing of Japanese man in Bangladesh
09:01 25 killed in Somalia hotel attack
China treasury bond futures close higher Wednesday
Hundreds of Ukranian troops retreat across border to Russia
South Sudan: South Sudan Crisis Situation Report No. 58 (as of 16 October 2014)
US, EU expand sanctions on Russia
Hillary Clinton refuses to apologize for using private email system
Israel demolishes homes of Palestinian suspects in teen killing
NJ nurse criticizes her quarantine
Typhoon heads for south China
Pakistan to screen passengers in plans to tackle Ebola
Police fire tear gas against Hong Kong protesters
People found in container 'of Indian origin'
Iran, Tajikistan sign cooperation agreement
Texas hospital worker tests positive for Ebola
Magnitude 7.9 earthquake hits Nepal
Turkey 'exploits' Syrian refugees
China disagrees with U.S. sanctions program on overseas cyber attackers
occupied Palestinian territory: IOF Arrest Two Minors on Gaza Border and Abuse One of Them
Britain joins fight against Islamic State group
U.S. drone strike kills 4 in NW Pakistan
Death toll in Nepal earthquake rises over 7,000
New York doctor tests positive for Ebola
Chinese manufacturing suffers another setback with a slowdown in October
Typhoon Koppu smashes into northern Philippines
Burkina Faso coup leader in custody
Who will win the 2014 Nobel Peace Prize?
11 held on multiple child sex charges in Manchester
38 IS militants killed in clashes, air strikes in Iraq
Djokovic wins Italian Open
Fierce fighting shakes Kobani
12 Dead, Despite Cease-fire in East Ukraine
Greece concerns drag on Asia markets
Parents of French air-crash victim arrive in Taiwan
Asia shares swing higher as China nears seven year high
Islamic State Group Kills 50 Iraqis
Heavy weaponry withdrawal locked in stalemate in eastern Ukraine
Turkey's Erdogan Calls for No-Fly Zone in Syria
Chinese vice premier meets former U.S. state secretary
Four dead as rain drenches the East Coast
Nepal quake: Survivors tell of Everest avalanche horror
Australian fishermen lure rare monster shark
Palestinian Authority slams Hamas executions
Nepal quake toll passes 7000
Funeral of MH17 victim Liam Sweeney takes place in Newcastle
Queen Mary 2 searches for missing crewmember near Canada
Donald Trump sweeps into Iowa on his personal helicopter
Spain to play England friendly if it qualifies for Euro 2016
West Ham beats Newcastle 2-0 in Premier League
Israeli leader urges calm in Jerusalem
Waiting for the next president
Mixed Progress Reported in Fight Against Islamic State
Hong Kong shares finish lower
Israeli police shoot, kill Palestinian woman in Hebron
Egypt sentences Al Jazeera journalists to jail
Iran says world powers are divided and backtracking in nuclear talks
US economy contracts in first quarter
Your letters: Your letters Show mercy, Mr. President
occupied Palestinian territory: Israel warns on security as Gaza truce talks resume
Contributing Op-Ed Writer: The Roberts Court's Reality Check
IED attack kills two people in Iraq's Baghdad
Kurds see Turkey impeding Islamic State fight
Tunisia museum attack: At least 17 killed, 3 at large
Strong typhoon lashes northeast Philippines, two dead
Greek Finance Minister says bailout deal will take country forward
China is immensely important partner in Africa's development
Era Ends as South Carolina Lowers Confederate Flag
US doctor infected with Ebola in stable condition
Togo opposition rejects presidential election results
Markets Live: Resources in retreat
US stocks open modestly higher in quiet trading
Angelina Jolie makes powerful plea for Syrian refugees
occupied Palestinian territory: EU warns Gaza violence could return in 'months'
German press agency hails Zarif as architect of Iran nuclear deal
Iran wants sanctions lifted before nuclear deal: official
Arrest warrant issued for Pistorius
Boko Haram militants storm town in NE Nigeria
occupied Palestinian territory: Palestinian killed in clash with Israel forces in Jenin: medics
American doctor stricken with Ebola is improving
India's top court orders investigation into job scam, deaths
Chinese military reaches out amid South China Sea tensions
Federal autopsy ordered in Missouri teen's death
Montenegrin police fire teargas to disperse opposition
US STOCKS-Wall St lower as investors await word from Yellen
Hawaii braces as hurricanes close in
Ebola patient in Texas dies says US hospital
Israeli army ordered to resume strikes against targets in Gaza after rocket attacks
Hong Kong protesters demand Leung Chun-ying resigns as city leader
North Korea defectors swim across sea border to South Korea
Egyptian court sentences 3 Al Jazeera journalists to 3 years in prison
Liberia: Runaway Ebola patients found
Terrorism attack feared 'within days'
Israel and Hamas to resume indirect talks on October 27
China's stock market meltdown
Pope Francis addresses Congress
European powers, Iran make little progress in nuclear talks
Death toll in Nepal earthquake tops 8,000
Ebola cases rise sharply in western Sierra Leone
Israel and Palestinians reportedly agree to 72-hour ceasefire
Iran nuclear deal outline - is the marathon finally over?
Hungarian state still hungry
Bomb attacks in Bangladesh leave 1 dead, over 100 injured
Hong Kong protesters mass for peace rally
Obama: Ebola Threat to 'Regional, Global Security'
Baltimore mayor lifts curfew 6 days after riots
Arab League to back Iraqi, US campaign against Islamic State
Iran summons Pakistani ambassador over border killings
Jason Day holds two-shot lead over Jordan Spieth at PGA Championship
Jeremy Clarkson's road to ruin on Top Gear
At least eight Afghan soldiers killed in 'friendly fire' incident
European tax meeting in Malta
PM Nawaz sees polio-free Pakistan in six months
Ashya King's parents freed from jail in Spain
Hong Kong Police Arrest Dozens of Student Protesters
US ramps up response to Ebola crisis
Israel Detains 14 Palestinians in West Bank, Summons Man
Bribery scandal shakes up Brazil's presidential elections
Four civilians killed in Kabul suicide attack
U.S. Drone Kills Eight In Northwest Pakistan
Thousands of Russians stranded abroad
New Russian military might on full display in Syria
'Yes or no' time in Iran nuclear talks
Hong Kong protests see weird, wonderful scenes
4.1-magnitude quake jolts SW China
Afghanistan inaugurates new president
Five killed, 40 injured in suicide attack in Lahore
Harry Kane leaves it late to rescue a point for Tottenham Hotspur
Nigerian president replaces military's top brass
6.7 magnitude earthquake strikes western Greece: USGS
Iran nuclear talks: comprehensive deal 'to be announced as early as Monday'
Australia berates Israel over 'shocking' attacks
Kerry: Israel, Jordan working to ease holy site tensions
'Bookkeeper of Auschwitz' Sentenced to Four Years in Prison
Greece IMF payment missed as bailout expires
Obama congratulates Turkish people over election
Hong Kong student leaders mull protest retreat
Pro-Palestinian activists prepare flotilla to break Gaza blockade
Hong Kong protests turn festive after tear gas chaos
An Islamic State militant carries out a suicide attack in Syria's Aleppo
Ten Turkish policemen killed in an attack east of Turkey
Ivory Coast presidential candidates recognises Ouattara victory
Chinese vice premier calls for stronger China-EU climate cooperation
Oil prices down in Asian trade
Menendez faces possible corruption charges
US scientists praise Iran nuclear deal
Islamic State seizes Iraqi army base, PM to send in Shi'ite fighters
BP warns against Russia sanctions
Heat flash detected at time of Russian airliner crash
German immigration official steps down
Donald Trump to unveil tax plan Monday
Ashley Madison cheaters exposed
Eurozone ministers approve 86-bln-euro Greek bailout deal
Islamic State fighters seize Syrian air base
Coalition airstrikes pound Islamic State stronghold in Syria
Pope Francis begins tour of Cuba and US
Cameron to hold talks with Sturgeon on UK future
India to free five gang rape suspects
US Senator Ted Cruz to announce presidential bid
EPL clubs out to avoid Champions League woes
Six killed, 50 injured as train derails near Rae Bareli
Islamic State group seizes villages in Syria
Two police officers shot in Ferguson amid race protests
British Parliament to debate motion to recognize Palestine
Has Nasa discovered water on Mars?
Cameron way behind curve on refugees
Iran arrests several spies near nuclear plant
Press awash with Nigeria\'s general elections
China's manufacturing improves in September
Silence to remember Tunisia victims
FIFA President Sepp Blatter Facing Suspensions
South Korea reports 14th Mers death, 12 new cases
Iraqi forces fail to recapture Tikrit from militants again
Chinese president declares Youth Olympic Games open
Thailand arrests second foreign suspect in Bangkok blast probe
Tour De France Pack Sets off for Stage 15
Marine death is 1st in campaign against Islamic State
Four US marines and gunman killed in 'act of terrorism' in Tennessee
General Assembly Vote Lets Palestinians Fly Flag at U.N. Headquarters
Media freedom at stake as Turkey fights rebels
Church should not fear change, Pope says at synod close
Qatar rejects rights group report on 'rampant' labor abuse
Asia shares swing higher as China nears seven year high
Camerwoman fired for tripping up fleeing migrants
Spanish bulls gore seven to death
China keeps an eye on visiting tiger freed by Russian President
Oliseh appointed as Nigeria coach
Iran optimistic on nuclear deal, US much less so
Gaza aid appeal raises almost £1m
India thwarts coal heat at Paris meet
British radical preacher Choudary granted bail
Lebanon's former PM returns after 3-year absence
Investors burying their heads in the sand?
Belarus tightens security along the border with Ukraine
South Korean woman in contact with MERS patient dies
Pope Francis in America
Baltimore police enforce third night of curfew
North Korea defectors swim across sea border to South Korea
Private sector urged to join fight against malaria
Chris Brown arrives in China
Over 1,800 migrants rescued from six boats adrift off Libya
Hong Kong protest leaders suspend planned vote
Marine death is 1st in campaign against Islamic State
Saudi-led coalition pounds Yemen rebel camps, lashes out at Iran
Obama vows to save Iraqis stranded on mountain
Iran: Police plane crashes, leaving seven people dead
Nation 1 killed, 4 wounded in ZombiCon shooting
Tokyo stocks open higher following Wall St. gains
Observatory says Russian air strikes kill 45 in Syria
Police abandon posts in Lesotho, fear for lives
France begins reconnaissance flights over Iraq
N Korea hit with new US sanctions
Lebanon Pulled into War with Islamic State Group
20 Palestinians injured in IOF attacks in Jenin
At least 12 killed as Shebab attack Somalia hotel
Hong Kong protests: China government official says Apec summit should not be affected
Thai army ruler named prime minister
Hiding Ebola patients now illegal
Power cut hits southern Pakistan
Poroshenko raises decentralisation referendum but rebels reject
Netanyahu Warns Of Militant Islamist Threat
Hong Kong student leaders mull protest retreat
Zim excited over President Xi visit
2 killed, 450 injured in Pakistan police clashes
Indexes flat; on track for best month in four years
IS claims to hold Chinese and Norwegian hostages
ICRC confirms its participation in consultations on Ukraine
UK says investigating 2 suspected MERS cases
UN Sec-Gen calls for Irans contribution to Lebanon security
At least 39 killed in Iranian plane crash
U.N. Security Council endorses Iran nuclear deal
Pakistan protests ceasefire violations by India
NASA's Messenger probe crashes into Mercury making giant crater
Why Cyprus backs Cameron's push for UK air strikes in Syria
Japan typhoon death toll rises to six: Report
Philippines saves 100 after ferry sinks
Hungary reopens Budapest train station, triggering new standoff
Israel, Hamas to discuss prisoner exchange
Tunisia contributes to international effort to rebuild Gaza
Iran welcomes European rail tourists
President Xi visits Chinese Youth Olympic delegation in Nanjing
Two-state solution between Palestinians, Israel pie in sky
Russians protest against Putin
British investments in Egypt worth $26m
German coalition politicians break ranks on Greek WWII reparations
President: Iran to continue enrichment
Chelsea, Mourinho apologise to racism victim
Four reasons for optimism as climate ministers take over talks
Chicago mayor in run-off election
Lawmakers from both sides express outrage at Secret Service
Burundi police fire tear gas in protest against president
Poland Votes Duda in Presidential Elections
Britain launches airstrikes on ISIS in Syria
Turkey's Ruling Party Loses Parliamentary Majority
MSF wants independent inquiry after fatal bombing
Israeli forces shoot, injure 82 Palestinians in Gaza, West Bank Nov. 27, 2015
NDA toes UPA line on disclosing info on black money
Russia ready to return over 20 Ukrainian ships based in Crimea to Ukraine
Hungary authorises government to use army in migration crisis
U.S. stock futures slump after China market selloff resumes
Hillary Clinton: US Should Lead on Clean Energy
At least 27 killed in car bombings, militia attacks north of Baghdad
Ferguson teen Brown autopsy reveals six gunshots
Hungarian TV journalist fired for tripping up fleeing migrants
Johor crowns its fifth Sultan
Clinton Makes Pitch To Working Americans
Australia beat Scotland in thriller
Poland kicks off presidential election
U.S.-led airstrikes on ISIS in Syria: What you need to know
Aguero strike sinks 10-man Manchester United
Liberia to prosecute man who brought Ebola to US
Several killed in Sweden pub shooting
France's right-wing parties take the Senate
Pope Francis canonizes two Palestinian women
Police chief calls for deepening mainland-HK cooperation
Historic tower collapses in Kathmandu after quake
Iranian General Is Killed in Syria Advising Military
Bangladeshi mourners pay tribute to slain blogger
Hong Kong tensions rise as police use pepper spray on protesters arrest 45
Michael Brown's Family Suing Cop and Ferguson
Late goals give Man City victory at Villa
Iran reiterates support for Iraq, Syria
Iran ready to resume oil exports to Egypt
Hong Kong protests turn festive after tear gas chaos
Poland president loses to challenger
Palestinian official slams Israel's stone-throwing bill
Minister to raise Pakistan case at climate conference
China approves iPhone 6 after security assurances
Wave of unrest leaves Palestinian president with no good choices
University of Florida frat accused of spitting on wounded war veterans
Three males held over series of stabbings in Temple Bar area
Australia bins standalone coding for kids in schools course
Lebanese politician urges Arab countries to welcome nuclear deal
PM Narendra Modi speaks of non-discrimination and equality
Myanmar discovers case suspected of Ebola
Donald Trump to unveil tax plan Monday
Brexit will lead to clamour for Scottish independence, says Sturgeon
Tears in Barcelona at funeral for Germanwings crash victim
UN chief condemns attack against peacekeepers in Mali
Germany says wants to keep close ties with Poland
Kentucky Senate rivals hold solitary debate
Myanmar Struggles to Finalize Voter Lists for Sunday Polls
U.S. government scrambles to deal with massive hacking attack
Pakistan protests ceasefire violations by India
Hawaii preps for first hurricane in 22 years
Tanzania awaits tense presidential poll result
MERS: No cause for alarm in Phl
AG Holder Meeting With Michael Brown's Parents
Liberia's president orders civil servants to stay home amid Ebola crisis
Italy's cabinet wins key confidence vote in Senate over labor reform
Search for Indonesia's missing chopper underway
Britain's Tony Blair resigns as U.N. Middle East envoy
Envoy: North Korea will pursue 'defensive' nuclear program
North Korea Delegation Meets With South Korean Officials
Cui: US patrol serious political, military provocation
WTO: India regrets action of developed nations
Free speech activist killed in Pakistan
Philippines: ERC to build 10 schools in Philippine Typhoon-ravaged areas
Japan restarts nuclear plant
Over 80 militants killed in Khyber Agency
US stocks open mostly lower as earnings disappoint
Volkswagen's "gesture of goodwill" to diesel owners
Permalink to Two killed in Germany train accident
21 killed in Tunisia museum gun attack
Security tightened at New Delhi churches after attacks
Liberia to become Christian state
Vice president of Congo elections commission resigns
Head-on collision kills 7 in east China
Pilot killed as US jet crashes in England
Jibes fly before Australia-NZ rugby World Cup final
Obama Rallies Coalition Commanders against IS Jihadists
US military releases footage of air strikes on ISIS targets in Iraq and Syria
Obama Vows To Hit Islamic State
Beau Biden, son of vice president, dies of brain cancer
Dozens killed after air strikes in Yemen capital
Gov't: Sanctions on Russia don't hit Paks plans
Russian market: Great export potentialities for Tunisia
Merkel pledges NATO solidarity with Latvia
Netanyahu forms new government just ahead of deadline
Australian father charged with abusing surrogate twins
Mainland to lift entry-permit requirement for Taiwan residents
Malls in Paris, London under tight security after Shabab threat
JP bullish ahead of triangular
First Ebola case diagnosed in US after man who flew in from Liberia falls ill
Girl bombs market in Nigeria
Texas man arrested, accused of helping friend travel overseas to join Islamic State
Egyptian boat crash death toll rises as more bodies found in Nile
President Xi: China to continue help to fight Ebola
Venezuela tightens visa rules on America
US stocks end rocky week with a surge; Nike gains
Iceland lowers volcano alert to orange
China Scrambles to Reassure Jittery Stock Traders
Musharraf's party to contest Pakistan's local elections
Suicide Attack, Bomb Blast in Pakistan Kill 10
China cut yuan rate more than 1% against dollar
Adam Chandler: A hollow Ukrainian cease-fire
Ukraine minister says 'no threat' from nuclear plant accident
Kerry calls for united front to tackle Islamic State
Obama waiting for midterm to name attorney general
4 killed in Okla. crash involving college softball team
Yemen to name new PM in deal with Shiite rebels
Hamilton Wins Russian GP as Rosberg Fails to Finish
Tunisian army chief resigns after soldiers killed
Turkey urges Russia not to escalate tension in Syria
U.S. rebukes Israel's victorious Netanyahu on Mideast policy
Nusra demands compensation, aid for release of soldiers
Police called to reports of helicopter in the sea
Seize the moment for breakthrough in Iran nuclear talks
Turkey votes in one of most crucial elections in years
Iran jails academic for crimes against regime
Iraqi Kurds say Islamic State used chlorine bomb
Ebola outbreak deaths exceed 4,000 - WHO
Scores dead after Boko Haram bomb attack in Nigeria
The Latest on Severe Weather: 1 Dead in Texas After Tornado
2 killed, 5 injured in helicopter crash in Afghan Bamyan province
Tianjin China blast: rescuers working against time
New York police officer critically wounded in hatchet attack
Burundi: Small groups of protestors, police clash in Burundi capital: witnesses
Lonmin expects full-year underlying cash costs below guidance
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
Define value of optimal solution recursively.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
It is "previous" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
Models based on and extending the vector space model include: • Generalized vector space model.
In general, we can solve a problem with optimal substructure using a three-step process: 1.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf (term frequency-inverse document frequency) weighting.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
The peropos of inheritance in object oriented programming is to minimize the reuse of existing code without modification.
A document is represented as a vector.
As an official theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all universal interpretations of probability.
For example, a schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a programme.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
A document is represented as a vector.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
A document can be represented as a vector.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
Characterise structure of an optimal solution.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
And thus the method takes much less time than more naive methods.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
In some areas less information need to be stored.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
Therefore, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
Object oriented programming is a style of programming that supports encapsulation, inheritance, and polymorphism.
One of the best known methods is called tf-idf weighting.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
It was intended to allow existing code to be used again with minimal or no alteration.
It does not take into account any information about B and therefore is considered “prior”.
Construct an optimal solution from computed values.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
Several different ways of computing these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
Models based on and extending the vector space model include: • Generalized vector space model.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
Inheritance is useful for situations where several classes share common features, such as needed functions or data variables.
Generalise the structure of an optimal solution 2.
When one class inherits from another class, all the public variables and methods are available to the subclass.
There are four steps in Dynamic Programming: 1.
A document can be represented as a vector.
It is mainly used to calculate the probability of one event’s outcome given that a previous event happened.
Many different ways of calculating these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
Dynamic programming is a problem-solving method which solves recursive problems.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The word Programming in the name has nothing to do with writing computer programs.
For instance, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
One of the most important uses of page rank is its meaning to advertising.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
Each and every dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan of action, an algorithm.
Characterise structure of an optimal solution.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Single words, keywords and occasionally longer phrases are used for terms.
* P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
It is used in information retrieval and was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
A document can be represented as a vector.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan, an algorithm.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
Dynamic Programming is a method of solving problems that exhibit the properties of overlapping subproblems and optimal substructure.
Models based on and extending the vector space model include: • Generalized vector space model.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
An example of this gain in efficiency is a path-finding problem.
Generalise the structure of an optimal solution 2.
A document can be represented as a vector.
Due to poor similarity values long documents are poorly represented.
It was intended to allow existing code to be used again with minimal or no alteration.
Many different methods of calculating these values, sometimes known as (term) weights, have been developed.
One of the best known methods is called tf-idf weighting.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
A website’s page rank, is how ‘important’ it is on the web.
Several different ways have been developed of calculating these values (also known as term weights).
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
The PageRank is a recursive algorithm used by Google to determine which webpages are more important than others.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
For example, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
LIMITATION: There is some limitation of vector space model.
Many different ways of calculating these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
For instance, a events schedule at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
For example, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
It is used in information retrieval and was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
The first is the bottom up approach.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
is derived from a theoretical probability value on a logarithmic scale like the Richter Scale.
A link to a page is seen as a vote of support.
Other ways of computing these values, or weights, have been developed.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Inheritance is one of the basic concepts of Object Oriented Programming.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
Each object (except java.lang.Object) can be cast to an object of one of its superclasses.
A normal term is usually a single word, keywords or longer phrases.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
Each and every dimension corresponds to a separate term.
As a formal theorem Bayes theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
A normal term is usually a single word, keywords or longer phrases.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
This can be known as one of the advantages of inheritance.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
A document is represented as a vector.
The PageRank depends on the PageRank rating and number of all pages that have links to it.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
A variation of the PageRank method bases the importance of a webpage on how many visits the page gets.
The last point would be to construct an optimal solution from the computed values.
In a word, we can solve a problem with optimal substructure using a three-step process.
Compute optimal solution values either top-down with caching or bottom-up in a table.
In defining this inheritance hierarchy we have already defined certain restrictions, not all of which are desirable.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
A Vector space model is an algebraic model for representing text documents as vectors of identifiers.
Other ways of computing these values, or weights, have been developed.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
One of the best known methods is called tf-idf weighting.
Bayes' Theorem is a theorem of probability theory originally stated by the Reverend Thomas Bayes.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
It is usually used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
The idea of inheritance in OOP refers to the formation of new classes with the already existing classes.
Each item in the vector represents a different keyword.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
A document can be represented as a vector.
It is mainly used to calculate the probability of one event’s outcome given that a previous event happened.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
As a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
Many different ways of calculating these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
Bayes' theorem is useful in evaluating the result of drug tests.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
As a formal theorem Bayes theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
It is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
For example; a person may be observed to have certain symptoms.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
For example, a patient may be observed to have certain symptoms.
It doesn't take into account any information about B, so it is "prior".
As a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
A document can be represented as a vector.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
The definition of term is dependent on the application.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Its first application was in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
The definition of a term depends on the application.
It was used in the first time in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
A variation of the PageRank method bases the importance of a webpage on how many visits the page gets.
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
5 probability is commonly expressed as a "50% chance" of something happening.
A document has representation as a vector.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan of action that is being produced.
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
In general, dynamic programming is used on optimisation problems, where the most efficient solution is needed.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
Several different ways have been developed of calculating these values (also known as term weights).
It was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Bayes’ theorem was names after Rev Thomas Bayes and is a method used in probability theory.
They do not have to be written in a computer language.
In general, dynamic programming is used on optimisation problems, where the most efficient solution is needed.
Characterise structure of an optimal solution.
It is similar to divide and conquer, however is differentiated as its subproblems are not independent.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
Like divide and conquer, Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining solutions to sub-problems.
Bayes’ theorem was names after Rev Thomas Bayes and is a method used in probability theory.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
A document is represented as a vector.
In general, dynamic programming is used on optimisation problems, where the most efficient solution is needed.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
LIMITATION: There is some limitation of vector space model.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining the solutions of subproblems.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
tf-idf weighting is one of the most well known schemes.
Each dimensions corresponds to a separate terms.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
Joe records all of his results and about 0.5% of the time he accidently records the wrong results.
The other method is the top down approach which is a method that combines memorization and recursion.
Each dimensions corresponds to a separate terms.
Dynamic Programming is a method of solving problems that exhibit the properties of overlapping subproblems and optimal substructure.
It is usually be used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
Here we're going to simply use a probability distribution hence the initial value of 0.25.
It is usually be used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
Secondly to define the value of the optimal solution recursively.
In a word, we can solve a problem with optimal substructure using a three-step process.
The method takes much less time than naive methods.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting (see the example below).
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
This is a much quicker method than other more naive methods.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
Bayes' Theorem is a simple mathematical formula used for calculating conditional probabilities.
A document is represented as a vector.
However, the patent is assigned to Stanford University and not to Google.
The PageRank depends on the PageRank rating and number of all pages that have links to it.
The algebraic model for representing text documents and objects as vectors of identifiers is called the vector space model.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
The definition of term depends on the application.
It is similar to divide and conquer, however is differentiated as its subproblems are not independent.
Use these optimal solutions to construct an optimal solution for the original problem.
A dampening factor is used to counter random surfers, who get bored and then switch to other pages.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
It is used in information filtering, indexing, relevancy rankings and information retrieval.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
Google has exclusive license rights on the patent from Stanford University.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
The inheritance concept was invented in 1967 for Simula.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
Other ways of computing these values, or weights, have been developed.
Other possible uses for vector space models are indexing and also to rank the relevancy of differing documents.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
For example, a patient may be observed to have certain symptoms.
Here by meaning that a program can be an optimal plan for the produced action.
It is usually used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan, an algorithm.
It also provides a way to generalize du to the "is a" relationship between classes.
It is often used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
Define value of optimal solution recursively.
Each dimensions corresponds to a separate terms.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
It is similar to divide and conquer, however is differentiated as its subproblems are not independent.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
As a formal theorem Bayes theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
Each item in the vector represents a different keyword.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
As an official theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all universal interpretations of probability.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
At the same time, Bayesians describe probabilities in terms of beliefs and degrees of uncertainty.
It is intended to help reuse existing code with little or no modification.
A normal term is usually a single word, keywords or longer phrases.
It has no relationship to computer programming; instead it is a process of finding a satisfactory algorithm.
Inheritance is a basic concept in object oriented programming.
Bayes theorem can be used to compute the probability that a proposed diagnosis is correct.
It is used in information filtering, indexing, relevancy rankings and information retrieval.
Bayes’ theorem is also often known as Bayes’ law.
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
Bayes' theorem is useful in evaluating the result of drug tests.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Dangling, links to a page which has no links to others.
It is often used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan of action, an algorithm.
The "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
A website’s page rank, is how ‘important’ it is on the web.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
Following this, each web page is given a ranking of 0-10 according to its relevance to a search.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
If this occurs then all of the non-private methods and variables can be used by the most specialised class.
The methodology takes much less time rather than naive methods.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
Pages that are linked to by many high ranking pages will themselves obtain a high rank.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting (see the example below).
The typical example could be of a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
Several different ways of computing these values, additionally known as (term) weights, have been developed.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
Recursively use this three-step process to compute the optimal path in the subproblem.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
Deep, links to a specific page, usually bypassing the homepage.
This is a much quicker method than other more naive methods.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
A link to a page is seen as a vote of support.
One of Google’s attempts to counter this is their Google Toolbar browser plugin.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
Here by meaning that a program can be an optimal plan for the produced action.
The main problem is divided into sub problems which are solved and stored for future use.
The vector space model has some limitations: 1.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
For example, a program could exist to model different forms of transport.
Dangling, links to a page which has no links to others.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
For example, a schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a programme.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
In defining this inheritance hierarchy we have already defined certain restrictions, not all of which are desirable.
Bayes’ theorem was names after Rev Thomas Bayes and is a method used in probability theory.
Inheritance is a method of forming new classes using predefined classes.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
And thus the method takes much less time than more naive methods.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
Bayes' Theorem is a theorem of probability theory originally stated by the Reverend Thomas Bayes.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
It is often used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
The steps required are as follows: 1.
Each dimensions corresponds to a separate terms.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
Several different ways of computing these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
Dynamic Programming is a method of solving problems that exhibit the properties of overlapping subproblems and optimal substructure.
Bayes' theorem is useful in evaluating the result of drug tests.
First, compute the shortest path to the goal from all adjacent vertices.
This can be known as one of the advantages of inheritance.
In general, we can solve a problem with optimal substructure using a three-step process: 1.
Google’s payoff is that it gets to track the behaviour of actual users.
It is also called the subsequent probability because it is derived from or depends upon the specified value of B.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
Inbound, links from other pages to yours.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
Many different methods of calculating these values, sometimes known as (term) weights, have been developed.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
• P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Recursively define the value of an optimal solution 3.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
Google’s payoff is that it gets to track the behaviour of actual users.
The PageRank is a recursive algorithm used by Google to determine which webpages are more important than others.
* P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
However, the patent is assigned to Stanford University and not to Google.
It is therefore used to create relationships between one object and another.
A document has representation as a vector.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
In object oriented programming inheritance is also dependant on access level modifiers.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
Here by meaning that a program can be an optimal plan for the produced action.
This general three-step process can be used to solve a problem: 1.
It is often used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
Bayes' Theorem is a theorem of probability theory originally stated by the Reverend Thomas Bayes.
The definition of a term depends on the application.
A problem with overlapping subproblems means that the same subproblems may be used to solve many different larger problems.
of the pages providing the links.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
A Vector space model is an algebraic model for representing text documents as vectors of identifiers.
Sub-problems are then selected and used to solve the overall problem.
What is the probability this student is a girl?
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
Single words, keywords and occasionally longer phrases are used for terms.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Typically terms are single words, keywords, or longer phrases.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
In general, dynamic programming is used on optimisation problems, where the most efficient solution is needed.
However, animals cannot be treated as fungi.
Secondly to define the value of the optimal solution recursively.
The PageRank is a recursive algorithm used by Google to determine which webpages are more important than others.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
The definition of a term depends on the application.
Thus, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
One of the most important uses of page rank is its meaning to advertising.
Models based on and extending the vector space model include: • Generalized vector space model.
It is "previous" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The method is more effiecent than naive methods.
One of the most popular schemes is tf-idf weighting.
A document is represented as a vector.
A document has representation as a vector.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
The definition of a term depends on the application.
Here we're going to simply use a probability distribution hence the initial value of 0.25.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
And thus the method takes much less time than more naive methods.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
In a word, we can solve a problem with optimal substructure using a three-step process.
A Vector space model is an algebraic model for representing text documents as vectors of identifiers.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
Typically terms are single words, keywords, or longer phrases.
Therefore, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
One of the most important uses of page rank is its meaning to advertising.
Since it is a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem holds in all popular interpretations of probability.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan, an algorithm.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Following this, each web page is given a ranking of 0-10 according to its relevance to a search.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
It is used in information filtering, information retrieval, indexing and relevancy rankings.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf (term frequency-inverse document frequency) weighting.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
The second method is the use of links.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
A document can be represented as a vector.
It was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
A document has representation as a vector.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
A document has representation as a vector.
Here we're going to simply use a probability distribution hence the initial value of 0.25.
As a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf (term frequency-inverse document frequency) weighting.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
It is used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
What is the probability this student is a girl?
In defining this inheritance hierarchy we have already defined certain restrictions, not all of which are desirable.
This can be known as one of the advantages of inheritance.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
The "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
As a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
And thus the method takes much less time than more naive methods.
There are four steps in Dynamic Programming: 1.
The algorithm may be applied to any collection of entities with reciprocal quotations and references.
Many different methods of calculating these values, sometimes known as (term) weights, have been developed.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
tf-idf weighting is one of the most well known schemes.
Google’s payoff is that it gets to track the behaviour of actual users.
It is used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
A document is represented as a vector.
Bayes Theorem is a mathematical formula used to calculate conditional probabilities.
In order to avoid this, we instead save the solutions to problems we have already solved.
A normal term is usually a single word, keywords or longer phrases.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
A variation of the PageRank method bases the importance of a webpage on how many visits the page gets.
Inheritance is one of the basic concepts of Object Oriented Programming.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan of action, an algorithm.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
LIMITATION: There is some limitation of vector space model.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
Also, looking up the solution when a sub-problem is encountered again helps reduce computation.
Dynamic Programming is a very powerful mathematical technique, often utilised in programming, for solving optimization problems.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
Following this, each web page is given a ranking of 0-10 according to its relevance to a search.
LIMITATION: There is some limitation of vector space model.
The correct answer can be computed using Bayes' theorem.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
One of the most famous schemes is tf-idf weighting.
The further down an inheritance tree you get, the more specific the classes become.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
Depending on the application, the definition of term varies.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
tf-idf weighting is one of the most well known schemes.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
One of the best known methods is called tf-idf weighting.
Later versions of PageRank (see the below formulas) would assume a probability distribution between 0 and 1.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
It is used in information filtering, information retrieval, indexing and relevancy rankings.
* P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
Characterise structure of an optimal solution.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
Bayes' Theorem is a theorem of probability theory originally stated by the Reverend Thomas Bayes.
The term weighting indentifies the success or failure of the vector space method.
The last point would be to construct an optimal solution from the computed values.
Bayes' theorem is useful in evaluating the result of drug tests.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
It is often used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
Instead, a new object is made to inherit properties of objects which already exist.
The method takes much less time than naive methods.
The vector space model has some limitations: 1.
As a formal theorem Bayes theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
For instance, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
inheritance in object oriented programming is where a new class is formed using classes which have allready been defined.
For instance, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
The new classes are called derived classes and they inherit the behaviours and attributes of the base classes.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
Bayes theorem can be used to compute the probability that a proposed diagnosis is correct.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
It is often used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
LIMITATION: There is some limitation of vector space model.
As a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
Several different ways of computing these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
Characterise structure of an optimal solution.
A document is represented as a vector.
This can be known as one of the advantages of inheritance.
The articles on Bayesian probability and frequentist probability discuss these debates in detail.
Inheritance is a basic concept in object oriented programming.
One of the most popular schemes is tf-idf weighting.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
Generalise the structure of an optimal solution 2.
To explain further vector space models, basically a document is characterized by a vector.
Inheritance is a basic concept in object oriented programming.
Term frequency: This formula counts how many times the term occurs in a document.
* P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
One can consider fruit to be an abstraction of apple, orange, etc.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Depending on the application, the definition of term varies.
There are a number of wighting sceems which can be incoperated inorder to increase the accuracy of the vextors.
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Ignoring case, extract all unique words from the entire set of documents.
The PageRank is a recursive algorithm used by Google to determine which webpages are more important than others.
Google’s payoff is that it gets to track the behaviour of actual users.
Every dimension is precisely related to a separate term.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
Here we're going to simply use a probability distribution hence the initial value of 0.25.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
In defining this inheritance hierarchy we have already defined certain restrictions, not all of which are desirable.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
Programming means finding a plan of action.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
It was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
For example, a program could exist to model different forms of transport.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
Many different methods of calculating these values, sometimes known as (term) weights, have been developed.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
Dynamic programming is a problem-solving method which solves recursive problems.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
There is also Conditional Probability which is usually interested in the way variables relate to each other.
As a formal theorem Bayes theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
It is often used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
To explain further vector space models, basically a document is characterized by a vector.
A document is represented as a vector.
It is often used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
The method is more effiecent than naive methods.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
Google uses this algorithm to assist intentional surfers in finding the best websites to suit their needs.
Bayes' Theorem is a theorem of probability theory originally stated by the Reverend Thomas Bayes.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
Many different ways of calculating these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
Here we're going to simply use a probability distribution hence the initial value of 0.25.
The new classes are called derived classes and they inherit the behaviours and attributes of the base classes.
Construct an optimal solution, using the computed optimal subproblems, for the original problem.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The term weighting indentifies the success or failure of the vector space method.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
A document can be represented as a vector.
By 1953, he had refined this to the modern meaning.
The key to Dynamic Programming is to find the structure of optimal solutions.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
Google has exclusive license rights on the patent from Stanford University.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
A 0.5 probability is commonly expressed as a "50% chance" of something happening.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
In order to do so, the following parsing and extraction steps are needed.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
Bayes theorem can be used to compute the probability that a proposed diagnosis is correct.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
It is therefore used to create relationships between one object and another.
Inbound, links from other pages to yours.
The idea of inheritance is to reuse the existing code with little or no modification at all.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
The advantage being the less time consumption in comparison to other amateur methods.
Inheritance is a basic concept in object oriented programming.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
A Vector space model is an algebraic model for representing text documents as vectors of identifiers.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
If this occurs then all of the non-private methods and variables can be used by the most specialised class.
Furthermore, by combining solutions to subproblems, DP solves problems.
Bayes' theorem is useful in evaluating the result of drug tests.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
LIMITATION: There is some limitation of vector space model.
One of the most popular schemes is tf-idf weighting.
It is usually be used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
Here we're going to simply use a probability distribution hence the initial value of 0.25.
The idea of inheritance is to reuse the existing code with little or no modification at all.
A link to a page is seen as a vote of support.
Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining the solutions of subproblems.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
It was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Instead, a new object is made to inherit properties of objects which already exist.
A document is represented as a vector.
Subclasses are said to ‘extend’ superclasses.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
Nevertheless, the patent is assigned to the University of Stanford and not to Google.
Dangling, links to a page which has no links to others.
If a page has no incoming links, there is no support for that page.
At first glance, a car and a train may not have much in common.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
As an official theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all universal interpretations of probability.
One of the best known methods is called tf-idf weighting.
For example, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
Depending on the application, the definition of term varies.
Bayes theorem can be used to compute the probability that a proposed diagnosis is correct.
It is also called the subsequent probability because it is derived from or depends upon the specified value of B.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
It is used in information filtering, indexing, relevancy rankings and information retrieval.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
It is used in information retrieval and was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Here we're going to simply use a probability distribution hence the initial value of 0.25.
It is mainly used to calculate the probability of one event’s outcome given that a previous event happened.
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
Inheritance is one of the basic concepts of Object Oriented Programming.
A website’s page rank, is how ‘important’ it is on the web.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Every dimension is precisely related to a separate term.
With little or no modification, it is intended to help reuse existing code.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
Instead, a new object is made to inherit properties of objects which already exist.
For example, a schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a programme.
A variation of the PageRank method bases the importance of a webpage on how many visits the page gets.
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
In Java all attributes and methods are implicitly virtual.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Typically, terms are single words, keywords, or sometimes even longer phrases.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
One of the most famous schemes is tf-idf weighting.
It is mainly used to calculate the probability of one event’s outcome given that a previous event happened.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
It does not take into account any information about B and therefore is considered “prior”.
So the same rule applies with keywords and indeed longer phrases.
Each and every dimension corresponds to a separate term.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
tf-idf weighting is one of the most well known schemes.
Object oriented programming is a style of programming that supports encapsulation, inheritance, and polymorphism.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
A document can be represented as a vector.
For example private attributes and methods cannot be inherited.
It doesn't take into account any information about B, so it is "prior".
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
It is usually be used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
In object oriented programming inheritance is also dependant on access level modifiers.
LIMITATION: There is some limitation of vector space model.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
LIMITATION: There is some limitation of vector space model.
For each document, count the number of occurrences of each word.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
A normal term is usually a single word, keywords or longer phrases.
It is intended to help reuse existing code with little or no modification.
Each and every dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The idea of inheritance is to reuse the existing code with little or no modification at all.
The actual Google PageRank algorithm is much more complex than this, but follows the same underlying principles.
One of the most famous schemes is tf-idf weighting.
It has no relationship to computer programming; instead it is a process of finding a satisfactory algorithm.
The theorem is often used when we have observations and wish to compute posterior probabilities.
It was used in the first time in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Here we're going to simply use a probability distribution hence the initial value of 0.25.
A document is represented as a vector.
It was intended to allow existing code to be used again with minimal or no alteration.
In object oriented programming inheritance is also dependant on access level modifiers.
This can be known as one of the advantages of inheritance.
Bayes' Theorem is a theorem of probability theory originally stated by the Reverend Thomas Bayes.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
A document has representation as a vector.
Each and every dimension corresponds to a separate term.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
Later versions of PageRank (see the below formulas) would assume a probability distribution between 0 and 1.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
A dampening factor is used to counter random surfers, who get bored and then switch to other pages.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
For example: a patient might be observed to show certain symptoms.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
The definition of term depends on the application.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
Programming, in this sense, means finding an acceptable plan of action.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
A document can be represented as a vector.
It is "prior" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
The concept of inheritance was basically formulated for Simula in 1967.
In Java all attributes and methods are implicitly virtual.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
A document is represented as a vector.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
The peropos of inheritance in object oriented programming is to minimize the reuse of existing code without modification.
The vector space model has some limitations: 1.
* P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
It is intended to help reuse existing code with little or no modification.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
There are two main approaches for dynamic programming.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
Here by meaning that a program can be an optimal plan for the produced action.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
Typically terms are keywords, single words or longer phrases.
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Then you could have an extended hierarchy, where a Mass Transport class extends the Transport class.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
It is used in information retrieval and was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
Typically, terms are single words, keywords, or sometimes even longer phrases.
Nevertheless, the patent is assigned to the University of Stanford and not to Google.
It doesn't take into account any information about B, so it is "prior".
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
It is also called the posterior probability because it is derived from or depends upon the specified value of B.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
Adding on this last section for every other page linked to from the original page.
of a particular page is roughly based upon the quantity of inbound links as well as the PageRank?
Use these optimal solutions to construct an optimal solution for the original problem.
* P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
Every dimension relates to a different term.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
The number of unique words in the vocabulary denotes the dimensionality, if words are used for the terms.
Its first use was in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Bayes’ theorem was names after Rev Thomas Bayes and is a method used in probability theory.
It is "previous" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
Break the problem into smaller subproblems.
A well known term used for this replacing act is called overriding.
The first is the bottom up approach.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
A document has representation as a vector.
A document is represented as a vector.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
Generate the optimal solution of these computed values
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
The definition of term depends on the application.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
Use these optimal solutions to construct an optimal solution for the original problem.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
The "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
Normally a term is a single word, keyword, or a longer phrase.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
As an official theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all universal interpretations of probability.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
For example: a patient might be observed to show certain symptoms.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
It is therefore used to create relationships between one object and another.
It has no relationship to computer programming; instead it is a process of finding a satisfactory algorithm.
If this occurs then all of the non-private methods and variables can be used by the most specialised class.
Occasionally it is advantageous to differentiate between these uses, as it is not necessarily noticeable from context.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
The key to Dynamic Programming is to find the structure of optimal solutions.
The idea of inheritance in OOP refers to the formation of new classes with the already existing classes.
Solve these problems optimally using this three-step process recursively.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
Bayes' Theorem is a simple mathematical formula used for calculating conditional probabilities.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
A variation of the PageRank method bases the importance of a webpage on how many visits the page gets.
One of the most famous schemes is tf-idf weighting.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Generate the optimal solution of these computed values
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The algebraic model for representing text documents and objects as vectors of identifiers is called the vector space model.
Construct an optimal solution, using the computed optimal subproblems, for the original problem.
As an official theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all universal interpretations of probability.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
The key to Dynamic Programming is to find the structure of optimal solutions.
A link to a page is seen as a vote of support.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
In general, dynamic programming is used on optimisation problems, where the most efficient solution is needed.
Other ways of computing these values, or weights, have been developed.
Bayes’ theorem was names after Rev Thomas Bayes and is a method used in probability theory.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
As a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
A normal term is usually a single word, keywords or longer phrases.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
It is used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
Here by meaning that a program can be an optimal plan for the produced action.
The other method is the top down approach which is a method that combines memorization and recursion.
A website’s page rank, is how ‘important’ it is on the web.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf (term frequency-inverse document frequency) weighting.
It is used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
In order to do so, the following parsing and extraction steps are needed.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
The method is more effiecent than naive methods.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
It is often used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf (term frequency-inverse document frequency) weighting.
So the same rule applies with keywords and indeed longer phrases.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
inheritance in object oriented programming is where a new class is formed using classes which have allready been defined.
Bayes’ theorem is also often known as Bayes’ law.
Several different ways of computing these values, also known as (term) weights, have been developed.
A variation of the PageRank method bases the importance of a webpage on how many visits the page gets.
Bayes Theorem is a mathematical formula used to calculate conditional probabilities.
A document has representation as a vector.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
Inheritance is a method of forming new classes using predefined classes.
Ignoring case, extract all unique words from the entire set of documents.
Here by meaning that a program can be an optimal plan for the produced action.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
One of the best known methods is called tf-idf weighting.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
Construct an optimal solution from computed values.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
Nevertheless, the patent is assigned to the University of Stanford and not to Google.
If there are no links to a web page there is no support for that page.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
For example: a patient might be observed to show certain symptoms.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
The inheritance concept was invented in 1967 for Simula.
This is a much quicker method than other more naive methods.
Bayes' theorem is useful in evaluating the result of drug tests.
Inheritance is one of the basic concepts of Object Oriented Programming.
In object oriented programming inheritance is also dependant on access level modifiers.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
Due to poor similarity values long documents are poorly represented.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
Object oriented programming is a style of programming that supports encapsulation, inheritance, and polymorphism.
Dangling, links to a page which has no links to others.
It is used in information retrieval and was first used in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Single words, keywords and occasionally longer phrases are used for terms.
The basic support provided by inheritance is that it represents by categorization in computer languages.
Bayes’ theorem was names after Rev Thomas Bayes and is a method used in probability theory.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
Generate the optimal solution of these computed values
For each document, count the number of occurrences of each word.
In object oriented programming inheritance is also dependant on access level modifiers.
Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining the solutions of subproblems.
In a word, we can solve a problem with optimal substructure using a three-step process.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
It is usually be used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
A document is represented as a vector.
There are two main approaches for dynamic programming.
If this occurs then all of the non-private methods and variables can be used by the most specialised class.
Use these optimal solutions to construct an optimal solution for the original problem.
In defining this inheritance hierarchy we have already defined certain restrictions, not all of which are desirable.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
Generate the optimal solution of these computed values
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
Inheritance is a basic concept in object oriented programming.
Here by meaning that a program can be an optimal plan for the produced action.
A document has representation as a vector.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
The PageRank is a recursive algorithm used by Google to determine which webpages are more important than others.
It was used in the first time in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
A problem with overlapping subproblems means that the same subproblems may be used to solve many different larger problems.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
An example of this gain in efficiency is a path-finding problem.
A document has representation as a vector.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
It is often used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
Generate the optimal solution of these computed values
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
A Vector space model is an algebraic model for representing text documents as vectors of identifiers.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
It is therefore used to create relationships between one object and another.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Following this, each web page is given a ranking of 0-10 according to its relevance to a search.
Bayes theorem can be used to compute the probability that a proposed diagnosis is correct.
The vector space model has the following limitations: 1.
A dampening factor is used to counter random surfers, who get bored and then switch to other pages.
One of the best known methods is called tf-idf weighting.
A document can be represented as a vector.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
In defining this inheritance hierarchy we have already defined certain restrictions, not all of which are desirable.
As a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
Inheritance is a basic concept in object oriented programming.
The "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
As an official theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all universal interpretations of probability.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
The definition of term is dependent on the application.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
In computer science; dynamic programming is a way of solving problems consist of overlapping subproblems and optimal substructure.
The peropos of inheritance in object oriented programming is to minimize the reuse of existing code without modification.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
Depending on the application, the definition of term varies.
One of the most important uses of page rank is its meaning to advertising.
Dynamic programming is a problem-solving method which solves recursive problems.
Bayes' Theorem is a theorem of probability theory originally stated by the Reverend Thomas Bayes.
An example of this gain in efficiency is a path-finding problem.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
A document has representation as a vector.
It does not take into account any information about B and therefore is considered “prior”.
One of the most famous schemes is tf-idf weighting.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
It is essentially a popularity meter.
Several different ways have been developed of calculating these values (also known as term weights).
If the term doesn’t occur within the document, the value in the vector is zero.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
A variation of the PageRank method bases the importance of a webpage on how many visits the page gets.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
A document has representation as a vector.
A website’s page rank, is how ‘important’ it is on the web.
P(B) (a.k.a. the normalizing constant) is the prior or marginal probability of B.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
Virtual attributes and methods can be shadowed/overridden.
Dangling, links to a page which has no links to others.
Generalise the structure of an optimal solution 2.
* P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
Following this, each web page is given a ranking of 0-10 according to its relevance to a search.
The method can be abused when people deliberately link to sites in order to raise a site's PageRank.
A document can be represented as a vector.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
P(A), or the probability that the student is a girl regardless of any other information.
* P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
And thus the method takes much less time than more naive methods.
Many different methods of calculating these values, sometimes known as (term) weights, have been developed.
Inheritance was firstly derived in 1967.
A Vector space model is an algebraic model for representing text documents as vectors of identifiers.
Depending on the application, the definition of term varies.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting (see the example below).
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
Therefore, the "program" is the optimal plan for action that is produced.
Here we're going to simply use a probability distribution hence the initial value of 0.25.
Recursively use this three-step process to compute the optimal path in the subproblem.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
Here by meaning that a program can be an optimal plan for the produced action.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
If a term occurs in the document, its value in the vector is non-zero.
One of the most important uses of page rank is its meaning to advertising.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
The method can be abused when people deliberately link to sites in order to raise a site's PageRank.
These subproblems are not, however, independent.
In object oriented programming inheritance is also dependant on access level modifiers.
Inheritance is one of the basic concepts of Object Oriented Programming.
Bayes theorem can be used to compute the probability that a proposed diagnosis is correct.
The basic idea is to represent each document as a vector of certain weighted word frequencies.
Inheritance is an important feature in object orientated programming.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
A page that is linked to by many pages with high PageRank receives a high rank itself.
For example, a patient may be observed to have certain symptoms.
A document has representation as a vector.
It was used in the first time in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
Programming means finding a plan of action.
A Vector space model is an algebraic model for representing text documents as vectors of identifiers.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
This can be useful when the number of times a word appears is not considered important.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
Then, using this, the best overall path can be found, thereby demonstrating the dynamic programming principle.
A document is represented as a vector.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
One of its uses is calculating posterior probabilities given observations.
Dynamic Programming is a method of solving problems that exhibit the properties of overlapping subproblems and optimal substructure.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
It is often used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
Inheritance is a basic concept in object oriented programming.
Term frequency: This formula counts how many times the term occurs in a document.
5 probability is commonly expressed as a "50% chance" of something happening.
The further down an inheritance tree you get, the more specific the classes become.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
Finally, the order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
It is used in information filtering, information retrieval, indexing and relevancy rankings.
A document can be represented as a vector.
Occasionally it is advantageous to differentiate between these uses, as it is not necessarily noticeable from context.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
It is also called the posterior probability because it is derived from or depends upon the specified value of B.
Each object (except java.lang.Object) can be cast to an object of one of its superclasses.
If a term occurs in the document, the value will be non-zero in the vector.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
Inheritance provides the support for representation by categorization in computer languages.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
The further down an inheritance tree you get, the more specific the classes become.
What is the probability this student is a girl?
Each and every dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Inheritance can be divided into two main processes: single inheritance and multiple inheritance.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
The second method is the use of links.
Construct an optimal solution, using the computed optimal subproblems, for the original problem.
For each document, count the number of occurrences of each word.
It is "prior" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
A document can be represented as a vector.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
If a term appears in the document, the terms value in the vector is non-zero.
A dampening factor is used to counter random surfers, who get bored and then switch to other pages.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
This is a much quicker method than other more naive methods.
Bayes theorem can be used to compute the probability that a proposed diagnosis is correct.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
Single words, keywords and occasionally longer phrases are used for terms.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
Google uses this algorithm to assist intentional surfers in finding the best websites to suit their needs.
The number of unique words in the vocabulary denotes the dimensionality, if words are used for the terms.
Dynamic Programming is a very powerful mathematical technique, often utilised in programming, for solving optimization problems.
The concept of inheritance was basically formulated for Simula in 1967.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
If a page has no incoming links, there is no support for that page.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting (see the example below).
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
It is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
Overlapping subproblems means that the same subproblems are used to solve many different larger problems.
Dynamic Programming is an algorithm design technique used for optimisation problems, such as minimising or maximising.
It has no relationship to computer programming; instead it is a process of finding a satisfactory algorithm.
In probability theory, the prior and conditional probabilities of two random events are related by Bayes' theorem.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
Dynamic Programming is a very powerful mathematical technique, often utilised in programming, for solving optimization problems.
Since the PageRank is the most important algorithms which is used in the Google engine.
Dynamic programming is a problem-solving method which solves recursive problems.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf weighting, proposed by Salton, Wong and Yang.
Occasionally it is advantageous to differentiate between these uses, as it is not necessarily noticeable from context.
Later versions of PageRank (see the below formulas) would assume a probability distribution between 0 and 1.
It also provides a way to generalize du to the "is a" relationship between classes.
The further down an inheritance tree you get, the more specific the classes become.
Inheritance in object oriented programming is a way to form new classes using classes that have already been defined.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
When a document is represented as a vector, each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
of the pages providing the links.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
A page that is linked to by many pages with high PageRank receives a high rank itself.
Construct an optimal solution, using the computed optimal subproblems, for the original problem.
In order to avoid this, we instead save the solutions to problems we have already solved.
LIMITATION: There is some limitation of vector space model.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
One of the most important uses of page rank is its meaning to advertising.
Dynamic Programming is a very powerful mathematical technique, often utilised in programming, for solving optimization problems.
Inheritance is useful for situations where several classes share common features, such as needed functions or data variables.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
Bayes' theorem is useful in evaluating the result of drug tests.
LIMITATION: There is some limitation of vector space model.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
Object oriented programming is a style of programming that supports encapsulation, inheritance, and polymorphism.
The last point would be to construct an optimal solution from the computed values.
For example, a finalized schedule of events at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
It doesn't take into account any information about B, so it is "prior".
For instance, a events schedule at an exhibition is sometimes called a program.
A variation of the PageRank method bases the importance of a webpage on how many visits the page gets.
The idea of inheritance is to reuse the existing code with little or no modification at all.
A document has representation as a vector.
If a term appears in the document then its value in the vector is non-zero.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
The way that a 'term' is defined depends on the application.
Animals can be treated (cast) to living things.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
A term which occurs in the document has a value in the vector of non-zero.
The theorem is often used when we have observations and wish to compute posterior probabilities.
Define value of optimal solution recursively.
If this occurs then all of the non-private methods and variables can be used by the most specialised class.
The word Programming in the name has nothing to do with writing computer programs.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
It is often used to compute posterior probabilities given observations.
A document is represented as a vector, and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
In this classic model the term specific weights in the document vectors are products of local and global parameters.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
If a term exists in a document, its value in the vector is not equal to zero.
P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
Bayes' Theorem is a theorem of probability theory originally stated by the Reverend Thomas Bayes.
Every dimension is precisely related to a separate term.
Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
Bayes' theorem is useful in evaluating the result of drug tests.
Typically terms are single words, keywords, or longer phrases.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
It is often used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
False negative matches could be returned when documents share a context but have different term vocabulary.
Bayes' theorem is useful in evaluating the result of drug tests.
Bayes Theorem is a mathematical formula used to calculate conditional probabilities.
P(A) is the probability of the student being a girl (which is 2/5).
It is similar to divide and conquer, however is differentiated as its subproblems are not independent.
As a formal theorem Bayes theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
It can be considered that fruit is an abstraction of apple, orange, etc.
It is also called the subsequent probability because it is derived from or depends upon the specified value of B.
The easiest way to look at inheritance is as an “…is a kind of” relationship.
* P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
Since it is a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem holds in all popular interpretations of probability.
Bayes' Theorem is a simple mathematical formula used for calculating conditional probabilities.
In probability theory, Bayes' theorem relates the conditional and marginal probabilities of two random events.
The most popular is tf-idf weighting.
The differing application has a direct influence on what the definition of the term means.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
P(A) is the prior probability A.
A document is represented as a vector and each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
The limitations of the vector space model are thus.
As a formal theorem, Bayes' theorem is valid in all common interpretations of probability.
In general, we can solve a problem with optimal substructure using a three-step process: 1.
For example private attributes and methods cannot be inherited.
Each dimensions corresponds to a separate terms.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts to normalise the probability.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
• P(A|B) is the conditional probability of A, given B.
* P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
A document has representation as a vector.
In order to prevent spamming, Google releases little information on the way in which a PageRank is calculated.
The vector space model are the documents which are represented as “bags of words”.
After this, it is using this to pick the best overall path.
This can be known as one of the advantages of inheritance.
Several different ways of computing these values, additionally known as (term) weights, have been developed.
Characterise structure of an optimal solution.
The definition of term is dependent on the application.
It is "previous" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
of a particular page is roughly based upon the quantity of inbound links as well as the PageRank?
Dynamic Programming is a method of solving problems that exhibit the properties of overlapping subproblems and optimal substructure.
One of the best known schemes is tf-idf (term frequency-inverse document frequency) weighting.
However, the key in Dynamic Programming is to determine the structure of optimal solutions.
Dynamic Programming reduces computation time by solving subproblems in a ‘bottom-up’ way.
A possible use for a vector space model is for retrieval and filtering of information.
A dampening factor is used to counter random surfers, who get bored and then switch to other pages.
Term frequency: This formula counts how many times the term occurs in a document.
Vector space representation results in the loss of the order which the terms are in the document.
The order in which the terms appear in the document is lost in the vector space representation.
In the vector space model a document is represented as a vector.
The vector space model has several disadvantages.
The value of a vector is non-zero if a term occurs in the document.
One of the most important uses of page rank is its meaning to advertising.
It also provides a way to generalize du to the "is a" relationship between classes.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
Inheritance is one of the basic concepts of Object Oriented Programming.
Construct an optimal solution, using the computed optimal subproblems, for the original problem.
Inheritance is a method of forming new classes using predefined classes.
The peropos of inheritance in object oriented programming is to minimize the reuse of existing code without modification.
If a term occurs in the document, its value is non-zero.
Each document is a vector where each word is a dimension.
It is "prior" in the sense that it does not take into account any information about B.
However, the vector space model has limitations.
In general, dynamic programming is used on optimisation problems, where the most efficient solution is needed.
A hyperlink to a page counts as a vote of support.
A document is represented as a vector, with each dimension corresponding to a separate term.
The order in which terms appear in the document is lost in a vector space representation.
P(B) is the prior or marginal probability of B, and acts as a normalizing constant.
The method can be abused when people deliberately link to sites in order to raise a site's PageRank.
For example private attributes and methods cannot be inherited.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
It is usually used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
Terms are basically the words or any indexing unit used to identify the contents of a text.
In computer science; dynamic programming is a way of solving problems consist of overlapping subproblems and optimal substructure.
Like divide and conquer, Dynamic Programming solves problems by combining solutions to sub-problems.
However an object cannot be cast to a class which is no relative of it.
Define value of optimal solution recursively.
It was used in the first time in the SMART Information Retrieval System.
For example, a program could exist to model different forms of transport.
Most of these languages provide an “extend” keyword, which is used to subclass another.
• P(B|A) is the conditional probability of B given A.
It is usually used to calculate posterior probabilities given observations.
Inheritance is an important feature in object orientated programming.
If there are no links to a web page there is no support for that page.
In vector space model, the documents from which the information is to be retrieved are represented as vectors.
Mathematicians use the word to describe a set of rules which anyone can follow to solve a problem.
Generalise the structure of an optimal solution 2.
Each dimension corresponds to a separate term.
Bayes' Theorem is a theorem of probability theory originally stated by the Reverend Thomas Bayes.
It does not take into account any information about B and therefore is considered “prior”.
It is used in information filtering, indexing, relevancy rankings and information retrieval.
LIMITATION: There is some limitation of vector space model.
The way you have it is fine.
It depends on your country.
You don't have to know.
The answer will depend of course on what you're looking for in a vacation.
I had the same problem as you.
Also, if you die, you don't have to repay, don't know if it helps.
What can you do and what should you do to grow more?
You may want it, but the process given to you is what you have to work within.
I remained under the banyan tree, exhausted by my daily ritual of herding the cats every two hours.
There's a ton of variables:
It is up to you.
I don't think you need double-entry bookkeeping.
It's acceptable to tailor your CV for each job you apply for.
My answer to your question is "Probably Not".
Some of what you can do:
It really depends on the school and the program.
I wouldn't say it is better, just different.
There is no quarantine period.
You don't have to worry.
You don't need sauce at all.
It depends in which country you are living in.
This is a part answer to your question
There are two things to consider:
I think you answered your own question.
You don't need to have proof, you're just reporting what you noticed.
You're using the wrong type of screws.
You practically answered your own question.
What should I do about this?
There is also a Youtube-Version of the film.
), but it is not.
So, just check if there's a specific part of the train you need to be on.
If you really want to learn it, it will take time and work.
A lot of it has to do with your programming.
Looks like cedar, that is a good wood to use.
You can do it, but you might not be a professor.
I don't think there's much you can do.
I think this is a simple answer.
There are two things you need to look at to get an answer.
It's really a matter of preference.
The more detail you have, the harder it is to dismiss your estimate as inaccurate.
I have this habit as well.
You may want it, but the process given to you is what you have to work within.
You can use garlic powder and leave it out.
If they don't, don't force it.
Recently, I have had a very similar situation occur.
Take a look at these:
I really don't know about will it help you, but here is what I do:
You don't have to worry.
You should do what it says.
I think it depends on the dish.
If you don't finish, you just don't get the snack.
Check out the last paragraph to my answer to this question.
Yes, you can freeze buttermilk.
The short and clear answer is: it is absolutely not safe.
I've done this in a similar situation.
I would suggest that the answer is that it isn't common.
If you don't mind the extra weight, I would say definitely go for it.
The first thing to do is, of course, close them.
If your Schenghen Visa will still be valid then you will not need to apply for a new Visa.
If you want to do it you should do it completely.
What should you do?
You should listen to your boss, because you're not paid to tell the boss what to do.
First, I'll answer your question.
You check how important it is for you and your boss that you go to the seminar.
You can do it, too.
You have to decide how much you want to demand, and what unmet demands you can live with.
I think, the answer is yet: We don't know.
I think you already answered your own question.
It depends on the instrument.
It depends on funding.
This is probably not a good idea but I will suggest it anyhow.
This really depends on your twins.
I think there's a good solution to this.
is it this one?
So how should I do this?
The fridge is not a good wine cellar.
This is something I needed to deal with.
If you do want to help but want to be paid.
If they're worth that, I hire them and if not, I don't.
This depends on your environment.
i think it depends what you want:
I agree with all of the above but here's another.
It depends on the employer.
This depends on where you are.
It looks like you'll have to learn enough English syntax to do what you need.
Short answer It varies.
When you return to the problem, you are able to take a logical approach to it.
Yes, you can do it.
I had this problem too.
I have been on both sides of the equation.
This is not uncommon in a water heater.
She shouldn't take to you like that and do these things you're right.
You can do it, too.
Healthy competition is the magic word you are looking for.
All of the answers above are good.
You can try SplashMoney.
You'll have to determine what kind of relationship you have with your boss to see what is appropriate.
There is no such index.
You will do that for your child?
You will need FOUR conductors.
Under perfect conditions this is not true.
I agree with the other answers.
You have to know what you want to do.
When you read a fictional story, you should be able to imagine what is going on.
rmkilc, what you want to do in principle is FINE.
If you have papers.
Nowadays, I really don't think it makes any difference whatsoever.
I have two suggestions for you:
No, there's nothing to that as far as I know.
So actually it didn't matter.
You will have to start with the clinic., and maybe move on to the insurance company.
It's not up to her any more what you do.
It depends on how the cheese is made.
There is really no reason against immunisation.
Depends on the legal environment where you are.
It surely depends on the field we are talking about.
The key thing you need to do in this meeting is listen.
It depends on how bad the wall is.
As far as I know there is no such law.
You'll have to determine what kind of relationship you have with your boss to see what is appropriate.
My answer to your question is "Probably Not".
Start them as early as possible.
I have personally verified this!
In Thailand, it depends on where you'll be going.
What you are looking for is "lazy susan hardware"
Make sure that you get your money.
So I think it up to you.
Remember this is your degree we are talking about, its up to you what you want to do.
They don't even have to be about you.
Do you want to know the answer?
Yes, there is a reason for it.
You can try Con-x-ion.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
It really depends on how much time you have to prepare.
Consider the tax bracket that you would be in if you rolled your traditional IRA into a Roth IRA.
It is more deciding what you should do and what you should get others to do.
The answer to both of your questions is yes.
It shouldn't matter all that much.
Try some of the following:
I'll answer this question:
So, I think you don't need to explicitly state the code copyright in the paper.
Sorry, I don't know the answer to your question.
I always go by the rule "When in doubt, throw it out!
Off the top of my head I can think of three options:
Find what you like to read.
It depends on you.
The movie you are looking for is probably Infested.
It depends on what you're going for, really.
AFAIK, you don't even need the glue, though I'd probably use it myself.
Only do this if you know your job is safe.
I don't think you should.
I believe you are looking for a round-the-world ticket.
All of the answers above are good.
This is a difficult one.
No you don't need to do anything special.
This sound like a very bad idea.
What kind of floors are above?
You don't have to worry.
If it doesn't work for you, don't accept it.
It's a good idea.
There is no such index.
You don't have a problem.
Then decide if you really want to get involved and how you want to approach it.
You don't have to retire.
I must ask you, are you sure this is what you want to do?
I had this problem with one cat.
If you can't play it or test it out, do not buy.
Is it that you can't or that you don't want to do it?
But the solution to the problem is that you don't need to.
See also Wikipedia for this period.
I think it depends on the dish.
I think it depends on your broker.
I think partially the answer depends on what you type.
(This is a possible explanation, but I'm not crazy about it.
Don't tell him you're recommending him if you aren't going to.
It depends on the meat and how it's cut.
This is a good one.
Your best bet is research.
A couple things to consider:
Yes, you need to file a tax return.
I think the movie you are looking for is Bandidas.
If you still want to make your own bread, you may want to purchase a bread-maker.
You should always respond, even if only to say you aren't looking at this time.
If you want to really find your style, you have to work for it.
It's a good question.
You have not quite mentioned what kind of work you would want to do.
Do you have a large plastic container?
You need to pick how and where you want to place your foot and do it.
I would suggest that you not violate FERPA.
It's much better to ask.
If you're inclined to say "no", you must have good reasons.
Depends on what your goal is.
I don't think you can.
Yes, that is exactly what it means.
Honestly I don't think they had sex.
It is always best to customize your resume anyway for each job you apply for.
So if you do know the address, it's best to put it down.
It's just a general guideline, don't worry about it too much.
I think you will find it hard to do.
Harold McGee's On Food and Cooking for a start.
You definitely don't have to.
I have three recommendations for you:
Have you tried asking?
If you cough during a performance, you will lose points.
You're not in the US, so there's nothing to effectively connect your income to.
They really don't need to know.
There are a couple things you can do which will help:
Do you have a car?
I would say that it is something to avoid.
You are making this too complicated.
I'm not aware of any studies either way, but it seems unlikely.
I have noticed this as well.
You have no need to do anything.
I don't think that there's any.
It's all about conventions.
There are two possible causes for this:
Depends on your time scale, but generally, I don't think it would work.
If you're not starving, don't ever apply for the job you don't really want.
Shouldn't do you any harm at all.
If you're not starving, don't ever apply for the job you don't really want.
You don't have to leave to see what others will pay you.
If you want to do it you should do it completely.
It simply, and obviously, depends on what you want to spend your money on.
Your problem is not your supervisors.
We had this problem and it turned out to be the thermal fuse.
So I would say that that is in fact a myth.
There is no such index.
It seems to work.
You need to decide what you want to learn first.
The more you have, the less likely you will be upside down.
This question has been asked before. I don't think I can improve on that answer.
Yes, you have to do both.
You can buy it on ebay for $25 and up.
I think you should do both.
Yes, it is a real issue.
I'm not 100% sure I understand your question but I'll try to answer it anyway.
One idea is cleaning the coffee residue from the coffee pot.
This is only a good thing if it motivates you to do the things to get better.
i think it depends what you want:
There are two traditional ways to bend wood:
The simple answer is no.
There are two things you can definitely do:
My advice would be to try a variety of coffees that you can afford and find one you like.
The top few possible reasons are:
My recommendation is not to say anything, and do the best you can.
Maybe it doesn't.
Yes, there is a reason for it.
It depends what you want to do with them.
You don't want jobs you're not a good fit for.
It is not a good idea.
But it is different for everyone, so you will have to find that out yourself.
If it doesn't, then you might have damaged the coax.
The best thing that you can do is helping him.
There is no reason to worry.
They can, but the way to do it depends on what you have available.
I had the same issue.
You don't need to read the book to know what GTD is or even how to use it.
You could probably do it, but it wouldn't be very effective.
Yes, you should mention it.
Yes, you can do exactly what you want to do.
In that case, you should have pretty strong control over what you want to do.
I don't think there is a single answer here.
So don't fret it if you can't, but try to work it in.
I believe the name of the movie you are looking for is Poltergeist 3.
If you want to improve your skills in something, identify it.
Thanks for the suggestions.
If you focus on what you want to do, you'll find an employer that needs that.
You should go to him the first day you don't have work not the tenth.
As far as I know there is no such website or app that allows to book last-minute cheap flights.
I don't think you have much to worry about.
If you don't do it, you go to bed early.
Can you do this?
Take a look at this:
It is possible to cover it with shredded newspaper, but I don't think you'd want to.
You should, but you don't have to.
If you don't ask for what you want, you will not likely get it.
What kind of stone is it?
I can tell you where it comes from, but not why it's the way it is.
You can try manager.io.
I had the same situation as you.
I would think you'd be able to.
The number one thing that I would advise you to expect is the unexpected.
are you using the new Basecamp?
I don't think it makes much difference.
You could try http://caloriecount.about.com.
No, you should not worry.
I'd say it depends on the ultimate outcome you want?
If you are going to Thailand because of work, you can try to get it approved.
I am sure this is more phylosophical and ethical question than it seems.
Yes you can do that, but it depends what your goals are.
Sounds an like you may just need more flour.
Not much you can do besides:
But it is not a good idea.
The difficulty with that is that you have to know what your own terms are.
If nothing happens, you need to sit down and think about what you want to do next.
If they request to know why you want a copy, you want it for your personal records.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
It really depends on what you are looking for.
You have a lot of answers already, but I'd like to add Curries as another solutions.
Don't worry, you can do it.
How this will perform will depend a lot on the temperature of the room it is in.
There are two options here:
This is how you should understand what a resume is & what a cover letter is:
I can think of a few things that you should not look for:
It depends on what you are reading.
I had a similar situation.
This depends highly on the genre.
I don't think it's going to be critical but when in doubt: PL.
That's not a lot of depth.
You should do both.
I've got an answer:
I think it is depends on the program.
The movie you are looking for is probably Infested.
I had this same problem.
There is no quarantine period.
I am not sure this question would have made much sense to the Romans themselves.
It depends on how the cheese is made.
I don't think preservation is the issue you want to worry about, it is taste.
In other words, it depends on where you go, when you do there and how.
It depends on your country.
If you have too much to do, you turn it down.
The wiring you show will work.
Yes, you should create a portfolio site to showcase what you can do and what you've done.
If there are recurring problems with students, then you don't want to work for this professor.
There is no reason to worry.
No you are not.
And you don't have to do it at same days when you go to gym, obviously.
You do not need to start an email with a salutation.
Get help as soon as possible.
It depends on the show in question.
It depends on how bad the wall is.
It's not ideal but will probably work.
Actually, I don't want to assume and just tell you what I think would be allowed/disallowed.
You don't have to configure anything.
I guess it depends on what you're going to do.
This is not a direct answer to your question.
The answer to this is yes: avoid meat-based broth.
It is his job to see that you have what you need to do your job.
This is what I'd do:
I have the exact same issue.
The word you're looking for is Atonal
You have to do what is right for you.
There's a couple practical things that can help.
That is the most "fair" way to do it.
The solution has two parts.
I think you know what a check is even if you don't use them, right?
I read a lot of papers and some books about.
AFAIR this didn’t happen in the book.
If you have the authority to do it yourself, then do it today.
Again, this is where YOU get to find out what YOU want to know about THEM.
I think you don't have many rights in this case.
I don't think there's much you can do.
It depends on what you want to achieve.
At the end of the day, sitting is still really bad for you even if you exercise later.
It depends on your country.
), but it is not.
This is a big problem.
Unfortunately I'd say no, not if you still have that much ammonia showing up.
If he is getting in the way of your work, then bring it up to you boss.
This sounds a bit unusual.
Travel in Europe should not be a big issue either.
There are a few adjustments you can try:
It depends what you want to do with them.
You indicate in your comments that your hamster does not have hay.
I don't think that there's any.
I wouldn't worry too much about your results not matching the picture.
I don't think you can make him get a job if he doesn't want to.
I think it depends very much on the area.
I don't see that there's anything wrong.
I think you have to find the balance that works for you.
I have had the same problem.
As to the specifics, it depends on the rest of your training.
No it is not.
So think it in this way.
I don't know if your boss is trying to help you or not.
You do not need to worry.
I think that the short answer to your question is: No.
You have to know what you want to do.
Have you tried your local beggar?
You do not tell if you were required to be at that meeting, but I assume so.
The alcohol is not added, but is a result of the fermentation process.
It depends on how much work you want to do.
I think you're actually in luck.
I have never done this.
If this is the case then I don't know if you could make bread out of it predominantly.
I don't think it makes much difference.
If you feel you have too many commas, you do.
It's probably just a broken switch.
There are two things to consider:
It depends on what they are evaluating, and how.
Where did you look?
There's not that much that you can do with a sourdough starter.
If they don't fire you, you are now working hours that you like.
Do you think I should keep it secret or not?
It is up to you.
A couple things to consider:
You have answered your own question.
What should you do?
There are two traditional ways to bend wood:
Just turn the breaker off.
Th answer to you problem is that you dont actually know what you're getting in .
Another thing, when you find a job, it is not always exactly what you wanted to do.
If, however, you don't think that you can do the job - don't apply.
You don't need a program, you need people already doing it to join with.
I had a similar situation.
It depends on what you want to get out of your career.
It depends on what you want, really.
It depends on what they are.
I don't want to tell you what to do, but 13 is older than you think.
This is a really good question.
This is probably not a good idea but I will suggest it anyhow.
My recommendation is not to say anything, and do the best you can.
Do you have a team/company wiki?
If you do it, be sure to read what you sign.
There are probably two main things to consider:
I'd say it depends what conditions you have.
I think it depends on what kind of job you are looking for.
All the answers above are all correct.
I really don't know about will it help you, but here is what I do:
You can drop them a line with the correct answers, of course.
But I don't think you'll find that in a restaurant.
It depends on how you use it.
You might try Mapex.
You do not tell if you were required to be at that meeting, but I assume so.
I would go for it.
First and most likely, it is simply historical.
It totally depends what you are doing with it.
I think it is important to understand the environment in the rest of Europe at that time.
You don't have to do anything to season it.
I have the same situation and have traveled extensively.
It depends on how the film is viewed as a whole.
This is a difficult issue to deal with.
I do not think it's a good idea.
You are right on the mark.
It's all about conventions.
The company isn't going to compensate you if you don't have anything to offer.
This is a part answer to your question
You may want it, but the process given to you is what you have to work within.
I have applied thinset over paint many many times.
It is his job to see that you have what you need to do your job.
I would say you can do it, but it wouldn't be advised.
Is this what you are looking for?
I don't know if it's "common" or not.
I don't think there's any real technique for this.
You don't have to prepay.
So how should I do this?
The more you sweat, the faster you will burn calories and fat.
Does this answer your questions?
It depends on how bad the wall is.
I don't see why should there be such a right.
You can still use it for practice.
I can see HR's concern here.
In this case I think it's best to first ask for permission to ask.
If you ask, you may not get but if you don't ask, you don't get.
Yes, you can use a bass bow.
There is nothing wrong in dressing formal.
The almost universal answer for this question is "Talk to your adviser".
However, I don't think there's much you can do about it, either.
You have to do them low and slow.
It's not going to be a problem if you can talk about it in the interview.
Actually, I don't want to assume and just tell you what I think would be allowed/disallowed.
I think you will find it hard to do.
That depends on the school and the kid.
I think this depends on the type of Gorgonzola.
It's actually just a minor third.
I agree with SAJ14SAJ.
First, you need to decide what type of squat you want to do:
I don't think there's much you can do.
You should, but you don't have to.
If you can not find the problem, you really need to call in an electrician.
It depends how you're stating it.
I've had this problem while working in a pubs.
Slope the ground away from the house, forget the paint.
It depends on your country.
The sooner you do it the easier it will be.
I have had this problem.
You should tell a good story and sometimes you have to tweak reality/history to do so.
It depends on how the film is viewed as a whole.
If it adheres well, then you know what you'll have to do.
This can work well.
You can, but you probably shouldn't.
I think it will be useful
If you think the product isn't what you want, don't buy it.
If you forget to mention something, you'll need to spot a chance to work it in later.
Unless this is someone you know already, I'd say that you probably shouldn't ask.
What kind of homework is it?
What makes you say that?
I think you have a plan, and if you stick to it you should be doing good.
If, however, you don't think that you can do the job - don't apply.
Yes, there is a reason to not do what you propose.
It depends on what you want to be able to do.
Really it's up to you.
As to what you can do, probably not much.
It all depends on context.
You are not required to file a tax return in Canada if you have no taxable income.
But really, it depends on how you plan to use it.
I don't see why that should be a problem.
There really isn't any good ways that I'm aware of.
If you don't mind the extra weight, I would say definitely go for it.
I think this is a common situation.
The answer to the question in the title of your post is, "it depends."
In my mind it's a case of "do what you like".
If what you are looking for is much higher, they get the picture.
It depends on how they are dried.
Yes, there is a reason for it.
There are several things you can do:
Yes, that is the supply line.
I have stayed in a hostel in Switzerland.
I guess it really depends on your own beliefs and situation.
The answer to your question is not really.
If you want to really find your style, you have to work for it.
Here is a simple answer:
I don't think you can validate the ticket on the train itself.
I want to guarentee you that you'll have a really rough time if you get giardia.
Here's what I think you should do.
I've looked for them.
The best thing to do is to overcome the fussiness.
Could it be Ark?
There are a few things I don't understand:
I wouldn't say it is necessarily wrong, but it would be a little strange.
If it adheres well, then you know what you'll have to do.
It depends on the sauce and the result you want.
The answer you are looking for is in the name of the building.
Do you have to legally pay for it?
Yes, it is a real issue.
The bigger it is, the more you want to do it.
It depends on how many calories you consume.
I think you're looking for Awaken (2012).
It varies a lot - and by type of writing.
If you don't know, get an electrician.
What should you do?
Know what roles you want to go for, versus the ones that you don't.
Seems to work pretty well, although I've mostly used it for cutting.
I don't think there is a general accepted definition.
In general, the larger/heaver the items, the more it costs no matter how you send it.
You have to do what is right for you.
Probably not a good idea.
Saying "thanks, I don't have any questions at the moment."
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
The mentor will have to know you well to tell you what is best for you.
There are lots of ways to do this.
Depends on the legal environment where you are.
Self defense is legal as far as I know.
You do not have to do it and there is no need to do it.
If the environment is such that it is inappropriate, you can always take it off.
Some situations require you to use the thumb, but I don't think this is the case.
What you need is a good reason to get out of bed.
If that is the case then you cannot bury it.
It doesn't matter unless it is really far off.
You don't have to know.
Is it dependent on the food in the pan?
Depends on the program and FF status.
Partly depends on where you are going.
Short answer It varies.
I'm a huge fan of the Fisher Space Pen.
(But for that, I don't think you have to do them in the morning.
The simple answer is no.
The best way to learn is to do it.
I'm a huge fan of the Fisher Space Pen.
There isn't anything you need to do about this.
I've been using polyurethane for 40 years or more.
As low as you can get away with.
You PROBABLY don't have any chance at the moment.
It depends how you're stating it.
Interesting question but ultimately the answer is no.
How many do you need to do?
I am not sure this is the right site for the question.
I think you're looking for the movie
If you don't ask for what you want, you will not likely get it.
No, I don't think you should contact the editor.
This depends on the country.
No, it makes no difference.
So if that's what you need, you really do have to be explicit about it.
I think this depends on the type of Gorgonzola.
If you don't know, get an electrician.
What should I do about this?
I don't think this will work very well.
Can you do this?
I really don't think there's any significance to that.
I agree with phil above.
Share it if you want to, don't share it if you don't want to.
I think it is okay to ask the question.
I'm going to be blunt, here: You don't.
Yes, you can do exactly what you want to do.
The heavier you can lift, the better your technique has to be to do it.
The problem is that air must be removed so that the food is not insulated from the water.
I don't think it makes much difference.
What kind of form is it?
I don't think you should.
I agree with Jolenealaska.
I don't think there's necessarily a connection issue.
Yes, you should include all of your relevant experience.
It depends on your country.
It will become easier the more you do it.
I don't think there is any other solution that the one you are adopting.
I'm afraid I don't have an answer to the salt question.
I had the same question as well.
You may have to experiment and find what you like.
I'm a bit confused to the "no brainer" type of question that this is.
You should prime it first.
My conclusion was that, if he had wanted to kill her he would have.
It's the order of pouring, not how the drink looks.
I wouldn't do it, particularly on the first day.
I'm afraid there's not really a lot you can do.
If, however, you don't think that you can do the job - don't apply.
This really depends on your twins.
You don't have to leave to see what others will pay you.
What kind of floors are above?
As far as I know, there is no legal standard for a check.
If this isn't the case, then take with a grain of salt.
Tell her, if she doesn't want to be, then she's not.
It likely depends on what shape you want to store them in.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
But I think really the only choice you have is to be the best person you can be.
Your best bet is research.
I guess it depends on the nature of your contract.
You've answered your own question already.
I agree with many of the above comments.
I would call it a custard, I think, if not only for want of a better word.
think about what is next best option you can do to excel.
Find out what he would need to see from you to accept you on to the team.
Sounds to me like you have a choice.
I have this problem, too.
The answer to this one is 'it depends on you'
What should I do about this?
You definitely don't have to.
To answer your question: it depends on the department and if you can find a supervisor.
No, it is not true.
I don't think there is any universal term.
There are a few minimally-effective things you can do at the personal level.
But if you don't want to quit, the above are your options, as I see it.
There are numerous ways.
I don't think there's much you can do.
The goal of course is to get the temperature down as quickly as possible.
You don't have to retire.
In addition to the other answers:
This is a good start.
It depends on how good you want to be.
You don't have to know.
Something like this is useful:
There is no reason to worry.
Yes, I believe it's a good idea.
This is what you are wanting.
If not, don't do that and spend that time with something you like to do.
I would suggest dumbbell flys instead.
I never use it.
I think you should do both.
Take a look at these:
It's all about adhesion.
I don't know where you would buy it but it would be really easy to pour it.
If you do not have a very strong scientific reason to do it, don't.
It is the way you walk.
Couple possibilities I can think of:
This isn't a bad thing, but you do need to be aware of the choices you make.
It very much depends on the grant in question.
But it's still useful to "just know" them, and that will happen with experience.
The above are all good points.
Don't rewrite unless you have to.
This makes perfect sense.
You have to know what you want to do.
Personally, I would say not unless it suits you.
I don't know what is better, but I think it depends on where you want to publish.
Can you do it?
If they don't respond to e-mail, I'd try to give them a call.
I've done this many dozens of times.
You should go with 3.
You can do it, too.
If you have papers.
Depends on what your goal is.
I'm pretty sure you're looking for Toy Soldiers (1991).
There are two reasons that I can think of off the top of my head.
I think you should do both.
Not much you can do besides:
It's not your money.
I can think of a few things that you should not look for:
How to do that?
You don't have to worry.
The more you do this, the easier it gets.
I found some link that might be of help to you:
It depends on what you mean by "sufficient".
I've never had a problem with a full passport.
There are many synonyms to but.
I would say it is impossible to know, so don't risk it.
The answer to your question is not really.
You don't, it will not work.
Look - I understand you need to do this quick and you know its wrong to put on vinyl.
The movie you're looking for is most probably Daybreakers.
I think the answer depends strongly on where the money comes from.
What do you want us to say?
I don't think that there is any deletion going on.
You should, but you don't have to.
It really depends on your audience and setting.
I think it would.
There is really no reason against immunisation.
It's definitely just a matter of preference.
It's a good idea to do both.
Have you tried asking your employees?
No, it won't be a problem.
I think that suits you and your tower well.
You can buy it separately online for $12.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
If it's written for the interview, then no, don't.
You could try something like chicken thighs.
Harold McGee discusses this in On Food And Cooking.
This answer is based on experience I did not researched for references.
There are quite a few things you would need to do;
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
I think it's a bad idea.
There is usually no reason not to include something in a thesis.
But if you don't want to quit, the above are your options, as I see it.
It depends on your country.
It depends on what they are.
I think the answer depends widely on where you are looking.
You will also want to remove the seeds.
You could buy a new Fluidmaster.
If the work is in your area of interest/expertise, there is always a potential for conflict of interest.
It may not be clearly understood by the child as a teaching tool, but it is.
You could try something like chicken thighs.
It depends on what you want to achieve.
There is no correct answer.
I would say, unless you know it is safe for cats assume it to be poisonous.
There are a lot of ways that could go poorly for you.
That's not a lot of depth.
Since you have one ticket, you don't have to worry.
I don't think you should be concerned.
I think it is depends on the program.
You don't want that to be your first impression.
Also, are you sure you know what you want to write about?
You can marinate, or brine it, but you don't need to.
You're thinking about it the wrong way.
You're not going to be able to make it out to buy clothes once baby's born.
I don't see why there should be an issue.
It could be a ton if you don't use the deductions you can.
by doing so I run the risk of appearing anti-social and unproductive
It depends on how good you want to be.
I'm a big fan of the fledgling online onetsp.com.
Nepalese citizens require a visa to visit the UK.
It depends on how long it's been out.
Try to always go.
Here are some things you can do to soften the blow:
I don't know what is better, but I think it depends on where you want to publish.
The HarpAndDragon website should be able to help you.
I don't see why this could be a problem.
I really do not think there is much you can do about that.
Some of what you can do:
Yes you got it.
I don't think there's much you can do here.
Although it's possible to do what you're asking I wouldn't recommend it.
Since you have one ticket, you don't have to worry.
Remember this is your degree we are talking about, its up to you what you want to do.
How should you do that?
I don't think that there's any.
I'm pretty certain we have a very similar question here, but I can't find it...
It depends on how bad the wall is.
You don't have to be happy about.
I don't think it is inappropriate.
It depends on how the cheese is made.
I don't think that there's any.
Yes, you need to file a tax return.
The answer depends on where you are.
You do not need to worry.
I am in a similar situation.
If you aren't getting that, what is the purpose of watching it in the first place.
my fridge had exactly the same problem and it turned out to be a failing relay.
Yes, you can do exactly what you want to do.
It is not a good idea.
There is always time to do what you want to do.
You don't have to know.
What is your paper for?
All of the answers to date are good.
You don't need sauce at all.
Depends on where you are.
It really depends on your audience and setting.
I have had the same problem.
It's just practice and perseverance.
I'm not 100% sure, but it sounds like you're referring to Explorers.
It depends on what you want to be able to do.
If you have too much to do, you turn it down.
Work with your supervisor and your team to solve the problem.
It's up to you what you want to do next.
This is a question with no answer.
It depends on the room temperature where you live.
It depends how you're stating it.
First of all, ask yourself if you really want to work for the company in the long run.
A couple things to consider:
What would the lumber-jack need to be like to make a good story out of this idea?
I have just had the same problem.
It depends on your company.
I would not recommend gluing it.
So I think it up to you.
I agree with Jolenealaska.
Don't rewrite unless you have to.
It's just worn out and not safe.
It depends on how bad the wall is.
So I think it up to you.
It is up to you.
You need to learn to use Components in SketchUp; they do exactly what you want.
I agree with the others.
A couple of good reasons.
What kind of homework is it?
"How do you want to stop me?
I don't think it makes much difference.
I don't think that there's any.
Depends on what your goal is.
My answer to your question is "Probably Not".
It all depends on your goal.
It's just worn out and not safe.
They have different characteristics, and you'll want to decide what's important to you.
It depends on how the cheese is made.
I don't know about direct, but you could do it in two legs.
It depends on the circuit you do.
I don't think there's any problem with this at all.
As I have said, most librarians will not be able to do the search for you.
So I think it up to you.
It doesn't have anything to do with intellect or knowing that you are actually spending money.
Another thing to consider is salt..
If, however, you don't think that you can do the job - don't apply.
I would suggest Markdown.
Then decide if you really want to get involved and how you want to approach it.
I don't have to tell you."
I don't think there's a good answer to your question.
If you decide to work 12hrs/day but get tired, then you'll need to factor in rest time.
This is a good thing.
At the moment, there's nothing you can do about what already has happened.
How do I do that?
It depends on what you are reading.
I'm thinking it's a bad idea.
It depends on what you want to get out of your career.
A lot of good answers already.
I wouldn't put this job on my resume.
If you don't have a degree, you will need to prove it in some other way.
This is a difficult one.
I don't want to tell you what to do, but 13 is older than you think.
Don't worry, you can do it.
It depends on the employer.
If you do, if you skip a session, you won't need to adjust your food intake.
I don't know what is better, but I think it depends on where you want to publish.
I would say it depends.
If he escalates it, or simply won't stop, then you can go to your manager.
I have been in a similar situation.
Even if you aren't the person's boss, you can do this.
One, I'm not sure where I am.
Some of the things I do:
What kind of work is it that you want to do?
The answer to that question is yes.
I think you're looking for the movie
It depends on your country.
If they don't already know, what credibility do you have to tell them.
Yes, you can use it.
I'm going through this exact same problem.
The only thing I could find is this one, it's not clear glass though.
This is very important.
Unfortunately that's how it is.
However, there are some things you can do:
To directly answer the two questions in your title.
Valid reasons to feel the way you do, but not a reason to resign.
You'll have to restore your confidence in yourself because no one is going to do it for you.
I've had good luck with the Iron Gym Pull Up bar.
As far as I know no active fan is required by code in laundry rooms.
I don't know if you're still watching this question, so I'll be brief.
I agree with Oded's answer and would like to add one important step.
It depends on how the term is used I think.
So, CAN you do this?
Thanks for all the suggestions.
does not need to be cited.
It depends on what exactly you're doing.
Of course this is a good idea.
Probably the first thing to do is realize that no two people are actually identical.
I don't think there is an answer for this.
There are a couple things you can try.
Simple advice is to take singing lessons.
You may want it, but the process given to you is what you have to work within.
It depends on how much work you want to do.
It's a good idea.
It's not a spectator sport.
You don't have equipments/facilities to do research in B.
If we ask you to do something, it's because we want you to be happy.
You've pretty much answered your own question.
When buying a car, don't think of it as investment but rather as a luxury.
There are a few things I don't understand:
You know that isn't my reason.
my mom always told me a little bit of baking soda.
The more you sweat, the faster you will burn calories and fat.
I have to ask, why would you want to add water?
I have worked on a project similar to this.
From what you have written you do not seem to be so.
I don't think it makes much difference.
It depends on what you want to say/imply.
if you don't know when or how to clean it.
You've got it right.
You don't need to prove it.
There is always time to do what you want to do.
You pretty much answered your own question.
It really depends on your usage.
No, you should not worry.
You may be able to, but I wouldn't recommend it.
Can they do this?
It sounds like you don't know what you are doing with regards to electricity.
A couple of good reasons.
You can do it, too.
If this is the case, you really don't need to be as worried about steak.
I had the same problem as you.
I just had the same problem.
If you do want to help but want to be paid.
Some of the things I do:
But you don't need to really.
What you can do:
You don't need sauce at all.
Yes, there is a reason for it.
Yes, although they can be a bit sour.
I would say that it is unethical.
I don't have to tell you."
I'd like to suggest Google Docs.
I don't think you should be conveying this, but rise to the opportunity instead.
Also, if you die, you don't have to repay, don't know if it helps.
Basically, if you have to hide this from the boss it's a problem.
I would look at this way:
I think there are two things you need to consider.
I must ask you, are you sure this is what you want to do?
I think you will find it hard to do.
Sure you can have one, no one is going to arrest you for putting it in.
You're on the right path.
'Cause if you don't, no one's going to pay you to use the universe.
The problem is the tools.
I'll answer this question:
You should, but you don't have to.
Have you considered moleskin?
No, I don't think you should contact the editor.
It will get better.
Also, I don't think it's a matter of being "junior".
They are very similar, but not the same.
I'll answer this question:
As for saying you can't do something, I think it depends on how you say it.
Have a look at these:
I think it really depends on your recipe.
The best thing you can do is shop around, and tell your current company that you're shopping.
This is an older question, but I thought I'd give my 2 cents:
The simple answer is yes!
To do this you need to learn about what you are investing in.
Most of all, you need to decide what you want out of a salary and go from there.
From my own personal experience, I don't think you need to force the issue.
Volcanic water is not a problem.
Some of the things I do:
It depends on how bad the wall is.
It is up to you.
I don't think there are any benefits.
Probably not a good idea.
It is up to you whether you want to do that.
If you think you lack the experience for the position then you're not going to get it.
This is a hard one.
The Joker doesn't care about money.
Have you already seen this?
In Thailand, it depends on where you'll be going.
Don't think of it as insurance for you in case you can't pay.
And the good thing is, that when you will have your own children you can cancel the subscription.
So I don't think you need to put it on the cover.
I don't think that there's any.
If it's on the same ticket, it's not your problem.
You have a good job, and you need to do the work you are hired to do.
I personally don't think there is any harm.
Concentration - focus on one thing at a time so as to do each task better and faster.
It is difficult, if not impossible, to give a complete answer to this question.
Your best bet is research.
I don't think you should use a software.
You don't have to worry.
This gives you the opportunity to make your case that you really do have expertise in XXX.
You work on it slowly.
You shouldn't need to let everyone know.
If you know your stuff, then you don't have to argue that you learn fast.
There is no safety reason to do so.
You can do it.
That IS worth the effort.
It is more deciding what you should do and what you should get others to do.
You have to decide how much you want to demand, and what unmet demands you can live with.
If you don't ask for what you want, you will not likely get it.
You do not need to worry.
Yes, it is hard to publish in a peer reviewed journal.
If you do speak to her, be aware that she is not going to immediately agree with you.
You don't need any visa.
If this is what you mean by parquet, I don't suggest it.
If this is it, you don't need to add sugar at all.
I do not think there is any difference.
I agree with phil above.
Your friend should ask his boss to confirm what he wants to do in writing.
A postdoc is a time limited academic job, a PhD is a research student position.
We had the same problem and it turned our to be due to the temperature changes in the fridge.
Don't worry, Germans are usually polite.
So if that's what you need, you really do have to be explicit about it.
But, my bet is that you are not going to be successful.
There are a couple things you can do:
Yes, you should make a résumé.
Maybe it doesn't.
You shouldn't feel any obligation at all.
If you haven't done your homework, you shouldn't be in the meeting.
I think this is what you are looking for : http://en.ardennes-etape.be/tourism-in-the-ardennes.
I think it probably depends on your money.
This sound like a very bad idea.
The best information I was able to find the answer is: NO.
I think that's a great plan.
If you think the product isn't what you want, don't buy it.
How lonely it is!
You don't have to leave to see what others will pay you.
Look - I understand you need to do this quick and you know its wrong to put on vinyl.
I think it's just a habit.
It depends on where you live and what your situation is.
Two options I can think of:
I've cooked this several times.
I don't think there is a precise interpretation of italics.
i think it depends what you want:
If you don't follow-up, then you are someone that will say one thing and not do it.
http://www.flightstats.com/go/FlightRating/flightRatingByRoute.do I think thats what you're looking for
I don't see any starch on the list.
Other than that you don't have a tax issue.
There's no rule against it.
What are you goals?
Depends on what your goal is.
But I don't think you'll find that in a restaurant.
What you should do is up to you.
The sooner you do it the easier it will be.
I do this too.
This is not the answer you want but I have to get it out of my chest.
The bigger it is, the more you want to do it.
You don't need to prepare in any special way for such interview.
It depends on your country.
So I think it up to you.
There's no VAT in the US.
What you want to say is that you read a lot.
You do not need to worry.
I am 13 and in this situation.
If nothing happens, you need to sit down and think about what you want to do next.
Do you have any flexibility with your hours at work?
If you're going to go for well done, you might want to consider a braise.
I don't think you can.
The above answers are all correct.
You just have to base your answer on what you do know, which is what you want.
Do you want to know the answer?
Depends on what your goal is.
No, as far as we know to this moment it is not.
You don't have to know.
You may deserve every dime of the money you ask for but that's not the point.
I don't think there's much you can do here.
You pretty much answered your own question.
All of the answers to date are good.
Some of the things I do:
You need to spend a lot of time and do so frequently.
I think it depends on the piece and on what it's for.
I'm going to be very direct here.
I'm really not qualified to respond to the second part of your question.
If you know something the market doesn't that's going to be good for price, hold.
I would recommend you to do three things about this:
Depends on the place where you apply for.
There are brackets for this type of thing:
You do not need a transit visa, but to enter Zurich you will need a visa.
If she doesn't like it, she can find something for you to do.
I don't think that there's any.
It is up to you.
No, you don't need a transit visa.
It depends on the circuit you do.
Hot or not? Now turn the main on, and B2 off.
It depends on what you want to have in your tank.
I don't think it makes much difference.
A lot of it has to do with your programming.
A few things to think about:
You don't have to know.
Voltron is the name of the show you're looking for
I think this is one of those things where you are just out of luck.
Point is: know what you want and don't be afraid to ask for it.
If she really wants to do it, I wouldn't try to hold her back.
I guess it depends on the nature of your contract.
I would avoid putting it in the dough as it will change the texture.
I also think it depends on your living situation.
You have to know what you want to do.
This varies by institution.
It very much depends on the program.
A similar question to this was asked over the last couple of weeks.
I don't think that there's any.
You may want to find a partner to write with.
I have the same problem.
Some of what you can do:
I've done this in a similar situation.
I have the exact same problem.
I don't think it makes much difference.
If you have too much to do, you turn it down.
You need to ask your boss what you need to do to get the promotion you want.
It depends on your local corporate culture.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
I don't think there's much you can do.
The answer depends on where you are.
You're right on about the sample definition.
You don't have to configure anything.
There is no way to win it.
I am not a veterinarian.
Is the movie you are looking for Unknown.
The simple answer is yes!
If you don't follow-up, then you are someone that will say one thing and not do it.
You are on the right path.
If not, the kindest thing you can do is to let them go.
There is no reason for the professor to shout.
I don't think that this temperature range should be a problem for the spirits.
Nope that will not work.
If you really want it, you will change your habits to get the time.
I agree with the other answers here.
The card you have is fine.
As you can see here, you can do it with a chef's knife.
I don't know if that will work, but it certainly isn't the traditional method.
I don't know the whole algorithm, but I found the formula you'd need to derive it.
The best thing you can do is find something else interesting to do while you wait on hold.
It's mostly a matter of taste.
I agree with the other posters.
This really depends on your twins.
It really depends on the hostel you book.
Personally when I was in a similar situation I sent the couple a card and a gift.
I think it's unprofessional to ask for a one off payment.
I have the same issue.
Interesting question but ultimately the answer is no.
Take a look at creative nonfiction.
You are not a runner.
If you don't follow-up, then you are someone that will say one thing and not do it.
But the simplest thing you can do is to try it out.
In the first case, I think you don't need it.
I think this is not such a good idea.
Code share flight have two numbers, one for each airlines.
try to write all the things down you need to do, that will definitely be a help.
I think it depends very much on what you mean by "have to decline".
There is no answer.
I would not recommend gluing it.
This is not something strange.
Yes, you can do it.
You are the one asking for reassignment and will get what is available if there is something.
I don't think there's any problem with this at all.
I have never used extruders, but I make a lot of tagliatelle using my pasta roller.
Depends a little on your field.
Here's how I have worked it out.
You can try http://www.holidayen.com/.
I had the same situation.
You have to find out what works for you.
Again depending on your needs, you will have to pick what is best for you.
And it's not a qualification.
There are two things to consider:
But if you owe money, you don't get to decide that.
There are several options:
This is very subjective but I think charcoal grilled food is better.
I don't think you should quit.
If you have a story to tell, it should be possible to tell that story in your setting.
Look - I understand you need to do this quick and you know its wrong to put on vinyl.
My first suggestion would be a "dutch oven" at a low temperature.
There are two options for you -
I think the answer depends strongly on where the money comes from.
There is no name for it that I'm aware of.
Use an arrangement that makes sense to you.
It depends on how it's used.
It depends on what you are reading.
As you can see in this simple example there is a lot of information.
I have just had the same problem.
It really depends on your audience and setting.
This recipe just has a lot of liquid in you can see her dressing is very fluid.
You could probably get a tour agency to do it for you but it would cost you.
It might alter the way you perform.
You have to do them low and slow.
In general, it's better if you don't use them.
You don't know what your manager wants from you.
Do you want to know the answer?
They just don't want you to know it.
I do not know the difference.
You don't even need to tape it, so what if it cracks.
You don't HAVE to make that mistake, so DON'T.
If you want to build wealth, you're doing it wrong.
It's really up to you.
I've had the same problem once.
It is important to keep the story in the scope of your limit.
Focus on what you need the scene to do.
I don't think it is fair on the employer to pay you to do that.
I suggest that you make it how you think it would be done.
It depends on where you are in the world.
I believe this is the answer to both questions:
The problem is the tools.
You may want to bring a phrase book to help you with greetings and simple phrases.
That's roughly along the lines of what I'd do anyways.
I think it's a bad idea.
No, it's not a good thing.
There are a few things you can do to thicken your sauce:
If you think you lack the experience for the position then you're not going to get it.
you have a couple of options:
It depends on the reason.
You want to show progression in responsibilities on your resume, and it looks like you have that.
If you are depressed enough that you don't feel you have friends, find a counselor.
It really depends on how much you play.
I think it is depends on the program.
I wouldn't advise you what to do with your resume, it's up to you.
What you should do is up to you.
I think it's impossible to give a definitive answer to that question.
This is not uncommon in a water heater.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
Actually I think it's here:
Also if you want to get a bit stronger/muscular you will need to increase your physical activity.
It shouldn't hurt you to tell C and they might give you the time you want.
I think it's a bad idea.
You need to pick how and where you want to place your foot and do it.
All the answers above are great.
This is a big problem.
I've had good luck baking naan on an indoor grill.
This is how you learn to read papers.
Some of the things you can do to help are:
The simple answer is no.
If I were you, I'd do the following.
If the conversation is not about work, you know what the answer is to your own question.
It's not a problem:
This depends a bit on what you are applying for.
Then decide if you really want to get involved and how you want to approach it.
This cannot be answered in general.
You don't need to have proof, you're just reporting what you noticed.
There is no quarantine period.
As for saying you can't do something, I think it depends on how you say it.
Just off the top of my head, I thought of:
This isn't a bad thing, but you do need to be aware of the choices you make.
What you should do is up to you.
I would recommend looking at The Motley Fool.
Your performance may be great, but it means nothing if you are not in the office.
I don't think there is a single definition.
(But for that, I don't think you have to do them in the morning.
The answer depends on where you are.
You don't have to worry.
I think you're looking for the movie
Not a good idea.
other: "can you show me how to do this?"
You don't have to worry.
However, this may not be a DIY job.
It depends on your country.
You're probably going to have to read various blogs to get all the information you want.
The problem is that you're using a lid.
The short answer to your question is "maybe", but probably not.
I don't know what would be useful at your company, but something in that direction.
Other than that it won't make a difference which one you pick.
The first thing you're going to want to do is read and read a lot.
It's all about adhesion.
I agree with the above.
Don't worry, you can do it.
Microwave would be your best bet.
But it is not a good idea.
I don't see any problem with the grammar of this.
If you have too much to do, you turn it down.
No it was not a hallucination.
I don't know that I'd do this myself.
Depends on what your goal is.
I have exactly the same problem.
I am afraid that this is a visa scam.
I don't think it really matters exactly what happened.
Yes, it can be done.
It has nothing to do with SE really.
I don't think you should.
The answer to your question is not really.
But it is not a good idea.
I don't understand why there should be a problem.
If you want to really find your style, you have to work for it.
So if that's what you need, you really do have to be explicit about it.
I have the same problem.
You should alternate strength training and HIIT, better not do them on the same day.
Do you have a title?
), but the intervals between them are not the same.
I think it's just a habit.
I think you will find it hard to do.
I don't know what is better, but I think it depends on where you want to publish.
The short answer is no, you don't need it.
It does not sound at all normal to me.
What you need to consider is how you do other things in life.
You should never do it.
Sometimes I'm in a similar situation.
I had the same issue.
This depends on exactly what equpiment you're using.
Share it if you want to, don't share it if you don't want to.
There are several things you need to do.
Patents are the way to go if you have to make money from a smart idea in the academia.
I think it's just a habit.
I believe the movie you are looking for is Embrace Of The Vampire
This is a bad idea.
I don't think that you need a saw at all.
It's a really good read.
There is always things to do, even if you think there is not.
They just don't want you to know it.
If you find a publisher of such works, that's the place to start.
I would say that the answer is yes.
A couple things to consider:
This is a good question.
I don't think there's a good reason for it.
I don't think there's any one universal norm here.
You don't have to know.
But you don't need to really.
I think what you are seeing could be fluoride that is put in the water by the utility company.
just take a look at the tail..!
(I may not have to do these things, but I should be able to.)
It depends on what they are.
Other than that you don't have a tax issue.
Share it if you want to, don't share it if you don't want to.
It depends on the age of your child:
I don't think you can rescue it, but you can use it.
Unfortunately, there isn't much you can do.
You can call and ask, but you are unlikely to get anything useful.
It depends on your country.
Short and quick answer: definitely the Romans were NOT the first.
Even if you do end up leaving, you don't know how long it will be.
I've been researching for years.
That being said it is definitely up to you to make the most of your situation.
My guess is that your child will do fine.
It shows you know what you want and you have a good reason to be interested in the school.
This is not necessarily an issue.
Is this the kind of thing you're looking for ?
I think there are two important things to consider:
I think the answer depends strongly on where the money comes from.
The answer to both questions is: Yes.
I recommend Amazon for you.
If you don't follow-up, then you are someone that will say one thing and not do it.
I think you need to be fair.
There really isn't any downside that I'm aware of.
If you focus on what you want to do, you'll find an employer that needs that.
If you just want to do it to promote your books, it probably won't work.
And you CAN do your own thing, and you DON'T need to worry about failing at it.
As part of the, Why do you want to work for this company?
Yes, there is a chemical difference.
I agree with the earlier answers.
I'm assuming the following:
Relax, you don't need to do anything.
Do you need to incorporate?
I am in a similar situation, and I believe you are correct.
I've done this many dozens of times.
There are two obstacles:
How you do that is up to you.
It is up to you.
There are a few things you need to consider:
Short answer is yes.
If you want to do it you should do it completely.
This is what I'd do:
If you put in the work, then you have every right to mention that you did the work.
The hard answer is a straight no.
The answer depends on where you are.
Also, are you sure you know what you want to write about?
The answer to both questions is: Yes.
However, depending on your local laws, you may be required to have a separate business account.
If the problem is not copyrightable, then you can do whatever you wish.
I think it would.
I have this habit as well.
It depends on your country.
You don't HAVE to make that mistake, so DON'T.
This is a question with no answer.
What I do is this:
That's what it did cost.
Depends on the place where you apply for.
Additionally, you can tie a rope to the other end of the brush before you pull it back.
There is no particular restriction against as far as I have known and seen.
I think you have a valid reason to take the other job, if that's what you want.
You don't need to oil it.
I don't think that the paycheck address is the determining factor.
if you want something done, do it yourself.
It is up to you whether you want to do that.
Ask your colleagues to use them.
This is what I'd do:
It's just how long you dry them.
This is a part answer to your question
It will be heavily dependent on the country.
I recently watched this and thought exactly the same thing.
I cannot think of a great reason why you would want to do this.
There are a few things I think you should do.
Ok i've done a research.
You do not need to say "You are wrong."
You don't have to be happy about.
There is always time to do what you want to do.
It depends on what and where you are going to do.
This may not be the case for you, so do what your body tells you to do.
Most of the time that's what you want for a good dish.
I don't know the credentials of this site, so take it with a grain of salt.
I do not think there's any appreciable difference.
http://www.kyleswitchplates.com/push-button-light-switches/ will get you what you are looking for
Well, there is always the possibility.
ClearJel is a product you may want to look at.
It depends on your country.
You don't HAVE to make that mistake, so DON'T.
If you don't want to do Android, it shouldn't be on your resume.
I don't think there is any truth in that saying.
You have to know what you want to do.
It sounds like you're behind on a payment.
Is it a one-off?
Yes, it is a real issue.
It depends on your country.
You really shouldn't have a problem.
There are a few reasons that paint wrinkles.
I had to do the same thing.
If you have a high leptin sensitivity you probably need to eat a lot more than you do now.
I do, it works marvellously for me.
There are a couple things you can do:
Yes, you can do that.
There are only three options:
Think of it this way.
Take them to a professional.
Maybe this can work for you.
For me it looks quite simple:
This is very important.
There is no official government page.
No, you should not worry.
They can, but the way to do it depends on what you have available.
This would be a bad idea.
Your main question has been pretty well answered, but I'd like to clarify a few points:
Only if you know (or have reason to suspect) that not doing so would be a detriment.
No, I don't think it's possible to do that.
It completely depends on what type of work you intend to do.
Microwave would be your best bet.
Your best bet is research.
You don't have to prepay.
I think you should do both.
This will depend on the university.
I had the same problem.
This is a reasonable concern, but not necessarily a problem.
The more practice you do the better you will be at it.
I wouldn't bring it up.
I agree with everything Matthew G. has said.
I don't think anyone is giving you the answer you're looking for.
I think it depends how fussy a presentation you are working on.
They just don't want you to know it.
It's not just a good idea, it's an excellent idea.
No, you cannot do that.
Do you need to incorporate?
I had the same problem as you.
Going in to a interview it is important to ask questions that make people THINK.
I think this is a good way to do it.
If it's just for home use and your own enjoyment, then you can do what you want.
Treat it like an investment account.
I think this depends on what level you are teaching at.
You need to read a lot to know what you like and what you don't.
They can, but the way to do it depends on what you have available.
I'm a huge fan of the Fisher Space Pen.
I'm a fan of http://www.writersbeat.com myself.
I don't think there is a single term for your situation, so my answer is none.
I don't think there's a good answer to your question.
You want the 18k to be there when you need it for the down payment.
For once, I think it's possible to give a general opinion.
If you don't have enough budget then, we'll, you should.
It depends what you want to do with them.
I don't think you can re-use the bones and expect to get a good product, no.
No you are not.
There are a few minimally-effective things you can do at the personal level.
I Agree with Jefromi.
No, you will not need special paperwork or to collect your bags.
I had this same situation.
I don't know of a program.
Can you do this?
Depends on what your goal is.
It'll depend on the coach.
Not a good idea.
I think it depends in large part on what the research is.
I can think of two possible explanations:
I think it is depends on the program.
I know this is an old question but I feel I should add my 2 cents.
I think there are a couple of things that might help.
There are a few possible reasons.
Yes, there is a chemical difference.
To my knowledge, there's no time requirement.
This is becoming more common in the UK, but I'd hang fire as it works two ways.
You don't have to know.
You say you do not know what to write.
Depends on the place where you apply for.
A couple of other options for mind-mapping software:
I'm pretty sure you've already considered this, but just in case you haven't...
You don't have to know.
I can think of two suggestions:
You check how important it is for you and your boss that you go to the seminar.
Do you have a car?
A few things I learned:
You don't have to do anything to season it.
I've had good luck with the Iron Gym Pull Up bar.
There is no code telling you that you cannot do this.
I don't think there's much truth in this claim.
If they do not ask you to qualify your speaking ability, then do not worry about it.
The answer to this one is 'it depends on you'
If you want to really find your style, you have to work for it.
Sometimes the problem is in what you are avoiding to do.
I think the number one thing you can do is plan your internships appropriately.
I would think not.
If you ask, you may not get but if you don't ask, you don't get.
The best way to do this is to use IRR.
Yes, you should talk to your professor.
I do not think there's any appreciable difference.
Some things to check:
I have exactly the same problem.
You don't need sauce at all.
I had this problem before.
I have been in a similar situation.
If it's the second, I have no idea how to help you.
I'll have that report ready for you by the end of the day
I think you are misreading the picture.
What you want to say is that you read a lot.
You don't have to badmouth him.
Seems your best bet would be to use resistance bands.
You have to find out what works for you.
I think I would just ignore it.
You can do it, too.
(But for that, I don't think you have to do them in the morning.
Depends on what flavours exactly you are going for.
is it this one?
I'd add a few things to hobodave's response:
If you can afford the help of a personal trainer, go for one.
Here are the obvious things:
It's all in how you ask the question.
This really depends on your twins.
To the best of my knowledge, there's no firm date requirement.
Take a look at creative nonfiction.
There's not a lot you can do about that.
I don't know if you're working hard, but many people are.
They are not nominative.
Don't you hate that?
There is no universally-agreed way to do it.
Absolutely say you have something to declare.
But really, it depends on how you plan to use it.
It depends on how it's used.
This is a part answer to your question
It really isn't your problem how they are going to find a qualified person to do the job.
At this stage the best thing for you to do is probably rest.
If you have the willingness, then you can do it yourself.
I am not entirely sure this is the right place to answer those questions.
Most of the work you will need to do for this is during the day.
We don't know the brothers were wrong.
It highly depends on the discipline.
And I think its a good way to deal with situation like this.
You can do it.
Here's what I found.
What sort of brush is it?
I don't know where you live, but in the UK, they legally have to be.
No, you don't need a transit visa.
I disagree with the other answers.
There really isn't any good ways that I'm aware of.
A contact is valuable to you if you think that he could be helpful to you down the line.
This is a really bad idea.
It really depends on your audience and setting.
You need to do whatever you most want to improve on first.
I used the recipe on this website for my first time making yogurt.
Not that this is a direct answer to your specific question, but it may be a solution.
I always freeze it.
So if that's what you need, you really do have to be explicit about it.
It depends on what you want to do next, and where you want to do it.
The answer is related to what you are connecting, and how you know your boss.
Not a real answer to your question, but maybe it helps.
"I used to do it a lot," I explained, "when I was a kid.
You have to stop them at the source.
But it is not a good idea.
You have not quite mentioned what kind of work you would want to do.
There are two options for you -
It depends on the fine print.
I think you're looking for the movie
I was recently in a similar situation.
Let them know that it is ok to come to you any time they have questions in the future.
This is how I suspect the circuit is wired, but you'll have to investigate to be sure.
If you are not sure how to do it, don't do it at all.
As long as you don't block off the vent at all, you should be fine.
I think you've pretty much answered your own question.
Just to correct a couple of mistakes:
I think there's a good solution to this.
This depends on the equipment that you are using.
Regarding the first question, you might want to check Maxroam.
I agree with the previous comments.
The short answer is :
If the answer to any of these questions is yes, a PhD may be worthwhile for you.
That depends on which country you are in.
It depends on how the cheese is made.
I had the same problem as you.
It is not your job to agree with the decisions but to do your best to make them work.
Apply to the one you think you want, and also describe that you're interested in the other.
Yes Kilz will probably contain it.
I believe this is the episode you are looking for.
Ochef.com answered this question.
The answer you are looking for is in the name of the building.
You are right about the overtaking rules.
This is a bad idea.
I have had the same issue last couple of years.
I don't think that there's any.
If, as you have indicated, you don't want to plan.
